ELECTION TIME: The 9 judges on this body in Alabama, unlike the one in Washington, D.C., run for election
the Supreme Court
The Supreme Court unanimously held that this racial "gerrymandering" violated the Constitution.
3
Exclusion of minorities continued under at-large voting systems in most counties; some changes were made through a series of omnibus court cases in the late 1980s to establish different electoral systems.
This notion was popularized in the 1850s through the writings of Alexander Beaufort Meek.
The current split is 35 Democrats, 31 Republicans, and one Independent Fayette).Alabama Sheriffs Association  However, most of the Democratic sheriffs preside over rural and less populated counties.
GEOGRAPHY: In Egypt & Algeria, some areas of this desert are below sea level
Sahara
Algeria is bordered to the northeast by Tunisia, to the east by Libya, to the west by Morocco, to the southwest by Western Sahara, Mauritania, and Mali, to the southeast by Niger, and to the north by the Mediterranean Sea.
3
In addition, political campaigns must be exempt from the aforementioned subjects.
The Algerian national oil company is Sonatrach, which plays a key role in all aspects of the oil and natural gas sectors in Algeria.
The University of Algiers, founded in 1879, is the oldest, it offers education in various disciplines (law, medicine, science and letters).
TV CHARACTERS: (Hi. I'm Rob Morrow.) As Joel Fleischman, I found myself the only doctor among the weirdos of Cicely, Alaska on this series
Northern Exposure
Many films and television shows set in Alaska are not filmed there; for example, Northern Exposure, set in the fictional town of Cicely, Alaska, was filmed in Roslyn, Washington.
3
Legislation allowing Alaskan communities to legally incorporate as cities did not come about until 1900, and home rule for cities was extremely limited or unavailable until statehood took effect in 1959.
Fuel cost per gallon is routinely 20–30¢ higher than the continental United States average, with only Hawaii having higher prices.
Kalifornsky  CDP  7,850 12  Wasilla  City  7,831 13  Meadow Lakes  CDP  7,570 14  Kenai  City  7,100 15  Steele Creek  CDP  6,662 16  Kodiak  City  6,130 17  Bethel  City  6,080 18
MOVIE "NIGHT": Vampires appear when the sun sets for a month in Alaska in this 2007 film based on a graphic novel
30 Days of Night
The 2007 horror feature 30 Days of Night is set in Barrow, but was filmed in New Zealand.
3
Some of the highest and lowest temperatures in Alaska occur around the area near Fairbanks.
Religious affiliation in Alaska (2014) Affiliation% of population Christian |-
Alaska Communications Coverage Map.
"AE"-NCIENT CROSSWORD CLUES: Sea between Greek peninsula & Asia Minor(6)
the Aegean
Before Greek poetry, the Aegean Sea area was in a Greek Dark Age, at the beginning of which syllabic writing was lost and alphabetic writing had not begun.
3
The first continental use of Asia is attributed to Herodotus (about 440 BC), not because he innovated it, but because his Histories are the earliest surviving prose to describe it in any detail.
These areas remained very sparsely populated.
The story of the Great Flood for example, as presented to Christians in the Old Testament, is first found in Mesopotamian mythology, in the Epic of Gilgamesh.
THE NEW YORK TIMES WEEK IN REVIEW: On Tues., Dec. 9, 2006 the Times said the U.S. would now sell nuclear fuel to this Asia country
India
" It is bounded on the east by the Pacific Ocean, on the south by the Indian Ocean and on the north by the Arctic Ocean.
2
Yet it was not among the region's top performers in improving school enrollment and life expectancy.
thumb|right|Pilgrims in the annual Hajj at the Kaabah in Mecca.
RIVERS: In Arabic, it's Nahr Al-Urdunn
Jordan
It is spoken by about 21 million people in Lebanon, Syria, Jordan, Palestine, Cyprus and Turkey.
3
Nizar Y. Habash,Introduction to Arabic Natural Language Processing, pgs.
emp.
Final long vowels are often shortened, merging with any short vowels that remain.
A RIVER RUNS THROUGH IT: You can have a light beer as you stroll along this river in Amsterdam
the Amstel
The eastern part of the concentric canal plan, covering the area between the Amstel river and the IJ bay, has never been implemented.
3
Founding and Middle Ages
Amsterdam's high-end shops are found in the streets P.C. Hooftstraat and Cornelis Schuytstraat, which are located in the vicinity of the Vondelpark.
The 1949 song "Aan de Amsterdamse grachten" ("On the canals of Amsterdam") was performed and recorded by many artists, including John Kraaijkamp sr.
THE GREAT ABBA: Title of the ABBA hit heard here, it was one of their last:
"The Winner Takes It All"
"The Winner takes it all" & "Super Trouper" ('80).
3
The second leg of the tour, which took them through Scandinavia in January 1975, was very different.
All four members made their final public appearance, as four friends more than as ABBA, in January 1986, when they recorded a video of themselves performing an acoustic version of "Tivedshambo", which was the first song written by their manager, Stig Anderson, for a Swedish TV show honouring Anderson on his 55th birthday.
On 22 January 2009, Fältskog and Lyngstad appeared together on stage to receive the Swedish music award "Rockbjörnen" (for "lifetime achievement").
BIRTH MONTH FLOWERS: As Popeye's adopted baby could tell you, April brings this flower
the sweet pea
The birth flower is typically listed as either the Daisy (Bellis perennis) or the Sweet Pea.
3
He further states that the month was named after a goddess Eostre whose feast was in that month.
April 20 Patriots' Day –
April 30, for the last time celebrated in 2013, now celebrated as Koningsdag at April 27th.
THE BIBLE: This mother of John the Baptist was a descendant of Aaron
Elizabeth
Also see article, Samaritan  The Gospel of Luke records that the priest Zechariah, his wife Elizabeth and therefore their son John the Baptist were descendants of Aaron.
3
In the Hebrew Bible and the Quran, Aaron אַהֲרֹן  (, ) was the older brother of Moses (Exodus 6:16-20, 7:7; Qur'an 28:34,) and a prophet of God.
In this way, the institution of the Aaronide priesthood was established.
The Qur'an then adds that Moses here lamented the sins of Israel and said he only had the power to protect himself and Aaron (Qur'an 5: 25).
THE FAR EAST: In this Buddhist country, April 6 is Chakri Day, a holiday honoring the ruling family
Thailand
King Buddha Yodfa Chulaloke (Rama I) of Siam (modern day Thailand) founds the Chakri dynasty.
3
1979 –
2011 –
Leo Robin, American composer and songwriter (d. 1984) 1901 –
THEATRE: Written in 405 B.C., this comedy by Aristophanes really is all it's "croaked" up to be
The Frogs
We know however from a combination of these sources,D.Welsh, IG ii2 2343, Philonides and Aristophanes' Banqueters, Classical Quarterly 33 (1983) and especially from comments in The KnightsKnights 512-14</ref> and The Clouds,Clouds 530-33 that Aristophanes' first three plays were not directed by him — they were instead directed by Callistratus and Philoneides,Ian Storey, General Introduction, in Clouds, Wasps, Birds By Aristophanes, Peter Meineck (translator), Hackett Publishing 1998, page xiii an arrangement that seemed to suit Aristophanes since he appears to have used these same directors in many later plays as well (Philoneides for example later directed The Frogs and he was also credited, perhaps wrongly, with directing The Wasps.)MacDowell (1971) p.124 Aristophanes's use of directors complicates our reliance on the plays as sources of biographical information because apparent self-references might have been made with reference to his directors instead.
3
.
The butts of the most savage jokes are opportunists who prey on the gullibility of their fellow citizens, including oracle-mongers,e.g.
Aristophanes: Clouds K.J. Dover (ed), Oxford University Press 1970, pages XIII-XIV Foreigners, a conspicuous presence in imperial Athens, particularly at the City Dionysia, often appear in the plays comically mispronouncing Attic words — these include Spartans (Lysistrata), Scythians (Thesmophoriazusae), Persians, Boeotians and Megarians (The Acharnians).
ANCIENT GREECE: Carrying news of a Greek victory, Pheidippides ran from this plain to Athens, about 23 miles
Marathon
In the ensuing Greco-Persian Wars Athens, together with Sparta, led the coalition of Greek states that would eventually repel the Persians, defeating them decisively at Marathon in 490 BC, and crucially at Salamis in 480 BC.
3
Ag.
The length of Athens's commuter rail network extends to , and is expected to stretch to  by 2010.
In 2014, the airport handled 15,196,369 passengers, an increase of 21.2% over the previous year of 2013.
ANCIENT GREECE: In 490 B.C. Pheidippides ran the 25 miles from this battle site to Athens with news of victory over the Persians
Marathon
In the ensuing Greco-Persian Wars Athens, together with Sparta, led the coalition of Greek states that would eventually repel the Persians, defeating them decisively at Marathon in 490 BC, and crucially at Salamis in 480 BC.
2
thumb|left|Suburban rail
In 2000 the Organising Committee's president was replaced by Gianna Angelopoulos-Daskalaki, who was the president of the original Bidding Committee in 1997.
STUPID ANSWERS: At the 2004 Olympics, this event's course will run from Marathon to Athens
Marathon
In the ensuing Greco-Persian Wars Athens, together with Sparta, led the coalition of Greek states that would eventually repel the Persians, defeating them decisively at Marathon in 490 BC, and crucially at Salamis in 480 BC.
3
The decades that followed became known as the Golden Age of Athenian democracy, during which time Athens became the leading city of Ancient Greece, with its cultural achievements laying the foundations of Western civilization.
The expansion is now particularly toward the East and North East (a tendency greatly related to the new Eleftherios Venizelos International Airport and the Attiki Odos, the freeway that cuts across Attica).
Athens hosts 17 Foreign Archaeological Institutes which promote and facilitate research by scholars from their home countries.
YAHWEH: Exodus 3 says Yahweh is "the God of" Abraham, Isaac & this other patriarch
Jacob
() Abraham lived to see his son marry Rebekah, (and possibly to see the birth of his twin grandsons Jacob and Esau).
3
When they entered Egypt, the Pharaoh's officials praised Sarai's beauty to Pharaoh, and she was taken into his palace, and Abraham was given provisions: "oxen, and he-asses, and menservants, and maidservants, and she-asses, and camels".
At this point, the two other visitors left for Sodom.
Thus in Santa Maria Maggiore, Rome, a 5th-century mosaic portrays only the visitors against a gold ground and puts semitransparent copies of them in the "heavenly" space above the scene.
MILESTONE BIRTHDAYS 2008: On August 16 this "Material Girl" became a real middle-aged girl, reaching the half-century mark
Madonna
R. R. Patil, Indian lawyer and politician, Deputy Chief Minister of Maharashtra (d. 2015) 1958 – Madonna, American singer-songwriter, producer, actress, and director   1958   – Angela Bassett, American actress, singer, and producer   1958   – José Luis Clerc, Argentinian tennis player and coach   1958   –
3
–
– Ashikaga Yoshikatsu, Japanese shogun (b. 1434) 1445
Balanadarajah Iyer, Sri Lankan journalist and poet (b. 1957)   2004   –
SCIENCE & NATURE: STP goes into cars; your body's cells are fueled by ATP, short for this triphosphate
adenosine
ATP may refer to:  Adenosine triphosphate, coenzyme used as an energy carrier in the cells of all known organisms; the process in which energy is moved throughout the cell  Association of Tennis Professionals, international men's professional tennis association  Music and theater  Adenosine Tri-Phosphate (band), a Japanese alternative rock/pop band  All Tomorrow's Parties (music festival), a music festival which takes place in Great Britain  Alberta Theatre Projects, a Canadian theatre production company    ATP Recordings, a record label affiliated with the All Tomorrow's Parties festival  Technology  Accidental Tech Podcast (atp.fm), hosted by Marco Arment, John Siracusa and Casey Liss  Automated theorem proving, the proving  of mathematical theorems by a computer program  Advanced Technology Program, a United States government program  Alberta Taciuk process, thermal retorting technology for extracting oil from oil sands, oil shale, and oil contaminated soils / sludges  Transport  Airline Transport Pilot License, a type of pilot's license  ATP Flight School, a flight training school with multiple locations throughout the United States.
1
ATP (treaty), the 1970 Agreement on the International Carriage of Perishable Foodstuffs and on the Special Equipment to be used for such Carriage  Automatic Train Protection, a British train protection system  BAe ATP, a British Aerospace turboprop passenger aircraft designed for the short range market  ATP, IATA airport code of Aitape Airport in Papua New Guinea  Other  American Technical Publishers, an employee-owned publishing company located in Orland Park, Illinois  Anantapur, Andhra Pradesh, a city in Andhra Pradesh, India  Anantapur district, a district in Andhra Pradesh, India  Arbejdsmarkedets Tillægspension, the largest pension program in Denmark  Armenia Tree Project, a non-profit organization promoting Armenia's socioeconomic development through reforestation  Associated Talking Pictures, a British film studio of the 1930s later renamed as Ealing Studios  ATP architects engineers, an international architecture- and engineering office for integrated design  ATP Oil and Gas, a Texas-based oil and gas company that operates in the Gulf of Mexico and the North Sea  Available-to-promise, a business function that provides a response to customer order enquiries  Category:Three-letter disambiguation pages
ARNOLD SCHWARZENEGGER: Arnold's film career took off after he played this sword-wielding comic book hero in 1982
Conan the Barbarian
Schwarzenegger's breakthrough film was the sword-and-sorcery epic Conan the Barbarian in 1982, which was a box-office hit and resulted in a sequel.
3
Schwarzenegger has discussed his early struggles in developing his acting career.
On March 6, 2011, at the Arnold Seminar of the Arnold Classic, Schwarzenegger revealed that he was being considered for several films, including sequels to The Terminator and remakes of Predator and The Running Man, and that he was "packaging" a comic book character.
Awards and honors    1977 Golden Globe Award winner  Star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame  WWE Hall of Fame (Class of 2015, celebrity wing)  WWF Heavyweight Box Office Champion (for End of Days, 1999)  Schwarzenegger Institute for State and Global Policy (part of the USC Sol Price School of Public Policy at the University of Southern California) named in his honor.
NAME THE YEAR: (Jimmy of the Clue Crew in Little Rock, Arkansas)  Little Rock's old state house was the scene of a big election party in this year, exactly 150 after its completion
1992
Arnold 1992, p. 75.
3
Economy right|thumb|upright|The Simmons Tower is the state's tallest building.
Related to the state's frontier past, hunting continues in the state.
Arkansas House members can serve a maximum of three two-year terms.
ARTHUR MILLER: In June 1999 Arthur Miller received a lifetime achievement one of these awards at Radio City Music Hall
a Tony Award
The play was commercially successful and critically acclaimed, winning a Tony Award for Best Author, the New York Drama Circle Critics' Award, and the Pulitzer Prize for Drama.
3
Miller was Jewish.
Miller was sentenced to a $500 fine or thirty days in prison, blacklisted, and disallowed a US passport.<ref name="UMICH_Early"></ref>
Like Death of a Salesman, the book follows the structure of memory itself, each passage linked to and triggered by the one before.
BUSINESS PEOPLE: Thank you Akio Morita, who didn't take over the family sake biz but co-founded this electronics giant instead
Sony
Akio Morita (盛田 昭夫 Morita Akio; 26 January 1921 – 3 October 1999) was a Japanese businessman and co-founder of Sony along with Masaru Ibuka.
3
The book was translated into English and caused controversy in the United States, and Morita later had his chapters removed from the English version and distanced himself from the book.
In 1993, he was awarded an honorary British knighthood (KBE).
References  Further reading Morita, Akio.
THE SPANISH-AMERICAN WAR: The U.S. declared war on April 25, but made it retroactive to April 21, the day before this was ordered on Cuba
Blockade
1898 – Spanish–American War: The United States Navy begins a blockade of Cuban ports.
3
John Cameron Mitchell, American actor, director, and screenwriter 1964 – Alex Baumann, Czech-Canadian swimmer   1964   – Ludmila Engquist, Russian-Swedish hurdler 1965
–
1932 – Friedrich Gustav Piffl, Bohemian cardinal (b. 1864) 1938 –
MARINE BIOLOGY: (Lindblad National Geographic underwater specialist Lisa trotter delivers the clue from Antarctica.) This shrimp-like crustacean is a major link in the Antarctic food chain; from January to April swarms of them may reach concentrations of 35 lbs. per cubic yard
krill
Wildlife  A variety of animals live in Antarctica for at least some of the year, including:  Seals  Penguin  South Georgia pipits  Albatrosses  Antarctic petrels  Whales  Fish, such as Antarctic icefish, Antarctic toothfish  Squid, including the colossal squid  Antarctic krill  Most of the Antarctic continent is permanently covered by ice and snow; less than 1% of the land is exposed.
3
Convention for the Conservation of Antarctic Marine Living Resources  The implementation of the Convention is managed through an international Commission headquartered in Hobart, Australia, by an efficient system of annual fishing quotas, licenses and international inspectors on the fishing vessels, as well as satellite surveillance.
The first Antarctic land discovered was the island of South Georgia, visited by the English merchant Anthony de la Roché in 1675.
However, the region is visited by more than 40,000IAATO tourist statistics 2007/08 tourists annually, the most popular destinations being the Antarctic Peninsula area (especially the South Shetland Islands) and South Georgia Island.
SAM I AM: He's directed "Evil Dead", "Army of Darkness" & "Spider-Man"
Sam Raimi
Army of Darkness is a 1992 American comedy horror film directed by Sam Raimi.
3
Ash becomes determined to lead the humans against the army of the dead.
To achieve this effect, Raimi used 60-foot-tall Scotchlite front-projection screens, miniatures and background plates.
Warren 2000, p. 147.
'80s FADS: These characters were created in Belgium way back in 1958, but hit it big in the U.S. in the 1980s
the Smurfs
The Adventures of Tintin by Hergé is the best known of Franco-Belgian comics, but many other major authors, including Peyo (The Smurfs), André Franquin (Gaston Lagaffe), Dupa (Cubitus), Morris (Lucky Luke), Greg (Achille Talon), Lambil (Les Tuniques Bleues), Edgar P. Jacobs and Willy Vandersteen brought the Belgian cartoon strip industry a worldwide fame.
3
Emperor Charles V extended the personal union of the Seventeen Provinces in the 1540s, making it far more than a personal union by the Pragmatic Sanction of 1549 and increased his influence over the Prince-Bishopric of Liège.
The 2014 federal election (coinciding with the regional elections) resulted in a further electoral gain for the Flemish nationalist N-VA, although the incumbent coalition (composed of Flemish and French-speaking Social Democrats, Liberals, and Christian Democrats) maintains a solid majority in Parliament and in all electoral constituencies.
At the beginning of 2012, people of foreign background and their descendants were estimated to have formed around 25% of the total population i.e. 2.8 million new Belgians.
SO YOU THINK YOU CAN FRANCE: It borders France between Germany & Belgium
Luxembourg
Historically, Belgium, the Netherlands and Luxembourg were known as the Low Countries; it once covered a somewhat larger area than the current Benelux group of states.
3
This continuing antagonism has led to several far-reaching reforms, resulting in a transition from a unitary to a federal arrangement during the period from 1970 to 1993.
In 2007, there were 1.38 million foreign-born residents in Belgium, corresponding to 12.9% of the total population.
The secular branch of schooling is controlled by the communities, the provinces, or the municipalities, while religious, mainly Catholic branch education, is organized by religious authorities, although subsidized and supervised by the communities.
ANNUAL EVENTS: (Sarah of the Clue Crew reports from Belgium.)  Here in Belgium, July 21st is a celebration of the enthronement of the newly independent nation's first king, who reigned as "this" the first
Leopold
Since the installation of Leopold I as king on  1831 (which is now celebrated as Belgium's National Day), Belgium has been a constitutional monarchy and parliamentary democracy, with a laicist constitution based on the Napoleonic code.
3
Despite the reforms, tensions between the groups remain; the formation of a coalition government took 18 months following the June 2010 federal election.
Belgium took over the German colonies of Ruanda-Urundi (modern-day Rwanda and Burundi) during the war, and they were mandated to Belgium in 1924 by the League of Nations.
This single Flemish body thus exercises powers about Community matters in the bilingual area of Brussels-Capital and in the Dutch language area, while about Regional matters only in Flanders.
EURO COINS: Both Monaco's and Belgium's Euros feature royal personages with this name, one a king, one a prince
Albert
CNN.com, "Belgium Prime Minister offers resignation over banking deal" At this juncture, his resignation was accepted and Christian Democratic and Flemish Herman Van Rompuy was sworn in as Prime Minister on  2008.Belgian king asks Van Rompuy to form government Reuters  After Herman Van Rompuy was designated the first permanent President of the European Council on  2009, he offered the resignation of his government to King Albert II on  2009.
3
3,664 487,145 Walloon Brabant  Waals-Brabant Brabant wallon  Wallonisch Brabant
The prevalent foreign nationals were Italian (171,918), French (125,061), Dutch (116,970), Moroccan (80,579), Portuguese (43,509), Spanish (42,765), Turkish (39,419) and German (37,621).De vreemde bevolking.
A Personal Kiwi-Yankee Slanguage Dictionary, by Louis Leland, Jr., an American, and at the time Professor of Psychology at the University of Otago, Dunedin.
SCHOOLS: At this Washington, D.C. college, Bill Clinton served as class president in his freshman & sophomore years
Georgetown
Clinton was born and raised in Arkansas, and is an alumnus of Georgetown University, where he was a member of Kappa Kappa Psi and Phi Beta Kappa and earned a Rhodes Scholarship to attend the University of Oxford.
3
Clinton did eventually move to Texas with Rodham to take a job leading George McGovern's effort there in 1972.
Wealth The Clintons accrued several million dollars in legal bills during his presidency; they were paid off four years after he left office.
Schantz, Harvey L. Politics in an Era of Divided Government: Elections and Governance in the Second Clinton Administration (2001) ISBN 0-8153-3583-0  Troy, Gill.
NAME THAT YEAR: U.S. elects 46-year-old Bill Clinton president
1992
He previously served as Governor of Arkansas from 1979 to 1981 and 1983 to 1992, and as the state's Attorney General from 1977 to 1979.
3
From 1964 to 1967 he was an intern and then a clerk in the office of Arkansas Senator J. William Fulbright.
thumb|General John P. Jumper, U.S. Air Forces in Europe commander, escorts Clinton upon his arrival to Ramstein Air Base, Germany, May 5, 1999.
Opinions in the popular press criticized pre-war genocide statements by the Clinton administration as greatly exaggerated.
SAINTLY CITIES: 8th most populous city in the world, it was once capital of Brazil
São Paulo
FAO.  South of Bahia, near the coasts, and more southerly most of the state of São Paulo, the distribution of rainfall changes, with rain falling throughout the year.
3
28–29Ibidem Fausto 2000, pp 78 to 80 While heredity had some weight, leadership status was more subdued over time, than allocated in succession ceremonies and conventions.
ISBN 85-16-04336-3Azevedo (1971), pp.
Munro, Dana Gardner.
THE BIBLE: The Latin Vulgate calls this book of the Bible "Liber Judicum"
Judges
It contains two sub-groups, the Former Prophets (, the narrative books of Joshua, Judges, Samuel and Kings) and the Latter Prophets (, the books of Isaiah, Jeremiah and Ezekiel and the Twelve Minor Prophets).
3
They contain narratives that begin immediately after the death of Moses with the divine appointment of Joshua as his successor, who then leads the people of Israel into the Promised Land, and end with the release from imprisonment of the last king of Judah.
Moody Publishers, 1986, p.86.
The historicity of the biblical account of the history of ancient Israel and Judah of the 10th to 7th centuries BCE is disputed in scholarship.
BIBLE STUDY: Ehud, the second of these officials listed in the Bible, killed the king of Moab with a dagger, not a gavel
judges
It contains two sub-groups, the Former Prophets (, the narrative books of Joshua, Judges, Samuel and Kings) and the Latter Prophets (, the books of Isaiah, Jeremiah and Ezekiel and the Twelve Minor Prophets).
3
Etymology  The English word Bible is from the Latin biblia, from the same word in Medieval Latin and Late Latin and ultimately from Koine Greek  ta biblia "the books" (singular  biblion).
These works were also outside the particular set of books that Roman Catholics called deuterocanonical and to which Protestants had generally applied the term Apocryphal.
27 p. N.B.: Place of publication also given as Philadelphia, Penn.
THE BIBLE: The stories of Gideon & Samson are found in this book of the Bible
Judges
It contains two sub-groups, the Former Prophets (, the narrative books of Joshua, Judges, Samuel and Kings) and the Latter Prophets (, the books of Isaiah, Jeremiah and Ezekiel and the Twelve Minor Prophets).
3
Parallel to the solidification of the Hebrew canon (c. 3rd century BCE), only the Torah first and than the Tanakh began to be translated into Greek and expanded, now referred to as the Septuagint or the Greek Old Testament.
It also divides them into three subgroups based on the distinctiveness of Sifrei Emet and Hamesh Megillot.
Hotchkiss, Gregory K. The Middle Way: Reflections on Scripture and Tradition, in series, Reformed Episcopal Pamphlets, no.
THE BIBLE: According to the King James Version of the Bible, the number of people on Noah's Ark
8
ISBN 0-8054-1613-7. was "an expression Hellenistic Jews used to describe their sacred books (the Septuagint)."From Hebrew Bible to Christian Bible" by Mark Hamilton on PBS's site
3
It has been proposed, and is thought highly likely by scholars, that "Esdras B" – the canonical Ezra–Nehemiah – is Theodotion's version of this material, and "Esdras A" is the version which was previously in the Septuagint on its own.
Other religions
Higher criticism
BIRD, REPTILE OR FELINE: The basilisk
reptile
Definition Aves and a sister group, the clade Crocodilia, contain the only living representatives of the reptile clade Archosauria.
3
Songbirds, parrots, and other species are popular as pets.
Archaeopteryx was the first fossil to display both clearly traditional reptilian characteristics: teeth, clawed fingers, and a long, lizard-like tail, as well as wings with flight feathers similar to those of modern birds.
The orbits are large and separated by a bony septum.
EXCEPT AFTER SEA: This sea has Georgia on its mind (well, its eastern side, anyway) & Bulgaria on its west
the Black Sea
It is bordered by Romania to the north, Serbia and Macedonia to the west, Greece and Turkey to the south, and the Black Sea to the east.
3
Most of the plant and animal life is central European, although representatives of Arctic and alpine species are present at high altitudes.
300px|right Blagoevgrad  Burgas  Dobrich  Gabrovo  Haskovo  Kardzhali  Kyustendil  Lovech  Montana  Pazardzhik  Pernik  Pleven  Plovdiv  Razgrad
The oldest written Slavic language, Bulgarian is distinguishable from the other languages in this group through certain grammatical peculiarities such as the lack of noun cases and infinitives, and a suffixed definite article.
EUROPEAN HISTORY: In WWI Germany, Austria-Hungary, Bulgaria & the Ottoman Empire were  known in the West as these "Powers"
the Central
After a disastrous defeat in the Second Balkan War, Bulgaria again found itself fighting on the losing side as a result of its alliance with the Central Powers in World War I. Despite fielding more than a quarter of its population in a 1,200,000-strong army and achieving several decisive victories at Doiran and Dobrich, the country capitulated in 1918.
3
In 1946 it became a one-party socialist state as part of the Soviet-led Eastern Bloc.
The first free elections in June 1990 were won by the Bulgarian Socialist Party (BSP, the freshly renamed Communist Party).
The protests continued over the lifetime of the Oresharski government.
EUROPEAN HISTORY: In 1830 this country declared itself independent from the Netherlands with Brussels as its capital
Belgium
is a region of Belgium comprising 19 municipalities, including the City of Brussels which is the capital of Belgium, the French Community of Belgium, and the Flemish Community.
3
Thus reduce the overall running costs.
Climate
The City has minor railway stations at Bockstael, Brussels-Chapel, Brussels-Congres, Brussels-Luxembourg, Brussels-Schuman, Brussels-West, Haren, Haren-South, Simonis.
BUSINESS & INDUSTRY: In Forbes magazine's 2007 list of billionaires, this Omahan was again ranked No. 2, behind Bill Gates
Warren Buffett
In 2004, he became a director of Berkshire Hathaway, the investment company headed by long-time friend Warren Buffett.
3
Between 2013 and 2014, his wealth increased by 15 billion.
When IBM's representatives mentioned that they needed an operating system, Gates referred them to Digital Research (DRI), makers of the widely used CP/M operating system.
He argued with examiner David Boies over the contextual meaning of words such as, "compete", "concerned", and "we".
ARCHITECTURE: The name of this ornate style of Baroque architecture probably comes from the French for "rockwork"
Rococo
Though Baroque was superseded in many centers by the Rococo style, beginning in France in the late 1720s, especially for interiors, paintings and the decorative arts, the Baroque style continued to be used in architecture until the advent of Neoclassicism in the later 18th century.
3
The Making of the West (third ed.).
The best known playwright was Andreas Cryphius, who used the Jesuit model of the Dutch Joost van den Vondel and Cornielle.
Hortolà, Policarp, 2013, The Aesthetics of Haemotaphonomy.
NAME THAT COUNTRY: It produces a lot of steel; it's only 998 square miles in area; it's the "lux" of the Benelux countries
Luxembourg
The Benelux Union (; ) is a politico-economic union of three neighbouring states in central-western Europe: Belgium, the Netherlands, and Luxembourg.
2
However, according to The Economist, it was coined in August 1946 by that newspaper's correspondent in Belgium ().
The main institutions of the Union are the Committee of Ministers, the Benelux Parliament, the Council of the Union and the Secretariat-General, while the Benelux Organization for Intellectual Property and the Benelux Court of Justice cover the same territory but are not part of the Union.
OLD TESTAMENT WOMEN: Not to belabor the fact, but this wife of Jacob died after giving birth to Benjamin
Rachel
thumb|right|Benjamin (right) embracing his brother, Joseph Benjamin was the last-born of Jacob's thirteen children (12 sons 1 daughter), and the second and last son of Rachel in Jewish, Christian and Islamic tradition.
1
The etymology of the name interpreted as son of the right side.
IRAQ: Iraq's capital, Baghdad, is located on both banks of this historic river
Tigris
Located along the Tigris River, the city was founded in the 8th century and became the capital of the Abbasid Caliphate.
3
The two designers who were hired by Al-Mansur to plan the city's design were Naubakht, a Zoroastrian who also determined that the date of the foundation of the city would be astrologically auspicious, and Mashallah, a Jew from Khorasan, Iran.
(1932).
Eventually, L. Paul Bremer, Director of the Coalition Provisional Authority in Iraq from May 11, 2003 to June 28, 2004 ordered protection of the zoo and U.S. engineers helped to reopen the facility.
STORY SONGS: A Johnny Cash song ends with a man deciding to name his son "Bill or George!  Anything but" this
Sue
Bill may refer to:  Documents  Banknote, paper money (especially in the US)  Handbill, Flyer (pamphlet), paper leaflet  Poster, form of advertising  Billboard, large board on which to display advertising posters or displays  Bill (law), a proposed law put before a legislature  Invoice, commercial document issued by a seller to a buyer   Bill of Indictment, a document accusing a defendant of a crime      Bill of lading, document issued by a carrier receiving goods for transport  Bill of materials, document listing the parts needed to make a product  Bill of quantities, tendering document detailing the quantities of materials needed to build a proposed construction  Operational bills, tendering document detailing the operations needed to build a proposed construction  Waybill, document describing a shipment  Menu or bill of fare  Utility bill, see invoice  Tools and weapons  Bill (weapon), a weapon similar to a halberd  Billhook, a long-handled cutting tool (sometimes weapon) with a curved blade  BILL Anti-tank guided weapon, a Swedish anti-tank weapon  BILL 2 Anti-tank guided weapon, a Swedish anti-tank weapon  Other objects called "bill"  Beak, an alternative name for a bird's, usually a duck's, beak  Peninsulas of land jutting out into the sea, such as "Portland Bill"  Police, with 'old bill' as a slang term in the UK  Rostrum, the "beak" or "sword" of a billfish (marlin, swordfish, etc.)  Visor or partial brim as a feature of a cap, sometimes called a "peaked cap"  Film and TV  Meet Bill, a 2008 comedy film formerly known as Bill  Bill (1981 film), a 1981 TV film starring Mickey Rooney  Bill: On His Own, sequel to the 1981 film  The Bill, a long-running British police drama  Bill (Kill Bill), a character in the Kill Bill films  Bill (2015 film), an adventure-comedy film from the cast of Horrible Histories  Music  Albums  Bill (Tripping Daisy album), 1992  Bill (Bill Cosby album), 1973 compilation album Songs  "Bill" (Show Boat), a song in the Jerome Kern-Oscar Hammerstein II musical Show Boat  "Bill", a song by Peggy Scott-Adams  "Bills" (LunchMoney Lewis song), 2015  "Bills, Bills, Bills", a 1999 song by Destiny's Child  "Bills", a 1960 single by Louis Jordan   "Too Long" / "Bills", a 1962 single by Denny Denson  The Bills, piano composition by composer Carter Pann  Places  Bill, Wyoming, a railroad crew-change station  People  Common nickname for William This section includes only individuals whose last name is Bill, or whose only generally-known name is Bill.
2
Bill (surname)  Alfred H. Bill, American writer  Bill W. (Bill Wilson, 1895–1971), co-founder of Alcoholics Anonymous  Buffalo Bill (Bill Cody, 1846–1917), American bison hunter and showman  Charles Bill (1843–1915), British Conservative Party Member of Parliament (MP)
Leek 1892–1906  Bill (decedent), an unidentified young woman who died after partying in Michigan in 1976  Fictional characters  Bill the Pony, a pony appearing in The Lord of the Rings novel  Bill Cipher, a dream demon in Gravity Falls  Bill Ferny, the previous owner of Bill the Pony  Bill, a lizard in Lewis Carroll's Alice's Adventures in Wonderland  Bill the Cat, a Bloom County character  characters in the Mario game series  Bullet Bill  Banzai Bill  Mr. Bill, a claymation character from Saturday Night Live  Others  Bill the Goat, the mascot of the US Naval Academy  Bills (subculture), a Congolese youth subculture in the late 1950s, idolising cowboy Western movies  Buffalo Bills, an American NFL football team  Tropical Storm Bill (disambiguation), a list of storms named Bill  See also  Billy (disambiguation)  Billie (disambiguation)  Bili (disambiguation)  Will (disambiguation)  William (disambiguation)
SUM-MERS: When William Thomson, later Lord this, was born in Belfast in 1824 he knew absolute zero about math
Lord Kelvin
Gerry Adams, politician John Stewart Bell, physicist George Best, football player, Ballon D'or winner Danny Blanchflower, football player and manager Jackie Blanchflower football player Sir Kenneth Branagh, actor Christopher Brunt, football player Jocelyn Bell Burnell, astrophysicist Patrick Carlin, Victoria Cross recipient Ciaran Carson, writer Frank Carson, comedian Craig Cathcart, football player Shaw Clifton, former General of The Salvation Army Lord Craigavon, former Prime Minister of Northern Ireland Mal Donaghy, football player Jamie Dornan, Actor Barry Douglas, musician John Boyd Dunlop, inventor Jonny Evans, football player Corry Evans, football player Carl Frampton, boxer Sir James Galway, musician Craig Gilroy, rugby union player Chaim Herzog, former President of Israel Alex Higgins, snooker player Eamonn Holmes, broadcaster Paddy Jackson, rugby union player Oliver Jeffers, artist Lord Kelvin, physicist and engineer C.S. Lewis, author James Joseph Magennis, Victoria Cross recipient Jim Magilton, football player and manager Paula Malcomson, actress Mary McAleese, former President of Ireland Gerry McAvoy, musician and long time bass guitarist with Rory Gallagher Wayne McCullough, Olympic Games Silver Medalist, WBC World Champion Boxer, Patron of Northern Ireland Children's Hospice Alan McDonald, football player Sammy McIlroy, football player and manager Gary Moore, guitarist Van Morrison, singer-songwriter Doc Neeson, singer-songwriter Mary Peters, Olympic sportswoman Patricia Quinn, actress Pat Rice, football player and coach Trevor Ringland, rugby union player Peter Robinson, First Minister of Northern Ireland Bobby Sands, IRA hungerstriker David Trimble, former First Minister of Northern Ireland, Nobel Peace Prize winner Gary Wilson, cricketer  Education  thumb|The Lanyon Building of Queen's University in south Belfast Belfast has two universities.
3
Parks and gardens  thumb|The Palm House at the Botanic Gardens  Sitting at the mouth of the River Lagan where it becomes a deep and sheltered lough, Belfast is surrounded by mountains that create a micro-climate conducive to horticulture.
Bus and rail public transport in Northern Ireland is operated by subsidiaries of Translink.
CLG Aontroim.
MUSICALS BY PLOT: Charlemagne's son leads a revolution against his dad
Pippin
Nor did he tolerate insubordination in his sons: in 792, he banished his eldest, though possibly illegitimate, son, Pippin the Hunchback, to the monastery of Prüm, because the young man had joined a rebellion against him.
3
It was, however, seen as such in Byzantium, where it was protested by Irene and her successor Nicephorus I —
This is evidenced by one of the regulations of the Council of Tours (813), which required that the parish priests preach either in the "rusticam Romanam linguam" (Romance) or "Theotiscam" (the Germanic vernacular) rather than in Latin.
The Sword of Charlemagne (myArmoury.com article)
A WALK ACROSS THE CHARLES BRIDGE: (Sarah of the Clue Crew stands on the Charles Bridge in Prague, Czech Republic.)  St. Norbert & St. Sigmund are portrayed with this Good King; all three are Czech patron saints
Wenceslas
Known as the lands of the Bohemian Crown since the 14th century, a number of other names for the country have been used, including Czech/Bohemian lands, Bohemian Crown, and the lands of the Crown of Saint Wenceslas.
2
During the next two centuries, 90% of the inhabitants became adherents of the Hussite movement.
Kofola is a non-alcoholic domestic cola soft drink which competes with Coca Cola and Pepsi in popularity.
POWER TO THE STUDENTS!: This fabric-named 1989 revolution in Czechoslovakia began after police attacked a student demonstration
the Velvet Revolution
In 1989, as Marxist–Leninist governments and communism  were ending all over Europe, Czechoslovaks peacefully deposed their government in the Velvet Revolution; state price controls were removed after a period of preparation.
3
1946–1948: The country was governed by a coalition government with communist ministers, including the prime minister and the minister of interior.
The roots of Czech nationalism go back to the 19th century, when philologists and educators, influenced by Romanticism, promoted the Czech language and pride in the Czech people.
On May 3, 1945, the third US Army of General Patton entered Pilsen from the south west.
COLORADO: The Moody Blues recoreded a live album in Colorado at this natural amphitheater
Red Rocks
Colleges and universities in Colorado:  Adams State University Aims Community College Arapahoe Community College Art Institute of Colorado Belleview Christian College & Bible Seminary Colorado Christian University Colorado College Colorado Mesa University Colorado Mountain College Colorado Northwestern Community College Colorado School of Mines Colorado State University System Colorado State University Colorado State University-Pueblo Colorado Technical University Community College of Aurora Community College of Denver Denver Seminary DeVry University Emily Griffith Opportunity School Ecotech Institute Fort Lewis College Front Range Community College Iliff School of Theology Johnson & Wales University Jones International University Lamar Community College Metropolitan State University of Denver Morgan Community College Naropa University National Technological University Nazarene Bible College Northeastern Junior College Otero Junior College Pikes Peak Community College Pueblo Community College Red Rocks Community College Redstone College Regis University Rocky Mountain College of Art and Design Rocky Vista University College of Osteopathic Medicine Trinidad State Junior College United States Air Force Academy University of Colorado System University of Colorado Boulder University of Colorado Colorado Springs University of Colorado Denver Anschutz Medical Campus Auraria Campus University of Denver University of Northern Colorado Western State Colorado UniversityBy legislative act enacted August 1, 2012, approved by Governor John Hickenlooper.
3
These basins, particularly the San Luis Valley, lie along the Rio Grande Rift, a major geological formation of the Rocky Mountains, and its branches.
Grand Junction is located along Interstate 70, the only major highway in Western Colorado.
to medical research in the 2014 budget.
"X"-MEN: He was the de facto leader of China from the late 1970s to the early 1990s
Deng Xiaoping
In 1976, Mao died, the Gang of Four was arrested, and Deng Xiaoping took power.
3
In 1971, the PRC replaced the Republic of China as the sole representative of China in the United Nations and as one of the five permanent members of the United Nations Security Council.
After the Communists came to power in 1949, efforts were made to organize science and technology based on the model of the Soviet Union, in which scientific research was part of central planning.
Languages of the Tibeto-Burman branch, including Tibetan, Qiang, Naxi and Yi, are spoken are spoken across the Tibetan and Yunnan–Guizhou Plateau.
LIKE A MAN: Found in China's Cho-K'ou-Tien caves in the 1920s, the fossils of this "man" disappeared in WWII
Peking Man
The fossils are of Peking Man, an example of Homo erectus who used fire.
3
ISBN 0-521-24327-0.
Xinzhong Yao.
360doc.com.
GOOD SPORTS: The jersey of the Houston Rockets' Tracy McGrady was China's top seller in 2005; this teammate & center was 3rd
Yao Ming
The Chinese Basketball Association and the American National Basketball Association have a huge following among the people, with native or ethnic Chinese players such as Yao Ming and Yi Jianlian held in high esteem.
3
There have been some moves toward political liberalization, in that open contested elections are now held at the village and town levels.
Retrieved 16 July 2013.
Chinese historiography began with the Shiji, the overall scope of the historiographical tradition in China is termed the Twenty-Four Histories, which set a vast stage for Chinese fictions along with Chinese mythology and folklore."史传文学与中国古代小说".
RUSSIAN TO THE BORDER: A 1966 treaty entitles this nation bordering China to Russian military help if it's ever invaded
Mongolia
The Han Dynasty expanded the empire's territory considerably with military campaigns reaching southern Korea, Vietnam, Mongolia and Central Asia, and also helped establish the Silk Road in Central Asia.
3
Republic of China (1912–49)  thumb|Sun Yat-sen, the father of modern China (seated on right), and Chiang Kai-shek, later President of the Republic of China thumb|Chiang Kai-shek and Mao Zedong toasting together in 1946 following the end of World War II On 1 January 1912, the Republic of China was established, and Sun Yat-sen of the Kuomintang (the KMT or Nationalist Party) was proclaimed provisional president.
An emphasis on public health and preventive medicine has characterized Chinese health policy since the early 1950s.
Board games such as go (known as weiqi in China), xiangqi, mahjong, and more recently chess, are also played at a professional level."Chinese players dominate at Malaysia open chess championship".
CHINA PATTERNS: Begun in the 2nd century B.C., this "road" of trade stretched 4,000 miles from China to the Mediterranean
the Silk Road
The Han Dynasty expanded the empire's territory considerably with military campaigns reaching southern Korea, Vietnam, Mongolia and Central Asia, and also helped establish the Silk Road in Central Asia.
3
Covering approximately 9.6 million square kilometers, China is the world's second-largest country by land area, and either the third or fourth-largest by total area, depending on the method of measurement.
China's professional football league was established in 1994, it is the largest football market in Asia."足球不给劲观众却不少 中超球市世界第9亚洲第1".
搜狐体育. 14 July 2013. Retrieved 17 July 2015.
TRADITIONAL ANNIVERSARY GIFTS: The traditional gift for a 12th anniversary is this luxurious fabric, in the name of an ancient trade route from China
silk
The Han Dynasty expanded the empire's territory considerably with military campaigns reaching southern Korea, Vietnam, Mongolia and Central Asia, and also helped establish the Silk Road in Central Asia.
3
Cold coniferous forests predominate in the north of the country, supporting animal species such as moose and Asian black bear, along with over 120 bird species.
USDA Economic Research Service. Retrieved 3 May 2006.
In 2003, China became the third country to independently send humans into space, with Yang Liwei's spaceflight aboard Shenzhou 5; as of 2015, ten Chinese nationals have journeyed into space, including two women.
MONGO FOR MONGOLIA: Founded around 1368, this Chinese dynasty drove the Mongols out of power in China that same year
the Ming
A peasant named Zhu Yuanzhang overthrew the Yuan Dynasty in 1368 and founded the Ming Dynasty.
3
The state still dominates in strategic "pillar" sectors such as energy production and heavy industries, but private enterprise has expanded enormously, with around 30 million private businesses recorded in 2008.John Lee.
The 2010 census found that males accounted for 51.27 percent of the total population.
Today, the Chinese government has accepted numerous elements of traditional Chinese culture as being integral to Chinese society.
WORD & PHRASE ORIGINS: This term first appeared in print in 1971 & refers to the many electronics firms in Santa Clara County, California
Silicon Valley
Stanford University and its Dean of Engineering Frederick Terman began encouraging faculty and graduates to stay in California instead of leaving the state, and develop a high-tech region in the area now known as Silicon Valley.
3
The Sierra Nevada (Spanish for "snowy range") includes the highest peak in the contiguous 48 states, Mount Whitney, at .Elevation adjusted to North American Vertical Datum of 1988.
New York State, in second place, had 9 languages other than English spoken by more than 100,000 persons.
Roman Catholics founded 21 missions along the California coast, as well as the cities of Los Angeles and San Francisco.
TEAM PLAYERS: One who goes wild with a credit card at California's Horton Plaza
San Diego Charger
right|thumb|upright|Los Angeles Memorial Coliseum hosted the Olympic Games in 1932 and 1984 Below is a list of major league sports teams in California:   Club Sport League Los Angeles Rams American football National Football League (NFL) Oakland Raiders American football National Football League San Diego Chargers American football National Football League San Francisco 49ers American football National Football League Los Angeles Dodgers Baseball Major League Baseball (MLB) Los Angeles Angels of Anaheim Baseball Major League Baseball Oakland Athletics Baseball Major League Baseball San Diego Padres Baseball Major League Baseball San Francisco Giants Baseball Major League Baseball Golden State Warriors Basketball National Basketball Association (NBA)
3
In 2000, California, had 2,569,340 veterans of U.S. military service: 504,010 served in World War II, 301,034 in the Korean War, 754,682 during the Vietnam War, and 278,003 during 1990–2000 (including the Persian Gulf War).
Its two sections meet at Yerba Buena Island through the world's largest diameter transportation bore tunnel, at  wide by  high.
Government and politics  Government  thumb|The California State Capitol building in SacramentoThe state's capital is Sacramento.
PLAYMATES: Miss March, March Fong Eu was California's first woman in this post; Condoleezza Rice was one for the U.S.
Secretary of State
The California executive branch consists of the Governor of California and seven other elected constitutional officers: Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, Secretary of State, State Controller, State Treasurer, Insurance Commissioner, and State Superintendent of Public Instruction.
3
Though Lake Tahoe is larger, it is divided by the California/Nevada border.
The ranchos developed under ownership by Californios (Spanish-speaking Californians) who had received land grants, and traded cowhides and tallow with Boston merchants.
Several dams across the state provide hydro-electric power.
CALIFORNIA CITIES: The world's largest known almond processing center as well as the governor's mansion are in this city
Sacramento
It contains the nation's second most populous census statistical area (Greater Los Angeles Area) and the fifth most populous (San Francisco Bay Area), and eight of the nation's 50 most populated cities (Los Angeles, San Diego, San Jose, San Francisco, Fresno, Sacramento, Long Beach, and Oakland).
3
The state's coasts, rivers, and other bodies of water are regulated by the California Coastal Commission.
The Lightly populated lower region of California, the Baja Peninsula, remained in the possession of Mexico.
San Francisco Chronicle.
"O", 'BAMA: In Alabama there's one just north of Tuscumbia; in California, it's a neighbor of San Francisco
Oakland
It contains the nation's second most populous census statistical area (Greater Los Angeles Area) and the fifth most populous (San Francisco Bay Area), and eight of the nation's 50 most populated cities (Los Angeles, San Diego, San Jose, San Francisco, Fresno, Sacramento, Long Beach, and Oakland).
3
Several major tributaries feed into the Sacramento and the San Joaquin, including the Pit River, the Tuolumne River, and the Feather River.
The first priests to come to California were Roman Catholic missionaries from Spain.
Water  thumb|right|An aerial view of the Delta–Mendota Canal (left) and the California Aqueduct (right), at the Interstate 205 crossing west of Tracy, conveying water from Northern to Southern California California's interconnected water system is the world's largest, managing over 40,000,000 acre feet of water per year, centered on six main systems of aqueducts and infrastructure projects.
U.S. SCIENCE CITIES: This California city has the honor of being the only one in the U.S. to have an element named for it
Berkeley
In addition, several cities such as Oakland, Berkeley and Davis have declared themselves as nuclear-free zones.
3
The Sierra Nevada falls to Arctic temperatures in winter and has several dozen small glaciers, including Palisade Glacier, the southernmost glacier in the United States.
Endangered animals include the San Joaquin kitfox, Point Arena mountain beaver, Pacific pocket mouse, salt marsh harvest mouse, Morro Bay kangaroo rat (and five other species of kangaroo rat), Amargosa vole, California least tern, California condor, loggerhead shrike, San Clemente sage sparrow, San Francisco garter snake, five species of salamander, three species of chub, and two species of pupfish.
The state has the 5th largest population of African Americans in the U.S., an estimated 2,250,000 residents.
NATIVE AMERICAN TRIBES: They thrived in the scorching heat of the California desert that bears their name
Mojave
California's diverse geography ranges from the Sierra Nevada in the east to the Pacific Coast in the west, from the redwood–Douglas fir forests of the northwest, to the Mojave Desert areas in the southeast.
3
To the east of the Sierra Nevada are Owens Valley and Mono Lake, an essential migratory bird habitat.
Peck, Merton J. & Scherer, Frederic M. The Weapons Acquisition Process: An Economic Analysis (1962)
Brown proudly signs balanced state budget.
ALL CROATIA GREAT & SMALL: Croatia occupies the northwestern section of this peninsula
the Balkans
In that period the stone portal of the Trogir Cathedral was made by Radovan, representing the most important monument of Romanesque sculpture in the Balkans.
3
The two largest political parties in Croatia are the Croatian Democratic Union and the Social Democratic Party of Croatia.
The NUTS Local administrative unit divisions are two-tiered.
The oldest preserved examples of Croatian architecture are the 9th-century churches, with the largest and the most representative among them being Donatus of Zadar.
FRENCH LITERATURE: Type of lit. that was the specialty of Francois Villon, Marie De France & Charles Baudelaire
Poetry
Baudelaire's highly original style of prose-poetry influenced a whole generation of poets including Paul Verlaine, Arthur Rimbaud and Stéphane Mallarmé among many others.
3
thumb|left|Jeanne Duval, in a painting by Édouard Manet thumb|upright|Apollonie Sabatier, muse and one time mistress, painted by Vincent Vidal thumb|left|Cenotaph of Charles Baudelaire, Montparnasse Cemetery  By 1859, his illnesses, his long-term use of laudanum, his life of stress and poverty had taken a toll and Baudelaire had aged noticeably.
Baudelaire was not the first French translator of Poe, but his "scrupulous translations" were considered among the best.
Baudelaire encouraged Manet to strike out on his own path and not succumb to criticism. "
RELIGION: This "Tao Te Ching" author attracted many admirers, including a young Confucius
Lao-Tzu
The Ahmadiyya Muslim Community believes Confucius was a Divine Prophet of God, as were Lao-Tzu and other eminent Chinese personages..
3
Far from trying to build a systematic or formalist theory, he wanted his disciples to master and internalize the old classics, so that their deep thought and thorough study would allow them to relate the moral problems of the present to past political events (as recorded in the Annals) or the past expressions of commoners' feelings and noblemen's reflections (as in the poems of the Book of Odes).
His teachings require examination and context in order to be understood.
Virtuous action towards others begins with virtuous and sincere thought, which begins with knowledge.
A "TINY" CATEGORY: Probably the most famous ukulele player to have a top 40 hit, his name came from a Charles Dickens character
Tiny Tim
The likes of Ebenezer Scrooge, Tiny Tim, Jacob Marley, Bob Cratchit, Oliver Twist, The Artful Dodger, Fagin, Bill Sikes, Pip, Miss Havisham, Sydney Carton, Charles Darnay, David Copperfield, Mr. Micawber, Abel Magwitch, Daniel Quilp, Samuel Pickwick, Wackford Squeers, and Uriah Heep are so well known as to be part and parcel of British culture, and in some cases have passed into ordinary language: a scrooge, for example, is a miser.
3
Simon Callow, 'Charles Dickens'.
G. K. Chesterton, stated: "It is not the death of little Nell, but the life of little Nell, that I object to", arguing that the maudlin effect of his description of her life owed much to the gregarious nature of Dickens's grief, his "despotic" use of people's feelings to move them to tears in works like this..  The question as to whether Dickens belongs to the tradition of the sentimental novel is debatable.
Another life-size statue of Dickens is located at Centennial Park, Sydney, Australia."Down Under with Dickens".
SPORTS: In 1957 this Cleveland team's Lou Groza became the first to lead the NFL in scoring without a touchdown
Browns
In sports, the Indians won the 1948 World Series and the Browns dominated professional football in the 1950s.
3
Public Square, less than one mile (2 km) inland, sits at an elevation of , and Hopkins Airport,  inland from the lake, is at an elevation of .
The award-winning Great Lakes Brewing Company, located across the street from the historic West Side Market, offers several locally styled beers and ales.
Defunct major newspapers include the Cleveland Press, an afternoon publication which printed its last edition on June 17, 1982; and the Cleveland News, which ceased publication in 1960.
THE FALL: Can't wait for Christmas?  In Europe, this saint "visits" on Dec. 6, his feast day, with gifts in hand
Saint Nicholas
In addition, several closely related and often interchangeable figures, known as Santa Claus, Father Christmas, Saint Nicholas, and Christkind, are associated with bringing gifts to children during the Christmas season and have their own body of traditions and lore."Poll:
3
The date of Christmas may have initially been chosen to correspond with the day exactly nine months after the day on which early Christians believed that Jesus was conceived, or with one or more ancient polytheistic festivals that occurred near southern solstice (i.e., the Roman winter solstice); a further solar connection has been suggested because of a biblical verse identifying Jesus as the "Sun of righteousness".Newton, Isaac, Observations on the Prophecies of Daniel, and the Apocalypse of St. John (1733).
He is first recorded in early 17th century England, but was associated with holiday merrymaking and drunkenness rather than the bringing of gifts.
It is said that La Befana set out to bring the baby Jesus gifts, but got lost along the way.
ANCIENT EGYPT: The pyramid of Menkaure was the last of the major 3 built at this site southwest of modern Cairo
Giza
Greater Cairo is the largest metropolitan area in the Middle East and the Arab world, and 15th-largest in the world, and is associated with ancient Egypt, as the famous Giza pyramid complex and the ancient city of Memphis are located in its geographical area.
3
The Egyptian Museum  The Museum of Egyptian Antiquities, known commonly as the Egyptian Museum, is home to the most extensive collection of ancient Egyptian antiquities in the world.
Cairo Tower  thumb|upright|Cairo Tower The Cairo Tower is a free-standing tower with a revolving restaurant at the top.
The Art and Architecture of Islamic Cairo.
COLLEGE TOWNS: Columbia University
New York City
Columbia University (officially Columbia University in the City of New York) is a private, Ivy League, research university in Upper Manhattan, New York City.
3
In 1746 an act was passed by the general assembly of New York to raise funds for the foundation of a new college.
1900
That same year, the university ended loans for incoming and current students who were on financial aid, replacing loans that were traditionally part of aid packages with grants from the university.
FAMOUS WOMEN: In 1997, in honor of her 90th birthday, she was made honorary First Lady of Old Saybrook, Connecticut
Katharine Hepburn
Katharine Hepburn, named by the American Film Institute as the greatest female star in Hollywood history.
3
The maximum property tax credit is $300 per return and any excess may not be refunded or carried forward.
The government has operated under the direction of four separate documents in the course of Connecticut Constitutional History.
Since 1952, a PGA Tour golf tournament has been played in the Hartford area.
"YELLOW" FEVER: It's joined to the Yangtze by the Grand Canal
the Yellow River
thumb|left|A map of China depicting the Yellow River's southerly path following its stabilization by the Grand Eunuch Li Xing's public works after the 1494 flood.
3
However, due to the fact that western missionaries carried out their activities mainly in this area and were familiar with the name of this part of Chang Jiang, "Yangtze river" was used to refer to the whole Chang Jiang in English language.
Further, although railroads and the Shanghai concessions subsequently turned it into a backwater, Yangzhou was the lower river's principal port for much of the Qing Dynasty, directing Liangjiang's important salt monopoly and connecting the Yangtze with the Grand Canal to Beijing.
Commercial firms, Robert Dollar Company, Jardine Matheson, Butterfield and Swire and Standard Oil added their own steamers on the river between 1917 - 1919.
WORLD FACTS: You'll find the Museum of Catalan Art in this Spanish city, the capital of Catalonia
Barcelona
Catalonia consists of four provinces: Barcelona, Girona, Lleida, and Tarragona.
2
The  16px (Autopista del Nord-est) and  (Autovia del Nord-est) connect inland and onward to Madrid.
Since the Statute of Autonomy of 1979, Aranese (a dialect of Gascon Occitan) has also been official and subject to special protection in Val d'Aran.
COIN OF THE REALM: 1966: 1 yuan depicting Chiang Kai-Shek
Taiwan
Chiang's government and army retreated to Taiwan, where Chiang imposed martial law and persecuted people critical of his rule in a period known as the "White Terror".
3
Throughout his rise to power, Chiang also benefited from membership within the nationalist Tiandihui fraternity, to which Sun Yat-sen also belonged, and which remained a source of support during his leadership of the Kuomintang.
The inability of Li to coordinate KMT military forces led him to put into effect a plan of defense that he had contemplated in 1948.
The hope was to have both buried at their birthplace in Fenghua if and when it was possible.
HISTORIC AMERICA: In 1848 a shipping canal completed through an old Indian portage linked Chicago with this mighty river system
Mississippi River
Chicago was incorporated as a city in 1837, near a portage between the Great Lakes and the Mississippi River watershed, and grew rapidly in the mid-nineteenth century.
3
Ten years later he became the secretary and then the president of the first Illinois State Board of Health, which carried out most of its activities in Chicago.
Polish: (134,032)  German: (120,328)  Italian: (77,967)  American: (37,118)  English: (36,145)  African American: (32,727)  Russian: (19,771)  Arab: (17,598)  European: (15,753)  Swedish: (15,151)  Greek: (15,129)  French (except Basque): (11,410)  Ukrainian: (11,104)  West Indian (except Hispanic groups): (10,349)  Persons identifying themselves as "Other groups" were classified at 1.72 million, and unclassified or not reported were approximately 153,000.
Frank Gehry's detailed, stainless steel band shell, the Jay Pritzker Pavilion, hosts the classical Grant Park Music Festival concert series.
HOMES: This Chicago mansion rented by Jane Addams in 1889 was named for its builder
Hull House
Concern for social problems among Chicago's immigrant poor led Jane Addams to co‑found Hull House in 1889.
3
The historic Chicago Cultural Center (1897), originally serving as the Chicago Public Library, now houses the city's Visitor Information Center, galleries and exhibit halls.
In addition to ongoing beautification and renewal projects for the existing parks, a number of new parks have been added in recent years, such as the Ping Tom Memorial Park in Chinatown, DuSable Park on the Near North Side, and most notably, Millennium Park, which is in the northwestern corner of one of Chicago's oldest parks, Grant Park in the Chicago Loop.
Notable people  Sister cities  Chicago has 28 sister cities around the world.
CITY WALK: In the 1980s this city passed Chicago as the USA's second most populous
Los Angeles
Only the urban agglomerations of New York City and Los Angeles are larger.
3
The Illinois Department of Tourism defines Chicagoland as Cook County without the city of Chicago, and only Lake, DuPage, Kane and Will counties.
For much of the twentieth century, it nurtured a strong style of figurative surrealism, as in the works of Ivan Albright and Ed Paschke.
Since its completion in 1991, the Harold Washington Library has appeared in Guinness World Records as the largest public library building in the world  Schools and libraries Chicago Public Schools (CPS) is the governing body of the school district that contains over 600 public elementary and high schools citywide, including several selective-admission magnet schools.
CHOCOLATE: Chocolate, garlic & onions are 3 of the main ingredients in this spicy Mexican sauce
mole
The temperature in which the crystals obtain enough energy to break apart from their rigid conformation would depend on the milk fat content in the chocolate and the shape of the fat molecules, as well as the form of the cocoa butter fat.
3
The word "chocolatl" does not occur in central Mexican colonial sources, making this an unlikely derivation.
It is unadulterated chocolate: the pure, ground, roasted chocolate beans impart a strong, deep chocolate flavor.
McKenzie, David and Swails, Brent (19 January 2012) Slavery in Cocoa fields: a horrible "normal".
PALME D'OR WINNERS: Nicolas Cage has an Elvis fixation in this 1990 Palme d'Or winner from David Lynch
Wild at Heart
Next, Lynch created his own television series with Mark Frost, the popular murder mystery Twin Peaks (1990–1991; 2017): he also created a cinematic prequel, Twin Peaks: Fire Walk with Me (1992); a road movie, Wild at Heart (1990); and a family film, The Straight Story (1999); in the same period.
3
They just look good all lined up like teeth ... sometimes they become the title of the painting.
They have a daughter.
The Washington Post, David Lynch's Guru and His Art, Claire Hoffman, February 7, 2008
19TH CENTURY AUTHORS: His first novel, "The Snake's Pass", was published in 1890, 7 years before "Dracula"
Bram Stoker
Dracula is an 1897 Gothic horror novel by Irish author Bram Stoker.
2
Deleted ending  An excerpt from the original final chapter was removed, in which Dracula's castle falls apart as he dies, hiding the fact that vampires were ever there.
Starrs, D. Bruno. "Keeping the faith: Catholicism in Dracula and its adaptations," Journal of Dracula Studies 6 (2004).
MOTHERS OF INVENTION: Stephanie Kwolek of this Delaware chemical firm created Kevlar, a lightweight material used in bulletproof vests
DuPont
The state's largest employers are:  government (State of Delaware, New Castle County)  education (University of Delaware, Delaware Technical & Community College)  banking (Bank of America, M&T Bank, JPMorgan Chase, Citigroup, Deutsche Bank)  chemical, pharmaceutical, technology (E.I. du Pont de Nemours & Co., AstraZeneca, Syngenta, Agilent Technologies)  healthcare (Christiana Care Health System, Bayhealth Medical Center, Alfred I. duPont Hospital for Children)  farming, specifically chicken farming in Sussex County
3
The "DART First State" public transportation system was named "Most Outstanding Public Transportation System" in 2003 by the American Public Transportation Association.
The governor presents a "State of the State" speech to a joint session of the Delaware legislature annually.
Delaware has been home to professional wrestling outfit Combat Zone Wrestling (CZW).
AM I BLUE?: This blue or bluish-green stone often seen in Southwestern jewelry is a birthstone for December
Turquoise
December's birthstones are the turquoise, zircon, and tanzanite.
3
Movable Observances First Friday Farmer's Day (Ghana) Second Friday after Thanksgiving International Sweater Vestival First Sunday Good Neighborliness Day (Turkmenistan) Second Monday Green Monday National Tree Planting Day (Malawi) Winter Solstice Blue Christmas (holiday) Brumalia (Ancient Rome) Dongzhi Festival (Asia) Global Orgasm Korochun (Slavic) Midsummer in the Southern Hemisphere.
(Neopagan) Sanghamitta Day
Teachers' Day (Panama) World AIDS Day
ENGLISH LITERATURE: This Daniel Defoe character was born in the year 1632 in the city of York, of a good family
Robinson Crusoe
The day of his death is also uncertain." born Daniel Foe, was an English trader, writer, journalist, pamphleteer, and spy, most famous for his novel Robinson Crusoe.
3
He was charged with seditious libel.
The Tories fell from power with the death of Queen Anne, but Defoe continued doing intelligence work for the Whig government, writing "Tory" pamphlets that undermined the Tory point of view.
(Furbank and Owens argue for the much smaller number of 276 published items in Critical Bibliography (1998).)
FEATHERS: It's what Daedalus used to hold the feathers together in the wings he made for himself & his son
wax
He secured the feathers at their midpoints with string and at their bases with wax, and gave the whole a gentle curvature like the wings of a bird.
3
They had passed Samos, Delos and Lebynthos by the time the boy, forgetting himself, began to soar upward toward the sun.
His sister had placed her son, named variously as Perdix, Talus, or Calos,In Hyginus, Fabulae, 39 Perdix is the name of the nephew; but according to Bibliotheca 3.
The latter source also states that Perdix had a sanctuary dedicated to her near the Acropolis.
VICE PRESIDENTIAL BIRTHPLACES: December 5, 1782:Kinderhook, New York
Martin Van Buren
Martin Van Buren, American lawyer and politician, 8th President of the United States (d. 1862)
3
Antti Aarne, Finnish author and academic (d. 1925)   1867
Cliff Eidelman, American composer and conductor 1965 – Manish Malhotra, Indian fashion designer   1965
Nakamura Kanzaburō XVIII, Japanese actor (b. 1955)   2012
YES SIR, THAT'S MY SCIENTIST: Sir David Brewster invented the Dioptic system of illumination for these on the seaside
Lighthouses
Brewster pressed its adoption on those in authority at least as early as 1820, two years before Fresnel suggested it, and it was finally introduced into lighthouses mainly through Brewster's persistent efforts.
3
ISBN 1109110898.
A list of his larger separate works will be found below.
External links
U.S. COINS: (Kelly of the Clue Crew reports from the U.S. Mint in Denver, CO.) The United States Mint's Westward Journey nickel shows the word "Liberty" in this man's handwriting
Jefferson
A study by the Jefferson County health director, Dr. Carl Johnson, in 1981 linked the contamination to an increase in birth defects and cancer incidence in central Denver and nearer Rocky Flats.
3
Denver's position near the mineral-rich Rocky Mountains encouraged mining and energy companies to spring up in the area.
The Denver Broncos of the National Football League have drawn crowds of over 70,000 since their origins in the early 1960s, and continue to draw fans today to their current home Sports Authority Field at Mile High.
DIA is located  east-northeast of the Colorado State Capitol.
...AND ON DRUMS: (Cheryl of the Clue Crew at the Motown Museum in Detroit)  This "What's Going On" singer played drums on early Motown seasons including "Please Mr. Postman"
Marvin Gaye
thumb|The MGM Grand Detroit, one of Detroit's three casino resorts and the 16th largest employer in the city Berry Gordy, Jr. founded Motown Records which rose to prominence during the 1960s and early 1970s with acts such as Stevie Wonder, The Temptations, The Four Tops, Smokey Robinson & The Miracles, Diana Ross & The Supremes, the Jackson 5, Martha and the Vandellas, The Spinners, Gladys Knight & the Pips, The Marvelettes, The Elgins, The Monitors, The Velvelettes and Marvin Gaye.
3
American Institute of Architects. Retrieved on December 23, 2009.
thumb|upright|Greektown Historic District in Detroit  The city of Detroit has a rich musical heritage and has contributed to a number of different genres over the decades leading into the new millennium.
Sports thumb|Looking toward Ford Field the night of Super Bowl XL  Detroit is one of 12 American metropolitan areas that are home to professional teams representing the four major sports in North America.
LABOR UNIONS: In December 1995 this Detroit-based union ended a 17-month strike at Caterpillar, Inc.
United Auto Workers
With the rapid growth of industrial workers in the auto factories, labor unions such as the American Federation of Labor and the United Auto Workers fought to organize workers to gain them better working conditions and wages.
3
By 1773, the population of Detroit was 1,400.
Detroit manufacturers such as Packard and Hudson merged into other companies and eventually disappeared.
Other, prominent Motor City R&B stars in the 1950s and early 1960s was Nolan Strong, Andre Williams and Nathaniel Mayer – who all scored local and national hits on the Fortune Records label.
THE "A"s: Some scientists believe the dinosaurs died out when one of these interstellar objects struck the Earth
an asteroid
The most recent such event was , when an asteroid impact triggered the extinction of the non-avian dinosaurs and other large reptiles, but spared some small animals such as mammals, which then resembled shrews.
3
Earth's axis of rotation is tilted 23.4° away from the perpendicular of its orbital plane, producing seasonal variations on the planet's surface with a period of one tropical year (365.24 solar days).
It has a composition of 78% nitrogen and 21% oxygen, with trace amounts of water vapor, carbon dioxide and other gaseous molecules.
Cultural and historical viewpoint  thumb|"Earthrise", the first photograph of Earth as a celestial body, taken by astronauts on board Apollo 8.
DOWN TO EARTH: A clue for alien astronomers looking for life on Earth is the large amount of this gas, CH4, in the atmosphere
methane
Water vapor, carbon dioxide, methane and ozone are the primary greenhouse gases in the atmosphere.
3
The tectonic plates ride on top of the asthenosphere, the solid but less-viscous part of the upper mantle that can flow and move along with the plates.
At the same time, the upwelling of mantle material at divergent boundaries creates mid-ocean ridges.
Due to the efforts of influential Christian scholars and clerics such as James Ussher, who sought to determine the age of Earth through analysis of genealogies in Scripture, Westerners prior to the 19th century generally believed Earth to be a few thousand years old at most.
MEASUREMENT: One astronomical unit is about 93 million miles, the average distance between Earth & this
the Sun
Earth  (also the world, in  Gaia, or in Latin: TerraOxford English Dictionary),  "terra, n." Oxford University Press (Oxford), 1911.) is the third planet from the Sun, the densest planet in the Solar System, the largest of the Solar System's four terrestrial planets, and the only astronomical object known to harbor life.
2
When the consensus of the membership permits, it provides a mechanism for armed intervention.
See also  Celestial sphere  Earth physical characteristics tables  Earth science  Earth system science  Timeline of the far future  Notes  References  Further reading    External links   National Geographic encyclopedic entry about the Earth  Earth – Profile – Solar System Exploration –
"E" FOR EFFORT: The solar type of this event happens when the moon comes between the sun & the Earth
Eclipse
Without this tilt, there would be an eclipse every two weeks, alternating between lunar eclipses and solar eclipses.
3
Atmosphere  thumb|A typhoon as seen from low Earth orbit The atmospheric pressure on Earth's surface averages 101.325 kPa, with a scale height of about 8.5 km.
These deposits are used by humans both for energy production and as feedstock for chemical production.
Over millions of years, these tiny modifications—and the lengthening of Earth's day by about 23 µs/yr—add up to significant changes.
THIS IS PLANET EARTH: Term for the innermost part of the Earth, or the innermost part of an apple
Core
Earth's interior remains active with a solid iron inner core, a liquid outer core that generates the magnetic field, and a convecting mantle that drives plate tectonics.
3
thumb|600px|center|alt=14 billion year timeline showing Sun's present age at ; from  Sun gradually warming, becoming a red dwarf at , "soon" followed by its transformation into a white dwarf|Life cycle of the Sun  Name and etymology The modern English word  Earth developed from a wide variety of Middle English forms, which derived from an Old English noun most often spelled .Oxford English Dictionary,  "earth, n.¹" Oxford University Press (Oxford), 2010.
This water cycle is a vital mechanism for supporting life on land, and is a primary factor in the erosion of surface features over geological periods.
Atmospheric circulation, topographic features and temperature differences determine the average precipitation that falls in each region.
THIRD ROCK FROM THE SUN: Of about 1/4, 2/3 or 3/4, Earth's orbital period is 365 & this fraction of a day
1/4
Earth's hydrosphere consists chiefly of the oceans, but technically includes all water surfaces in the world, including inland seas, lakes, rivers, and underground waters down to a depth of 2,000 m. The deepest underwater location is Challenger Deep of the Mariana Trench in the Pacific Ocean with a depth of 10,911.4 m.  The mass of the oceans is approximately 1.35 metric tons, or about 1/4400 of Earth's total mass.
3
Earth's biosphere has significantly altered its atmosphere.
Magnetosphere thumb|Schematic of Earth's magnetosphere.
Earth's biosphere produces many useful biological products for humans, including food, wood, pharmaceuticals, oxygen, and the recycling of many organic wastes.
"V" HAVE MAPS: In 1814 the congress of this city met to redraw Europe
Vienna
Meanwhile, in the south, the Ottomans had conquered the Balkans by the 15th century, laying siege to Vienna in 1529.
3
including between 11 and 17 million people who perished during the Holocaust.
European integration also grew after World War II.
Within this context, significant disparities exist between regions in relation to fertility rates.
NATION STATION: Coming in right behind Spain, this Scandinavian country is the fifth largest in Europe
Sweden
Bratislava Slovensko   Slovenia 20,273 2,050,189 101 Ljubljana Slovenija   Spain 504,851 47,059,533 93.2 Madrid España   Sweden 449,964 9,090,113 19.7 Stockholm Sverige   Switzerland 41,290 7,507,000 176.8 Bern Schweiz/Suisse/Svizzera/Svizra   Turkey  783,562 77,695,904 101 Ankara Türkiye   Ukraine 603,700 48,396,470 80.2 Kiev Ukrajina   United Kingdom 244,820 64,105,654 244.2 London United Kingdom   Vatican City 0.44 900 2,045.5 Vatican City Città del Vaticano/Civitas Vaticana Total 10,180,000 742,000,000 70  Within the above-mentioned states are several de facto independent countries with limited to no international recognition.
3
The wolf, the second largest predator in Europe after the brown bear, can be found primarily in Central and Eastern Europe and in the Balkans, with a handful of packs in pockets of Western Europe (Scandinavia, Spain, etc.).
Approximately 70 million Europeans died through war, violence and famine between 1914 and 1945.Gary Rodger Weaver (1998).
European ancestry predominates in North America, and to a lesser degree in South America (particularly in Uruguay, Argentina, Chile and Brazil, while most of the other Latin American countries also have a considerable population of European origins).
WORLD HISTORY: World leaders met at the Congress of this city in 1815 to decide the fate of Europe after Napoleon's defeat
Vienna
Meanwhile, in the south, the Ottomans had conquered the Balkans by the 15th century, laying siege to Vienna in 1529.
3
The fall of the Western Roman Empire, during the migration period, marked the end of ancient history and the beginning of an era known as the "middle ages".
It started when Archduke Franz Ferdinand of Austria was assassinated by the Yugoslav nationalist Gavrilo Princip.
National Geographic, 536.
NEPALESE HISTORY: The golden age of Licchavi rule was followed by 300 years of these ages, also a term used of medieval Europe
the Dark Ages
During the Dark Ages, the Western Roman Empire fell under the control of various tribes.
3
Feudalism developed in France in the Early Middle Ages and soon spread throughout Europe.
Germany re-expanded and took back the Saarland and Rhineland in 1935 and 1936.
Scholar Andreas Kaplan describes Europe as "embracing maximum cultural diversity at minimal geographical distances".
LET'S GO DUTCH: This city's Schiphol Airport, one of Europe's busiest, is home to KLM, Royal Dutch Airlines
Amsterdam
Luxembourg Lëtzebuerg/Luxemburg/Luxembourg   Macedonia 25,713 2,054,800 81.1 Skopje Makedonija   Malta 316 397,499 1,257.9 Valletta Malta   Moldova  33,843 4,434,547 131.0 Chișinău Moldova   Monaco 1.95 31,987 16,403.6 Monaco Monaco   Montenegro 13,812 616,258 44.6 Podgorica Crna Gora   Netherlands  41,526 16,902,103 393.0 Amsterdam Nederland   Norway 385,178 5,018,836 15.5 Oslo Norge/Noreg   Poland 312,685 38,625,478 123.5 Warsaw Polska   Portugal  91,568 10,409,995 110.1 Lisbon Portugal   Romania 238,391 21,698,181 91.0 Bucharest România   Russia  17,075,400 143,975,923 8.3 Moscow Rossiya   San Marino 61 27,730 454.6 San Marino San Marino   Serbia  88,361 7,120,666 91.9 Belgrade Srbija   Slovakia 48,845 5,422,366 111.0
3
Further from the Atlantic, seasonal differences increase, but the mildness of the climate remains.
Dissertation on St. Paul's Voyage, BiblioLife (BiblioBazaar), 1872.
Isolated monastic communities were the only places to safeguard and compile written knowledge accumulated previously; apart from this very few written records survive and much literature, philosophy, mathematics, and other thinking from the classical period disappeared from Western Europe though they were preserved in the east, in the Byzantine Empire.
REGION-ISMS: There's a Lake one in Cumbria, England: the federal one in Mexico is the seat of the national government
district
However, there are uplands in the north (for example, the mountainous Lake District, Pennines, and Yorkshire Dales) and in the south west (for example, Dartmoor and the Cotswolds).
3
The export part of the economy is dominated by pharmaceuticals, cars (although many English marques are now foreign-owned, such as Land Rover, Lotus, Jaguar and Bentley), crude oil and petroleum from the English parts of North Sea oil along with Wytch Farm, aircraft engines and alcoholic beverages.
Common folkloric beings include pixies, giants, elves, bogeymen, trolls, goblins and dwarves.
Ealing Studios in London has a claim to being the oldest continuously working film studio in the world.
OBSERVATORIES: Located on Salisbury Plain, Wiltshire, England, it may have been built as early as 2800 B.C.
Stonehenge
History  Prehistory and antiquity  thumb|alt=Sun shining through row of upright standing stones with other stones horizontally on the top.|Stonehenge, a Neolithic monument The earliest known evidence of human presence in the area now known as England was that of Homo antecessor, dating to approximately 780,000 years ago.
3
The 2014 European Parliament election saw the regions of England elect the following MEPs: 22 UK Independence Party (UKIP), 17 Conservatives, 17 Labour, 3 Greens, and one Liberal Democrat.
Rainfall is higher in the west, and parts of the Lake District receive more rain than anywhere else in the country.
The physician Edward Jenner's smallpox vaccine is said to have "saved more lives ... than were lost in all the wars of mankind since the beginning of recorded history."
BIRTHQUAKES: "Hard times", indeed! A giant quake struck New Madrid, MO, on Feb. 7, 1812, the day this author struck England
Charles Dickens
Authors from around the Victorian era include Charles Dickens, the Brontë sisters, Jane Austen, George Eliot, Rudyard Kipling, Thomas Hardy, H. G. Wells and Lewis Carroll..
3
About half of the population increase between 1991 and 2001 was due to immigration.
The England rugby union team won the 2003 Rugby World Cup, the country was one of the host nations of the competition in the 1991 Rugby World Cup and is set to host the 2015 Rugby World Cup.
It is also known as the Rose of England.
JUNE 26: He became King of England on June 26, 1483; just over 2 years later he was killed at Bosworth Field
Richard III
Eventually it led to the Yorkists losing the throne entirely to a Welsh noble family the Tudors, a branch of the Lancastrians headed by Henry Tudor who invaded with Welsh and Breton mercenaries, gaining victory at the Battle of Bosworth Field where the Yorkist king Richard III was killed.
3
thumb|left|alt=A grey coloured car.|The Bentley Mulsanne.
p. 64–69
Some of the more popular cheeses are Cheddar, Red Leicester and Wensleydale together with Blue Stilton.
IN THE DICTIONARY: Slower than a gallop, this horse's gait is named for a pilgrimage site in England
canter
Religion thumb|alt=Large yellow stone ornate building with buttresses and square central tower.|right|Canterbury Cathedral, seat of the Archbishop of Canterbury  According to the 2011 census, 59.4% of the population is Christian, 24.7% non-religious, 5% is Muslim while 3.7% of the population belongs to other religions and 7.2 did not give an answer.
3
The best-known of the native tribes who attempted to resist were the Catuvellauni led by Caratacus.
The Bank has a monopoly on the issue of banknotes in England and Wales, although not in other parts of the United Kingdom.
Some of the best-known of these are: Hadrian's Wall, Stonehenge, Avebury and Associated Sites, Tower of London, Jurassic Coast, Saltaire, Ironbridge Gorge, Studley Royal Park and various others.
"GUN" SMOKE: It was an accident with this substance that caused John Smith to go back to England in 1609
gunpowder
On 5 November people make bonfires, set off fireworks and eat toffee apples in commemoration of the foiling of the Gunpowder Plot centred on Guy Fawkes.
3
He also legally incorporated his ancestral land Wales into the Kingdom of England with the 1535–1542 acts.
Geography  Landscape and rivers thumb|upright=1.5|alt=Blue lake between green hills.|right|Skiddaw massif, seen from Walla Crag in the Lake District  Geographically England includes the central and southern two-thirds of the island of Great Britain, plus such offshore islands as the Isle of Wight and the Isles of Scilly.
The coldest months are January and February, the latter particularly on the English coast, while July is normally the warmest month.
BRITISH ART: Thomas Sully left England for America as a child but returned in the 1830s to paint this queen
Victoria
London became the largest and most populous metropolitan area in the world during the Victorian era, and trade within the British Empire—as well as the standing of the British military and navy—was prestigious.
2
The prison population doubled over the same period, giving it the highest incarceration rate in Western Europe at 147 per 100,000.
The English are keen sailors and enjoy competitive sailing; founding and winning some of the worlds most famous and respected international competitive tournaments across the various race formats, including the match race, a regatta, and the America's Cup.
HISTORY: In 1086 William the Conqueror had a survey of England taken which was recorded in this book
The Domesday Book
The Anglo-Saxon Chronicle recorded that the Domesday Book of 1086 covered the whole of England, meaning the English kingdom, but a few years later the Chronicle stated that King Malcolm III went "out of Scotlande into Lothian in Englaland", thus using it in the more ancient sense.
3
It is an Indo-European language in the Anglo-Frisian branch of the Germanic family..
Some of the characters and stories are present across England, but most belong to specific regions.
The charity National Trust for Places of Historic Interest or Natural Beauty holds a contrasting role.
TO PROTECT: Oliver Cromwell "guarded" England as a virtual dictator under this official title from 1653 to 1658
Lord Protector
Leader of the Parliament forces, Oliver Cromwell declared himself Lord Protector in 1653; a period of personal rule followed.
3
Roman-dominated Christianity had in general disappeared from the conquered territories, but was reintroduced by missionaries from Rome led by Augustine from 597 onwards.
The English Lowlands are to the south of the Pennines, consisting of green rolling hills, including the Cotswold Hills, Chiltern Hills, North and South Downs—where they meet the sea they form white rock exposures such as the cliffs of Dover.
The English are keen sailors and enjoy competitive sailing; founding and winning some of the worlds most famous and respected international competitive tournaments across the various race formats, including the match race, a regatta, and the America's Cup.
HOW TERRIBLY BRITISH: If you're not happy saying your weight is 280 pounds, go to England where you're only 20 of these
stones
History  Prehistory and antiquity  thumb|alt=Sun shining through row of upright standing stones with other stones horizontally on the top.|Stonehenge, a Neolithic monument The earliest known evidence of human presence in the area now known as England was that of Homo antecessor, dating to approximately 780,000 years ago.
3
This conquest led to the almost total dispossession of the English elite and its replacement by a new French-speaking aristocracy, whose speech had a profound and permanent effect on the English language.
UK Film Council.
Barry Ronge's Classic DVD : Alice in Wonderland, The Times, It was made under the personal supervision of Walt Disney, and he took special care when animating British fantasy.
PARTY TIME!: This famous Edgar Allan Poe story concerns "A gay and magnificent revel" that turns horribly deadly
The Masque of the Red Death
Selected list of works  Tales  "The Black Cat"  "The Cask of Amontillado"  "A Descent into the Maelström"  "The Facts in the Case of M. Valdemar"  "The Fall of the House of Usher"  "The Gold-Bug"  "Hop-Frog"  "The Imp of the Perverse"  "Ligeia"  "The Masque of the Red Death"  "Morella"  "The Murders in the Rue Morgue"  "The Oval Portrait"  "The Pit and the Pendulum"  "The Premature Burial"  "The Purloined Letter"  "The System of Doctor Tarr and Professor Fether"  "The Tell-Tale Heart"  Poetry  "Al Aaraaf"  "Annabel Lee"  "The Bells"  "The City in the Sea"  "The Conqueror Worm"  "A Dream Within a Dream"  "Eldorado"  "Eulalie"  "The Haunted Palace"  "To Helen"  "Lenore"  "Tamerlane"  "The Raven"  "Ulalume"  Other works   Politian (1835) – Poe's only play  The Narrative of Arthur Gordon Pym of Nantucket (1838) – Poe's only complete novel  "The Balloon-Hoax" (1844) –
3
With the death of Frances Allan in 1829, Poe and Allan reached a temporary rapprochement.
Fellow critic James Russell Lowell called him "the most discriminating, philosophical, and fearless critic upon imaginative works who has written in America", suggesting—rhetorically—that he occasionally used prussic acid instead of ink.
The house which was his birthplace at 62 Carver Street no longer exists; also, the street has since been renamed "Charles Street South".
WORLD LITERATURE: The defense of Douglas Castle in 1306 is the subject of this Edinburgh native's 1832 novel "Castle Dangerous"
Sir Walter Scott
Notable residents   thumb|upright|Sir Walter Scott Edinburgh has a long literary tradition, which became especially evident during the Scottish Enlightenment.
3
By 1821, Edinburgh had been overtaken by Glasgow as Scotland's largest city.
This provides a varied programme including shows by Callum Innes, Peter Liversidge, Ellsworth Kelly, Richard Forster, and Sean Scully.
Transport for Edinburgh released a statement on 7 July 2014 that average weekly tram passengers are currently in excess of 90,000 after the first week of service saw 130,000 journeys taken.
ACADEMIC PENTATHLON: Art:"Madonna" & this masterpiece by Edvard Munch were stole in broad daylight in 2004
The Scream
One of his most well-known works is The Scream of 1893.
3
His idiom continued to veer between naturalistic, as seen in Portrait of Hans Jæger, and impressionistic, as in Rue Lafayette.
Paris Munch arrived in Paris during the festivities of the Exposition Universelle (1889) and roomed with two fellow Norwegian artists.
In 1902, he displayed his works thematically at the hall of the Berlin Secession, producing "a symphonic effect—it made a great stir—a lot of antagonism—and a lot of approval." The Berlin critics were beginning to appreciate Munch's work even though the public still found his work alien and strange.
ADVICE FROM DR. JOYCE BROTHERS: (Dr. Joyce Brothers reads the clue.)  Make sure your kids know that this euphoria-inducing drug, also called MDMA, can do serious damage
ecstasy
MDMA has become widely known as ecstasy (shortened to "E", "X", or "XTC"), usually referring to its tablet form, although this term may also include the presence of possible adulterants.
3
MDMA and metabolites are primarily excreted as conjugates, such as sulfates and glucuronides.
In 1927, Max Oberlin studied the pharmacology of MDMA while searching for substances with effects similar to adrenaline or ephedrine, the latter being structurally similar to MDMA. Compared to ephedrine, Oberlin observed that it had similar effects on vascular smooth muscle tissue, stronger effects at the uterus, and no "local effect at the eye".
Hoping MDMA could avoid criminalization like LSD and mescaline, psychotherapists and experimenters attempted to limit the spread of MDMA and information about it while conducting informal research.
THE BASS: Jack Bruce played with Eric Clapton in The Bluesbreakers before joining him in this trio
Cream
He is the only three-time inductee to the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame: once as a solo artist and separately as a member of the Yardbirds and Cream.
3
During the summer of 1969, Clapton and Bramlett contributed to the Music From Free Creek "supersession" project.
Gordon was confined to 16-years-to-life imprisonment, later being moved to a mental institution, where he remains today.
The band toured the world and subsequently released the 1975 live LP, E.C. Was Here.
TOWERS: Seen here are the world headquarters towers (nicknamed "Debit" & "Credit") for this bank in Frankfurt
Deutsche Bank
In 2010 63 national and 152 international banks had their registered offices in Frankfurt, including Germany's major banks, notably Deutsche Bank, Commerzbank, DZ Bank and KfW, as well as 41 representative offices of international banks.
3
Gallileo,  —
It is primarily used for soccer and concerts with a capacity up to 51,500.
Botanical gardens thumb|Palmengarten Frankfurt is home to two major botanical gardens.
PRIMETIME TV: William Devane played the Secy. of State on "The West Wing" & the Secy. of Defense on this Fox series
24
nysaes.cornell.edu (1997-04-24)  Island fox (Urocyon littoralis) The island fox, though considered a near-threatened species throughout the world, is becoming increasingly endangered in its endemic environment of the California Channel Islands.
3
p.18.
This is usually represented as a character possessing these traits.
p.89.Komarova, Natalia.
THE OAFISH: So far, this actor who played Joey is the only member of the "Friends" cast to star in a spinoff of the show
Matt LeBlanc
Starring Jennifer Aniston, Courteney Cox, Lisa Kudrow, Matt LeBlanc, Matthew Perry and David Schwimmer, the show revolves around six friends living in Manhattan.
3
In the season finale, they end their relationship when they realize that unlike Monica, Richard does not want children.
Rachel projects feelings of sadness when she thinks she's not pregnant, so Phoebe tells her the truth.
The series' creators completed the first draft of the hour-long finale in January 2004, four months before its original airing.
GERMAN RIVERS: The 339-mile Moselle River forms part of the boundary between Germany & this duchy
Luxembourg
In the spring of 1940, Germany conquered Denmark and Norway, the Netherlands, Belgium, Luxembourg, and France forcing the French government to sign an armistice after German troops occupied most of the country.
3
Ian Kershaw.
In 2010, 29% of families with children under 18 had at least one parent with immigrant roots.
The German video gaming market is one of the largest in the world.
WORLD WAR II: Germany's "Desert Fox"
Rommel
The Academy Award for Best Foreign Language Film ("Oscar") went to the German production Die Blechtrommel (The Tin Drum) in 1979, to Nirgendwo in Afrika (Nowhere in Africa) in 2002, and to Das Leben der Anderen (The Lives of Others) in 2007.
3
thumb|left|The Holy Roman Empire in 1648, after the Peace of Westphalia which ended the Thirty Years' War  In 1517, the Wittenberg monk Martin Luther publicised The Ninety-Five Theses, challenging the Roman Catholic Church and initiating the Protestant Reformation.
In 2013, a grand coalition was established in a Third Merkel cabinet.
Such films included Wolfgang Staudte's Die Mörder sind unter uns (The Murderers are among us) (1946).
WORLD LEADERS: (Jimmy reads from the streets of Lubeck, Germany.)  This Lubeck-born West German chancellor said, "I always carried a piece of Lubeck with me wherever I had to go"
Willy Brandt
Tensions between East and West Germany were reduced in the early 1970s by Chancellor Willy Brandt's .
3
The 14 national parks in Germany include the Jasmund National Park, the Vorpommern Lagoon Area National Park, the Müritz National Park, the Wadden Sea National Parks, the Harz National Park, the Hainich National Park, the Black Forest National Park, the Saxon Switzerland National Park, the Bavarian Forest National Park and the Berchtesgaden National Park.
The German energy transition (Energiewende) is the recognised move to a sustainable economy by means of energy efficiency.
Ludwig Mies van der Rohe became one of the world's most renowned architects in the second half of the 20th century.
MYTHELLANEOUS: This goddess after whom a major city in Greece is named sprang from the head of Zeus
Athena
Other prominent cities with urban populations above 100,000 inhabitants include those of [[Patras]], [[Heraklion]], [[Larissa]], [[Volos]], [[Rhodes (city)|Rhodes]], [[Ioannina]], [[Chania]] and [[Chalcis]].<ref name="cities">{{cite web|url=http://www.statistics.gr/Athena2001/Athena2001.ASP?wcu=$cmd=0$id=5200712142356520314915|title=Athena 2001 Census | publisher=[[National Statistical Service of Greece]]|accessdate=14 December 2007 | archiveurl =//web.archive.org/web/20080117231653/http://www.statistics.gr/Athena2001/Athena2001.ASP?wcu=$cmd=0$id=5200712142356520314915| archivedate = 17 January 2008}}{{Dead link|date=February 2014}}</ref
2
The Greek islands are traditionally grouped into the following clusters:  The [[Argo-Saronic Islands]] in the Saronic gulf near Athens, the Cyclades, a large but dense collection occupying the central part of the Aegean Sea, the [[North Aegean islands]], a loose grouping off the west coast of Turkey, the Dodecanese, another loose collection in the southeast between Crete and Turkey, the [[Sporades]], a small tight group off the coast of northeast Euboea, and the Ionian Islands, located to the west of the mainland in the Ionian Sea.
''Bust: Greece, the Euro and the Sovereign Debt Crisis''.
HODGEPODGE: Plate pressure is compressing the Mediterranean, but this sea, bordering Greece, is expanding
Aegean Sea
The Aegean Sea lies to the east of the mainland, the Ionian Sea to the west, and the Mediterranean Sea to the south.
3
After the War was Over.
=Piraeus}}</ref>  Important Greek industries include [[Tourism in Greece|tourism]] (with 14.9 million<ref name="World Tourism Organization">{{cite web|title=UNWTO World Tourism Barometer | format = PDF | url = http://www.unwto.org/facts/eng/pdf/barometer/UNWTO_Barom10_2_en.pdf |publisher=[[United Nations World Tourism Organization]] |accessdate=22 February 2012}}</ref> international tourists in 2009, it is ranked as the 7th most visited country in the European Union<ref name="World Tourism Organization" /> and 16th in the world<ref name="World Tourism Organization" /> by the [[United Nations World Tourism Organization]]) and [[Greek Merchant Navy|merchant shipping]] (at 16.2%<ref name="UN Shipping report 2011" /> of the world's total capacity, the Greek merchant marine is the largest in the world<ref name="UN Shipping report 2011" />), while the country is also a considerable agricultural producer (including fisheries) within the union.
It accounts for 4.5% of GDP, employs about 160,000 people (4% of the workforce), and represents ⅓ of the country's trade deficit.<ref name =nbg>{{cite web | author=Press release |url=http://www.nbg.gr/en/pr_release_resb.asp?P_ID=463 | publisher=[[National Bank of Greece]] |title=Greek Shipping Is Modernized To Remain a Global Leader and Expand Its Contribution to the Greek Economy |date=11 May 2006 |accessdate=8 April 2007| archiveurl =//web.archive.org/web/20070831114031/http://www.nbg.gr/en/pr_release_resb.asp?P_ID=463|archivedate = 31 August 2007}}</ref
EUROPEAN ART & ARTISTS: This beautiful painting by Gustav Klimt has the same name as a famous sculpture by Rodin
The Kiss
His painting, The Kiss (1907–08), is thought to be an image of them as lovers.
3
After the exhibition the painting was preserved, although it was not displayed again until 1986.
The only folio set produced in Klimt's lifetime, Das Werk Gustav Klimts, was published initially by H. O. Miethke (of Gallerie Miethke, Klimt's exclusive gallery in Vienna) from 1908 to 1914 in an edition of 300, supervised personally by the artist.
Schorske, Carl E. "Gustav Klimt:
EAST ASIAN CITIES: Also called Guangzhou, for almost a century it was the only Chinese port open to foreign trade
Canton
Guangzhou (also known as Canton, and less commonly as Kwangchow),"Guangzhou (China)".
3
Accessed September 12, 2010.
It is also very close to Guangzhou Baiyun Airport.
Zhushui
THE DEVIL'S IN THE DETAILS: It's the Gospel that contains the line "In my name shall they cast out devils; they shall speak with new tongues"
Mark
thumb|250px|The first page of the Gospel of Mark in Armenian, by Sargis Pitsak, 14th century.
3
Günter Bornkamm (ed).
Gospels.
Evangelium als Biographie: Die vier Evanelien im Rahmen antiker Erzählkunst.
AMERICAN IDLE 2009: Geoffrey the Giraffe from this company went toy shopping & bought struggling FAO Schwarz
Toys "R" Us
Another famous fictional giraffe is the Toys "R" Us mascot Geoffrey the Giraffe.
3
Males develop calcium deposits that form bumps on their skulls as they age.
During copulation, the male stands on his hind legs with his head held up and his front legs resting on the female's sides.
The smoke from burning giraffe skins was used by the medicine men of Buganda to treat nose bleeds.
BUSINESS PEOPLE: In 1901 James Dole founded a company in Hawaii to process this
pineapple
The attack on Pearl Harbor and other military and naval installations, carried out by aircraft and by midget submarines, brought the United States into World War II.  Political changes of 1954—the State of Hawaii (1959–present)  thumb|alt = Three young women pack pineapples into cans in 1928.|Prior to the postwar labor movement, Hawaii was governed by U.S. agricultural elites and entrepreneurs.
3
A second wave of migration from Raiatea and Bora Bora took place in the  century.
Average electricity prices in October 2014 () were nearly three times the national average () and 80% higher than the second-highest state, Connecticut.
Hawaii incurred the biggest seniority shift between the 112th and 113th Congresses.
EUROPEAN CAPITALS: Romania's capital, Bucharest, is not to be confused with this capital of Hungary
Budapest
The country's capital and largest city is Budapest.
3
Despite great Eastern successes, Germany suffered complete defeat on the more important Western front.
The average yearly rainfall is approximately .
Loránd
EUROPEAN HISTORY: From 1541 to 1784 this current capital of Slovakia served as the capital of Hungary
Bratislava
Another, Universitas Istropolitana, was established 1465 in Pozsony (now Bratislava in Slovakia) by Mattias Corvinus.
3
("Magyarország a 12.
For a time, the Soviet leadership was unsure how to respond to developments in Hungary, but soon decided to intervene to prevent Hungary from breaking away from the Soviet bloc.
Loránd
CARIBBEAN TASTE TREATS: Sancocho, a stew made with 5 to 7 meats, is a specialty of this country, Haiti's next-door neighbor
Dominican Republic
It occupies the western three-eighths of the island which it shares with the Dominican Republic.
3
Cité Soleil in Port-au-Prince, one of the biggest slums in the Northern Hemisphere, has been called "the most dangerous place on Earth" by the United Nations.
Sonni Nattestad Faroese professional footballer, born in Port-au-Prince.
Map of Haiti from the United Nations.
SKIP TO MY "LOO": Chinese city opposite Hong Kong island
Kowloon
After the First Opium War (1839–42), Hong Kong became a British colony with the perpetual cession of Hong Kong Island, followed by Kowloon Peninsula in 1860 and a 99-year lease of the New Territories from 1898.
3
Nevertheless, the expiry of the 1898 lease on the New Territories in 1997 created problems for business contracts, property leases and confidence among foreign investors.
According to UN estimates, Hong Kong has one of the longest life expectancies of any country or territory in the world.
Also, Hong Kong's skyline is often regarded to be the best in the world, with the surrounding mountains and Victoria Harbour complementing the skyscrapers.
THE NEW YORK TIMES HOME & GARDEN: A report from Hong Kong covered a wealthy widow's $3 billion bequest to her adviser on this study of placing objects
feng shui
Concepts like feng shui are taken very seriously, with expensive construction projects often hiring expert consultants, and are often believed to make or break a business.
3
Hong Kong Economic Journal, 3 July 2007, Page 34.
Agricultural activity—relatively unimportant to Hong Kong's economy and contributing just 0.1% of its GDP—primarily consists of growing premium food and flower varieties.
Travel writer Ryan Levitt considered the main Tsim Sha Tsui to Central route one of the most picturesque in the world.
BELIEVE: When members of this offshoot of Hinduism perform important rituals, they use water stirred with a ceremonial sword
Sikhism
He includes among "founded religions" Buddhism, Jainism, Sikhism that are now distinct religions, syncretic movements such as Brahmo Samaj and the Theosophical Society, as well as various Guru-ism and new religious movements such as Maharishi Mahesh Yogi and ISKCON.  Inden states that the attempt to classify Hinduism by typology started in the imperial times, when proselytizing missionaries and colonial officials sought to understand and portray Hinduism from their interests.
3
223-256; Chris Bartley (2001), Encyclopedia of Asian Philosophy, Editor: Oliver Learman, ISBN 0-415-17281-0, Routledge, Article on Purushartha, pp 443  Mokṣa (liberation, freedom from samsara)  Moksha (Sanskrit:  ) or mukti (Sanskrit: ) is the ultimate, most important goal in Hinduism.
thumb|Priest attending a murthi Bhakti refers to devotion, participation in and the love of a personal god or a representational god by a devotee.
Rafiuddin Ahmed (1992), Muslim-Christian Polemics, in Religious Controversy in British India: Dialogues in South Asian Languages (Editor: Kenneth Jones), State University of New York Press, ISBN 978-0791408278, pages 93-120Ayesha Jalal (2010), Partisans of Allah: Jihad in South Asia, Harvard University Press, ISBN 978-0674047365, pages 117-146  Religious leaders of some Hindu reform movements such as the Arya Samaj launched Shuddhi movement to proselytize and reconvert Muslims and Christians back to Hinduism,CS Adcock (2014), The Limits of Tolerance: Indian Secularism and the Politics of Religious Freedom, Oxford University Press, ISBN 978-0199995448, pages 1-35, 115-168Harold Coward (1987), Modern Indian Responses to Religious Pluralism, State University of New York Press, ISBN 978-0887065729, pages 49-60 while those such as the Brahmo Samaj suggested Hinduism to be a non-missionary religion.
"JAN"UARY: Hadrian's predecessor as Roman emperor, his column in Rome commemorates his victories
Trajan
Alicia M. Canto, Itálica, Sedes natalis de Adriano His predecessor, Trajan, was a maternal cousin of Hadrian's father.
2
Princeton University Press, 2002, pp.
Or better, the reason for their elimination is simply that all four were prominent senators of consular rank and, as such, prospective candidates for the imperial office (capaces imperii).Marasco, 377
STUPID ANSWERS: This great Hindu hero's story is told in the "Ramayana"
Rama
52, No. 2, pages 266-269 Temples dedicated to deity Rama were built from north to south India, and textual records as well as hagiographic inscriptions began comparing the Hindu epic of Ramayana to regional kings and their response to Islamic attacks.
3
Scholars state that the custom of distinguishing between Hindus, Buddhists, Jains and Sikhs is a modern phenomenon.
However, these mid 19th century reports offered no indication of doctrinal or ritual differences between Hindu and Buddhist, or other newly constructed religious identities.
The successes of each side fed the fears of the other, leading to the growth of Hindu nationalism and Muslim nationalism in the Indian subcontinent.
RELIGION: The Hindu trinity is Brahma, Vishnu & this god
Shiva
Pollock notes that the Yadava king Ramacandra is described as a devotee of deity Shiva (Shaivism), yet his political achievements and temple construction sponsorship in Varanasi, far from his kingdom's location in the Deccan region, is described in the historical records in Vaishnavism terms of Rama, a deity Vishnu avatar.
3
The historical development of Hindu self-identity within the Indian population, in a religious or cultural sense, is unclear.
follow a tradition centered on any particular form of the Divine, such as Shaivism, Vaishnavism, Shaktism, etc.
37, No. 4, pages 701-706 state that the military and political campaign during the medieval era wars in Deccan peninsula of India, and in the north India, were no longer a quest for sovereignty, they embodied a political and religious animosity against the "otherness of Islam", and this began the historical process of Hindu identity formation.
LABOR DAY FOR HERCULES: For his last labor, Hercules had to go to Hades & subdue this canine that had a dragon for a tail
Cerberus
Capture and bring back Cerberus.
3
Slay the nine-headed Lernaean Hydra.
Hercules had a number of myths that were distinctly Roman.
In art In Roman works of art and in Renaissance and post-Renaissance art, Hercules can be identified by his attributes, the lion skin and the gnarled club (his favorite weapon); in mosaic he is shown tanned bronze, a virile aspect.
THE 20TH CENTURY: He & co-author Richard Suskind served brief prison terms for their forged bio of Howard Hughes
Clifford Irving
Memoir hoax In 1972, author Clifford Irving caused a media sensation when he claimed he had co-written an authorized autobiography of Hughes.
3
Thomas 1987, p. 41.
The two had not lived together for many years.
Lisheron, Mark. "Obituary for Lex Dale Owens, owner of Air Ambulance, Inc.
UNBREAKABLE: Hermes gave this mythical hero an unbreakable sword he used to cut Medusa into Gorgon-zola
Perseus
identification of < Shelley > as a translator was due to the commentary of A. Lang at Project Gutenberg [eBook #16338])  HG. Evelyn-White' (d.1924) translation,published 1914, is used on the Perseus Project.
2
In addition to the lyre, Hermes was believed to have invented many types of racing and the sports of wrestling and boxing, and therefore was a patron of athletes."First Inventors...
162, 169.
COUNTRIES OF THE WORLD: A person from America is an American, from Mexico, a Mexican & from Iceland, this noun
Icelander
Most Icelanders are descendants of Germanic and Gaelic (Celtic) settlers.
3
Iceland is volcanically and geologically active.
Retrieved 28 April 2012.
There is also a value added tax, whereas a net wealth tax was eliminated in 2006.
THAT'S WHERE IT'S AT, MAN!: India to the north, east & west & Burma to the southeast
Bangladesh
Bounded by the Indian Ocean on the south, the Arabian Sea on the south-west, and the Bay of Bengal on the south-east, it shares land borders with Pakistan to the west; China, Nepal, and Bhutan to the north-east; and Myanmar (Burma) and Bangladesh to the east.
3
It is also traditionally associated with the rule of the legendary emperor Bharata.
The railway network provided critical famine relief, notably reduced the cost of moving goods, and helped nascent Indian-owned industry.
The Congress was voted out again in 1989 when a National Front coalition, led by the newly formed Janata Dal in alliance with the Left Front, won the elections; that government too proved relatively short-lived, lasting just under two years.
INDEPENDENCE!: India got its independence August 15, 1947, the day after this neighbor got its own
Pakistan
Bounded by the Indian Ocean on the south, the Arabian Sea on the south-west, and the Bay of Bengal on the south-east, it shares land borders with Pakistan to the west; China, Nepal, and Bhutan to the north-east; and Myanmar (Burma) and Bangladesh to the east.
3
India is a federal constitutional republic governed under a parliamentary system consisting of 29 states and 7 union territories.
It has the power both to declare the law and to strike down union or state laws which contravene the constitution, as well as to invalidate any government action it deems unconstitutional.
Three of these wars were fought over the disputed territory of Kashmir, while the fourth, the 1971 war, followed from India's support for the independence of Bangladesh.
THE RAIN: These winds that blow through India from June to September bring the country most of its rain
monsoon
The Indian climate is strongly influenced by the Himalayas and the Thar Desert, both of which drive the economically and culturally pivotal summer and winter monsoons.
3
Four major climatic groupings predominate in India: tropical wet, tropical dry, subtropical humid, and montane.
The pervasive and ecologically devastating human encroachment of recent decades has critically endangered Indian wildlife.
In the Indian parliamentary system, the executive is subordinate to the legislature; the prime minister and his council are directly responsible to the lower house of the parliament.
U.S. BODIES OF WATER: Shoshone Falls in Idaho lies on this winding river
Snake River
The network of dams and locks on the Columbia River and Snake River make the city of Lewiston the farthest inland seaport on the Pacific coast of the contiguous United States.
3
Despite this lack of evidence for the origin of the name, many textbooks well into the 20th century repeated as fact Willing's account that the name "Idaho" derived from the Shoshone term "ee-da-how".
Total 2008 Population Est.
.
MY OWN PRIVATE IDAHO: Idaho's Kamiah Valley is rich in the heritage & legends of this "nosy" Native American tribe
Nez Perce
According to local knowledge, the name Idaho originated from the Nez Perce language and stands for "the Land of many Waters", a kidney-shaped drainage area in north central Idaho in which a multitude of rivers come together.
3
The landscape is rugged with some of the largest unspoiled natural areas in the United States.
Idaho's government has an alcohol monopoly.
Several Idaho Republicans, including current Senator Mike Crapo, have won reelection to the Senate, but only Frank Church has won reelection as a Democrat.
"WILD" ABOUT ENTERTAINMENT: Even though it was in Swedish, Ingmar Bergman was nominated for an Oscar for writing this 1950s film
Wild Strawberries
He is recognized as one of the most accomplished and influential auteurs of all time and is most famous for films such as The Seventh Seal (1957), Wild Strawberries (1957), Persona (1966), Cries and Whispers (1972), and Fanny and Alexander (1982).
2
The Swedish director Marcus Lindeen went through the material, and inspired by Kärlek utan älskare he took samples from many of the works and turned them into a play, titled Arkivet för orealiserbara drömmar och visioner ("The archive for unrealisable dreams and visions").
The list of his nominations and awards follows:
SCIENCE: Isaac Newton found the strength of this depends on 2 things: mass & distance
gravity
By deriving Kepler's laws of planetary motion from his mathematical description of gravity, and then using the same principles to account for the trajectories of comets, the tides, the precession of the equinoxes, and other phenomena, Newton removed the last doubts about the validity of the heliocentric model of the Solar System.
2
His book Philosophiæ Naturalis Principia Mathematica ("Mathematical Principles of Natural Philosophy"), first published in 1687, laid the foundations for classical mechanics.
ISBN 0-7624-1348-4 Places selections from Newton's Principia in the context of selected writings by Copernicus, Kepler, Galileo and Einstein     Keynes took a close interest in Newton and owned many of Newton's private papers.
BEFORE HE WAS PRESIDENT...: He was postmaster of New Salem, Illinois
Abraham Lincoln
Three U.S. presidents have been elected while living in Illinois: Abraham Lincoln, Ulysses S. Grant, and Barack Obama.
3
Most of the coal produced in Illinois is exported to other states, while much of the coal burned for power in Illinois (21 million tons in 1998) is mined in the Powder River Basin of Wyoming.
Wind power
Former Chicago sports franchises  Folded teams
U.S. RIVERS: It flows from Pittsburgh to Cairo, Illinois, where it empties into the Mississippi River
the Ohio River
After the American Revolutionary War established the United States, American settlers began arriving from Kentucky in the 1810s via the Ohio River, and the population grew from south to north.
3
With Chicago in the northeast, small industrial cities and great agricultural productivity in central and northern Illinois, and natural resources like coal, timber, and petroleum in the south, Illinois has a diverse economic base and is a major transportation hub.
The state's 2010 per capita gross state product was estimated to be , the state's per capita personal income was estimated to be  in 2009.
However, this coal has a high sulfur content, which causes acid rain unless special equipment is used to reduce sulfur dioxide emissions.
LITERARY TOURISM: The home of this "Ivanhoe" author is a tourist attraction in Abbotsford, Scotland
Sir Walter Scott
Ivanhoe  is a historical novel by Sir Walter Scott, first published in 1820 in three volumes and subtitled A Romance.
3
For the Saxons, this value is the final admission of the hopelessness of the Saxon cause.
Castles mentioned within the story include Ashby de la Zouch Castle (now a ruin in the care of English Heritage), York (though the mention of Clifford's Tower, likewise an extant English Heritage property, is anachronistic, it not having been called that until later after various rebuilds) and 'Coningsburgh', which is based upon Conisbrough Castle, in the ancient town of Conisbrough near Doncaster (the castle also being a popular English Heritage site).
2005: A Channel 5 adaptation entitled Dark Knight attempted to adapt Ivanhoe for an ongoing series.
MOVIES WITH SUBTITLES: With films like "A Better Tomorrow", John Woo brought attention to the cinema of this place where he grew up
Hong Kong
John Woo SBS (Ng Yu-Sum; born 1 May 1946) is a Hong Kong film director, writer, and producer.
2
Grosses in the United States exceeded $100 million.
John Woo:
JAPAN: This city, site of the 1972 Winter Olympics, is capital of Hokkaido Prefecture
Sapporo
Sapporo in 1972 and Nagano in 1998.
3
no Yoritomo was appointed shogun and established a base of power in Kamakura.
Administrative divisions  Japan consists of forty-seven prefectures, each overseen by an elected governor, legislature and administrative bureaucracy.
Environment  In the period of rapid economic growth after World War II, environmental policies were downplayed by the government and industrial corporations; as a result, environmental pollution was widespread in the 1950s and 1960s.
FLOWERS: Spider, irregular incurve & pompon are types of this symbol of Japan
Chrysanthemum
Akihito is the current Emperor of Japan; Naruhito, Crown Prince of Japan, stands as next in line to the Chrysanthemum Throne.
3
Kaguya is the largest lunar mission since the Apollo program.
Since privatisation in 1987, dozens of Japanese railway companies compete in regional and local passenger transportation markets; major companies include seven JR enterprises, Kintetsu Corporation, Seibu Railway and Keio Corporation.
"Dilemmas of Development on The Ogasawara Islands," JPRI Occasional Paper, No. 15 (August 1999).
WHAT'S ON TV?: Joshua Jackson plays the son of a mad scientist on this "X-Files"-esque Fox show
Fringe
His well known roles include Pacey Witter in Dawson's Creek, Charlie Conway in The Mighty Ducks film series, Peter Bishop in Fringe, and Cole Lockhart in The Affair.
3
Jackson grew up in California until the age of 8.
In 2000, he also guest-starred in Season 12 of The Simpsons, voicing the character of Jesse Grass, a "hunky environmentalist" and love interest for Lisa Simpson in the episode "Lisa the Tree Hugger".
He has just finished the second season of the Showtime series The Affair.
WHAT ARE "YOU" DOING?: Double your fun & tell us the name of this 1967 James Bond film
You Only Live Twice
It was not until the penultimate novel, You Only Live Twice, that Fleming gave Bond a sense of family background.
3
Other important elements which run through most of the films include Bond's cars, his guns, and the gadgets with which he is supplied by Q Branch.
Gardner went on to write sixteen Bond books in total; two of the books he wrote –
In the early Bond stories Fleming gave Bond a battleship-grey Bentley 4½ Litre with an Amherst Villiers supercharger.
"B" ACTORS: Of the actors who have played James Bond, he's the one born in Ireland in 1951
Pierce Brosnan
After a six-year hiatus, during which a legal wrangle threatened Eon's productions of the Bond films, Irish actor Pierce Brosnan was cast as Bond in GoldenEye, released in 1995; he remained in the role for a total of four films, before leaving in 2002.
3
Likewise, in Moonraker, Special Branch Officer Gala Brand thinks that Bond is "certainly good-looking ...
In October 2013 Ian Fleming Publications announced that Stephen Cole would continue the series, with the first edition scheduled to be released in Autumn 2014.
No provided no spy-related gadgets, but a Geiger counter was used; industrial designer Andy Davey observed that the first ever onscreen spy-gadget was the attaché case shown in From Russia with Love, which he described as "a classic 007 product".
INTERNATIONAL HOLIDAYS & OBSERVANCES: Liberation Day in Cuba, January 1, celebrates independence from this country in 1899
Spain
January 1 became the official start of the year as follows:  1362 Grand Duchy of Lithuania 1522 Republic of Venice 1544 Holy Roman Empire (Germany) 1556 Spain, Portugal 1559 Prussia, Sweden 1564 France 1576 Southern Netherlands 1579 Duchy of Lorraine 1583 Northern Netherlands 1600 Scotland 1700 Russia 1721 Tuscany 1752 Great Britain (excluding Scotland) and its colonies  Events 153 BC –
3
The Zapatista Army of National Liberation initiates twelve days of armed conflict in the Mexican state of Chiapas.
Joe Petagno, American illustrator   1948
1387 – Charles II of Navarre (b. 1332)
JOE BUCK CALLS HISTORY: June 17, 1972:There's the throw... & James McCord, Jr. & 4 others are caught stealing at this complex
Watergate
1972 – Watergate scandal: Five White House operatives are arrested for burgling the offices of the Democratic National Committee, in an attempt by some members of the Republican party to illegally wiretap the opposition.
3
The United States Supreme Court rules 8–1 in Abington School District v. Schempp against requiring the reciting of Bible verses and the Lord's Prayer in public schools.
–
The Mechanics) (d. 2000) 1948 –
SHORT STORIES: John Steinbeck wrote a famous story about young Jody Tiflin & this title equine
the Red Pony
He is widely known for the comic novels Tortilla Flat (1935) and Cannery Row (1945),  the multi-generation epic East of Eden (1952), and the novellas Of Mice and Men (1937) and The Red Pony (1937).
3
It was critically acclaimed and Steinbeck's 1962 Nobel Prize citation called it a "little masterpiece".
Nobel Prize  In 1962, Steinbeck won the Nobel Prize for literature for his "realistic and imaginative writing, combining as it does sympathetic humor and keen social perception."
It was made into a 1955 movie directed by Elia Kazan and starring James Dean.
ARTISTS: Sir Joshua Reynolds was knighted by this king in 1769
George III
He was a founder and first president of the Royal Academy of Arts, and was knighted by George III  in 1769.
3
He took rooms in St Martin's Lane, before moving to Great Newport Street, his sister Frances acted as his housekeeper.
By 1761 Reynolds could command a fee of 80 guineas for a full-length portrait; in 1764 he was paid 100 guineas for a portrait of Lord Burghersh.
McIntyre, p. 427.
BIRTH OF A PRESIDENT: July 4, 1872 in Plymouth, Vermont
Calvin Coolidge
Bill Tilghman, American police officer (d. 1924) 1867 – Stephen Mather, American businessman (d. 1930) 1868 – Henrietta Swan Leavitt, American astronomer and academic (d. 1921) 1872 – Calvin Coolidge, American lawyer and politician, 30th President of the United States (d. 1933) 1874 – John McPhee, Australian journalist and politician, 27th Premier of Tasmania (d. 1952) 1881 – Ulysses S. Grant III, American general (d. 1968) 1882 – Louis B. Mayer, Belarusian-American film producer, founded the Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences (d. 1957) 1883
3
Nina Badrić, Croatian singer-songwriter and actress   1972   –
Max Elliott Slade, American actor   1980   – Kwame Steede, Bermudan footballer 1981 – Dedé, Angolan footballer   1981   – Brock Berlin, American football player   1981   – Francisco Cruceta, Dominican baseball player   1981   – Tahar Rahim, French actor   1981   – Will Smith, American football player 1982 – Hannah Harper, American porn actress and director   1982   –
Barnett Newman, American painter and illustrator (b. 1905)   1970   –
CELEBRITY ALMA MATERS: She dropped out of Sarah Lawrence College in 1957 & married John Lennon in 1969
Yoko Ono
After his marriage to Yoko Ono in 1969, he changed his name to John Ono Lennon.
2
LennoNYC, PBS Television 2010  Recorded as a collaboration with Ono and with backing from the New York band Elephant's Memory, Some Time in New York City was released in 1972.
Ono issued a statement the next day, saying "There is no funeral for John", ending it with the words, "John loved and prayed for the human race.
THE UNIVERSITY OF...: James Madison was Rector No. 2 of this university; James Monroe was a member of the 1st governing body
the University of Virginia
thumb|left|224px|Portrait of Madison, age 82,c.1833  In 1826, after the death of Jefferson, Madison was appointed as the second Rector ("President") of the University of Virginia.
3
Wills (1982), The Federalist Letters Papers
The U.S. fleet on Lake Erie went up against a superior British force there and destroyed or captured the entire British Fleet on the lake.
The Haunted Philosophe:
18TH CENTURY AMERICA: Year in which Thomas Jefferson wrote to James Madison, "France will be quiet this year"
1789
In 1789, Madison became a leader in the new House of Representatives, drafting many basic laws.
3
Madison recorded the unofficial minutes of the convention, and these have become the only comprehensive record of what occurred.
356–59, New York: Newsweek, 1974.
As with both Washington and Jefferson, Madison left the presidency a poorer man than when he entered, due to the steady financial collapse of his plantation, aided by the continued low price of tobacco and his stepson's mismanagement.
STATE CAPITALS: Hollywood Cemetery in this city is the final resting place of James Monroe, John Tyler & Jefferson Davis
Richmond
He returned to Williamsburg in September of 1779 and studied law with George Wythe, and then moved to Richmond to study law with Thomas Jefferson.
3
He gained experience as an executive as the Governor of Virginia and rose to national prominence as a diplomat in France, when he helped negotiate the Louisiana Purchase in 1803.
They found common ground with some abolitionists in supporting colonization.
James Monroe (1911) 312 pages; old barely adequate biography.
COLLEGES & UNIVERSITIES: James K. Polk went to this "tarheel university"
University of North Carolina
In January 1816, he transferred and was admitted into the University of North Carolina as a second-semester sophomore.
3
61–2  Polk's Whig opponent in the 1844 presidential election was Henry Clay of Kentucky.
Many of these Democrats believed that Polk had always wanted the boundary at the 49th, and that he had fooled them into believing he wanted it at the 54th parallel.
In 1845, he sent diplomat John Slidell to Mexico to purchase California and New Mexico for $24–30 million.
KENNEDY FAMILY MEMBERS: Lost the 1980 Democratic presidential nomination to Jimmy Carter
Ted Kennedy
By 1980, Carter's popularity had eroded such that, running for re-election that year, he was challenged by Senator Ted Kennedy in the Democratic Party's primaries for the presidential nomination, marking the most recent Democratic primary in which an incumbent faced serious opposition.
3
While discussing his religion's view of pride, Carter said: "I've looked on a lot of women with lust.
He found that the trustees had mismanaged the trust, leaving him more than one million dollars in debt.
Carter announced his endorsement of Senator (now president) Barack Obama.
FRENCH HISTORY: The law that made July 14 a holiday actually honored that date in this year, 1 year later than you might think
1790
1790 – French Revolution: Citizens of Paris celebrate the unity of the French people and the national reconciliation in the Fête de la Fédération.
3
1223 – Louis VIII becomes King of France upon the death of his father, Philip II. 1420 – Battle of Vítkov Hill, decisive victory of Czech Hussite forces commanded by Jan Žižka against Crusade army led by Sigismund, Holy Roman Emperor
– Edmond-Charles Genêt, French-American diplomat (b. 1763) 1850 – August Neander, German historian and theologian (b. 1789) 1856 – Edward Vernon Utterson, English lawyer and historian (b. 1775) 1876 – John Buckley, English soldier, Victoria Cross recipient (b. 1813)   1876   – Thomas Hazlehurst, English architect (b. 1816) 1881 –
Walter Sedlmayr, German actor and director (b. 1926) 1993 –
JERUSALEM: Around 1000 B.C. he captured the city & made it capital of his kingdom
David
According to the Biblical tradition, King David conquered the city from the Jebusites and established it as the capital of the United Kingdom of Israel, and his son, King Solomon, commissioned the building of the First Temple.
3
A huge water reservoir dating from this period was discovered in 2012 near Robinson's Arch, indicating the existence of a densely built-up quarter across the area west of the Temple Mount during the Judean kingdom.
Adrian J. Boas, Jerusalem in the Time of the Crusades, Routledge 2001, pp.
The Jerusalem Center for Middle Eastern Music and Dance is open to Arabs and Jews and offers workshops on Jewish-Arab dialogue through the arts.
BIBLE BROS: In a move that came back to haunt him, this twin brother of Jacob sold his birthright for some lentil soup
Esau
He is the son of Isaac and Rebecca, the grandson of Abraham, Sarah and of Bethuel, and the younger twin brother of Esau.
1
In Islamic tradition, Jacob had lost his father, Isaac as well as his wife Rachel in the same year, followed by his loss of his favorite son, Joseph.
STATE THE STATE: This state has parishes like Jefferson Davis, Jackson & Union... wait, Union?
Louisiana
Davis was born in Kentucky to a moderately prosperous farmer, and grew up on his older brother Joseph's large cotton plantations in Mississippi and Louisiana.
3
Irons were riveted to his ankles at the order of General Nelson Miles who was in charge of the fort.
ISBN 9780820319414.
Jefferson Davis, Confederate President.
CITIES & TOWNS: Neil Simon might know Jefferson Davis made his home in this Mississippi town known for its "blues", not grays
Biloxi
In 1877, Sarah Anne Ellis Dorsey, a wealthy widow who had heard of his difficulties, invited him to stay at her estate and plantation house of "Beauvoir" on the Gulf Coast (facing the Gulf of Mexico) in Biloxi, Mississippi.
3
She was born in 1759 to William Cook and his wife Sarah Simpson in what is now Christian County, Kentucky.
Davis was also severely ill, and his family feared for his life.
271–273.
EXPIRATION DATES: January 14, 1984:After passing through the golden arches
Ray Kroc
Ray Kroc, American businessman and philanthropist (b. 1902) 1986 – Donna Reed, American actress (b. 1921) 1987 – Turgut Demirağ, Turkish director, producer, and screenwriter (b. 1921)   1987   –
3
2011 –
Former president of Tunisia, Zine El Abidine Ben Ali flees his country to Saudi Arabia after a series of street demonstrations against his regime and corrupt policies, asking for freedom, rights and democracy, considered as the anniversary of the Tunisian Revolution and the birth of the Arab Spring.
– Jean-Baptiste van Loo, French painter (d. 1745) 1699 – Jakob Adlung, German organist, historian, and theorist (d. 1762) 1700 – Picander, German poet and playwright (d. 1764) 1702
TEXAS CITIES: In January 2003 this "Port" city celebrated the 60th birthday of famous daughter Janis Joplin
Port Arthur
Janis Joplin was born in Port Arthur, Texas, on , to Dorothy Bonita East (February 15, 1913 – December 13, 1998), a registrar at a business college, and her husband, Seth Ward Joplin (April 19, 1910 –
3
She told her family how great it was, but her mother and father remained distant on the subject as they did not really understand the hippie movement.
When in New York City, Joplin, often in the company of actor Michael J. Pollard, frequented Limbo on St. Mark's Place.
Pink has performed a live version of a Janis Joplin medley, which can be seen on her 'Live in Europe' DVD.
AMERICAN HISTORY: John Hancock held this political position from 1780-85 & from 1787-93
Governor of Massachusetts
To no one's surprise, Hancock was elected Governor of Massachusetts in a landslide, garnering over 90% of the vote.
3
Thomas Hancock was the proprietor of a firm known as the House of Hancock, which imported manufactured goods from Britain and exported rum, whale oil, and fish.
Other colonists protested that new duties were another attempt by Parliament to tax the colonies without their consent.
Hancock wrote innumerable letters to colonial officials, raising money, supplies, and troops for Washington's army.
"M" & "M": This political organization begun by Jerry Falwell in 1979 fought for many conservative causes
the Moral Majority
He founded Lynchburg Christian Academy (now Liberty Christian Academy) in 1967 and Liberty University in 1971 and co-founded the Moral Majority in 1979.
3
Falwell supported President George W. Bush's Faith Based Initiative, but had strong reservations concerning where the funding would go and the restrictions placed on churches.
In 1999, Falwell declared the Antichrist would probably arrive within a decade and "of course he'll be Jewish".
Doubleday, 1982.
'80s MOVIES: This 1989 Keanu Reeves flick asked the immortal question, "Want a Twinkie, Genghis Khan?"
Bill & Ted's Excellent Adventure
Following this film's critical success, he spent the late 1980s appearing in a number of movies aimed at teenage audiences, including Permanent Record, and the unexpectedly successful 1989 comedy, Bill & Ted's Excellent Adventure, along with its 1991 sequel, Bill & Ted's Bogus Journey.
3
In Bigelow's 'Point Break' – NYTimes.com
Reeves dropped out of high school when he was 17.
They arrived, arrested her and took her in for psychological evaluation.
FLAGS OF THE WORLD: (Kelly of the Clue Crew shows a flag on a monitor.)  On the flag of Kiribati, the blue & white waves stand for the Pacific Ocean; the rising sun represents this, which straddles the nation
the Equator
Their spread straddles the equator and the International Date Line, although the Date Line is indented to bring the Line Islands in the same day as the Kiribati Islands.
3
is an island nation in the central Pacific Ocean.
President Tito was re-elected in 2003 but was removed from office in March 2003 by a no-confidence vote and replaced by a Council of State.
right|thumb|300px|Coconut palms in Abaiang  Kiribati consists of about 32 atolls and one solitary island (Banaba), extending into the eastern and western hemispheres, as well as the northern and southern hemispheres.
ALIAS: This Civil War guerrilla leader who wreaked havoc in Kansas used the alias Charles Hart
William Quantrill
By that time the violence in Kansas had largely subsided, but during the Civil War, on August 21, 1863, William Quantrill led several hundred men on a raid into Lawrence, destroying much of the city and killing nearly 200 people.
3
Average monthly production was over 32 billion cubic feet (0.9 km3).
The Sports Car Club of America has its national headquarters in Topeka.
Both KU and K-State have tradition-rich programs in men's basketball.
CELL BLOCK CINEMA: The scenes of Perry Smith being interviewed in jail in this 2005 film were shot in Manitoba, not in Kansas
Capote
In Cold Blood, described by its author Truman Capote as a "nonfiction novel."
3
Thus, Kansas is the ninth or tenth sunniest state in the country, depending on the source.
Interstate freeways                    U.S. Routes through Kansas                                                    Law and government  State and local politics  Executive branch: The executive branch consists of six elected officers.
Joe Walsh, guitarist for the famous rock band, The Eagles, was born in Wichita.
AUSTIN: This Old West cattle trail that ran from Texas to Kansas crossed the eastern part of Austin
the Chisholm Trail
At the same time, the Chisholm Trail was opened and the Wild West-era commenced in Kansas.
3
The tribe's name (natively kką:ze) is often said to mean "people of the wind" or "people of the south wind", although this was probably not the term's original meaning.
2 Sprint Nextel 8,000 Overland Park Telecommunications
Also elected in 2010 were the Attorney General Derek Schmidt of Independence; the Secretary of State Kris Kobach, of Kansas City; the State Treasurer Ron Estes, of Wichita; and the Insurance Commissioner Sandy Praeger, of Topeka.
MUSEUMS: Karl Marx is said to have written & dined in the Museum Tavern, across from this world-famous museum
the British Museum
Given the repeated failures and frustrations of workers' revolutions and movements, Marx also sought to understand capitalism, and spent a great deal of time in the reading room of the British Museum studying and reflecting on the works of political economists and on economic data.
3
105–212. and offered it as a response to the "petty bourgeois philosophy" of the French anarchist socialist Pierre-Joseph Proudhon as expressed in his book The Philosophy of Poverty (1840).Wheen 2001.
Columbia University Press, 1991, p. 49.
ISBN 0-19-520052-7
"OO" WHO?: Kentucky has only one national forest, & it's named for this trailblazer
Daniel Boone
Red River Gorge Geological Area, part of the Daniel Boone National Forest.
3
In Owensboro, Kentucky Wesleyan College is associated with the United Methodist Church and Brescia University is associated with the Roman Catholic Church.
Coal was by far the most common cargo, accounting for 76% of cargo loaded and 61% of cargo delivered.
UK and UofL have the highest academic rankings and admissions standards although the regional schools aren't without their national recognized departments – examples being Western Kentucky University's nationally ranked Journalism Department or Morehead State University offering one of the nation's only Space Science degrees.
BASES LOADED: During WWII the Declaration of Independence was moved to this Kentucky military base for safety
Fort Knox
In May 2010, the Army Human Resource Center of Excellence, the largest office building in the state at nearly 900,000-square-feet, opened at Fort Knox.
3
The highest recorded temperature was  at Greensburg on July 28, 1930 while the lowest recorded temperature was  at Shelbyville on January 19, 1994.
Goebel is the only governor of a U.S. state to have been assassinated while in office.
There are two general tiers: major research institutions (the University of Kentucky and the University of Louisville) and regional universities, which encompasses the remaining 6 schools.
KENTUCKY IS JUST DUCKY: Until 1792 Kentucky was a part of this state
Virginia
Kentucky is one of four U.S. states constituted as a commonwealth (the others being Virginia, Pennsylvania, and Massachusetts).
2
Additionally, in 1948, the Kentucky General Assembly established the Kentucky State Police, making it the 38th state to create a force whose jurisdiction extends throughout the given state.
Government-promoted slogans In December 2002, the Kentucky governor Paul Patton unveiled the state slogan "It's that friendly", in hope of drawing more people into the state based on the idea of southern hospitality.
ASIAN NATIONS: A map of this country bears many Kualas;  Kuala Dungun, Kuala Lumpur....
Malaysia
is the national capital and most populous global city in Malaysia.
3
Historically Kuala Lumpur was a predominantly Chinese, but recently the Bumiputra component of the city has increased substantially and they are now the dominant group.
Late modern and postmodern architecture began to appear in the late-1990s and early-2000s.
Badminton and 'takraw' courts are usually included in community halls.
DIALECTS: Of all this language's dialects, Tuscan is the closest to classical Latin
Italian
Vulgar Latin developed into the Romance languages, such as French, Italian, Portuguese, Spanish, and Romanian.
3
The cases are as follows:   Nominative – used when the noun is the subject or a predicate nominative.
First and second declension -er adjectives  Some first and second declension adjectives have an -er as the masculine nominative singular form.
The first letter in each case is the last of the stem, because of which the conjugations are also called the a-conjugation, e-conjugation and i-conjugation.
RETRONYMS: No C-section?  Little or no drugs?  Then the childbirth was this, aptly from the Latin for "birth"
natural
For example, the Linnaean system of plant and animal classification was heavily influenced by Historia Naturalis, an encyclopedia of people, places, plants, animals, and things published by Pliny the Elder.
3
Some systems use  for the consonant sounds , except in the combinations , where  is never used.
In more traditional terminology, it is an inflected language, although the typologists are apt to say "inflecting".
Latin adjectives also have comparative (more --, -er) and superlative (most --, est) forms.
BODIES OF WATER: Phnom Penh in Cambodia & Vientiane in Laos are the largest urban centers along this river
Mekong
Geography  thumb|Mekong River flowing through Luang Prabang thumb|Rice fields in Laos Laos is the only landlocked country in Southeast Asia, and it lies mostly between latitudes 14° and 23°N (a small area is south of 14°), and longitudes 100° and 108°E.
2
T. Lomperis, From People's War to People's Rule, (1996), estimates 35,000 total.
Australian filmmaker Kim Mordount's first feature film was made in Laos and features a Laotian cast speaking their native language.
ASIAN HISTORY: Fingers were pointed at Syria when this ex-P.M. of Lebanon was killed in February 2005
Rafik Hariri
On 14 February 2005, former Prime Minister Rafik Hariri was assassinated in a car bomb explosion.
3
The Northern portion of Mount Lebanon was ruled by Druze feudal families to the early 14th century which was then brought to an end by the Mamluk invasion.
191–194 The multinational force was withdrawn in the spring of 1984, following a devastating bombing attack during the previous year.
Preliminary inspection of the results showed, with more than 50% probability, that 10% of Lebanon's exclusive economic zone contained up to 660 million barrels of oil and up to 30×1012 cu ft of gas.
ANCIENT HISTORY: The city-states of Sidon & Tyre were olocated in this Mediterranean region now occupied mostly by Lebanon
Phoenicia
Lebanon was the home of the Canaanites/Phoenicians and their kingdom, a maritime culture that flourished for over a thousand years (c. 1550–539 BC).
3
He conquered what is now Lebanon and other nearby regions of the Eastern Mediterranean in 332 BCE.  Maronites, Druze, and the Crusades thumb|The Fall of Tripoli to the Egyptian Mamluks and destruction of the Crusader state, the County of Tripoli, 1289  The region that is now Lebanon, as with the rest of Syria and much of Anatolia, became a major center of Christianity in the Roman Empire during the early spread of the religion.
The Lebanese Armed Forces' primary missions include defending Lebanon and its citizens against external aggression, maintaining internal stability and security, confronting threats against the country's vital interests, engaging in social development activities, and undertaking relief operations in coordination with public and humanitarian institutions.
The cinema of Lebanon, according to film critic and historian, Roy Armes, was the only cinema in the Arabic-speaking region, other than Egypt's, that could amount to a national cinema.
WORLD POTPOURRI: Barbados has a Trafalgar Square, too & its statue of this hero is older than the one in London
Nelson
Nelson's Column is a nationally recognised monument in Trafalgar Square, one of the focal points of central London.
3
The Abbey is not to be confused with nearby Westminster Cathedral, which is the largest Roman Catholic cathedral in England and Wales.
thumb|The front façade of the Royal College of Music London is home to five major medical schools – Barts and The London School of Medicine and Dentistry (part of Queen Mary), King's College London School of Medicine (the largest medical school in Europe), Imperial College School of Medicine, UCL Medical School and St George's, University of London – and has a large number of affiliated teaching hospitals.
Walker, Tim (28 July 2008). "Mumford & Sons, The Luminaire, London".
THINK FAST: Stop the presses! Ye Olde Cock Tavern has entertained generations of reporters on this London street
Fleet Street
The coffeehouse became a popular place to debate ideas, with growing literacy and the development of the printing press making news widely available; and Fleet Street became the centre of the British press.
3
London has traditionally been Christian, and has a large number of churches, particularly in the City of London.
Santos, Georgina; Button, Kenneth; Noll, Roger G. "London Congestion Charging/Comments." Brookings-Wharton Papers on Urban Affairs. 15287084 (2008): 177,177–234.
London has played a significant role in the film industry, and has major studios at Ealing and a special effects and post-production community centred in Soho.
I GOT THE MUSIC IN ME: An Eric Clapton guitar in London was the first piece of memorabilia donated to this restaurant chain
Hard Rock Cafe
The city is home to the first and original Hard Rock Cafe and the Abbey Road Studios where The Beatles recorded many of their hits.
3
The McKinsey Global Institute study used a metropolitan area with a population of 14.9 million for London compared to 11.8 million for Paris, whilst the PricewaterhouseCoopers study used a metropolitan area with a population of 8.59 million for London compared to 9.92 million for Paris.
By about 680, it had revived sufficiently to become a major port, although there is little evidence of large-scale production of goods.
Note that some of the German-born population, in 18th position, are British citizens from birth born to parents serving in the British Armed Forces in Germany.
___OH___: Districts in London & New York City share this name
Soho
London's theatre district is here, as are many cinemas, bars, clubs and restaurants, including the city's Chinatown district (in Soho), and just to the east is Covent Garden, an area housing speciality shops.
3
But the tentacles of English maritime enterprise hardly extended beyond the seas of north-west Europe.
Tourism  thumb|right|upright|The Natural History Museum  London is a popular centre for tourism, one of its prime industries, employing the equivalent of 350,000 full-time workers in 2003, while annual expenditure by tourists is around £15 billion."
Three major national museums are there: the Victoria and Albert Museum (for the applied arts), the Natural History Museum and the Science Museum.
MUSEUMS OF THE WORLD: This 18th century lexicographer's first dictionary is on display in the London townhouse where he lived & worked
Samuel Johnson
According to Samuel Johnson:  Late modern and contemporary thumb|British volunteer recruits in London, August 1914 thumb|A bombed-out London street during the Blitz of the Second World War London was the world's largest city from about 1831 to 1925.
3
Lulu.com
The literary centres of London have traditionally been hilly Hampstead and (since the early 20th century)
Three major national museums are there: the Victoria and Albert Museum (for the applied arts), the Natural History Museum and the Science Museum.
EXCHANGES: London stock prices are tracked by the FTSE 100 Index, FT standing for this newspaper
the Financial Times
The London Business School is considered one of the world's leading business schools and in 2015 its MBA programme was ranked second best in the world by the Financial Times.
3
The local authorities are the councils of the 32 London boroughs and the City of London Corporation.
The public transport network is administered by Transport for London (TfL) and is one of the most extensive in the world.
London Southend Airport, east of London in Essex, is a smaller, regional airport that mainly caters for cheap short-haul flights.
GEOLOGY: In the 1830s Louis Agassiz proved that these moved, bringing with them the rocks & boulders that covered Europe
glaciers
Prior to this proposal, Goethe, de Saussure, Venetz, Jean de Charpentier, Karl Friedrich Schimper and others had made the glaciers of the Alps the subjects of special study, and Goethe, Charpentier as well as Schimper had even arrived at the conclusion that the erratic blocks of alpine rocks scattered over the slopes and summits of the Jura Mountains had been moved there by glaciers.
3
The task of describing the Brazilian fish was completed and published in 1829.
In the early stages of his career in Neuchatel, Agassiz also made a name for himself as a man who could run a scientific department well.
Two of Agassiz's most prominent students detailed their personal experiences under his tutelage, Samuel Hubbard Scudder in a short magazine article for Every SaturdayScudder, Samuel H.  "Look at your fish", originally published in Every Saturday, April 4, 1874, 16, 369-370; reprinted in Erlandson, David A. et al.
ANCIENT COINS: The animal featured on the electrum coin of Lydia, it got the world's coinage off to a roaring success
Lion
These coins were stamped with a lion's head adorned with what is likely a sunburst, which was the king's symbol.
3
with dates ranging from 700 BC to 550 BC, but the most common opinion is that they were minted at or near the beginning of the reign of King Alyattes (sometimes referred to incorrectly as Alyattes II), who ruled Lydia c. 610-550 BC.A. Ramage, "Golden Sardis," King Croesus' Gold: Excavations at Sardis and the History of Gold Refining, edited by A. Ramage and P. Craddock, Harvard University Press, Cambridge, 2000, p. 18.
During the occupation of Constantinople in the Fourth Crusade, Lydia continued to be a part of the Byzantine Orthodox 'Greek Empire' based at Nicaea.
Livius.org: Lydia    Category:Historical regions of Anatolia Category:Ancient peoples Category:Archaeological sites in Turkey Category:History of Turkey Category:Iron Age Anatolia Category:Manisa Province Category:History of Izmir Province Category:Praetorian prefecture of the East Category:Cyrus the Great
MUSIC ON THE MAP: Gerry & the Pacemakers ferry crossed this Liverpool river
the Mersey
Liverpool is in the south west of the historic county of Lancashire in North West England, on the eastern side of the Mersey Estuary.
2
Metro Mayor’ to oversee the entire metropolitan area.
Geography thumb|Satellite imagery showing Liverpool Bay, Liverpool and the wider Merseyside area Liverpool has been described as having "the most splendid setting of any English city."The Buildings of England – Lancashire: Liverpool and the Southwest
CHAIN OF COMMAND: This chain-wearer seen here sailed from Lisbon in 1497 with the São Gabriel and other ships under his command
Vasco da Gama
Early Modern thumb|right|The oldest known image of Lisbon (1500–1510) from the Crónica de Dom Afonso Henriques by Duarte Galvão Most of the Portuguese expeditions of the Age of Discovery left from Lisbon during the 15th to 17th centuries, including Vasco da Gama's expedition to India in 1497.
2
also mentions it in his 1857 poem, The Deacon's Masterpiece, or The Wonderful One-Hoss Shay.
A series of restoration works has brought the area back to its former self and made it a high-scale shopping district.
LAND O' LAKERS: The Nisei Week Festival is held every August in the section of Los Angeles known as "Little" this city
Tokyo
The Los Angeles combined statistical area (CSA) has a gross metropolitan product (GMP) of $831 billion (as of 2008), making it the third-largest in the world, after the Greater Tokyo and New York metropolitan areas.
3
At the official downtown station, the highest recorded temperature is  on September 27, 2010, while the lowest is , as recently as January 4, 1949.
The Latino population is spread throughout the city of Los Angeles and its metropolitan area but it is most heavily concentrated in the East Los Angeles region, which has a long established Mexican-American and Central American community.
Other major nearby commercial airports include:   LA/Ontario International Airport, owned by the city of Los Angeles; serves the Inland Empire.
KWANZAA: The 1965 riots in this Los Angeles neighborhood inspired Prof. Maulana Karenga to create Kwanzaa in 1966
Watts
thumb|The Richfield Tower, an Art Deco landmark of 1929, was demolished in 1969.The 1960s saw race relations boil-over into the Watts Riots of 1965 which resulted in 34 deaths and over 1,000 injuries.
3
The name is from  , meaning The Angels.
During Mexican rule, Governor Pío Pico made Los Angeles Alta California's regional capital.
Environmental issues thumb|right|500px|A view of Los Angeles covered in smog  A Gabrielino settlement in the area was called iyáangẚ (written Yang-na by the Spanish), which has been translated as "poison oak place".
CALIFORNIA: In 1926 Zane Grey built a home on this island off Los Angeles where he spent most of the rest of his life
Catalina Island
Passenger ferry service from San Pedro to the city of Avalon on Santa Catalina Island is provided by Catalina Express.
3
In 1848, at the end of the Mexican–American War, Los Angeles and the rest of California were purchased as part of the Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo, thereby becoming part of the United States.
The perimeter of the city is .
thumb|The Fox Plaza in Century City, headquarters for 20th Century Fox  Sports thumb|Dodger Stadium is the home of the Los Angeles Dodgers.
DUKE, DUKE: Louisiana politician David Duke was a former grand wizard in this organization
Ku Klux Klan
White insurgents mobilized to enforce white supremacy, first in Ku Klux Klan chapters.
3
The first burial mounds were built at this time.
The mechanization of agriculture also reduced the need for laborers.
The sheriff in each parish is the chief law enforcement officer in the parish.
20th CENTURY AMERICA: During every decade from the 1920s to 1960, some member of this family was governor of Louisiana
Long
In more elevated areas, fire is a natural process in the landscape, and has produced extensive areas of longleaf pine forest and wet savannas.
3
According to the 2010 United States Census, 5.4% of the population aged 5 and older spoke Spanish at home, up from 3.5% in 2000; and 4.5% spoke French (including Louisiana French and Louisiana Creole), down from 4.8% in 2000.American FactFinder - ResultsAmerican FactFinder - Results  Race and ethnicity According to the 2010 US census, the population of Louisiana was:Louisiana QuickFacts from the US Census Bureau.
Louisiana had eight votes in the Electoral College for the 2012 election after losing one House seat due to stagnant population growth in the 2010 Census.
Numerous Isleño identity red and organizations, and many members of Isleños society keep contact with the Canary Islands of Spain.
NAME GAME: The first name used by Louisiana's governor, it's also the popular name for a British policeman
Bobby
Training sites include Camp Beauregard near Pineville, LA, Camp Villere near Slidell, LA, Camp Minden near Minden, LA, England Air Park (formerly England Air Force Base) near Alexandria, LA, Gillis Long Center near Carville, LA, and Jackson Barracks in New Orleans, LA.  Education  The Louisiana Science Education Act is a controversial law passed by the Louisiana Legislature on June 11, 2008 and signed into law by Governor Bobby Jindal on June 25.
3
Louisiana has more Native American tribes than any other southern state, including four that are federally recognized, ten that are state recognized, and four that have not yet received recognition.
August 1969, Camille (Category 5) caused a  storm surge and killed 250 people.
Among states in the Deep South (discounting Florida's Panhandle and much of Texas) the historic role of Catholicism in Louisiana is unparalleled and unique.
HUEY, DEWEY OR LOUIS: A populist Louisiana governor of the early 1930s
Huey Long
Beginning in the 1940s, blacks went West to California for jobs in its expanding defense industries. "African American Migration Experience: The Great Migration", In Motion, New York Public Library, Schomburg Center for Research in Black Culture, accessed April 24, 2008  During some of the Great Depression, Louisiana was led by Governor Huey Long.
3
Kniffen, F.B. and Hilliard, S.B. 1988.
Artificial levees block spring flood water that would bring fresh water and sediment to marshes.
This hurricane caused the survivors to move to higher ground.
OF OUTRAGEOUS FORTUNE: In 2003 Calvin Klein paid $30 million for a mansion in the "south" one of these Long Island enclaves; now he's tearing it down
the Hamptons
In its easternmost sections, Suffolk remains small-town rural, as in Greenport on the North Fork and some of the outward areas of The Hamptons, although summer tourism swells the population in those areas.
3
From the 1920s to the 1940s, Long Island began the transformation from backwoods and farms as developers created numerous suburbs.
Some institutions in the New York City section of the island use the island's names, like Long Island University and Long Island Jewish Medical Center.
Long Island temperatures vary from west to east, with the western part (Nassau County, Queens, and Brooklyn) generally warmer than the east (Suffolk County).
GRAMMY WINNERS: The acoustic album called "MTV" this "in New York" earned a Grammy for Nirvana
Unplugged
In 1989, MTV began to premiere music-based specials such as MTV Unplugged, an acoustic performance show, which has featured dozens of acts as its guests and has remained active in numerous iterations on various platforms for over 20 years.
3
A majority of the rap artists appearing on MTV in the mid-1980s, such as Run-DMC, The Fat Boys, Whodini, L.L. Cool J, and the Beastie Boys, were from the East Coast.
And I wish there had been music videos in the heyday of The Beatles, and The Rolling Stones.
The very first moments of MTV featured an adaptation of the first landing on the moon, directly from NASA still images (a concept of Seibert's, executed by Buzz Potamkin and Perpetual Motion Pictures).
AMERICA THE BEAUTIFUL: The 288-year-old town of Easton, Maryland sits on the eastern shore of this bay
Chesapeake Bay
It has three occasionally used nicknames: the Old Line State, the Free State, and the Chesapeake Bay State.
3
In addition, immigrants comprised 15% of the voting population, and the legislature had difficulty devising requirements against blacks that did not also disadvantage immigrants.<ref name="tuck"/>  In 1902, the state regulated conditions in [[Mining|mines]]; outlawed [[child labor]]ers under the age of 12; mandated compulsory school attendance; and enacted the nation's first [[workers' compensation]] law.
> !!
Maryland is the first state with an official state exercise.<ref>{{cite web|url=http://www.journalism.umd.edu/cns/wire/2008-editions/09-September-editions/080930-Tuesday/WalkingState_CNS-UMCP.html |title=STATE SYMBOLS: Marylanders take a walk, and eat cake too |publisher=Journalism.umd.edu |date=September 30, 2008 |accessdate=September 28, 2013}}</ref
U.S. CITY-SCAPE: This Michigan city was incorporated in 1815; there must have been a recall, as it was reincorporated in 1824
Detroit
Its capital is Lansing, and the largest city is Detroit.
3
Grand Rapids is home to a number of major companies including Steelcase, Amway, and Meijer.
The peninsula is as large as Connecticut, Delaware, Massachusetts, and Rhode Island combined but has fewer than 330,000 inhabitants.
+ Michigan Racial Breakdown of Population Racial composition  1970  1990Historical Census Statistics on Population Totals
ORIGIN OF THE SPECIOUS: Forwarding an e-mail supposedly sent by this Microsoft chairman got you $1,000 & a free copy of Windows
Gates
Microsoft was founded by Paul Allen and Bill Gates on April 4, 1975, to develop and sell BASIC interpreters for Altair 8800.
2
The two-storey, 6000 sq ft location features Microsoft's flagship products including the Surface line and Xbox One, there is also an Answer Desk on site for customers to get product support.
The new logo also includes four squares with the colors of the then-current Windows logo which have been used to represent Microsoft's four major products: Windows (blue), Office (red), Xbox (green), and Bing (yellow).
THAT'S GREAT, PETER THE GREAT!: Peter was born in 1672 within the walls of this sprawling Moscow fortress
the Kremlin
Within the modern bounds of the city other late evidence was discovered (the burial ground of the Fatyanovskaya culture, the site of the Iron Age settlement of the Dyakovo culture), on the territory of the Kremlin, Sparrow Hills, Setun River and Kuntsevskiy forest park, etc.
3
Oxford University Press US. p.17.
Entertainment thumb|Fountain in Moscow's Square of Europe thumb|left|Tverskaya Street  The city is full of clubs, restaurants and bars.
Private ownership of apartments was limited until the 1990s, when people were permitted to secure property rights to the places they inhabited.
HISTORIC LEADERS: He was just 3 years old when he was proclaimed Grand Prince of Moscow in 1533 -- hmm, not so "terrible"
Ivan
Ivan I eventually defeated Tver to become the sole collector of taxes for the Mongol rulers, making Moscow the capital of Vladimir-Suzdal.
3
Moscow is one of three federal cities in Russia (the others are Saint Petersburg and Sevastopol, although the status of the latter is disputed due to the annexation of Crimea by Russia).
49 bridges span the river and its canals within the city's limits.
These usually include areas with small or no permanent populations.
FAMOUS RUFFOS: Architects Pietro Solario & Marco Ruffo bulit the wall around this Moscow landmark circa 1490
The Kremlin
Within the modern bounds of the city other late evidence was discovered (the burial ground of the Fatyanovskaya culture, the site of the Iron Age settlement of the Dyakovo culture), on the territory of the Kremlin, Sparrow Hills, Setun River and Kuntsevskiy forest park, etc.
3
It became the prototype for future Soviet large-scale technologies.
For much of its architectural history, Moscow was dominated by Orthodox churches.
In 2006, Mercer Human Resources Consulting named Moscow the world's most expensive city for expatriate employees, ahead of perennial winner Tokyo, due to the stable Russian ruble as well as increasing housing prices within the city.
YOU COULD HURT SOMEONE: It precedes "Monaco" in this name of a brand owned by Ralph Lauren
club
Today, Société des bains de mer de Monaco, which owns Le Grand Casino, still operates in the original building that the Blancs constructed and has since been joined by several other casinos, including the Le Casino Café de Paris, the Monte Carlo Sporting Club & Casino and the Sun Casino.
3
According to the constitution of 1911, the principality was subdivided into three municipalities:  Monaco-Ville, the old city on a rocky promontory extending into the Mediterranean, known as the Rock of Monaco, or simply "The Rock";  Monte Carlo, the principal residential and resort area with the Monte Carlo Casino in the east and northeast;  La Condamine, the southwestern section including the port area, Port Hercules.
Since 1911 part of the Monte Carlo Rally has been held in the principality, originally held at the behest of Prince Albert I.
AS Monaco plays at the Stade Louis II and competes in Ligue 1, the first division of French football.
AT RANDOM: This method of solving problems with a random number generator is named after the casino city of Monaco
Monte Carlo
{{Infobox country |conventional_long_name  = Principality of Monaco  | native_name  =   |common_name = Monaco |image_flag = Flag of Monaco.svg |image_coat = Coat of Arms of Monaco.svg |image_map = Location Monaco Europe.png |map_caption =  |image_map2 = |map2_width = |map2_caption = |national_motto =  |national_anthem = Hymne Monégasque<small>English: Monégasque Anthem</small>File:Monaco National Anthem.ogg |capital = Monaco |religion = Roman Catholicism |largest_settlement_type = Quartier|largest_settlement = Monte Carlo |latd =43 |latm=43
3
The House of Grimaldi have ruled Monaco, with brief interruptions, since 1297.In fact Francesco Grimaldi, who captured the Rock on the night of 8 January 1297, was forced to flee Monaco only four years after the fabled raid, never to come back.
Through its relationship with France, Monaco uses the euro as its sole currency (prior to this it used the Monégasque franc).
All this changed in the dissolute Second French Empire under Napoleon III.
MONGOLIA: The ruined city of Karakorum is where this conqueror established his headquarters in 1220
Genghis Khan
In 1206, Genghis Khan founded the Mongol Empire, and his grandson Kublai Khan conquered China to establish the Yuan dynasty.
3
The population during the Copper Age has been described as mongoloid in the east of what is now Mongolia, and as europoid in the west.
58, No. 3 (Jul. 1980), pp.
The first census in the 20th century was carried out in 1918 and recorded a population of 647,500.
FOUND IN MONGOLIA: Navigable but carrying little traffic, the Selenge River forms part of Mongolia's border with this country
Russia
It is bordered by Russia to the north and China to the south, east and west.
2
The mummy of a Scythian warrior, which is believed to be about 2,500 years old, was a 30- to 40-year-old man with blond hair; it  was found in the Altai, Mongolia.
Agriculture   In 2002, about 30% of all households in Mongolia lived from breeding livestock.
FAR AND AWAY: A company called Happy Camel offers "The Secrets of" this desert, a 15-day tour of remote areas of Mongolia
the Gobi desert
The country contains very little arable land, as much of its area is covered by grassy steppe, with mountains to the north and west and the Gobi Desert to the south.
3
A new constitution was introduced in 1992, and the "People's Republic" was dropped from the country's name.
A unique microclimate is the fertile grassland-forest region of central and eastern Arkhangai Province (Tsetserleg) and northern Ovorkhangai Province (Arvaikheer) where January temperatures are on average the same and often higher than the warmest desert regions to the south in addition to being more stable.
Among the first attempts to introduce modernism into the fine arts of Mongolia was the painting Ehiin setgel (Mother's love) created by Tsevegjav in the 1960s.
"T" ON THE MAP: This North African city was officially international until integrated into Morocco in 1956
Tangier
Its political capital is Rabat, although the largest city is Casablanca; other major cities include Marrakesh, Tangier, Tetouan, Salé, Fes, Agadir, Meknes, Oujda, Kenitra, and Nador.
3
Also in Egyptian and Middle Eastern Arabic literature the name for Morocco (as a distinct country/state) was "Marrakesh" (مراكش), until about the 2nd half of the 20th century.
However, It's notable to say that we usually find Mediterranean characteristics in those regions, such as the precipitation pattern and thermal attributes.
Schemm, Paul (17 June 2011)
YOU GET A "D": He was married twice: once to Dorothy Arnold & once to Marilyn Monroe
Joe DiMaggio
She had two highly publicized marriages, to baseball player Joe DiMaggio and playwright Arthur Miller, which both ended in divorce.
3
Ladies of the Chorus was released in October and was not a success.
She was also tired of being typecast, and her attempts to appear in films other than comedies or musicals had been thwarted by Zanuck.
Bus Stop became a box office success, grossing $4.25 million, and received mainly favorable reviews, with Crowther proclaiming: "Hold on to your chairs, everybody, and get set for a rattling surprise.
CULTURE CLUB: A male Muslim who completes the pilgrimage to this city can be called Hajji; a female can be addressed as Hajjah
Mecca
The religious practices of Muslims are enumerated in the Five Pillars of Islam, which, in addition to Shahadah, consist of daily prayers (salat), fasting during the Islamic month of Ramadan (sawm), almsgiving (zakat), and the pilgrimage to Mecca (hajj) at least once in a lifetime.
3
The Arabic form muslimun is the stem IV participlealso known as "infinitive", cf.
About 13% of Muslims live in Indonesia, the largest Muslim country, 25% in South Asia, 20% in the Middle East and North Africa, and  2% in Central Asia, 4% in the remaining South East Asian countries, and 15% in Sub-saharan Africa.
Pew Research Center.
ILLOGICAL GEOGRAPHIC NAMES: Since it's the largest city in Missouri, we wonder why it's not called Missouri City
Kansas City
As defined by the 2010 US census, the four largest urban areas in order of population are St. Louis, Kansas City, Springfield, and Columbia.
3
Planters, defined by some historians as those holding twenty slaves or more, were concentrated in the counties known as "Little Dixie", in the central part of the state along the Missouri River.
He was a judge in Jackson County and then represented the state in the United States Senate for ten years, before being elected Vice-President in 1944.
{| class="wikitable"  style="float:right; font-size:80%; margin-left:10px;" |+ Past presidential elections results (1900–2012) |- style="background:lightgrey;" !
AUTHORS: He was 4 years old when his family moved to Hannibal, Missouri in 1839
Mark Twain
right|thumb|350px|The Bell Mountain Wilderness of southern Missouri's Mark Twain National Forest The southeastern part of the state is known as the Bootheel region, which is part of the Mississippi Alluvial Plain or Mississippi embayment.
3
Over half of Missourians (3,294,936 people, or 55.0%) live within the state's two largest metropolitan areas–St.
Missouri schools are commonly but not exclusively divided into three tiers of primary and secondary education: elementary school, middle school or junior high school and high school.
, a sidewheel frigate launched in 1841 and destroyed by fire in 1843  , a  in service from 1900 to 1922  , an  in service from 1944 to 1998; site of the official Japanese surrender of World War II; decommissioned in 1998; now a floating war memorial at Pearl Harbor Naval Base in Hawaii  , a , joined the fleet after a commissioning ceremony July 31, 2010 at the Naval Submarine Base New London.
I KILLED A GUY ONCE: On April 3, 1882 in St. Joseph, Missouri, Robert Ford took out this man with a shot to the head
Jesse James
Though regular Confederate troops staged some large-scale raids into Missouri, the fighting in the state for the next three years consisted chiefly of guerrilla warfare. "Citizen soldiers" or insurgents such as Captain William Quantrill, Frank and Jesse James, the Younger brothers, and William T. Anderson made use of quick, small-unit tactics.
3
Photographed by Lewis Hine as part of the Progressive Era assault on child labor.
Folk was elected governor as a progressive reformer and Democrat in the 1904 election.
Immigration from outside the United States resulted in a net increase of 50,450 people, and migration within the country produced a net increase of 37,638 people.
CONTESTS: In Hannibal, Missouri's fence painting contest, judges favor entrants who dress like this character
Tom Sawyer
His novels The Adventures of Tom Sawyer and The Adventures of Huckleberry Finn are set in his boyhood hometown of Hannibal.
3
Merriam-webster.com (August 31, 2012).
This situation of differing pronunciations has existed since the late-1600s.
The official MSA website describes the goals of the Academy to be as such: "The academy reflects Missouri's desire to strive for excellence in education at all levels.
THE BIBLE: God told Moses to place the 10 Commandments in this container
the Ark of the Covenant
IV, describes Solomon's Temple, also known as the First Temple, at the time the Ark of the Covenant was first moved into the newly built temple:  According to Feldman, Josephus also attaches particular significance to Moses' possession of the "cardinal virtues of wisdom, courage, temperance, and justice."
3
He quotes him:  Moses in Abrahamic religions  Judaism  There is a wealth of stories and additional information about Moses in the Jewish apocrypha and in the genre of rabbinical exegesis known as Midrash, as well as in the primary works of the Jewish oral law, the Mishnah and the Talmud.
Therefore, when Abraham Lincoln was assassinated in 1865 after freeing the slaves, black Americans said they had lost "their Moses".
The Hebrew word taken from Exodus means either a "horn" or an "irradiation."
FASTER: Exodus 34 reports that Moses didn't eat or drink for 40 days up here
Mount Sinai
After the Ten Plagues, Moses led the Exodus of the Israelites out of Egypt and across the Red Sea, after which they based themselves at Mount Sinai, where Moses received the Ten Commandments.
3
In Numenius Numenius, a Greek philosopher who was a native of Apamea, in Syria, wrote during the latter half of the 2nd century CE. Historian Kennieth Guthrie writes that "Numenius is perhaps the only recognized Greek philosopher who explicitly studied Moses, the prophets, and the life of Jesus..."  He describes his background:  In Justin Martyr The Christian saint and religious philosopher Justin Martyr (103–165 CE) drew the same conclusion as Numenius, according to other experts.
Artapanus of Alexandria explicitly identified Moses not only with Thoth/Hermes, but also with the Greek figure Musaeus (whom he called "the teacher of Orpheus"), and ascribed to him the division of Egypt into 36 districts, each with its own liturgy.
However, in addition to accepting the biblical account of Moses, Mormons include Selections from the Book of Moses as part of their scriptural canon.
"B" PLUS: It speaks to Moses in Exodus 3
the burning bush
thumb|A Russian Orthodox icon of the prophet Moses, gesturing towards the burning bush; 18th-century (Iconostasis of Transfiguration Church, Kizhi Monastery, Karelia, Russia) thumb|250px|Moses lifts up the brass serpent, curing the Israelites from poisonous snake bites in a painting by Benjamin West  Lawgiver of Israel  thumb| William Blake's "Moses Receiving the Law" thumbnail|Death of Moses by Alexandre Cabanel Moses is honoured among Jews today as the "lawgiver of Israel", and he delivers several sets of laws in the course of the four books.
3
More humble than any other man (Num.
56, No 1, 2 March 1993 pp.25-35,  p.33:'the overwhelming scholarly consensus today is that Moses is a mythical figure.'
Moses is depicted in several U.S. government buildings because of his legacy as a lawgiver.
LET'S VISIT AN AQUARIUM: The Great Lakes Aquarium in Duluth, Minnesota is located on the waterfront of this Great Lake
Superior
It shares a Lake Superior water border with Michigan and a land and water border with Wisconsin to the east.
3
Many places in the state have similar names, such as Minnehaha Falls ("laughing water" (waterfall)), Minneiska ("white water"), Minneota ("much water"), Minnetonka ("big water"), Minnetrista ("crooked water"), and Minneapolis, a combination of mni and polis, the Greek word for "city".
Cities and towns  thumb|right|National Farmers Bank in Owatonna by Louis Sullivan Saint Paul, located in east-central Minnesota along the banks of the Mississippi River, has been Minnesota's capital city since 1849, first as capital of the Territory of Minnesota, and then as state capital since 1858.
Minnesota is home to over 30 mosques, mostly in the Twin Cities metro area.
COLORFUL GEOGRAPHY: "Of the North" usually follows the name of this river that forms the border between Minnesota and North Dakota
the Red River
The Red River, in the bed of glacial Lake Agassiz, drains the northwest part of the state northward toward Canada's Hudson Bay.
3
Its official motto is L'Étoile du Nord (French: Star of the North).
The construction of Fort Snelling followed between 1819 and 1825.
Some actions in the Twin Cities metropolitan area are coordinated by the Metropolitan Council, and many lakes and rivers are overseen by watershed districts and soil and water conservation districts.
TRA-LA!  IT'S MAY!: May Day festivities date back to an ancient festival honoring this Roman goddess of flowers
Flora
Traditional May Day origins and celebrations  The earliest May Day celebrations appeared in pre-Christian times, with the Floralia, festival of Flora, the Roman goddess of flowers, held on April 27 during the Roman Republic era, and with the Walpurgis Night celebrations of the Germanic countries.
3
Perhaps the most significant of the traditions is the maypole, around which traditional dancers circle with ribbons.
It is then thought to be traditional for some people to jump off Magdalen Bridge into the River Cherwell.
In Lugo and in the village of Vilagarcía de Arousa  it was usual to ask a tip to the attendees, which used to be a handful of dry chestnuts (castañas maiolas), walnuts or hazelnuts.
CORPORATE HEADQUARTERS: Lew Wasserman built "The Black Tower", the longtime HQ of this movie company once owned by MCA
Universal
Companies   MCA Inc., a now defunct company (originally called Music Corporation of America) and its subsidiary companies:  MCA Records  MCA Nashville Records  MCA Home Video, former name of Universal Studios Home Entertainment  MCA, Russian-owned public relations company with branches throughout the world, Mitrofan Caspersz & Associates  MCA, an akronym and alternative name for the French company Maubeuge Construction Automobile  MotorCoach Australia a former Australian bus bodybuilder   Computer Technology   Micro Channel, IBM proprietary computer bus interface   Culture   Museum of Contemporary Art
3
MCA may refer to:   Archaeology   Medieval Climatic Anomaly, see Medieval Warm Period, an extreme and persistent drought in California and Patagonia during Medieval Time   Aviation   Minimum crossing altitude, a minimum obstacle crossing altitude for fixes on published airways  Medium Combat Aircraft, a 5th generation fighter aircraft being developed by India  Macenta Airport, Guinea (by IATA code)   Banking   Depository Institutions Deregulation and Monetary Control Act   Chemistry   Manufacturing Chemists' Association, now known as the American Chemistry Council, an American chemical industry trade group  Monochloroacetic acid, carboxylic acid, manufactured by chlorinating acetic acid  Methyl cyanoacrylate, an organic compound  Metabolic control analysis, analysing how the control of fluxes and intermediate concentrations in a metabolic pathway is distributed  MCA
Other education  Microsoft Certified Architect, a certification available from Microsoft Minnesota Comprehensive Assessments—Series II, a standardized test in Minnesota.
Law   The UK Magistrates' Courts Act of 1980  The UK Mental Capacity Act of 2005  The UK Matrimonial Causes Act of 1973  The US Military Commissions Act of 2006   Medicine   Middle cerebral artery, one of the three major blood supplies to the brain  Motorcar accident  Methylcholanthrene, a carcinogen  Multiple congenital anomalies   Nuclear technology   Maximum credible accident, a postulated scenario that a nuclear facility must be able to withstand  Multi-channel Analyzer, a gamma ray spectroscopy system for measuring counts at different voltage levels   Organizations   Maharashtra Chess Association  Malaysian Chinese Association  Maritime and Coastguard Agency, an agency of the United Kingdom Government  Medicines Control Agency, which joined with the Medical Devices Agency to become the Medicines and Healthcare Products Regulatory Agency   Metal Construction Association  Millennium Challenge Account, a U.S. program for aid to developing countries  MultiCultural Aotearoa, a New Zealand political action group  Mumbai Cricket Association, ruling body for cricket in Mumbai  Morrison Academy, a Christian international school in Taichung, Taiwan  The Multicore Association, an industry association regrouping companies and universities interested in multicore computing research.
U.S. GEOGRAPHY: Cadillac Mountain, the highest peak on the Eastern Seaboard, lies in this Maine national park
Acadia National Park
This visual contrast of forested slopes sweeping down to the sea has been summed up by American poet Edna St. Vincent Millay of Rockland and Camden, Maine, in "Renascence": thumb|250px|The coast of Maine near Acadia National Park thumb|250px|Boothbay Harbor "All I could see from where I stood Was three long mountains and a wood; I turned and looked the other way, And saw three islands in a bay."
3
In spite of its maritime position, it has a continental climate even in coastal areas such as its largest city, Portland.
A second settlement was attempted at a place called York, in 1623 by English explorer and naval Captain Christopher Levett, granted  by King Charles I of England.
Red vs. Blue, a comic science fiction video series, features a character named Maine.
STATE CAPITALS: While Portland is Maine's main city, this is the capital
Augusta
The state capital is Augusta with a population of 19,136 (2010), making it the third least-populous state capital (after Montpelier, Vermont and Pierre, South Dakota) in the nation.
3
National Climatic Data Center.
Janet Chapman writes several series of paranormal romance and contemporary romance novels set in Maine.
iconic Maine writer  Thomas A. Desjardin (1964–) — a Maine native and resident, he has written several books on Maine history and the Civil War.
U.S. CITIES: This Montana city was founded in 1882 by the Northern Pacific Railroad & named for its president
Billings
It then flows northeasterly across the state through Billings, Miles City, Glendive, and Sidney.
3
Protected lands  thumb|Bison herd grazing at the National Bison Range Montana contains Glacier National Park, "The Crown of the Continent"; and portions of Yellowstone National Park, including three of the park's five entrances.
This time she was the only vote against the war, and in the wake of public outcry over her vote, she required police protection for a time.
This will only be the second commissioned warship bearing the name Montana.
LOW TECH: We don't know who invented it, but it appeared on a cart in Mesopotamia over 5,000 years ago
Wheel
Mesopotamia is the site of the earliest developments of the Neolithic Revolution from around 10,000 BC. It has been identified as having "inspired some of the most important developments in human history including the invention of the wheel, the planting of the first cereal crops and the development of cursive script, Mathematics, Astronomy and Agriculture." A modern Mesopotamian identity is espoused by the ethnically indigenous Mesopotamian and Eastern Aramaic speaking people, known as Assyrians and Chaldean Christians.
3
Massive archives of texts were recovered from the archaeological contexts of Old Babylonian scribal schools, through which literacy was disseminated.
H. F. J. Horstmanshoff, Marten Stol, Cornelis Tilburg (2004), Magic and Rationality in Ancient Near Eastern and Graeco-Roman Medicine, p. 99, Brill Publishers, ISBN 90-04-13666-5.
Von den Sumerern bis zu Alexander dem Großen, München, ISBN 3-406-51664-5  Hrouda, Barthel and Rene Pfeilschifter; 2005.
MUMMY DEAREST: In 1994 the Royal Mummy Room in this city's Egyptian Museum was reopened after 13 years
Cairo
The first modern scientific examinations of mummies began in 1901, conducted by professors at the English-language Government School of Medicine in Cairo, Egypt.
3
ISBN 0-393-04521-8Michaelsen, K.K. Politikens bog om Danmarks Oldtid.
Self-mummification was practiced until the late 1800s in Japan and has been outlawed since the early 1900s.
The Mummies of Ürümchi.
POP "I": The Farriss Brothers was an earlier name for this group that also featured Michael Hutchence
INXS
He was a founding member, lead singer and lyricist of rock band :INXS from 1977 until his death in 1997.
3
The boys transferred to Davidson High School where they became serious about the idea of starting a proper band.
Their first performance under the new name was on 1 September at the Oceanview Hotel in Toukley.
Hutchence became the main spokesperson for the band and, according to rock music historian, Ian McFarlane, "He was the archetypal rock showman.
PSYCHOLOGY: Melancholia, an old word for what's now called this, is still part of the clinical definition of some forms of it
depression
Al-Kindi (c. 801–873 CE) links it with disease-like mental states like anger, passion, hatred and depression, while the Persian physician Avicenna (980–1037 CE) diagnosed ḥuzn in a lovesick man if his pulse increased drastically when the name of the girl he loved was spoken.
2
Mathworld.wolfram.com
These portraits were often set out of doors where Nature provides "the most suitable background for spiritual contemplation" or in a gloomy interior.
THE MIDEAST: More than a million pilgrims travel to Mecca each year for this great pilgrimage
the Hajj
Its resident population in 2012 was roughly 2 million, although visitors more than triple this number every year during the hajj ("pilgrimage") period held in the twelfth Muslim lunar month of Dhu al-Hijjah.
3
The ancient or early name for the site of Mecca is Bakkah (also transliterated Baca, Baka, Bakah, Bakka, Becca, Bekka, etc.).
Wsws.org (2002-01-28).
The Saudi regime expanded this press into a larger operation, introducing the new Saudi official gazette Umm al-Qurā.
8-LETTER WORDS: (Jon of the Clue Crew delivers the clue.)  Mica minerals are known for their excellence in this property; see how this one breaks cleanly along planes
cleavage
thumb|Mica sheet thumb|Mica flakes thumb|Dark Mica from Eastern Ontario The mica group of sheet silicate (phyllosilicate) minerals includes several closely related materials having nearly perfect basal cleavage.
3
Structurally, micas can be classed as dioctahedral (Y = 4) and trioctahedral (Y = 6).
In 2010, the major producers were Russia (100,000 tonnes), Finland (68,000 t), United States (53,000 t), South Korea (50,000 t), France (20,000 t) and Canada (15,000 t).
Produced by mechanized or hand setting of overlapping splittings and alternate layers of binders and splittings, built-up mica is used primarily as an electrical insulation material.
'90s MOVIES: 1997 action movie seen here:(with Nicolas Cage)
Con Air
Cage received an Academy Award, a Golden Globe, and Screen Actors Guild Award for his performance as an alcoholic Hollywood writer in Leaving Las Vegas (1995) before coming to the attention of wider audiences with mainstream films, such as The Rock (1996), Face/Off (1997), Con Air (1997), City of Angels (1998), and National Treasure (2004).
3
Early life and family Cage was born in Long Beach, California, to August Coppola, a professor of literature, and Joy (Vogelsang), a dancer and choreographer.
Nicolas Cage Has His Own Acting Method and It’s Called ‘Nouveau Shamanic’" Movieline.
Cage met his third and current wife Alice Kim, a former waitress who previously worked at the Los Angeles restaurant Kabuki and at the Los Angeles-based Korean nightclub, Le Privé. She bore their son, Kal-El, (after Superman's birth name) on October 3, 2005.
STATES THAT END IN HAMPSHIRE: New Hampshire is bounded to the north by this Canadian province, the country's largest in area
Quebec
It is bordered by Massachusetts to the south, Vermont to the west, Maine and the Atlantic Ocean to the east, and the Canadian province of Quebec to the north.
3
Founded in 1996, the team plays in the USL Premier Development League (PDL), the fourth tier of the American Soccer Pyramid, in the Northeast Division of the Eastern Conference.
In the winter, New Hampshire's ski areas and snowmobile trails attract visitors from a wide area.
In July 1944, the Bretton Woods Agreement, the first fully negotiated system intended to govern monetary relations among independent nation-states, was signed at the Mount Washington Hotel.
U.S. GEOGRAPHY: The U.S.A.'s strongest surface wind, 231 MPH, was recorded on this New Hampshire mountain
Mount Washington
The White Mountain National Forest links the Vermont and Maine portions of the Appalachian Trail, and boasts the Mount Washington Auto Road, where visitors may drive to the top of  Mount Washington.
3
Its agricultural outputs are dairy products, nursery stock, cattle, apples and eggs.
Its industrial outputs are machinery, electric equipment, rubber and plastic products and tourism.
As such, the communities of Dixville Notch in Coos County and Hart's Location in Carroll County, among others, have chosen to implement these provisions.
STATE CAPITALS: Pass the grape jelly & name this state capital of New Hampshire
Concord
Concord is the state capital, while Manchester is the largest city in the state.
3
In Coös County, 16% of the population speaks French at home.
The first public high schools in the state were the Boys' High School and the Girls' High School of Portsmouth, established either in 1827 or 1830 depending on the source.
New Hampshire has two NCAA Division I teams: the Dartmouth Big Green (Ivy League) and the New Hampshire Wildcats (America East Conference), as well as three Division II teams: Franklin Pierce Ravens, Saint Anselm Hawks and Southern New Hampshire Penmen (Northeast-10 Conference).
WORLD CAPITALS: It's the northernmost capital city in mainland North America
Ottawa
152.3 Road Town    3.4 Ottawa  (UK)
3
Figures listed here are for the entire country.
When Pangaea began to rift around 200 million years ago, North America became part of Laurasia, before it separated from Eurasia as its own continent during the mid-Cretaceous period.
However, the total length of the portion from Mexico to the northern extremity of the highway is roughly .
"S"TUFF: Attributed to Druids, Greeks & even Romans, this Neolithic site on Salisbury Plain was erected by unknown builders
Stonehenge
Windmill Hill culture  Stonehenge  Xinglongwa culture  Beifudi site  Xinle culture  Yangshao culture  Banpo and Xishuipo settlements.
3
Some archaeologists have long advocated replacing "Neolithic" with a more descriptive term, such as "Early Village Communities", but this has not gained wide acceptance.
In most cases there are small chambers here, with the cover made of a large slab placed on upright stones.
Remains have been found at the Ljubljana Marshes in Slovenia and at the Mondsee and Attersee lakes in Upper Austria, for example.
LIFE SCIENCE: A Mr. Whipple shared the 1934 Nobel Prize for showing daily eating of this raw organ meat helps cure anemia
liver
Aung San Suu Kyi was awarded the Nobel Peace Prize in 1991, but her children accepted the prize because she had been placed under house arrest in Burma; Suu Kyi delivered her speech two decades later, in 2012.
3
Thus it was a safe haven from the German military, which was not at war with Sweden.
Early on, the awards usually recognised recent discoveries.
The Economics Prize was not awarded to Fischer Black, who died in 1995, when his co-author Myron Scholes received the honor in 1997 for their landmark work on option pricing along with Robert C. Merton, another pioneer in the development of valuation of stock options.
WORLD CAPITALS: Physicist Niels Bohr was born in this capital in 1885
Copenhagen
Bohr founded the Institute of Theoretical Physics at the University of Copenhagen, now known as the Niels Bohr Institute, which opened in 1920.
3
thumb|right|upright|Bohr and Margrethe Nørlund on their engagement in 1910.|alt=A young man in a suit and tie and a young woman in a light coloured dress sit on a stoop, holding hands In 1910, Bohr met Margrethe Nørlund, the sister of the mathematician Niels Erik Nørlund.
He felt that it was not fully understood by professional philosophers.
Ivan Supek, one of Heisenberg's students and friends, claimed that the main subject of the meeting was Carl Friedrich von Weizsäcker, who had proposed trying to persuade Bohr to mediate peace between Britain and Germany.
NV: On Nevada's state flag, you can see 2 sprays of this wise-sounding state flower
sagebrush
It is also known as the "Battle Born State", because it achieved statehood during the Civil War (the words "Battle Born" also appear on the state flag); as the "Sagebrush State", for the native plant of the same name; and as "Sage hen State".
3
Nevadans usually pronounce the second syllable of their state name using the  vowel of "bad".
The current Governor of Nevada is Brian Sandoval, a Republican.
When permitted, brothels are only located in rural or isolated parts of counties.
HOUSES OF WORSHIP: Wooden stave churches of Norway were built by these seafarers using shipbuilding techniques
Vikings
The films Die Another Day, The Golden Compass, Spies Like Us and Heroes of Telemark, as well as the TV series Lilyhammer and Vikings also had scenes set in Norway.
3
Norway has often been ruled by minority governments.
Fra fornorskningspolitikk mot kulturelt mangfold.
In the 20th century, Norwegian academics have been pioneering in many social sciences, including criminology, sociology and peace and conflict studies.
HOTELS: Le Champollion is the gourmet restaurant of this city's Le Meridien Hotel, on an island in the Nile
Cairo
North of Cairo, the Nile splits into two branches (or distributaries) that feed the Mediterranean: the Rosetta Branch to the west and the Damietta to the east, forming the Nile Delta.
3
The Nile is an "international" river as its water resources are shared by eleven countries, namely, Tanzania, Uganda, Rwanda, Burundi, Congo-Kinshasa, Kenya, Ethiopia, Eritrea, South Sudan, Sudan and Egypt.
1967.
African Basins, Sedimentary Basins of the World.
ANCIENT WORLDS: Its people called it "kemet", color of black, from land after flooding by Nile
Egypt
an-Nīl; , P(h)iaro; Ancient Egyptian: Ḥ'pī and Iteru) is a major north-flowing river in northeastern Africa, generally regarded as the longest river in the world.
3
Sources
The Nile is the area's natural navigation channel, giving access to Khartoum and Sudan by steamer.
Jerónimo Lobo (1595-1687), a Jesuit priest, stayed in Ethiopia, mostly in Tigre, for 9 years and travelled to Lake Tana and the Blue Nile, reaching the province of Damot.
THE THIRD WORLD: On May 30, 1967, this state declared independence from Nigeria, but surrendered 2 1/2 years later
Biafra
The port of Calabar on the historical Bight of Biafra (now commonly referred to as the Bight of Bonny) become one of the largest slave trading posts in West Africa in the era of the transatlantic slave trade.
3
The origin of the name Niger, which originally applied only to the middle reaches of the Niger River, is uncertain.
On 29 May 1999 Abubakar transferred power to the winner of the elections, Obasanjo, who had since retired from the military."Abdusalam Abubakar", Encyclopædia Britannica Online.
The Nigerian Legal System: Public Law.
"F" STOP: A 17th Century conspirator against British royalty, he has his own "day" each November
Guy Fawkes
National Unity and Armed Forces Day (Italy) Unity Day (Russia) Yitzhak Rabin Memorial (unofficial)  November 5 Guy Fawkes Night November 6 November 7 November 8 November 9 November 10  National Heroes Day (Indonesia) November 11 Independence Day (Angola, Poland November 12 November 13 November 14 Children's Day (India) World Diabetes Day November 15 November 16 November 17 November 18 Day of Army and Victory (Haiti) Independence Day (Latvia) Independence Day (Morocco) Married To A Scorpio Support Day National Day (Oman) National Apple Cider Day (United States) National Vichyssoise Day (United States) The main day of the Feast of the Virgen de Chiquinquirá or Chinita's Fair (Maracaibo, Venezuela) Remembrance Day of the Sacrifice of Vukovar in 1991 (Croatia) November 19 Carbonated Beverage with Caffeine Day
2
(United States) Samhain in the Northern Hemisphere and Beltane in the Southern Hemisphere, celebrations start at sunset of October 31 (Neopagan Wheel of the Year)  World Vegan Day
(United States)
DEAD MAN WALKEN: Chris literally loses his robotic mind in this 2004 remake starring Nicole Kidman
The Stepford Wives
That same year she appeared in the black comedy-science-fiction film The Stepford Wives, a remake of the 1975 film of the same name.
3
She starred in a campaign of television and print ads with Rodrigo Santoro, directed by Moulin Rouge!
In 2012, Kidman's audiobook recording of Virginia Woolf's To the Lighthouse was released at Audible.com.
Retrieved 10 March 2007.
JERSEY SURE: New Jersey said sure, so the Camden home of this "O Captain!  My Captain!" poet is a state historic site
Whitman
Commonly referred to as simply "the Turnpike," it is known for its numerous rest-areas named after prominent New Jerseyans as diverse as inventor Thomas Edison; United States Secretary of the Treasury Alexander Hamilton; United States Presidents Grover Cleveland and Woodrow Wilson; writers James Fenimore Cooper, Joyce Kilmer, and Walt Whitman; patriot Molly Pitcher; Red Cross founder Clara Barton; and football coach Vince Lombardi.
3
To reassure neutrals, it provided that it would become void if New Jersey reached reconciliation with Great Britain.
Operated by the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey, which runs the other two major airports in the New York metropolitan area (John F. Kennedy International Airport and LaGuardia Airport), it is one of the main airports serving the New York City area.
Professional sports New Jersey currently has four teams from major professional sports leagues playing in the state, although the Major League Soccer team and two National Football League teams identify themselves as being from New York.
WORLD TRAVEL: Visit Ashgabat, Turkmenistan & you'll find that it's the sister city of this largest town in New Mexico
Albuquerque
The Rio Grande is tied for the fourth-longest river in the U.S.  The U.S. government protects millions of acres of New Mexico as national forests, including:  Carson National Forest  Cibola National Forest (headquartered in Albuquerque)  Lincoln National Forest  Santa Fe National Forest (headquartered in Santa Fe)  Gila National Forest  Gila Wilderness  Areas managed by the National Park Service include:  Aztec Ruins National Monument at Aztec  Bandelier National Monument in Los Alamos  Capulin Volcano National Monument near Capulin  Carlsbad Caverns National Park near Carlsbad  Chaco Culture National Historical Park at Nageezi  El Camino Real de Tierra Adentro National Historic Trail  El Malpais National Monument in Grants  El Morro National Monument in Ramah  Fort Union National Monument at Watrous  Gila Cliff Dwellings National Monument near Silver City  Old Spanish National Historic Trail  Pecos National Historical Park in Pecos  Petroglyph National Monument near Albuquerque  Salinas Pueblo Missions National Monument at Mountainair  Santa Fe National Historic Trail  White Sands National Monument near Alamogordo  Rio Grande del Norte National Monument near Taos Valles Caldera National Preserve  Visitors also frequent the surviving native pueblos of New Mexico.
3
State taxes  Since 2008, personal income tax rates for New Mexico have ranged from 1.7% to 4.9%, within four income brackets.
The route was called El Camino Real de Tierra Adentro.
Upham, near Truth or Consequences is the location of the world's first operational and purpose-built commercial spaceport, Spaceport America.
CLIFFS NOTES: A New Mexico national monument preserves cliff dwellings near this "monstrous" river
Gila River
The United States acquired the southwestern boot heel of the state and southern Arizona below the Gila River in the mostly desert Gadsden Purchase of 1853, which was related to the construction by the US of a transcontinental railroad.
3
It is also considered during this time a surveyor's error awarded the Permian Basin to the State of Texas, which included the city of El Paso.
However, the Confederate territorial government continued to operate out of Texas, and Confederate troops marched under the Arizona flag until the end of the war.
Among U.S. states, New Mexico has the highest percentage of Hispanic ancestry, at 47% (as of July 1, 2012), including descendants of Spanish colonists and recent immigrants from Latin America.
U.S. COLLEGES & UNIVERSITIES: The North Carolina university founded in this town in 1834 is now in Winston-Salem
Wake Forest
Many universities and colleges in the state have been founded on religious traditions, and some currently maintain that affiliation, including:    Belmont Abbey College (Catholic)  Bennett College for Women (United Methodist Church)  Campbell University (Baptist)  Catawba College (United Church of Christ)  Chowan University (Baptist)  Davidson College (Presbyterian)  Duke University (Historically Methodist)  Elon University (United Church of Christ)  Gardner-Webb University (Cooperative Baptist Fellowship)  Greensboro College (Methodist)  Guilford College (Religious Society of Friends [Quakers])  High Point University (United Methodist Church)  Lees-McRae College (Presbyterian)  Lenoir-Rhyne University (Evangelical Lutheran Church in America)  Livingstone College (African Methodist Episcopal Zion Church)  Louisburg College (United Methodist Church)   Mars Hill University (Christian)  Methodist University (United Methodist Church)  Montreat College (Christian)  University of Mount Olive (Baptist)  North Carolina Wesleyan College (United Methodist Church)  William Peace University (Presbyterian)  Pfeiffer University (Methodist)  Queens University of Charlotte (Presbyterian)  St. Andrews Presbyterian College (Presbyterian)  Saint Augustine's College (Episcopal)  Salem College (Historically Moravian [Protestant])  Shaw University (Baptist)  Wake Forest University (Historically Baptist)  Warren Wilson College (Historically Presbyterian)  Wingate University (Historically Baptist)  The state also has several major seminaries, including the Southeastern Baptist Theological Seminary in Wake Forest, and the Hood Theological Seminary (AME Zion) in Salisbury.
3
Raleigh established two colonies on the coast in the late 1580s, but both failed.
The latter had grown rapidly and land was less available.
The government of North Carolina is divided into three branches: executive, legislative, and judicial.
AUSTRALIAN CAPITALS: This capital of Queensland was founded as a convict colony in 1824 & named for a governor of New South Wales
Brisbane
Rail and road traffic from Brisbane (Queensland) to Perth (Western Australia), or to Melbourne (Victoria) must pass through New South Wales.
3
1788 British settlement  The European discovery of New South Wales was made by Captain James Cook during his 1770 survey along the unmapped eastern coast of the Dutch-named continent of New Holland, now Australia.
After years of chaos, anarchy and the overthrow of Governor William Bligh, a new governor, Lieutenant-Colonel (later Major-General) Lachlan Macquarie, was sent from Britain to reform the settlement in 1809.
The lowest minimum temperature was  at Charlotte Pass in the Snowy Mountains on 29 June 1994.
NUMBER, PLEASE: Number of players on an indoor volleyball team, or consecutive consonants in the surname of star Bob CTVRTLIK
6
ISBN 978-0691118802.
3
Every real number corresponds to a point on the number line.
Many ancient texts used 0.
The system of hyperreal numbers represents a rigorous method of treating the ideas about infinite and infinitesimal numbers that had been used casually by mathematicians, scientists, and engineers ever since the invention of infinitesimal calculus by Newton and Leibniz.
NUMBER, PLEASE: The value of pi is closest to this whole number
3
Gilsdorf, Thomas E. Introduction to Cultural Mathematics: With Case Studies in the Otomies and Incas, John Wiley & Sons, Feb 24, 2012.Restivo, S. Mathematics in Society and History, Springer Science & Business Media, Nov 30, 1992.
2
In mathematics, the notion of number has been extended over the centuries to include , negative numbers, rational numbers such as  and , real numbers such as  and , complex numbers, which extend the real numbers by including , and sometimes additional objects.
This difficulty eventually led him to the convention of using the special symbol i in place of  to guard against this mistake.
NUMBER, PLEASE: Though you'll probably retire later, you can join the American Assn. of Retired Persons on reaching this age
50
50 BC in China.
3
This principle allows true first-order statements about R to be reinterpreted as true first-order statements about *R.  Superreal and surreal numbers extend the real numbers by adding infinitesimally small numbers and infinitely large numbers, but still form fields.
It was not, however, until the 19th century that mathematicians separated irrationals into algebraic and transcendental parts, and once more undertook scientific study of irrationals.
Continued fractions, closely related to irrational numbers (and due to Cataldi, 1613), received attention at the hands of Euler, and at the opening of the 19th century were brought into prominence through the writings of Joseph Louis Lagrange.
I HAVE A PREPOSITION FOR YOU: Neil Gaiman wrote, "Now slip, now slide, now move unseen, above, beneath, betwixt," this
between
The concepts were then altered and split between three titles set in the same continuity:  Lady Justice, Mr. Hero the Newmatic Man, and Teknophage.
3
When I become an author, I want to be able to do things in parentheses.'
After the novel was published, the website evolved into a more general Official Neil Gaiman Website.
Personal life  Home and family thumb|right|Neil Gaiman and Amanda Palmer (Vienna 2011) Gaiman lives near Menomonie, Wisconsin, United States and has lived there since 1992.
ORSON: This 1938 Orson Welles broadcast scared millions into thinking that a Martian invasion was happening
War of the Worlds
He is remembered for his innovative work in all three: in theatre, most notably Caesar (1937), a Broadway adaptation of William Shakespeare's Julius Caesar; in radio, the 1938 broadcast "The War of the Worlds", one of the most famous in the history of radio; and in film, Citizen Kane (1941), consistently ranked as one of the all-time greatest films.
3
he produced and emceed the first two hours of a seven-hour coast-to-coast War Bond drive broadcast titled I Pledge America.
Welles campaigned ardently for Roosevelt in 1944.
He wrote of the Holocaust footage in his syndicated New York Post column May 7, 1945.
MIRO, MIRO ON THE WALL: The huge mural that Miro painted for a hotel in this southwest Ohio city in 1947 is now owned by the city's art museum
Cincinnati
The rugged southeastern quadrant of Ohio, stretching in an outward bow-like arc along the Ohio River from the West Virginia Panhandle to the outskirts of Cincinnati, forms a distinct socio-economic unit.
3
Many major east-west transportation corridors go through Ohio.
Executive branch
Education Ohio's system of public education is outlined in Article VI of the state constitution, and in Title XXXIII of the Ohio Revised Code.
"C" IN HISTORY: This Ohio city was called the "Queen of the West" even before a Longfellow poem popularized the nickname
Cincinnati
The rugged southeastern quadrant of Ohio, stretching in an outward bow-like arc along the Ohio River from the West Virginia Panhandle to the outskirts of Cincinnati, forms a distinct socio-economic unit.
3
Harrison conducted his political career while living on the family compound, founded by his father-in-law, John Cleves Symmes, in North Bend, Ohio.
organized list of topics about Ohio Index of Ohio-related articles Melrose – the official State apple of Ohio  Notes  References  Cayton, Andrew R. L. (2002).
New York: Crown Publishing.
CANADIAN GEOGRPAPHY: The name or this Ontario capital means "place of meeting" in the Huron Indian language
Toronto
It is home to the nation's capital city, Ottawa, and the nation's most populous city, Toronto.
3
Along the eastern shores of Lake Superior and Lake Huron winter temperatures are slightly moderated but come with frequent heavy lake-effect snow squalls that increase seasonal snowfall totals upwards of  in some places.
The Attorney-General drafts the laws and is responsible for criminal prosecutions and the administration of justice, while the Solicitor-General is responsible for law enforcement and the police services of the province.
Most Ontario cities have regional airports, many of which have scheduled commuter flights from Air Canada Jazz or smaller airlines and charter companies — flights from the mid-size cities such as Thunder Bay, Sault Ste.
OMAN: With no constitution or legislature, Oman is governed by a ruler with this title
the Sultan of Oman
As the rebellion threatened to overthrow the Sultan's rule in Dhofar, Sultan Said bin Taimur was deposed in a bloodless coup (1970) by his son Qaboos bin Said, who expanded the Sultan of Oman's Armed Forces, modernised the state's administration and introduced social reforms.
3
Currently, the only approved method of decreasing the stray dog population is shooting by police officers.
Because of Islamic misgivings towards dogs, they are often stoned or beaten to death by neighborhood teens or adults.
Members of the independent Omani Group of Human Rights have been harassed, arrested and sentenced to jail.
BOOKS OF THE BIBLE: Obadiah, the shortest Old Testament book with 21 verses, is the fourth of the 12 "minor" ones of these
Prophets
The books of the Old Testament can be broadly divided into several sections: 1) the first five books or Pentateuch (Torah); 2) the history books telling the history of the Israelites, from their conquest of Canaan to their defeat and exile in Babylon; 3) the poetic and "Wisdom" books dealing, in various forms, with questions of good and evil in the world; 4) and the books of the biblical prophets, warning of the consequences of turning away from God.   Content   The Old Testament contains 39 (Protestant) or 46 (Catholic) or more (Orthodox and other) books, divided, very broadly, into the Pentateuch (Torah), the historical books, the "wisdom" books and the prophets.
3
In the spirit of ecumenism more recent Catholic translations (e.g. the New American Bible, Jerusalem Bible, and ecumenical translations used by Catholics, such as the Revised Standard Version Catholic Edition) use the same "standardized" (King James Version) spellings and names as Protestant Bibles (e.g. 1 Chronicles as opposed to the Douaic 1 Paralipomenon, 1–2 Samuel and 1–2 Kings instead of 1–4 Kings) in those books which are universally considered canonical, the protocanonicals.
Hebrew Wisdom Wisdom Greek Sirach (Ecclesiasticus)
Jerome, however, in the Vulgate's prologues describes some portions of books in the Septuagint that were not found in the Hebrew as being non-canonical (he called them apocrypha); for Baruch, he mentions by name in his Prologue to Jeremiah and notes that it is neither read nor held among the Hebrews, but does not explicitly call it apocryphal or "not in the canon".
EVENTS OF 2010: A piece of custom-made equipment called the Phoenix played a key role in an October event in this country
Chile
Events in October  Movable observances World Cerebral Palsy Day  Ally Week   First Friday Children's Day (Singapore) Lee National Denim Day (United States) World Smile Day  First Sunday Day of Prayer for the Peace of Jerusalem Father's Day (Luxembourg)  First Full Week of October Customer Service Week (Kenya, United States) Mental Illness Awareness Week (United States)  Week of October 9 Fire Prevention Week (Canada, United States) Fire Service Recognition Day (Canada), last day of Fire Prevention Week  Week of October 10  Fiji Week (Fiji)  First Monday   Child Health Day (International observance)  Children's Day (Chile, Singapore)  Labour Day (Australian Capital Territory, New South Wales, South Australia, Queensland, Australia)  Territory Day (Christmas Island, Australia)  Thanksgiving (Saint Lucia)  World Architecture Day   World Habitat Day  First Wednesday  Children's Day (Chile)  Wednesday of second full week in October National Fossil Day (United States)  First or Second Thursday in October National Poetry Day (U.K., Ireland)  Second Thursday in October World Sight Day  Second Friday World Egg Day
3
Independence Day (Palau, Tuvalu) International Day of Older Persons Lincolnshire Day
The zodiac signs for this month are Libra (until October 22) and Scorpio (from October 23).
References  External links   10
SONNETS: In 1652 this "heavenly" epic poet wrote a sonnet praising Oliver Cromwell as "our chief of men"
John Milton
Cromwell is one of the most controversial figures in the history of the British Isles, considered a regicidal dictator by historians such as David Sharp, a military dictator by Winston Churchill, but a hero of liberty by John Milton, Thomas Carlyle and Samuel Rawson Gardiner, and a class revolutionary by Leon Trotsky.
3
The Putney Debates ultimately broke up without reaching a resolution.
Where Cromwell negotiated the surrender of fortified towns, as at Carlow, New Ross, and Clonmel, some historians argue that he respected the terms of surrender and protected the lives and property of the townspeople.
At Wexford, Cromwell again began negotiations for surrender.
HISTORIC PEOPLE: In 1890 this German emperor forced Otto Von Bismarck to resign as chancellor
Kaiser Wilhelm II
Under Wilhelm I, Bismarck largely controlled domestic and foreign affairs, until he was removed by young Kaiser Wilhelm II in 1890, at the age of 75.
3
On 30 September 1862, Bismarck made a famous speech to the Budget Committee of the Prussian Chamber of Deputies in which he expounded on the use of "iron and blood" to achieve Prussia's goals:  thumb|187px|left|Bismarck at 48, 1863  Defeat of Denmark  Germany, prior to the 1860s, consisted of a multitude of principalities loosely bound together as members of the German Confederation.
Russia After Russia's victory over the Ottoman Empire in the Russo-Turkish War of 1877–78, Bismarck helped negotiate a settlement at the Congress of Berlin.
Otto von Bismarck and Imperial Germany: A Historical Assessment (1993), excerpts from historians and primary sources    O'Shea, John J. "Bismarck's Decline and Fall," The American Catholic Quarterly Review, Vol.
SHAKESPEARE: Brabantio, this woman's father, dies of grief over her marriage to Othello
Desdemona
This tightly constructed work revolves around four central characters: Othello, a Moorish general in the Venetian army; his beloved wife, Desdemona; his loyal lieutenant, Cassio; and his trusted but ultimately unfaithful ensign, Iago.
3
However, the version in the Folio is rather different in length, and in wording: as the editors of the Folger edition explain: "The Folio play has about 160 lines that do not appear in the Quarto.
"Renaissance representations of the Moor were vague, varied, inconsistent, and contradictory.
His Othello was called by Harold Hobson of the London Sunday Times "the best Othello of our time,"Jet magazine, 30 June 2003 continuing: "...nobler than Tearle, more martial than Gielgud, more poetic than Valk.
COLLEGES & UNIVERSITIES: This Tulsa, Oklahoma school's athletic teams are called the Golden Eagles, not the Evangelists
Oral Roberts University
Spanning the southern and eastern parts of the United States, the area is known for politically and socially conservative views, even though Oklahoma has more voters registered with the Democratic Party than with any other party.http://www.ok.gov/elections/documents/reg_0112.pdf Tulsa, the state's second largest city, home to Oral Roberts University, is sometimes called the "buckle of the Bible Belt".
3
Tulsa's ONEOK and Williams Companies are the state's largest and second-largest companies respectively, also ranking as the nation's second and third-largest companies in the field of energy, according to Fortune magazine.
The Fair was held first on the south oval of the University of Oklahoma campus and in the third year moved to the Duck Pond in Norman until the Fair became too big and moved to Reaves Park in 2003.
Langston University is Oklahoma's only historically black college.
FLOWER POWER: By dropping 2 letters in Osiris' name, you get this Greek goddess who shares her name with a flower
Iris
thumbnail|right|Head of the God Osiris, ca.
2
21).
If found guilty, the person was thrown to a "devourer" and didn't share in eternal life.
DANCE: This court dance in triple time, not the polka, is the national dance of Poland
Polonaise
Other early compositions, such as the melody of Bogurodzica and Bóg się rodzi (a coronation polonaise for Polish kings by an unknown composer), may also date back to this period, however, the first known notable composer, Mikołaj z Radomia, was born and lived in the 15th century.
3
Straty osobowe i ofiary represji pod dwiema okupacjami, Warsaw, IPN 2009, ISBN 978-83-7629-067-6
World War II  thumb|upright|Polish army's 7TP tanks during military maneuvers shortly before the Invasion of Poland, 1939  The formal beginning of World War II was marked by the Nazi German invasion of Poland on 1 September 1939, followed by the Soviet invasion of Poland on 17 September in violation of the Soviet–Polish Non-Aggression Pact.
It contains the place of coronation of most Polish kings.
OOH, A WISE GUY: Plato compared the unenlightened to people chained up in one of these looking at shadows
Cave
Socrates says that he who sees with his eyes is blind, and this idea is most famously captured in his allegory of the cave, and more explicitly in his description of the divided line.
3
The Stanford Encyclopedia of Philosophy describes Plato as "...one of the most dazzling writers in the Western literary tradition and one of the most penetrating, wide-ranging, and influential authors in the history of philosophy. ...
JM Cooper (Stuart Professor of Philosophy, Princeton University, 1997); DS Hutchinson, Complete Works (p. xii), Hackett Publishing, 1997.
ISBN 978-1-930972-79-7
PARISIANS: The voice of this woman, born in Paris in 1915, evokes the city in songs like "Non, Je Ne Regrette Rien"
Edith Piaf
The Olympia Paris has presented  Edith Piaf, Marlene Dietrich, Miles Davis, Judy Garland, and the Grateful Dead.
3
This makes Paris the fifth largest municipality in the European Union, following London, Berlin, Madrid and Rome.
Paris has an extensive road network with over  of highways and motorways.
New suburban cemeteries were created in the early 20th century: The largest of these are the Cimetière parisien de Saint-Ouen, the Cimetière parisien de Pantin (also known as Cimetière parisien de Pantin-Bobigny, the Cimetière parisien d'Ivry, and the Cimetière parisien de Bagneux).
FRENCH WHINES: I will just scream if one more tourist asks me how to get to zis Paris cathedral on the Ile de la Cite
Notre Dame
The notable architectural landmarks of Paris include Notre Dame Cathedral (12th century); the Sainte-Chapelle (13th century); the Eiffel Tower (1889); and the Basilica of Sacré-Cœur on Montmartre (1914).
3
Each arrondissement has a number of members depending upon its population, from 10 members for each of the least-populated arrondissements (1st through 9th) to 36 members for the most populated (the 15th).
In modernising its infrastructure through the centuries, Paris has preserved even its earliest history in its street map.
A majority of Parisians are still nominally Roman Catholic.
AMERICAN REVOLUTION: Under the Treaty of Paris, the British ceded Florida back to this country
Spain
The largest numbers of foreign tourists in 2014 came from the United States (2.74 million), the U.K., Germany, Italy, Japan, Spain and China (532,000).
3
The current mayor is Anne Hidalgo, a socialist, elected 5 April 2014.
Nineteen percent of Paris employees work for the State in either in administration or education.
The median taxable income for 2011 was around €25,000 in Paris and €22,200 for Île-de-France.Taxable income by "consumption unit" as defined by INSEE, see  Generally speaking, incomes are higher in the Western part of the city and in the western suburbs than in the northern and eastern parts of the urban area.
AIRPORTS: Paris is served by both Orly and an airport named for him
Charles De Gaulle
The city is a major rail, highway, and air-transport hub, served by the two international airports Paris-Charles de Gaulle and Paris-Orly.
3
Two other important districts,  Neuilly-sur-Seine and Levallois-Perret, are extensions of the Paris business district and of La Defense.
Paris is also home to several of France's most famous high-schools such as Lycée Louis-le-Grand, Lycée Henri-IV, Lycée Janson de Sailly and Lycée Condorcet.
Electricity  Paris is provided in electricity through a 'periphery' grid fed by multiple sources.
POLITICAL SCIENTISTS: Raymond Aron was a contributor to this Paris daily from 1947-1977
Le Figaro
Most of France's major universities and grandes écoles are located in Paris, as are France's major newspapers, including Le Monde, Le Figaro, and Libération.
3
The Paris region's manufacturing decline is quickly being replaced by eco-industries: these employ about 100,000 workers.
Carmen has since become one of the most popular and frequently-performed operas in the classical canon;Georges Bizet: Carmen, Susan McClary, p. 120
Rail  A central hub of the national rail network, Paris' six major railway stations (Gare du Nord, Gare de l'Est, Gare de Lyon, Gare d'Austerlitz, Gare Montparnasse, Gare Saint-Lazare) and a minor one (Gare de Bercy) are connected to three networks: the TGV serving four high-speed rail lines, the normal speed Corail trains, and the suburban rails (Transilien).
PARIS: (Jimmy of the Clue Crew in Paris)  The Eiffel Tower opened in 1889 for the Universal Exposition, celebrating the 100th anniversary of this
The French Revolution
In the 18th century, it was the centre stage for the French Revolution, and became an important centre of finance, commerce, fashion, science, and the arts, a position it still retains today.
3
A luxury restaurant, La Taverne Anglaise, opened in 1786 in the arcades of the Palais-Royal by Antoine Beauvilliers; it featured an elegant dining room, an extensive menu, linen tablecloths, a large wine list and well-trained waiters; it became a model for future Paris restaurants.
The project was abandoned in 2002 for a new and better enforced local law, under the terms of which dog owners can be fined up to €500 for not removing their dog faeces.
Media thumb|left|Agence France-Presse Headquarters in Paris Paris and its close suburbs is home to numerous newspapers, magazines and publications including Le Monde, Le Figaro, Libération, Le Nouvel Observateur, Le Canard enchaîné, La Croix, Pariscope, Le Parisien (in Saint-Ouen), Les Échos, Paris Match (Neuilly-sur-Seine), Réseaux & Télécoms, Reuters France, and L'Officiel des Spectacles.
NOTRE DAME: Paris' Notre Dame Cathedral stands on an island in this river
the Seine
Situated on the Seine River, in the north of the country, it is in the centre of the Île-de-France region, also known as the région parisienne, "Paris Region".
3
Most of the clubs closed by the early 1960s, as musical tastes shifted toward rock and roll.
The administrative school such as ENA has been relocated to Strasbourg, the political science school Sciences-Po is still located in Paris' 7th arrondissement and the most prestigious university of economics and finance, Paris-Dauphine, is located in Paris' 16th.
Bibliothèque Mazarine, in the 6th arrondissement, is the oldest public library in France.
RENT: The highest business rents in the world are along this Paris boulevard
Champs-Elysées
The final stage of the most famous bicycle racing in the world, Tour de France, always finishes in Paris, and, since 1975, the race has finished on the Champs-Elysées.
3
Clovis the Frank, the first king of the Merovingian dynasty, made the city his capital from 508.
During the Hundred Years' War, the army of the Duke of Burgundy and a force of about two hundred English soldiers occupied Paris from May 1420 until 1436.
The Paris Urban Area, or "unité urbaine", is a statistical area created by the French statistical agency INSEE to measure the population of built-up areas around the city.
ARCHITECTURAL DIGEST: Paris's Ile de la Cite is home to this structure many consider the birthplace of gothic architecture
Notre Dame
The notable architectural landmarks of Paris include Notre Dame Cathedral (12th century); the Sainte-Chapelle (13th century); the Eiffel Tower (1889); and the Basilica of Sacré-Cœur on Montmartre (1914).
3
There are also notable private museums; The Contemporary Art museum of the Louis Vuitton Foundation, designed by architect Frank Gehry, opened in October 2014 in the Bois de Boulogne.
Also hosted at the Stade de France, two UEFA Champions League Finals in the current century: 2000 and 2006 editions.
From 1809, the Canal de l'Ourcq provided Paris with water from less-polluted rivers to the north-east of the capital.
THE SWEET 16th CENTURY: Ending in 1504, his fourth voyage to the New World took him to Panama
Columbus
A year later, Christopher Columbus visited the isthmus and established a short-lived settlement in the Darien.
3
Under the leadership of Francisco Vázquez, the region of Veraguas passed into Castillan rule in 1558.
On the other hand, the Panamanian movement for independence can be indirectly attributed to the abolishment of the encomienda system in the Azuero Peninsula, set forth by the Spanish Crown, in 1558 because of repeated protests by locals against the mistreatment of the native population.
Mostly unnavigable, many originate as swift highland streams, meander in valleys, and form coastal deltas.
LET'S SEE WHAT'S OVER THERE: In 1501 Portugal sent Vespucci to what's now this country; he'd sailed there earlier on Alsonso de Ojeda's voyage
Brazil
Portugal lost much of its wealth and status with the destruction of Lisbon in a 1755 earthquake, occupation during the Napoleonic Wars, and the independence of Brazil, its wealthiest colony, in 1822.
3
right|thumb|300px|The Great Lisbon earthquake of 1755 devastated much of central and southern Portugal and Northern Africa.
In these places snow can fall any time from October to May.
Sectors    Primary sector   thumb|The vineyards that produce port wine are common along the hillsides that flank the valley of the River Douro in northern Portugal.
WHO: Once among Charlie's Angels, she celebrated her 50th birthday in 1997 by posing for Playboy
Farrah Fawcett
Shannen Doherty (March 1994 and December 2003)  Farrah Fawcett (December 1995 and July 1997)  Women of Baywatch (June 1998)  Claudia Christian (October 1999)  Shari Belafonte (September 2000)
3
In December 2009, they further reduced the publication schedule to 10 issues per year, with a combined January/February issue.
Tanja Szewczenko (April 1999 German Edition)
Google News Archive Search  Playboy was not sold in the state of Queensland, Australia during 2004 and 2005 but returned as of 2006.
THAT'S "ALL", FOLKS!: This 325-mile river rises in the hilly plateau region of Potter County, Pennsylvania
the Allegheny
The state has 5 regions, namely the Allegheny Plateau, Ridge and Valley, Atlantic Coastal Plain, Piedmont, and the Erie Plain.
3
What had been Upland on what became the Pennsylvania side of the Pennsylvania-Delaware Border was renamed as Chester County when Pennsylvania instituted their colonial governments on March 4, 1681.
Demographics
The Port Authority of Allegheny County is the 25th largest transit agency and provides transit bus and light rail service in and around Pittsburgh."2010 Public Transportation Fact Book", p. 8.
U.S. GEOGRAPHY: This city is Pennsylvania's only port on the Great Lakes
Erie
The state borders Delaware to the southeast, Maryland to the south, West Virginia to the southwest, Ohio to the west, Lake Erie and Ontario, Canada to the northwest, New York to the north, and New Jersey to the east.
2
The Presbyterian Church in America has also significant, 112 congregations and 23,000 adherents, the EPC has around 50 congregations, as well as ECO.
Counties, municipalities, and school districts levy taxes on real estate.
SLEEPY: This sleepy Pennsylvania town is often called "The Most Famous Small Town in America"
Gettysburg
During the American Civil War, the Battle of Gettysburg was fought in this state.
3
Of the original Thirteen Colonies, Pennsylvania is the only state that does not border the Atlantic Ocean.
Its dome was inspired by the domes of St. Peter's Basilica in Rome and the United States Capitol.
Intercity passenger rail transit is provided by Amtrak, with the majority of traffic occurring on the Keystone Service in the high-speed Keystone Corridor between Harrisburg and Philadelphia's 30th Street Station before heading north to New York City; the Pennsylvanian follows the same route from New York City to Harrisburg, but extends out to Pittsburgh.
WEATHER WORDS: (Jeff Probst reports from Palau.)  Luckily, Palau is outside the zone of these storms, whose name comes from a Chinese word that means "great wind"
typhoon
Typhoons are rare, as Palau lies outside the main typhoon zone.
3
Legislative power is concentrated in the bicameral Palau National Congress.
Following Palau, the initiative was joined by the Federated States of Micronesia, the Marshall Islands, and the U.S. territories of Guam and Northern Mariana Islands.
Retrieved 1 March 2007 49.4% of the population is Roman Catholic, 21.3% Protestant, 8.7% Modekngei and 5.3% Seventh-day Adventist.
SALMON FISHING: A discussion process called North of Falcon determines the tribal catch in this state's Puget Sound
Washington
Puget Sound  is a sound along the northwestern coast of the U.S. state of Washington, an inlet of the Pacific Ocean, and part of the Salish Sea.
3
The maximum tidal currents, in the range of 9 to 10 knots, occurs at Deception Pass.
thumb|left|Evening on Puget Sound by Edward S. Curtis, 1913  The Puget Sound system consists of four deep basins connected by shallower sills.
There has also been an increase in recovery and management plans for many different area species.
PRAGUE: (Sarah of the Clue Crew leans out of a famous portal.) 2 men were tossed out this window in the incident called the Defenestration of Prague, leading to this numerical war
the Thirty Years' War
The city played major roles in the Protestant Reformation, the Thirty Years' War, and in 20th-century history, during both World Wars and the post-war Communist era.
3
Rudolf was an art lover too, and Prague became the capital of European culture.
Prague had a German-speaking majority in 1848, but by 1880 the number of German speakers had decreased to 14% (42,000), and by 1910 to 6.7% (37,000), due to a massive increase of the city's overall population caused by the influx of Czechs from the rest of Bohemia and Moravia and also due to return of social status importance of the Czech language.
The First Republic  thumb|Prague liberated by Red Army in May 1945 World War I ended with the defeat of the Austro-Hungarian Empire and the creation of Czechoslovakia.
AUSTRALIAN LIT: Nobel Prize winner Patrick White was noted for using this technique where thoughts flow freely & at random
stream of consciousness
White's fiction employs humour, florid prose, shifting narrative vantage points and a stream of consciousness technique.
2
He was among the first group of Companions of the Order of Australia in 1975 but resigned in June 1976 in protest at the dismissal of the Whitlam government in November 1975 by the Governor-General Sir John Kerr.
Existential Explorer—essay by Karin Hansson at the official Nobel Prize website.
YOU GET AN "F": ...in international studies if you can't recollect that the Eduskunta is this country's Parliament
Finland
thumb|Session Hall of Parliament of Finland.
3
With the development of the unique Polish Golden Liberty the Sejm's powers increased.
However, the Scottish Parliament does not have complete power over Scottish Politics, as it only holds the powers which were devolved to it by Westminster in 1997.
However, in case of general discontent with the head of government, his replacement can be made very smoothly without all the complications that it represents in the case of a presidential system.
ACCENTS: Peter Sellers served in this country during WWII & used the accent in "The Party"
India
He found these duties dull, so auditioned for Squadron Leader Ralph Reader's RAF Gang Show entertainment troupe: Reader accepted him and Sellers toured the UK before the troupe was transferred to India.
3
Sellers began his film career during the 1950s.
Directors John and Roy Boulting considered that Sellers was "a deeply troubled man, distrustful, self-absorbed, ultimately self-destructive.
Irv Slifkin said that the most prominent albeit ever-changing face in comedies of the sixties was Sellers who "changed like a chameleon throughout the era, dazzling audiences".
LITERARY LITERARY CHARACTERS: In this Russian-American's "Pale Fire", John Shade is the late author of a 999-line poem
Vladimir Nabokov
Pale Fire (1962) is a novel by Vladimir Nabokov.
3
Explanation of the title As Nabokov pointed out himself, the title of John Shade's poem is from Shakespeare's Timon of Athens: "The moon's an arrant thief, /
"Kinboteans", a decidedly smaller group, believe that Kinbote invented the existence of John Shade.
An exchange from NABOKV-L.  As in other Nabokov books, however, the fiction is an exaggerated or comically distorted version of his own life as a son of privilege before the Russian Revolution and an exile afterwards,Nabokov, Speak, Memory and the central murder has resemblances (emphasized by Priscilla Meyer) to Nabokov's father's murder by an assassin who was trying to kill someone else.
SAINT PETERSBURG: (Cheryl of the Clue Crew reads from the beautiful Hermitage Museum in St. Petersburg, Russia.)  The Peacock Clock at the Hermitage was given to Catherine the Great by this prince for whom a Russian battleship was named
Potemkin
Cinema, animation and media  thumb|left|Former Russian President Dmitry Medvedev in the Washington studio of Russia Today TV with Margarita Simonyan Russian and later Soviet cinema was a hotbed of invention in the period immediately following 1917, resulting in world-renowned films such as The Battleship Potemkin by Sergei Eisenstein.
3
The continued internal struggle in the Bolshevik party culminated in the Great Purge, a period of mass repressions in 1937–38, during which hundreds of thousands of people were executed, including original party members and military leaders accused of coup d'état plots.
46 oblasts (provinces): most common type of federal subjects, with locally elected governor and legislature.
The imperial motto God is with us and the Soviet motto Proletarians of all countries, unite! are now obsolete and no new motto has replaced them.
-O-O-O- YES!: The city of Perm in Russia used to be caled this, also the name of an infamous cocktail
Molotov
thumb|Citizens of Leningrad during the 872-day siege, in which about one million civilians died In August 1939, after another failure of attempts to establish an anti-Nazi alliance with Britain and France, the Soviet government decided to improve relations with Germany by concluding the Molotov-Ribbentrop Pact, pledging non-aggression between the two countries and dividing Eastern Europe into their respective spheres of influence.
3
thumb|left|upright|Soviet General Secretary Mikhail Gorbachev and U.S. President Ronald Reagan in Red Square during the Moscow Summit, 31 May 1988 In 1979, after a Communist-led revolution in Afghanistan, Soviet forces entered that country at the request of the new regime.
Following a Crimean referendum in which separation was favored by a large majority of voters, but not accepted internationally,16 March 2014, David Herszenhornmarch, The New York Times, "Crimea Votes to Secede From Ukraine as Russian Troops Keep Watch.
A History of Russian Cinema.
ISLAND COUNTRIES: On Oct. 22, 1962 President Kennedy revealed that Russia had built missile bases in this country
Cuba
The Soviet Union supported revolutionary movements across the world, including the newly formed People's Republic of China, the Democratic People's Republic of Korea and, later on, the Republic of Cuba.
3
In 1993, when the Constitution was adopted, there were eighty-nine federal subjects listed, but later some of them were merged.
Following the Primary Chronicle, the definitive Christianization of Kievan Rus' dates from the year 988 (the year is disputedOleg Rapov, Russkaya tserkov v IX–pervoy treti XII veka (The Russian Church from the 9th to the First 3rd of the 12th Century).
The 2014 Winter Olympics were held in Sochi in the south of Russia.
ROYAL NAME'S THE SAME: Not England's Elizabeth I, but Russia's Elizabeth I was the daughter of this "Great" czar
Peter the Great
Imperial Russia  thumb|upright|Peter the Great, the first Emperor of Russia Under Peter the Great, Russia was proclaimed an Empire in 1721 and became recognized as a world power.
3
The Appeasement policy of Great Britain and France towards Adolf Hitler's annexation of Austria and Czechoslovakia did not stem an increase in the power of Nazi Germany and initiated a threat of war to the Soviet Union.
The latter events are traditionally referred to as baptism of Rus'  (, ) in Russian and Ukrainian literature.
In 2007, the Russian national basketball team won the European Basketball Championship.
DO YOU LIKE RUSSIAN HISTORY?: In May 1905 imperial Russia's naval swan song came when 2/3 of its fleet was destroyed by this nation
Japan
It shares maritime borders with Japan by the Sea of Okhotsk and the U.S. state of Alaska across the Bering Strait.
3
Alexander I headed Russia's delegation at the Congress of Vienna that defined the map of post-Napoleonic Europe.
It began to experience a rapid decline starting in the mid-1990s.
The late 1980s and 1990s were a period of crisis in Russian cinema and animation.
HISTORY: Elizabeth Petrovna, the daughter of this czar, became empress of Russia in 1741
Peter the Great
Imperial Russia  thumb|upright|Peter the Great, the first Emperor of Russia Under Peter the Great, Russia was proclaimed an Empire in 1721 and became recognized as a world power.
3
The invading Mongol elite, together with their conquered Turkic subjects (Cumans, Kipchaks, Bulgars), became known as Tatars, forming the state of the Golden Horde, which pillaged the Russian principalities; the Mongols ruled the Cuman-Kipchak confederation and Volga Bulgaria (modern-day southern and central expanses of Russia) for over two centuries.
thumb|The Russian SFSR as a part of the USSR in 1936, after intra-Soviet territorial changes.
In August 1945 the Soviet Army ousted the Japanese from China's Manchukuo and North Korea, contributing to the allied victory over Japan.
THE 50 STATES: People from Rhode Island are called Rhode Islanders & people from this state are just Islanders
Hawaii
According to the 2010 Census, 81.4% of the population was White (76.4% non-Hispanic white), 5.7% was Black or African American, 0.6% American Indian and Alaska Native, 2.9% Asian, 0.1% Native Hawaiian and other Pacific Islander, 3.3% from two or more races.
3
The state legislature is the Rhode Island General Assembly, consisting of the 75-member House of Representatives and the 38-member Senate.
I schools in Rhode Island.
Travels Through New England and New York (circa 1800) 4 vol.
FIRST LADIES: Her sister Lee was maid of honor at her 1953 wedding in Newport, Rhode Island
Jacqueline Bouvier Kennedy
Jacqueline Bouvier Kennedy Onassis and John F. Kennedy were married at St. Mary's church in Newport, RI. Their reception was held at Hammersmith Farm, the Bouvier summer home in Newport.
3
Rhode Island has some of the highest taxes in the country, particularly its property taxes, ranking seventh in local and state taxes, and sixth in real estate taxes.
The Providence Reds were a hockey team that played in the Canadian-American Hockey League (CAHL) between 1926 and 1936 and the American Hockey League (AHL) from 1936 to 1977, the last season of which they played as the Rhode Island Reds.
They are the oldest continuously operating minor-league hockey franchise in North America, having fielded a team in one form or another since 1926 in the CAHL.
WOMEN ATHLETES: In 1984 Carl Lewis' 4 Olympic golds in track & field were matched by Romania's Ecaterina Szabo in this sport
gymnastics
Almost a quarter of all the medals and 25 of the gold ones were won in gymnastics, with Nadia Comăneci becoming the first gymnast ever to score a perfect ten in an Olympic event at the 1976 Summer Olympics.
3
According to followers of the continuity theory, the intense Romanization gave birth to the Proto-Romanian language.
The economy is accelerated by a government in the midst of liberalising, which is opening up new sectors (most notably, energy and telecoms) to competition and investment.
In cinema, several movies of the Romanian New Wave have achieved international acclaim.
TO REMAIN "SILENT": In a Nov. 3, 1969 speech, Richard Nixon referred to this large group that usually withholds its opinions
silent majority
He appealed to what he later called the "silent majority" of socially conservative Americans who disliked the hippie counterculture and the anti-war demonstrators.
3
With pressure building for Eisenhower to demand Nixon's resignation from the ticket, the senator went on television to deliver an address to the nation on September 23, 1952.
Nixon engaged in intense negotiations with Brezhnev.
Throughout his career, he was instrumental in moving his party away from the control of isolationists, and as a congressman was a persuasive advocate of containing Soviet communism.
RENAISSANCE MEN: This Spanish painter's son appears in his 1586 masterpiece the "Burial of the Count of Orgaz"
El Greco
The late Renaissance in Spain also saw the rise of artists such as El Greco, and composers such as Tomás Luis de Victoria and Antonio de Cabezón.
3
Accordingly, several theories have been put forward to explain its origins.
Portrait in crayon by Renaissance sculptor Leone Leoni
thumb|right|The Palace of Facets on the Cathedral Square of the Moscow Kremlin.
PEN NAMES: Under the name Richard Bachman, he wrote "Thinner", about a man with a wasting disease
Stephen King
Richard Bachman is a pen name used by horror fiction author Stephen King.
3
His fifth novel was dedicated to his wife, Claudia Inez Bachman, who also received credit for the bogus author photo on the book jacket.
In the fifth book, Wolves of the Calla, the sinister children's book Charlie the Choo Choo is revealed to be written by "Claudia y Inez Bachman." The spelling discrepancy of the added 'y' was later explained as a deus ex machina on the part of "The White" (a force of good throughout King's Tower series) to bring the total number of letters in her name to nineteen, a number prominent in King's series.
In 2010, King appeared on the FX television show Sons of Anarchy in a cameo role.
STUPID ANSWERS: Voltaire described this European political entity as not holy, nor Roman, nor an empire
Holy Roman Empire
Romanae or the Greco-Romans from Aetolia Acarnania that speak Romanesci Holy Roman Empire  Geography Roman, Bulgaria, a town and a municipality in Vratsa Province Roman, Eure, France, a commune Roman Municipality, Bulgaria Roman, Romania, a city in Neamţ county Roman Valley, Nova Scotia Romans, Ain, a town in France Romans, Deux-Sèvres, France, a commune Romans d'Isonzo, a town in Italy Roman, Sakha Republic, Russia, a rural locality Romans-sur-Isère, in the Drôme département of France Saint Roman, Monaco  People Roman (name), a given name, includes a list of people and fictional characters Roman (surname), a list of people surnamed either Roman or Romans  Religion Epistle to the Romans, a letter in the New Testament of the Christian Bible  Ar-Rum, the 30th book in the Qu'ran, sometimes translated as The Romans Roman religion (disambiguation) Roman catholic  Arts and entertainment  Music Romans (group), a Japanese pop group Roman (album), by the Japanese musical group Sound Horizon Roman (EP), by the South Korean boy band Teen Top  "Roman (My Dear Boy)", a song by the Japanese pop group Morning Musume  Film Roman (film), a 2006 American suspense-horror film Romans (film), a 2012 Indian Malayalam comedy film  Other "The Romans" (Doctor Who), an episode of the BBC production Doctor Who Roman (bidding system), a contract bridge bidding system Romans, a race in the Heroscape Universe  Other uses Roman script or Latin script, the standard script of the English language and most of the languages of western and central Europe, Indonesia, Malay, and other areas once settled by European colonial empires Roman type, an upright typeface style, contrasted to italic Roman (vehicle manufacturer), a Romanian truck manufacturer  Roman candle (firework)
2
Roman Kingdom (753 BC to 509 BC) Roman Republic (509 BC to 27 BC)  Roman Empire (27 BC to 476/1453 AD) Roman Britain, part of the island of Great Britain controlled by the Roman Empire between AD 43 and about 410 Ancient Roman cuisine Ancient Roman sarcophagi Roman alphabet or Latin alphabet Roman architecture Roman army Roman calendar Roman numerals Roman currency Roman economy Roman finance Roman funerary practices Roman law, the legal system of both the Roman Republic and the Roman Empire Roman mosaic, a tiled mural or floor from the Roman period, using tesserae, or miniature square tiles Roman mythology Roman navy Roman roads Roman temple Roman villa, a high status country house of the Roman period Byzantine Empire (330/476/629 to 1453), a Late Antiquity and medieval continuation of the Greek-speaking portion of the Roman Empire  Romaioi (Ρωμαίοι), Greek-speaking,  Orthodox population of the Eastern Roman Empire dating to Late Antiquity (the term translates literally to "Roman")
Romioi (Ρωμιοί), Greek-speaking, Orthodox population of the Rum-milet in the Ottoman Empire, or Greek-speaking Orthodox people today (the term translates literally to "Roman")
A "LITTLE" LIT: This pal of Robin Hood stood out in a crowd: he was at least 7 feet tall
Little John
Little John, Much the Miller's Son and Will Scarlet (as Will "Scarlok" or "Scathelocke") all appear, although not yet Maid Marian or Friar Tuck.
3
Some scholars have conjectured that Skelton may have indeed written a lost Robin Hood play for Henry VIII's court, and that this play may have been one of Munday's sources.
No surviving broadside ballad can be dated with certainty before the 17th century, but during that century the commercial broadside ballad became the main vehicle for the popular Robin Hood legend.
All Saints' Church had a priory hospital attached to it.
DISNEYLAND: New Orleans Square restaurant, or a hit song for Linda Ronstadt & Roy Orbison
Blue Bayou
He had a string of hits in 1963 with "In Dreams" (U.S. number 7/UK number 6), "Falling" (22/9), "Mean Woman Blues" (5/3) coupled with "Blue Bayou" (29/3).Brown, Kutner, & Warwick, p. 645.
3
In 1988, he was a member of the  Traveling Wilburys supergroup, along with George Harrison, Bob Dylan, Tom Petty and Jeff Lynne.
Orbison enrolled in Odessa Junior College.
He appeared on American Bandstand and toured the U.S. for three months non-stop with Patsy Cline.
ON THE "MA"P: The 4 largest islands of Spain's Balearic Group are Ibiza, Minorca, Formentera & this one
Majorca
Island  Population Tenerife  899,833 Majorca (Mallorca)  862,397 Gran Canaria  838,397 Lanzarote  141,938 Ibiza  125,053 Fuerteventura  103,107 Minorca (Menorca)  92,434 La Palma  85,933   Mountains and rivers  thumb|right|Ordesa y Monte Perdido National Park, World Heritage Site in the Pyrenees.
3
1478 commenced the completion of the conquest of the Canary Islands and in 1492, the combined forces of Castile and Aragon captured the Emirate of Granada, ending the last remnant of a 781-year presence of Islamic rule in Iberia.
There were 118 politicians from all factions.
thumb|left|Spain is a member of the Schengen Area, the Eurozone and the European Single Market.
EUROPEAN GEOGRAPHY: In Spain this second-largest city is a major port on the Mediterranean Sea
Barcelona
thumb|left|upright|Petronilla of Aragon and Ramon Berenguer IV, Count of Barcelona, dynastic union of the Crown of Aragon.
3
The Statutes of Autonomy establish the name of the community according to its historical identity, the limits of their territories, the name and organisation of the institutions of government and the rights they enjoy according to the constitution.
Thousands of music fans also travel to Spain each year for internationally recognised summer music festivals Sónar which often features the top up and coming pop and techno acts, and Benicàssim which tends to feature alternative rock and dance acts.
Basketball, tennis, cycling, handball, futsal, motorcycling and, lately, Formula One are also important due to the presence of Spanish champions in all these disciplines.
SEÑOR MOMENTS: On May 22, 2004 this Crown Prince of Spain wed Letizia Ortiz, a former TV anchorwoman & a commoner (!)
Felipe
Restoration of democracy   thumb|left|Posters of the first elections under Spanish Constitution of 1978, showing political leaders including Adolfo Suárez (first president), Manuel Fraga, Felipe González and Santiago Carrillo.
3
The capture of the strategically central city of Toledo in 1085 marked a significant shift in the balance of power in favour of the Christian kingdoms.
In turn, provinces are integrated by municipalities.
Their origin is unclear.
STAR WARS: (R2-D2 "reads".)  In "Star Wars", the term used for robots like C-3PO & myself is this 5-letter shortening of another word
droid
Robotic droids are also commonplace and are generally built to serve their owners.
2
The final season of the series aired on Netflix in March 2014.
While many fan films have used elements from the licensed Expanded Universe to tell their story, they are not considered an official part of the Star Wars canon.
FILM DIRECTORS: He hasn't directed a feature film since 1977's "Star Wars"
George Lucas
Star Wars is an American epic space opera franchise, centered on a film series created by George Lucas.
3
World War II terms were used for names in Star Wars; examples include the planets Kessel (a term that refers to a group of encircled forces), Hoth (Hermann Hoth was a German general who served on the snow laden Eastern Front), and Tatooine (Tataouine - a province south of Tunis in Tunisia, roughly where Lucas filmed for the planet; Libya was a WWII arena of war).
Variety.com J. J. Abrams will serve as executive producer.
The term Expanded Universe (EU) is an umbrella term for officially licensed Star Wars material outside of the six feature films.
STATELY FIRST NAMES: Sean Connery played this character's dad, Henry, in a 1989 film
Indiana Jones
His film career also includes such films as Marnie, The Name of the Rose, The League of Extraordinary Gentlemen, Indiana Jones and the Last Crusade, The Hunt for Red October, Highlander, Murder on the Orient Express, Dragonheart, and The Rock.
3
He was generally referred to in his youth as "Tommy".
While in Edinburgh, Connery was targeted by the notorious Valdor gang, one of the most ruthless gangs in the city.
In response to accusations that he is a tax exile, Connery released documents in 2003 showing that he had paid £3.7 million in UK taxes between 1997/98 and 2002/03.
COLLEGES & UNIVERSITIES: From 1902 to 1938, Sigmund Freud served as a professor of neuropathology at this university
University of Vienna
Freud qualified as a doctor of medicine in 1881 at the University of Vienna , and then carried out research into cerebral palsy, aphasia and microscopic neuroanatomy at the Vienna General Hospital.
3
His substantial body of published research led to his appointment as a university lecturer or docent in neuropathology in 1885, a non-salaried post but one which entitled him to give lectures at the university.
49, 106, 126, 127, 132, 201.
A Seventeenth-Century Demonological Neurosis (the Haizmann case)  Papers on sexuality  1906 My Views on the Part Played by Sexuality in the Aetiology of the Neuroses  1908 "Civilized" Sexual Morality and Modern Nervous Illness  1910 A Special Type of Choice of Object made by Men  1912 Types of Onset of Neurosis  1912
LAST PAGE OF THE AMERICAN HERITAGE DICTIONARY: Population 350,000, it's the largest city in Switzerland
Zurich
During the Cold War, Swiss authorities considered the construction of a Swiss nuclear bomb.7.4 States Formerly Possessing or Pursuing Nuclear Weapons Retrieved 6 March 2014 Leading nuclear physicists at the Federal Institute of Technology Zurich such as Paul Scherrer made this a realistic possibility.
3
Switzerland was an important base for espionage by both sides in the conflict and often mediated communications between the Axis and Allied powers.
The Swiss have also been under EU and sometimes international pressure to reduce banking secrecy and to raise tax rates to parity with the EU. Preparatory discussions are being opened in four new areas: opening up the electricity market, participation in the European GNSS project Galileo, cooperating with the European centre for disease prevention and recognising certificates of origin for food products.
The undisputed giants of 20th century Swiss literature are Max Frisch (1911–91) and Friedrich Dürrenmatt (1921–90), whose repertoire includes Die Physiker (The Physicists) and Das Versprechen (The Pledge), released in 2001 as a Hollywood film.
SUNSHINE: The energy we call sunshine is initially generated by the Sun's fusion of hydrogen into this
helium
About three quarters of the Sun's mass consists of hydrogen; the rest is mostly helium, with much smaller quantities of heavier elements, including oxygen, carbon, neon and iron.
2
The sculpture is probably from around 1350 BC.
doi:10.4249/scholarpedia.3967  External links   Nasa SOHO (Solar & Heliospheric Observatory) satellite  National Solar Observatory  Astronomy Cast: The Sun  A collection of spectacular images of the Sun from various institutions (The Boston Globe)  Satellite observations of solar luminosity  Sun|Trek, an educational website about the Sun  The Swedish 1-meter Solar Telescope, SST  An animated explanation of the structure of the Sun (University of Glamorgan)  Animation –
ITALY: Stendhal wrote about "The Charterhouse of" this city, world famous for its cheese
Parma
Best known for the novels Le Rouge et le Noir (The Red and the Black, 1830) and La Chartreuse de Parme (The Charterhouse of Parma, 1839), he is highly regarded for the acute analysis of his characters' psychology and considered one of the earliest and foremost practitioners of realism.
3
Stendhal used many aliases in his autobiographical writings and correspondence, and often assigned pseudonyms to friends, some of whom adopted the names for themselves.
He uses many ridiculous names: "Don phlegm", "Giorgio Vasari", "William Crocodile", "Poverino", "Baron de Cutendre".
Oeuvres complètes: Vies de Haydn, de Mozart et de Métastase, volume 41  Further reading Ann Jefferson, Reading Realism in Stendhal (Cambridge Studies in French), Cambridge, UK: Cambridge University Press, 1988.
STATE DEPT. TRAVEL WARNINGS: Say so long to Sarajevo; the U.S. has been warning people about visiting this country since 1992
Bosnia
Sarajevo (Bosnia/Croatian/Serbian cyrillic Сарајево) () is the capital and largest city of Bosnia and Herzegovina, with an estimated population of 369,534.
3
Austria-Hungary right|220px|thumb|Archduke Franz Ferdinand of Austria arrives at the city hall on the day of his assassination, 28 June 1914 thumb|right|220px|The Latin Bridge was the site of the assassination of Franz Ferdinand.
The Cathedral of Sacred Heart, for example, was constructed using elements of neo-gothic and Romanesque architecture.
Ann Arbor, University of Michigan Press, (2006).
CLASSIC TV: Uh, sir, just one more thing... a 1971 episode of this drama was written by Steven Bochco & directed by Steven Spielberg
Columbo
He did another segment on Night Gallery and did some work for shows such as Owen Marshall: Counselor at Law and The Psychiatrist, before landing the first series episode of Columbo (previous episodes were actually TV films).
3
In 2013, Spielberg has announced he is collaborating with 343 Industries for a live-action TV show of Halo.
According to Warren Buckland,Directed by Steven Spielberg: Poetics of the Contemporary Hollywood Blockbuster these themes are portrayed through the use of low height camera tracking shots, which have become one of Spielberg's directing trademarks.
Other In 1999, Spielberg, then a co-owner of DreamWorks, was involved in a heated debate in which the studio proposed building on wetlands near Los Angeles, though development was later dropped for economic reasons.
U.S. CITIES: Located at the southern tip of San Francisco Bay, it was named by Spanish colonists for St. Joseph
San Jose
San Francisco Bay is in the U.S. state of California, surrounded by a contiguous region known as the San Francisco Bay Area (often simply "the Bay Area"), dominated by the large cities San Francisco, Oakland, and San Jose.
2
From the Second World War until the 1990s, both islands served as military bases and are now being redeveloped.
History thumb|Cañizares Map of San Francisco Bay  The first recorded European discovery of San Francisco Bay was on November 4, 1769 when Spanish explorer Gaspar de Portolà, unable to find the port of Monterey, California, continued north close to what is now Pacifica and reached the summit of the  high Sweeney Ridge, now marked as the place where he first sighted San Francisco Bay.
SHE SELLS SEYCHELLES: This Portuguese navigator, the first European to reach India by sea, discovered the Seychelles in 1502
Vasco da Gama
The earliest recorded sighting by Europeans took place in 1502 by the Portuguese Admiral Vasco da Gama, who passed through the Amirantes and named them after himself (islands of the Admiral).
3
The British administration employed Indians on indentured servitude to the same degree as in Mauritius resulting in a small Indian population.
Fish dishes are cooked in several ways, such as steamed, grilled, wrapped in banana leaves, baked, salted and smoked.
Modern piracy  Seychelles has become a key participant in the fight against piracy, which is perhaps the cause of their out-sized incarceration rate.
LANGUAGES: Oromo is a major Cushitic language spoken in the northern parts of Kenya & this nation east of Sudan
Ethiopia
It is bordered by Egypt to the north, the Red Sea, Eritrea, and Ethiopia,  to the east, South Sudan to the south, the Central African Republic to the southwest, Chad to the west and Libya to the northwest.
3
Geography  thumb|left|Jebel Barkal mountain in Nubia, a UNESCO World Heritage Site.
Armed Forces  thumb|Sudanese Air Force Hongdu JL-8
Slavery in Mauritania and Sudan —
"T" COUNTRIES: It thrusts out towards Sicily as the northernmost bulge of Africa
Tunisia
He offered the rule of Sicily to Ziyadat Allah, the Aghlabid Emir of Tunisia, in return for a position as a general and as a place of safety; a Muslim army of Arabs, Berbers, Spaniards of Al-Andalus (which was then an Islamic region), Cretans and Persians was then sent to the island.
3
Syracuse gained Sparta and Corinth as allies and, as a result, the Athenian expedition was defeated.
Today Sicily is investing a large amount of money on structures of the hospitality industry, in order to make tourism more competitive.
Trapani-Birgi Airport, a military-civil joint use airport (third for traffic on the island).
HOT "BUN"s: In a 1969 Sam Peckinpah film, William Holden & Ernest Borgnine were part of a "Wild" one
Bunch
David Samuel "Sam" Peckinpah (;"Peckinpah", Random House Webster's Unabridged Dictionary February 21, 1925 – December 28, 1984) was an American film director and screenwriter who achieved prominence following the release of the Western epic The Wild Bunch (1969).
3
Beating Federico
The production abruptly ran out of funds, and Peckinpah was forced to completely improvise the concluding sequence, filming the scene in one day.
The Osterman Weekend  By 1982, however, Peckinpah's health was in poor shape.
WORK THOSE APPS!: The "RELAX" entry in this app series provides detailed descriptions of poses, including their Sanskrit names
Yoga
right|thumb|400px|Devi Mahatmya palm-leaf manuscript in an early Bhujimol script, Bihar or Nepal, 11th century  It is also popular amongst the many practitioners of yoga in the West, who find the language helpful for understanding texts such as the Yoga Sutras of Patanjali.
3
Sanskrit continues to be widely used as a ceremonial language in Hindu religious rituals and Buddhist practice in the form of hymns and chants.
However, linguistic change led to an eventual loss of mutual intelligibility.
British attitudes   Orientalist scholars of the 18th century like Sir William Jones marked a wave of enthusiasm for Indian culture and for Sanskrit.
SUPER BOWL MVPs: III:Joe Namath
New York Jets
At the time, many doubted the competitiveness of AFL teams compared with their NFL counterparts, though that perception changed when the AFL's New York Jets defeated the NFL's Baltimore Colts in Super Bowl III in Miami.
3
Originally, the game took place in early to mid-January.
Stadiums may include temporary seating for Super Bowls, but seating must be approved by the league.
Thank you.
SUPER BOWL MVPs: In Super Bowl XXXIII this Bronco won his first MVP award in the last year of his 16-year career
John Elway
1997–2009: AFC resurgence Super Bowl XXXII saw quarterback John Elway and running back Terrell Davis lead the Denver Broncos to an upset victory over the defending champion Packers, snapping the NFC's 13 year winning streak.
3
At the time, many doubted the competitiveness of AFL teams compared with their NFL counterparts, though that perception changed when the AFL's New York Jets defeated the NFL's Baltimore Colts in Super Bowl III in Miami.
During this decade, the Cowboys made post-season appearances every year except for the seasons of 1990 and 1997.
Brady would go on to win the MVP award for this game.
COLONIAL ARTS: This South Carolina city that gave us a popular dance in the 1930s was the site of the first opera in America in 1735
Charleston
The state's coastline contains many salt marshes and estuaries, as well as natural ports such as Georgetown and Charleston.
3
Snowfall in South Carolina is somewhat uncommon in most of the state, while coastal areas receive less than an inch (2.5 cm) annually on average.
They grew tobacco, and sold timber and tar, both categories of naval stores needed by England.
1.0%  1.7%  1.7%  thumb|right|Population density of South Carolina.
A LITTLE BIT COUNTRY: It's the country that country stars Anne Murray & Shania Twain came from
Canada
Twain has received five Grammy Awards, 27 BMI Songwriter awards, stars on Canada's Walk of Fame and the Hollywood Walk of Fame, and an induction into the Canadian Music Hall of Fame.
3
The album's first single, "Whose Bed
Lange won Grammys for "You're Still the One" and "Come on Over".
I've written 38 songs in total, and now the process is underway to narrow that down to another six or eight to finish recording".
COUNTRIES OF THE WORLD: (Kelly of the Clue Crew points to a map of Southeast Asia on the monitor.) Malaysia consists of two regions--West Malaysia, on the Malay Peninsula, & East Malaysia, which occupies the northern part of this large island
Borneo
Its greatest ruler was Hayam Wuruk, whose reign from 1350 to 1389 marked the empire's peak when it dominated other kingdoms in the southern Malay Peninsula, Borneo, Sumatra, and Bali.
3
The Philippines, Malaysia, Brunei, Indonesia, Singapore, and Vietnam have integral rivers that flow into the South China Sea.
The region notably manufactures textiles, electronic high-tech goods such as microprocessors and heavy industrial products such as automobiles.
The rice paddies are well-suited to the monsoon climate of the region.
CIVIL WAR PEOPLE: Early in the morning of April 15, 1865, David Herold & this man showed up at the home of Dr. Samuel Mudd
John Wilkes Booth
Samuel Alexander Mudd (December 20, 1833 – January 10, 1883) was an American physician who was imprisoned for conspiring with John Wilkes Booth in the assassination of U.S. President Abraham Lincoln.
3
The two men, as well as John Surratt, Jr. and Louis J. Weichmann, had a conversation and drinks together, first at Booth's hotel, and later at Mudd's.
He also arranged for a carpenter, John Best, to make a pair of crutches for Booth, and gave him a shoe to wear.
Mudd and his three companions lived in the casemate directly above the fort's main entrance, called the sally port.
DON'T BE CRUEL: Killed with his brother Qusay in 2003, this son of Saddam Hussein had a reputation for brutality
Uday Hussein
Uday Hussein (18 June 1964 – 22 July 2003), was Saddam's oldest son, who ran the Iraqi Football Association, Fedayeen Saddam, and several media corporations in Iraq including Iraqi TV and the newspaper Babel.
3
He soon became the architect of Iraq's foreign policy and represented the nation in all diplomatic situations.
The allies ultimately rejected any linkage between the Kuwait crisis and Palestinian issues.
Former CIA case officer Robert Baer reports that he "tried to assassinate" Saddam in 1995 amid "a decade-long effort to encourage a military coup in Iraq."
THE OLYMPICS: In 1988 she became the first figure skater since Sonja Henie to defend successfully the women's title
Katarina Witt
While Irina Slutskaya of Russia won her seventh European Championship in 2006 to become the most successful ladies' skater in European Championships, Henie retains record of most consecutive titles, sharing it with Katarina Witt of Eastern Germany/Germany (1983–1988).
3
womenssportsfoundation.org
She has a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame.
In 2012, the Posten Norge (Norwegian postal service) made two stamps featuring Sonja Henie.13.
ENERGY: In 1937 an explosion of this, unodorized, killed 300 people in a New London, Texas school
natural gas
Texas also leads in natural gas production, producing one-fourth of the nation's supply.
3
Pangea began to break up in the Triassic, but seafloor spreading to form the Gulf of Mexico occurred only in the mid and late Jurassic.
Hardin (1994), p. 12.
Texas's large population, abundance of natural resources, thriving cities and leading centers of higher education have contributed to a large and diverse economy.
PEOPLE WHO BECAME WORDS: By leaving his cows unbranded, a Texas cattle rancher gave us this term for an independent loner
Maverick
Within the "Big Four" professional leagues, Texas has two NFL teams (the Dallas Cowboys and the Houston Texans), two Major League Baseball teams (the Texas Rangers and the Houston Astros), three NBA teams (the Houston Rockets, the San Antonio Spurs, and the Dallas Mavericks), and one National Hockey League team (the Dallas Stars).
3
The Sabine River forms a natural border with Louisiana to the east.
The oldest rocks in Texas date from the Mesoproterozoic and are about 1,600 million years old.
Texians sided with the federalists against the current government and drove all Mexican soldiers out of East Texas.
FAMOUS TEXANS: The family home of this longtime Speaker of the House is now a museum in Bonham, Texas
Sam Rayburn
Geography  thumbnail|250px|Sam Rayburn Reservoir thumb|250px|Texas Hill Country thumb|250px|Big Bend National Park.
3
Weber (1992), p. 163.
New laws also called for the enforcement of customs duties angering both native Mexican citizens (Tejanos) and recent immigrants.
Texas descended into anarchy for two months between the surrender of the Army of Northern Virginia and the assumption of authority by Union General Gordon Granger.
U.S. CITIES: Before a new facility was built, Love Field was this Texas city's main airport
Dallas
Dallas–Fort Worth and Greater Houston are the fourth and fifth largest United States metropolitan statistical areas, respectively.
3
The boundary between New Spain and the United States was finally set at the Sabine River in 1819, at what is now the border between Texas and Louisiana.
Economy  thumb|Astronaut training at the Johnson Space Center in Houston.
The state is ranked forty-second in the percentage of residents who engage in regular exercise.
THERE'S A PLACE FOR US: George H.W. Bush has a home in Tanglewood, a neighborhood of this Texas city
Houston
Houston is the largest city in Texas and the fourth-largest in the United States, while San Antonio is the second largest in the state and seventh largest in the United States.
3
While the United States claimed that Texas's border stretched to the Rio Grande, Mexico claimed it was the Nueces River.
State government  thumb|250px|The Texas State Capitol at night.
Cattle is the state's most valuable agricultural product, and the state leads nationally in production of sheep and goat products.
JAPAN: Tokyo is served by two of these:  Narita & Haneda
Airports
Various islands governed by Tokyo have their own airports.
3
(National Diet Library Digital Archive) (digital page number 46)  + Population of Tokyo By area1Tokyo Special wards Tama Area Islands12.79 million 8.653 million 4.109 million 28,000 By age2Juveniles (age 0–14) Working (age 15–64) Retired (age 65+)1.461 million (11.8%) 8.546 million (69.3%) 2.332 million (18.9%)
Within Ōta, one of the 23 special wards, Haneda Airport offers domestic and international flights.
Because of this, Tokyo's urban landscape consists mainly of modern and contemporary architecture, and older buildings are scarce.
HITTING A HOMER: The king of Troy & husband to Hecuba
Priam
Frank Starke of the University of Tübingen recently demonstrated that the name of Priam, king of Troy at the time of the Trojan War, is connected to the Luwian compound Priimuua, which means "exceptionally courageous". "The certainty is growing that Wilusa/Troy belonged to the greater Luwian-speaking community," although it is not entirely clear whether Luwian was primarily the official language or in daily colloquial use.
3
From c. 410-399, Ilion was within the sphere of influence of the local dynasts at Lampsacus (Zenis, his wife Mania, and the usurper Meidias) who administered the region on behalf of the Persian satrap Pharnabazus.
Inschriften von Ilion 33 (Aristodikides), 34 (Metrodoros).
Subsequent to this, the Tawagalawa letter (CTH 181) was found to document an unnamed Hittite king's correspondence to the king of the Ahhiyawa, referring to an earlier "Wilusa episode" involving hostility on the part of the Ahhiyawa.
TOUGH STUFF: This northern Tanzania national park is twice the size of Yellowstone
Serengeti
On Tanzania's Serengeti plain, white-bearded wildebeest (Connochaetes taurinus mearnsi) and other bovids participate in a large-scale annual migration.
3
They subsequently migrated out of these regions across the rest of Tanzania between 2,300 and 1,700 years ago.
In the highlands, temperatures range between  during cold and hot seasons respectively.
Literature  Tanzania's literary culture is primarily oral.
ZANY FOR TANZANIA: In April 1964 this mainland region combined with Zanzibar to form Tanzania
Tanganyika
The mainland was governed as Tanganyika, with the Zanzibar Archipelago remaining a separate colonial jurisdiction.
3
Communications
Tanzanian witch doctors arrested over albino killing".
Languages  thumb|upright|left|A carved door with Arabic calligraphy in Zanzibar.
THE CIVIL WAR: Most of the battles in the west took place in Tennessee, most in the east in this state
Virginia
Tennessee is bordered by Kentucky and Virginia to the north, North Carolina to the east, Georgia, Alabama, and Mississippi to the south, and Arkansas and Missouri to the west.
3
Tennessee Encyclopedia of History and Culture, 2002.
Tennessee Encyclopedia of History and Culture, 2002.
Lieutenant Governor Ron Ramsey is the first Republican speaker of the state Senate in 140 years.
DEMOCRATS: This former Tennessee senator & current V.P. has been called "Prince Albert"
Al Gore
In the 2000 presidential election, Vice President Al Gore, a former Democratic U.S. Senator from Tennessee, failed to carry his home state, an unusual occurrence but indicative of strengthening Republican support.
3
Chattanooga and Knoxville, both in the eastern part of the state near the Great Smoky Mountains, each has approximately one-third of the population of Memphis or Nashville.
From 1972 to 1978, after the Supreme Court ruled (Furman v. Georgia) capital punishment unconstitutional, there were no further executions.
Lethal injection was approved by the legislature in 1998, though those who were sentenced to death prior to January 1, 1999 may request electrocution.
CELEBRITIES: Her latest exercise video is called "Her Lean Routine"; we don't know if Ted Turner uses it
Jane Fonda
thumb|right|Turner with Jane Fonda.
3
Additionally, in 2001, Turner co-founded the Nuclear Threat Initiative with U.S. Senator Sam Nunn (D-GA).
He was the largest private landowner in the United States until John C. Malone surpassed him in 2011.
In 2008, Turner wrote Call Me Ted, which documents his career and personal life.
TEMPERATURE: At 136 degrees F., the hottest place ever recorded on Earth was near Tripoli in this country in 1922
Libya
Tripoli (, ; Berber: Ṭrables) is the de jure capital city and the largest city of Libya.
2
Retrieved 18 February 2010  There is a project under construction which will finish by 2015.
Victory in Tripoli –
LAKES & RIVERS: This river flows from its source in Turkey to the Shatt Al Arab, where it unites with the Tigris
Euphrates
thumb|Batman River  The Tigris () is the eastern member of the two great rivers that define Mesopotamia, the other being the Euphrates.
3
Pliny: Natural History, VI, XXVI, 128-131  Baghdad, the capital of Iraq, stands on the banks of the Tigris.
Shallow-draft vessels can go as far as Baghdad, but rafts are needed for transport upstream to Mosul.
In 2014 a major breakthrough in developing consensus between multiple stakeholder representatives of Iraq and Turkey on a Plan of Action for promoting exchange and calibration of data and standards pertaining to Tigris river flows was achieved.
AFRICAN COUNTRIES: In 1999 Thabo Mbeki became this country's democratically elected president
South Africa
Thabo Mvuyelwa Mbeki (; born 18 June 1942) is a South African politician who served nine years as the second post-apartheid President of South Africa from 14 June 1999 to 24 September 2008.
3
Mbeki completed his Master's degree at Sussex University in May 1968.
With symbolic handshake and warm smiles at the Rainbow Towers hotel, in Harare, Mugabe and Tsvangirai signed the deal to end violent political crisis provides.
Anatomy of a catastrophe 11 February 2008, Mail & GuardianSergeant, Barry.
NEWSPAPERS & MAGAZINES: The Washington Times was founded in 1982 as a conservative alternative to this newspaper
The Washington Post
Moon asked Richard L. Rubenstein, a rabbi and college professor who had written on the Holocaust, to serve on the board of directors."Rabbi Joins the Board of Moonie Newspaper", The Palm Beach Post, May 21, 1978  At the time of founding of the Times Washington had only one major newspaper, the Washington Post.
3
The newspaper is owned by Sun Myung Moon, originally a native of North Korea and head of the Unification Church, whose ultra-right leanings make him a ready ally for Netanyahu.
Has Some Familiar Roots, New York Times, August 14, 2009Baquet of 'N.Y. Times' Apologizes For 'Washington Times' Flap, Editor & Publisher, August 17, 2009  On November 30, 2009 the New York Times reported that the Washington Times would no longer be receiving funds from the Unification Church and might have to cease publication or go to online publication only.
The move ended OAN’s relationship with The Washington Times.
POLITICS & SHOW BIZ: Artists like Gladys Knight have recorded the songs of this senior senator from Utah
Orrin Hatch
Both of Utah's U.S. Senators, Orrin Hatch and Mike Lee, are Republican.
3
Thousands of years before the arrival of European explorers, the Ancestral Puebloans and the Fremont people lived in what is now known as Utah.
It was created with the Compromise of 1850, and Fillmore, named after President Millard Fillmore, was designated the capital.
As of 2012, 62.2% of Utahns are counted as members of The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints.
GUNS & AMMO: (Sarah of the Clue Crew delivers the clue from a biathlon range at Soldier Hollow, Utah.)  The biathlon rifle's a straight-pull, bolt-action model that fires 5.6 millimeter rounds, or this small caliber
.22
County nameCounty seatYear founded2010 U.S. Census  Percent of totalArea% of stateBeaverBeaver18566,1620.22%3.2%Box ElderBrigham City185649,9751.81% 7.0%CacheLogan1856112,6564.08%1.4%CarbonPrice189421,4030.77%1.8%DaggettManila19189380.03%0.8%DavisFarmington1852306,47911.09%0.4%DuchesneDuchesne191518,6070.67%3.9%EmeryCastle Dale188010,9760.40%5.4%GarfieldPanguitch18824,6580.17%6.3%GrandMoab18909,5890.35%4.5%IronParowan185246,1631.67%4.0%JuabNephi185210,2460.37%4.1%KaneKanab18646,5770.24%4.9%MillardFillmore185212,5030.45%8.0%MorganMorgan18628,6690.31%0.7%PiuteJunction18651,4040.05%0.9%RichRandolph18682,2050.08%1.3%Salt LakeSalt Lake City18521,029,65537.25%0.9%San JuanMonticello188014,7460.53%9.5%SanpeteManti185227,8221.01%1.9%SevierRichfield186520,8020.75%2.3%SummitCoalville185436,3241.31%2.3%TooeleTooele185258,2182.11%8.4%UintahVernal188032,5881.18%5.5%UtahProvo1852 516,56418.69%2.4%WasatchHeber186223,5300.85%1.4%WashingtonSt.
3
Running down the middle of the northern third of the state is the Wasatch Range, which rises to heights of almost  above sea level.
In the northeastern section of the state, running east to west, are the Uinta Mountains, which rise to heights of over .
In 2011, 28.6% of Utah's population younger than the age of one were minorities, meaning that they had at least one parent who was not non-Hispanic white.
THE U.S. SENATE: AFTER HOURS: This Utah man & Senate Judiciary Committee member wrote songs for a 2003 "Christmas Eve" CD
Orrin Hatch
Both of Utah's U.S. Senators, Orrin Hatch and Mike Lee, are Republican.
3
The resulting conflict is known as the Utah War, nicknamed "Buchanan's Blunder" by the Mormon leaders.
One exception to this aridity is Snake Valley, which is (relatively) lush due to large springs and wetlands fed from groundwater derived from snow melt in the Snake Range, Deep Creek Range, and other tall mountains to the west of Snake Valley.
Utah is much more conservative than the United States as a whole, particularly on social issues.
ACRONYMBLE: A United Nations agency:WHO
World Health Organization
UN System agencies include the World Bank Group, the World Health Organization, the World Food Programme, UNESCO, and UNICEF.
3
A JOINT DECLARATION BY THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA, THE UNITED KINGDOM OF GREAT BRITAIN AND NORTHERN IRELAND, THE UNION OF SOVIET SOCIALIST REPUBLICS, CHINA, AUSTRALIA, BELGIUM, CANADA, COSTA RICA, CUBA, CZECHOSLOVAKIA, DOMINICAN REPUBLIC, EL SALVADOR, GREECE, GUATEMALA, HAITI, HONDURAS, INDIA, LUXEMBOURG, NETHERLANDS, NEW ZEALAND, NICARAGUA, NORWAY, PANAMA, POLAND, SOUTH AFRICA, YUGOSLAVIA  The Governments signatory hereto,  Having subscribed to a common program of purposes and principles embodied in the Joint Declaration of the President of the United States of America and the Prime Minister of Great Britain dated August 14, 1941, known as the Atlantic Charter,  Being convinced that complete victory over their enemies is essential to defend life, liberty, independence and religious freedom, and to preserve human rights and justice in their own lands as well as in other lands, and that they are now engaged in a common struggle against savage and brutal forces seeking to subjugate the world,  DECLARE:  (1) Each Government pledges itself to employ its full resources, military or economic, against those members of the Tripartite Pact and its adherents with which such government is at war.
The UN has been involved with arms-limitation treaties, such as the Outer Space Treaty (1967), the Treaty on the Non-Proliferation of Nuclear Weapons (1968), the Seabed Arms Control Treaty (1971), the Biological Weapons Convention (1972), the Chemical Weapons Convention (1992), and the Ottawa Treaty (1997), which prohibits landmines.
For Dreyfus, see "Don't be lynch mob, lawyers urge U.N.."
A VIRGIL VIGIL: Virgil served as a tour guide for this poet in "The Divine Comedy"
Dante
Virgil's work has had wide and deep influence on Western literature, most notably Dante's Divine Comedy, in which Virgil appears as Dante's guide through hell and purgatory.
3
The four books of the Georgics focus respectively on raising crops and trees (1 and 2), livestock and horses (3), and beekeeping and the qualities of bees (4).
In this story Virgil became enamoured of a beautiful woman, sometimes described as the emperor's daughter or mistress and called Lucretia.
References  Further reading  Buckham, Philip Wentworth; Spence, Joseph; Holdsworth, Edward; Warburton, William; Jortin, John.
THE COURAGE TO "B": Despite the democratic ideals of Freemasonry, this member declared himself dictator of Venezuela in 1813
Bolivar
Venezuela ( ; ), officially the Bolivarian Republic of Venezuela (), is a federal republic located on the northern coast of South America.
2
Some 38% of the over 21,000 plant species known from Venezuela are unique to the country.
This includes A New Era (UNT) together with allied parties Project Venezuela, Justice First, Movement for Socialism (MAS) and others.
"CAN" OPENER: "Optimism" is the alternate title of this Voltaire work
Candide
I (Candide) [1759]   Though deeply committed to the Marquise, Voltaire by 1744 found life at the château confining.
3
You will find everywhere barbarians obstinate.
This is no matter of faith, but of reason."Voltaire.
Napoleon commented that till he was sixteen he "would have fought for Rousseau against the friends of Voltaire, today it is the opposite...
HISTORIC TWITS: Vidkun Quisling, now a name synonymous with traitor, was made this country's prime minister by the Nazis
Norway
Vidkun Abraham Lauritz Jonssøn Quisling (; 18 July 1887 – 24 October 1945) was a Norwegian military officer and politician, mostly known as the nominal head of government of Norway after the country was occupied by Nazi Germany during World War II.  Quisling first came to international prominence as a close collaborator of Fridtjof Nansen, organizing humanitarian relief during the Russian famine of 1921 in Ukraine.
2
thumb|alt=A black and white image of a group of men, most of whom are dressed in the uniforms of military officers.
One who was quisling was in the act of committing treason..
THE FRENCH & INDIAN WARS: In 1753, concerned over French fort-building in the Ohio Valley, Virginia sent this 21-year-old to check things out
George Washington
Stories about historic figures, such as those surrounding Pocahontas and John Smith, George Washington's childhood, or the plantation elite in the slave society of the antebellum period, have also created potent myths of state history, and have served as rationales for Virginia's ideology.
3
The interaction of these elements with the state's topography creates distinct microclimates in the Shenandoah Valley, the mountainous southwest, and the coastal plains.
This includes an increase from net migration of 381,969 people into the Commonwealth since the 2010 census.
Law and government  thumb|The Virginia State Capitol, designed by Thomas Jefferson and begun by Governor Patrick Henry in 1785, is home to the Virginia General Assembly.|alt=All white Neoclassical building with pediment and six columns rises on a grassy hill with a large American elm tree in the left foreground.
EARLY AMERICAN HISTORY: On May 29, 1765 this patriot made a speech attacking the Stamp Act in Virginia's House of Burgesses
Patrick Henry
Statehood thumb|upright|1851 painting of Patrick Henry's speech before the House of Burgesses on the Virginia Resolves against the Stamp Act of 1765|alt=Upper-class middle-aged man dressed in a bright red cloak speaks before an assembly of other angry men.
2
Tangible personal property also is taxed at the local level and is based on a percentage or percentages of original cost.
Although the Washington Metropolitan Area, which includes Northern Virginia, has the second worst traffic in the nation, Virginia as a whole has the 21st-lowest congestion and the average commute time is 26.9 minutes.
AN "A" IN AMERICAN HISTORY: This 3-word Virginia village, site of a surrender, was made a National Historic Park in 1954
Appomattox Court House
During the war, more battles were fought in Virginia than anywhere else, including Bull Run, the Seven Days Battles, Chancellorsville, and the concluding Battle of Appomattox Court House.
3
The Barter Theatre, designated the State Theatre of Virginia, in Abingdon won the first ever Regional Theatre Tony Award in 1948, while the Signature Theatre in Arlington won it in 2009.
Fairfax County also sponsors Celebrate Fairfax! with popular and traditional music performances.
Virginia is the most populous U.S. state without a major professional sports league franchise.
THE SWEET 1600s: Last name of Nathaniel, who fostered a 1676 rebellion against Virginia governor Berkeley's Indian policies
Bacon
Tensions and the geographic differences between the working and ruling classes led to Bacon's Rebellion in 1676, by which time current and former indentured servants made up as much as 80% of the population.
3
The Atlantic coast regions are host to flora commonly associated with the South Atlantic pine forests and lower Southeast Coastal Plain maritime flora, the latter found primarily in southeastern Virginia.
In addition to agriculture, slave labor was increasingly used in mining, shipbuilding and other industries.
Fine and performing arts  thumb|The Meadow Pavilion is one of the theaters at Wolf Trap National Park for the Performing Arts.|alt=A small, boxy, wooden stage with a trapezoidal overhang stands in the center of meadow.
VERMONT: Let's not keep silent about the fact that this president was born in Plymouth Notch, Vermont in 1872
Calvin Coolidge
walleye pike State fossil – white whale (beluga whale) State bird - hermit thrush  Notable Vermonters thumb|Vermont native Calvin Coolidge as he appears at the National Portrait Gallery in Washington, D.C.    Vermont is the birthplace of former U.S. Presidents Chester A. Arthur and Calvin Coolidge.
3
Much of the state, in particular the Green Mountains, is covered by the conifers and northern hardwoods of the New England-Acadian forests.
Windsor County: Ludlow (in Windsor County) is served by the LMTS (Ludlow Municipal Transit System).
milk State pie –
VERMONT: In 1974 he became Vermont's first Democrat elected to the U.S. Senate; he's still there
Patrick Leahy
Vermont's two Senators are Democrat Patrick Leahy, the longest-serving member of the Senate, and independent Bernie Sanders.
3
Largest towns
Abolitionist Thaddeus Stevens developed as a national leader and later promoted Radical Republican goals after the American Civil War.
The buyer pays the use tax when the seller fails to collect the sales tax or the items are purchased from a source where no tax is collected.
WORKS OF THE BARD: Shylock asks Bassanio, "What news on" this commercial heart of Venice?
the Rialto
p.83  Fashion and shopping thumb|upright|Luxury shops and boutiques along the Rialto Bridge.
3
Venice remained closely associated with Constantinople, being twice granted trading privileges in the Eastern Roman Empire, through the so-called Golden Bulls or "chrysobulls" in return for aiding the Eastern Empire to resist Norman and Turkish incursions.
Each sestiere has its own house numbering system.
Mestre is the center and the most populated urban area of the mainland of Venice.
MOVIES IN BLACK & WHITE: This 1979 Woody Allen film featured Tisa Farrow, Mia's sister
Manhattan
Some best-known of his over 40 films are Annie Hall (1977), Manhattan (1979), and Hannah and Her Sisters (1986), although he considers Stardust Memories (1980), The Purple Rose of Cairo (1985), and Match Point (2005) to be his best films.
3
February 18, 2004.
Retrieved February 21, 2006.
Mia Farrow
NON-NATIVE AMERICANS: This Korean-born woman married Woody Allen in December 1997
Soon-Yi Previn
In 1997, rumors of Allen returning to the theatre to write a starring role for his wife Soon-Yi Previn turned out to be false.
3
His stuff was dazzling."
During an interview in 2013, Keaton stated that she "fell in love with him right away," adding, "I wanted to be his girlfriend so I did something about it.""Actress Diane Keaton Talks About Woody Allen, Her Career and Personal Life", Netquake, June 2, 2013 After co-starring alongside Allen in the subsequent film version of Play It
CBS News.
EXPLOSIVES: (Jimmy of the Clue Crew reports from an explosive test site at the New Mexico Institute of Mining & Technology.) Explosives deal effectively with rock; that's why this industry is the no. 1 U.S. civilian user of them, with West Virginia among the top consuming states
coal mining
The state is noted for its mountains and rolling hills, its historically significant logging and coal mining industries, and its political and labor history.
3
The diary kept by the surveyor indicates that there were already many squatters, largely of German origin, along the South Branch Potomac River.
Slaves under the age of 12 years were not taxed and slaves over that age were taxed at only $300, a fraction of their true value.
This rate is used by all county boards of education statewide.
WARSAW: A heroic uprising of April 1943 is named for this Jewish section of Warsaw
the Ghetto
When the order came to annihilate the ghetto as part of Hitler's "Final Solution" on 19 April 1943, Jewish fighters launched the Warsaw Ghetto Uprising.
3
Bielany Forest, located within the borders of Warsaw, is the remaining part of the Masovian Primeval Forest.
Sound’
The origin of the legendary figure is not fully known.
HISTORIC PEOPLE: During World War II, the Allies referred to him as "The Paperhanger"
Adolf Hitler
thumb|left|Adolf Hitler at a German National Socialist political rally in Weimar, October 1930  Adolf Hitler, after an unsuccessful attempt to overthrow the German government in 1923, eventually became the Chancellor of Germany in 1933.
3
gradually stalled,.. and both states began preparations for war..
The former conference determined the post-war return of Japanese territory,. while the latter included agreement that the Western Allies would invade Europe in 1944 and that the Soviet Union would declare war on Japan within three months of Germany's defeat..  left|thumb|Ruins of the Benedictine monastery, during the Battle of Monte Cassino; Italian Campaign, May 1944  From November 1943, during the seven-week Battle of Changde, the Chinese forced Japan to fight a costly war of attrition, while awaiting Allied relief...
thumb|200px|left|A V-2 rocket launched from a fixed site in Peenemünde, 1943  Land warfare changed from the static front lines of World War I to increased mobility and combined arms.
IRISH HISTORY: Despite American pressure, Ireland maintained this stance during World War II
neutrality
The United States, concerned with events in Europe and Asia, passed the Neutrality Act in August of the same year..
3
" See .. The Nationalists won the civil war in April 1939; Franco, now dictator, bargained with both sides during the Second World War, but never concluded any major agreements.
About 100,000 Polish military personnel were evacuated to Romania and the Baltic countries; many of these soldiers later fought against the Germans in other theatres of the war..
The second Japanese invasion of China aimed to destroy China's main fighting forces, secure railways between Japanese-held territory and capture Allied airfields..
STATE BORDERS: If you cross the St. Croix River from Wisconsin, you'll be in this state to the west
Minnesota
It is bordered by Minnesota to the west, Iowa to the southwest, Illinois to the south, Lake Michigan to the east, Michigan to the northeast, and Lake Superior to the north.
3
Etymology The word Wisconsin originates from the name given to the Wisconsin River by one of the Algonquian-speaking Native American groups living in the region at the time of European contact.
Toward the end of this period, Wisconsin was the heartland of the "Effigy Mound culture", which built thousands of animal-shaped mounds across the landscape.
The Badger men's basketball team won the national title in 1941 and made trips to college basketball's Final Four in 2000, 2014 and 2015.
THE PEACE OF WESTPHALIA: What was once the province of Westphalia is now part of 3 states in this country
Germany
thumb|220px|right|Westphalia within the federal state of North Rhine-Westphalia bordering on Northern Rhineland in the west and Lippe in the northeast  Westphalia or Westfalia (;  , ) is a region in Germany, centred on the cities of Arnsberg, Bielefeld, Dortmund and Münster.
3
In principle the term "Westphalia" contrasts with the much less used term "Eastphalia", which roughly covers the southeastern part of the present-day state of Lower Saxony, eastern Saxony-Anhalt and northern Thuringia.
Early modern era
It was founded by Napoleon and was a French vassal state.
THE FABULOUS '50s: He spent the entire decade as chancellor of West Germany
Konrad Adenauer
The first chancellor Konrad Adenauer, who remained in office until 1963, had worked for a full alignment with the West rather than neutrality.
3
The city of Bonn was its  capital city (Berlin was symbolically named the  capital city in the West German Basic Law).
In the early sixties, the rate of economic growth slowed down significantly.
The SPD fell to 37%; long-time SPD Chairman Brandt subsequently resigned in April 1987 and was succeeded by Hans-Jochen Vogel.
POETS & POETRY: William Blake asked of this wild animal, "Did he who made the lamb make thee?"
The Tyger
Modern British composer John Tavener set several of Blake's poems, including The Lamb (as the 1982 work "The Lamb") and The Tyger.
3
to write upon a scroll that seems to project from his own head.
Freedom Press.
Victor N. Paananen (1996).
MEALTIME LIT: We hope William S. Burroughs was clothed while writing this tale of a trip to the "interzone"
Naked Lunch
Finding success with his confessional first novel, Junkie (1953), Burroughs is perhaps best known for his third novel Naked Lunch (1959), a highly controversial work that underwent a court case under the U.S. sodomy laws.
3
Meanwhile, Vollmer's addiction led to a temporary psychosis which resulted in her admission to  Bellevue Hospital, which endangered the custody of her child.
London: J. Murray, 1941.
Wills, David S. Scientologist!
IT'S ALL POLITICALLY RELATIVE: About being a distant cousin of this politician from Wyoming, Barack Obama said, "That's a heartbreak"
Dick Cheney
Former Vice President Dick Cheney is a Wyoming resident and represented the state in Congress from 1979 to 1989.
3
Wyoming  is a state in the mountain region of the Western United States.
In the north central are the Big Horn Mountains; in the northeast, the Black Hills; and in the southern region the Laramie, Snowy and Sierra Madre ranges.
Judicial system Wyoming's highest court is the Supreme Court of Wyoming, with five justices presiding over appeals from the state's lower courts.
NOTABLE WOMEN: On May 3, 1933 this first woman governor of Wyoming became the first woman director of the U.S. Mint
Nellie Tayloe Ross
Also, in 1924, Wyoming became the first state to elect a female governor, Nellie Tayloe Ross, who took office in January 1925.
3
The lower areas in the North and on the eastern plains typically average around , making the climate there semi-arid.
Immigration resulted in a net increase of 2,264 people, and migration within the country produced a net increase of 1,771 people.
Today the Wind River Indian Reservation is jointly owned, with each tribe having a 50% interest in the land, water, and other natural resources.
WOMEN IN SONG: In "West Side Story", Tony's smitten because "I've just met a girl named" this
Maria
guidetomusicaltheatre.com, accessed August 18, 2011</ref> The young protagonist, Tony, a former member of the Jets and best friend of the gang leader, Riff, falls in love with Maria, the sister of Bernardo, the leader of the Sharks.
2
Tony initially refuses, but Riff wins him over.
.In Town".
WHAT A GODDESS: Associated with Juno, she's Zeus' sister-wife
Hera
In most traditions, he is married to Hera, by whom he is usually said to have fathered Ares, Hebe, and Hephaestus.
3
Zeus is the child of Cronus and Rhea, the youngest of his siblings to be born, though sometimes reckoned the eldest as the others required disgorging from Cronus's stomach.
(British Museum, A Catalogue of Sculpture in the Department of Greek and Roman Antiquities, 1904).
Zeus as keeper of oaths.
MYTHOLOGICAL MISTAKES: Anchises bragged about romancing this Greek love goddess, so Zeus struck him with lightning
Aphrodite
At the oracle of Dodona, his consort was said to be Dione, by whom the Iliad states that he fathered Aphrodite.
3
, I.503 & 533.
Argus  Pelasgus Othreis MeliteusPandoraGraecus Latinus Phthia (daughter of Phoroneus) Achaeus (possibly)
99Hyginus, Poetical Astronomy ii.
MYTHOLOGY: After Zeus turned her to stone, she still wept over the loss of her children
Niobe
Lamia (daughter of Poseidon) Libyan Sibyl Laodamia Sarpedon Leda Pollux  Helen of Troy5 Maera Locrus Niobe
3
Since Cronus ruled over the Earth, the heavens and the sea, she hid him by dangling him on a rope from a tree so he was suspended between earth, sea and sky and thus, invisible to his father.
Pointed out by Bernard Clive Dietrich, The Origins of Greek Religion (de Gruyter)
In some cases, cities were not entirely sure whether the daimon to whom they sacrificed was a hero or an underground Zeus.
AFRICANA: In 2000 Durban in this country hosted the 13th International AIDS Conference & the first held on the continent
South Africa
June 17 – Ismail Mahomed, South African and Namibian Chief Justice (b. 1931)  June 19 – Noboru Takeshita, former Prime Minister of Japan (b. 1924)  June 21 – Alan Hovhaness, American composer (b. 1911)  June 24 –
3
CNN.com –
March 4 –
Adam Petty, American NASCAR driver (b. 1980)
THE OLYMPICS: In 2000 marathon winner Naoko Takahashi became the first woman from this country to win a gold in track & field
Japan
The PlayStation 2 is released in Japan.
3
July 10  In southern Nigeria, a leaking petroleum pipeline explodes, killing about 250 villagers who were scavenging gasoline.
October 3 – Benjamin Orr, American singer-songwriter, guitarist and singer for the band The Cars (b. 1947)  October 4 –
Gao Xingjian  Peace – Kim Dae-jung  Physics –
RATED "G": He got more popular votes for president than George W. Bush in 2000 but lost the election
Al Gore
The Democratic National Convention in Los Angeles nominates U.S. Vice President Al Gore for President and Senator Joe Lieberman for Vice President.
3
March 27 –
An American anti-globalization protest is held in Washington, D.C.  April 17 – Tuanku Syed Sirajuddin becomes Raja of Perlis.
October 26 – Pakistani authorities announce that their police have found an apparently ancient mummy of a Persian Princess in the province of Balochistan.
SOMEDAY MY PRINCE WILL COME: In 2000 Peter Russell wrote the first new bio in over a century of this prince known as "the Navigator"
Henry
Henry McLeish becomes First Minister of Scotland.
3
However, by the end of 1999, many companies had already converted to new, or upgraded, existing software.
August 12 –
Edward Gorey, American writer and illustrator (b. 1925)  April 25 – David Merrick, American stage producer (b. 1911)  April 29 – Phạm Văn Đồng, Vietnamese politician, Prime Minister of Vietnam (b. 1906)  May 100px|thumbnail|Douglas Fairbanks, Jr. thumb|100px|Keizō Obuchi  May 1  Steve Reeves, American actor and bodybuilder (b. 1926)  Jukka Tapanimäki, Finnish game programmer (b. 1961)  May 7 –
PEOPLE'S REPUBLICS: In 1977 its ruling colonel changed it from a republic into a Socialist People's Arab Jamahiriyah
Libya
The Libyan–Egyptian War, sparked by a Libyan raid on Sallum, begins.
3
Prog 1 of 2000 AD is launched (issue dated 26 February 1977).
Kumar Sangakkara, Sri Lankan cricketer  October 28 – Jonas Rasmussen, Danish badminton player  October 29 – Brendan Fehr, Canadian actor  October 30 – Charmian Faulkner, missing Australian toddler   November  thumb|right|120px|Maggie Gyllenhaal thumb|right|120px|Steve Aoki  November 1
Tom Pryce, British Formula race car driver (b. 1949)  March 8 – Henry Hull, American actor (b. 1890)  March 10  E. Power Biggs, British-born American organist (b. 1906)  William G. James, Australian pianist and composer (b. 1892)  Léonce-Henri Burel,  French cinematographer (b. 1892)  March 11 –
POP MUSIC: She was the woman in the title of the 1977 album "Allman And Woman: Two The Hard Way"
Cher
October 14  Adam Pengilly, British skeleton racer  Bianca Beauchamp, Canadian latex model  Kelly Schumacher, American basketball and volleyball player  October 15 –
3
The small market town of Hay-on-Wye declares independence from the UK, as a publicity stunt.
After campaigning by Anita Bryant and her anti-gay "Save Our Children" crusade, Miami-Dade County, Florida voters overwhelmingly vote to repeal the county's "gay rights" ordinance.
Carl Gustav von Rosen, Swedish pilot (b. 1909)  July 15 – Konstantin Fedin, Russian writer (b. 1892)  July 19 – Karl Ristikivi, Estonian writer (b. 1912)  July 20   Carter DeHaven, American actor (b. 1886)  Grenfell Price, Australian geographer, historian and educationist (b. 1892)  July 23 – Arsenio Erico, Paraguayan footballer (b. 1915)  July 26 –
THE NEW YORK TIMES SCIENCE TIMES: 28 years after its 1977 launch, it passed through a sort of space sound barrier called the termination shock
Voyager
August 20 – Voyager program: The United States launches the Voyager 2 spacecraft.
3
The Centre Georges Pompidou is officially opened by French President Valéry Giscard d'Estaing.
Supertanker Pierre Guillaumat is launched at Saint-Nazaire; she is the all-time world's largest ship (by deadweight tonnage and length overall) at launch.
October 27 – British punk band Sex Pistols release Never Mind the Bollocks, Here's the Sex Pistols on the Virgin Records label.
MIT DEN BEATLES: One of 2 official Beatles German-language releases, "Komm, gib mir deine Hand" was the lads' take on this 1964 smash
"I Want To Hold Your Hand"
U.S. President Lyndon B. Johnson's War on Poverty  February   February 1 – The Beatles vault to the #1 spot on the U.S. singles charts for the first time, with "I Want to Hold Your Hand", starting the British Invasion in America.
3
Some 400–1,000 students march through Times Square, New York and another 700 in San Francisco, in the first major student demonstration against the Vietnam War.
At the same event, the AC Cobra wins its class in its second Le Mans appearance.
Race riots begin in Singapore between ethnic Chinese and Malays.
FILM FACTS: Dick Van Dyke played a dancing chimney sweep & an elderly banker in this 1964 Disney classic
Mary Poppins
August 27 – Walt Disney's Mary Poppins has its world premiere in Los Angeles.
2
July 8 – U.S. military personnel announce that U.S. casualties in Vietnam have risen to 1,387, including 399 dead and 17 MIA.  July 10 –
December 24 – Bombing of the Brinks Hotel in Saigon.
NOTABLE NAMES: He finally "faded away" at age 84 in 1964:
Douglas MacArthur
Peter Lorre, Hungarian-born actor (b. 1904)  April thumb|120px|Douglas MacArthur  April 5 – Douglas MacArthur, U.S. Army general, Supreme Allied Commander in Japan after World War II (b. 1880)  April 13 – Veit Harlan, German film director (b. 1899)  April 14 – Rachel Carson, American biologist and environmental writer (b. 1907)  April 18 – Ben Hecht, American screenwriter (b. 1894)  April 20 - Joseph-Alphida Crete, Canadian Politician (b. 1890)  April 24 – Gerhard Domagk, German bacteriologist, recipient of the Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine (declined) (b. 1895)  April 26 – E. J. Pratt, Canadian poet (b. 1882)  April 29 –
3
January 10 –
October 12 – The Soviet Union launches Voskhod 1 into Earth orbit as the first spacecraft with a multi-person crew and the first flight without space suits.
July 13 – Stephen Galatti, Director of AFS, American Field Service (b. 1888)  July 16 –
MOVIE LAST LINES: In this 1964 film Rex Harrison barks, "Eliza, where the devil are my slippers?"
My Fair Lady
It will go on to become Disney's biggest moneymaker, and winner of 5 Academy Awards, including a Best Actress award for Julie Andrews, who accepted the part after she was passed over by Jack L. Warner for the leading role of Eliza Doolittle in the film version of My Fair Lady.
3
February 29 –
Ranger program: Ranger 7 sends back the first close-up photographs of the Moon (images are 1,000 times clearer than anything ever seen from Earth-bound telescopes).
December 11  Sam Cooke, African-American singer and songwriter was shot and killed at a motel in Los Angeles, California (b. 1931)  December 11 – Che Guevara addresses the U.N. General Assembly.
BRANDED: In 2001 the oldest known pair of this company's jeans sold for more than $46,000 on eBay
Levi
A bomb explodes at BBC Television Centre in London, UK.  March 23   The deorbit of Russian space station Mir is carried out near Nadi, Fiji, with Mir falling into the Pacific Ocean.
3
The iPod is first introduced by Apple.
No other tropical cyclone in recorded history has come as close to the equator.
Giovanni Leone, former Prime Minister of Italy (b. 1908)  November 10 –
CANADIAN GEOGRAPHY, EH?: In 1999 this territory split from the Northwest Territories
Nunavut
April  April 1 – Nunavut, an Inuit homeland, is created from the eastern portion of the Northwest Territories to become Canada's third territory.
3
The 921 earthquake, also known as the Jiji earthquake (magnitude 7.6 on the Richter scale), kills about 2,400 people in Taiwan.
The Megadeth song "Set the World Afire", from their album So Far,
The flashback scenes of Ben aged 11 in Ben 10:
"V"ARIETY: 16th century Flemish "Father of Modern Anatomy"
Vesalius
Andreas Vesalius, anatomist, physician, and author of one of the most influential books on human anatomy, De humani corporis fabrica (On the Workings of the Human Body).(1514–1564) Wanli Emperor, Emperor of China during the Ming Dynasty, aided Korea in the Imjin War, (1563 – 1620)
3
1547: Edward VI becomes King of England and Ireland on 28 January and is crowned on 20 February at the age of 9.
Mary I of England.
Mary, Queen of Scots, First female head of the House of Stuart (1542 – 1587).
TANK ARRAY: In this 1950s war the People's Army at first outgunned the Americans with Soviet-made T-34 tanks
the Korean War
The conflicts included the Korean War in the beginnings of the decade and the beginning of the Space Race with the launch of Sputnik 1.
3
Before the dogmatic definition, in Deiparae Virginis Mariae Pope Pius XII sought the opinion of Catholic Bishops and a large number of them pointed to the Book of Genesis (3:15) as scriptural support for the dogma.
The invention of the modern Solar cell.
Sales of TV sets rose tremendously in the 1950s and by 1950 4.4 million families in America had a television set.
AIR APPARENT: Thousands died in 1952 in a notorious smoggy event in this European capital
London
February 7 – Elizabeth II is proclaimed Queen of the United Kingdom at St James's Palace, London, England.
3
March 15–16 – 73 inches (1,870 mm) of rain falls in Cilaos, Réunion, the most rainfall in one day up to that time.
August  August 5 – The Treaty of Taipei between Japan and the Republic of China goes into effect, to officially end the Second Sino-Japanese War.
The Jordanian Parliament forces King Talal of Jordan to abdicate due to mental illness; he is succeeded by his son King Hussein.
ROBOT MANIA: In this 1984 film a cyborg from the future travels back in time to kill Sarah Connor
The Terminator
The Terminator takes place in May of this year.
3
Western military experts called it the worst naval disaster the Soviet Navy has suffered since WWII.  May 14 –
November 25  An East Rail train derails between Sheung Shui and Fanling stations, Hong Kong.
Do They Know It's Christmas?
YOU MUST BE FROM DALLAS: Born in Dallas in 1947, he hit the pop music charts with & like a "Bat Out Of Hell"
Meat Loaf
Cindy Williams, American actress  August 23 – Willy Russell, British playwright  August 24 – Roger De Vlaeminck, Belgian cyclist  August 26 – Emiliano Díez, Cuban actor  August 27 – Barbara Bach, American actress   August 28 – Liza Wang, Hong Kong actress, Otis Surratt  August 29  George Costigan, British actor and screenwriter   Temple Grandin, American animal welfare and autism expert  August 30 – Allan Rock, Canadian politician and diplomat  August 31  Ramón Castellano de Torres, Spanish painter  Somchai Wongsawat, Thai 26th Prime Minister  September thumb|120px|Sam Neill thumb|120px|Stephen King thumb|120px|Meat Loaf  September 1
3
He purchased the 1946 automobile from the U.S. Army Post Exchange in Frankfurt, Germany, while serving in the U.S. Army.
The United Nations Conference on Trade and Employment begins in Havana, Cuba.
Vivienne Haigh-Wood Eliot, English writer (b. 1888)  January 23 Pierre Bonnard, French painter (b. 1867)  Roy Geiger, American general (b. 1885)  January 25 –
COMPOSERS: He died at 35 in 1791 & was buried in a multiple grave--standard at the time in Vienna for a person of his standing
Mozart
September 6 – Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart's opera seria La clemenza di Tito premières at the Estates Theatre in Prague to mark the coronation of Leopold II as King of Bohemia.
3
The United States opens diplomatic relations with Portugal.
The Priestley Riots against Dissenters break out in Birmingham, England.
August 26 – John Fitch is granted a patent for the steamboat in the United States.
EUROPEAN LANDMARKS: Completed in 1791, it was reopened in 1989 after being closed for 28 years
the Brandenburg Gate
August 6 – The Brandenburg Gate in Berlin is finished.
3
March 2 –
December 15 – Ratification by the states of the first ten amendments to the United States Constitution is completed, creating the United States Bill of Rights.
Charles Babbage, British mathematician and inventor (d. 1871)   Deaths  thumb|110px|right|Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart  January 11 –
IT COMES WITH THE TERRITORY: The price paid for these Caribbean islands in 1917 was $25 million, over 3 times what Alaska cost
Virgin Islands
The United States takes possession of the Danish West Indies, which become the US Virgin Islands, after paying $25 million to Denmark.
3
The Parliament of Finland passes another "Sovereignty Act", dissolving Russian sovereignty over Finland and effectively declaring Finland independent.
November 20  WWI: Battle of Cambrai:
Richard Olney, American politician (b. 1835)
THE WINTER PALACE: In 1917 Russia's provisional govt. met in the Winter Palace's Malachite Room after this parliament was dissolved
the Duma
The Duma declares a Provisional Government.
3
June   June 1 – French Army Mutinies: A French infantry regiment seizes Missy-aux-Bois and declares an anti-war military government.
The first Pulitzer Prizes are awarded: Laura E. Richards, Maud Howe Elliott and Florence Hall receive the first Pulitzer for a biography (for Julia Ward Howe).
The Silent Parade is organized by the NAACP in New York City to protest the East St. Louis riot of July 2, as well as lynchings in Tennessee and Texas.
COMPUTER MILESTONES: 1993: this company introduces its Pentium processor
Intel
January 25  Mir Aimal Kasi fires a rifle and kills two employees outside Central Intelligence Agency headquarters in Langley, Virginia.
3
February 17 –
The Russian constitutional crisis culminates with Russian military and security forces clearing the White House of Russia Parliament building by force, quashing a mass uprising against President Boris Yeltsin.
Billy Eckstine, American musician (b. 1914)
THE HISTORY CHANNEL: The channel's website tells us that this country's King Carlos was assassinated on Feb. 1 in 1908
Portugal
I of Portugal and Infante Luis Filipe are shot dead in Lisbon.
3
It is restored the following day.
Michael E. DeBakey, American surgeon and medical researcher (d. 2008)  September 10 – Raymond Scott, American composer, bandleader, electronic music pioneer (d. 1994)  September 13 – Mae Questel, American actress (d. 1998)  September 15 – Miško Kranjec, Slovenian writer (d. 1983)  September 18 – Victor Ambartsumian, Soviet Armenian scientist (d. 1996)  September 19 –
Nozu Michitsura, Japanese general (b. 1840)  October 26 –
OLYMPIC HISTORY: Asserting "This flag dips to no earthly king", the U.S. delegation refused to do so at this city's Olympics in 1908
London
January 24 – Start of publication of Robert Baden-Powell's Scouting for Boys in London.
3
The first around-the-world car race, the 1908 New York to Paris Race, begins.
thumb|110px|Lyndon Johnson  July 1 – Estée Lauder, American cosmetics entrepreneur (d. 2004)  July 8 – Nelson Rockefeller, American businessman, philanthropist, public servant, and politician (d. 1979)  July 12 – Milton Berle, American comedian (d. 2002)  July 16 – Gerd Achgelis, German aviator, test pilot, and pioneer in the development of helicopters (d. 1991)  July 23 –
Klas Pontus Arnoldson, Fredrik Bajer
THAT'S SO '90s: His 1997 meeting with Sinn Fein leader Gerry Adams was the first for a British P.M. & an IRA leader in 76 years
Tony Blair
The Labour Party of the United Kingdom returns to power for the first time in 18 years, with Tony Blair becoming Prime Minister, in a landslide majority in the 1997 general election.
3
August 3 –
Iraq disarmament crisis: An Iraqi military officer attacks an UNSCOM weapons inspector on board an UNSCOM helicopter, while the inspector attempts to take photographs of unauthorized movement of Iraqi vehicles inside a site designated for inspection.
International Campaign to Ban Landmines and Jody Williams  Physics –
MUSIC OF THE '90s: In 1997 songwriter Bill Mack & singer LeAnn Rimes won Grammys for this "colorful" song
Blue
May 11 – IBM's Deep Blue defeats Garry Kasparov in the last game of the rematch, the first time a computer beats a chess World champion in a match.
3
January 20 – U.S. President Bill Clinton is inaugurated for his second term.
May 12 –
Melissa Juratowitch, Australian model  January 30  Alexandra Rodriguez Long, Spanish pair skater  Shim Suk-hee, South Korean speed skater  January 31  Lane Sutton, American entrepreneur  Eva Sayer, English actress  February  thumb|right|150px|Chloë Grace Moretz thumb|right|150px|Isabelle Fuhrman  February 2 – Jaheel Hyde, Jamaican sprinter  February 3 – Wang Wenting, Chinese pair skater  February 5  Patrick Roberts, English footballer  Nicolas Roy, Canadian ice hockey player  February 7  Jessica Waterhouse, Australian footballer  Anhelina Kalinina, Ukrainian tennis player  February 8  Kathryn Newton, American actress  Venus Palermo, English model  February 9 –
SPANS: The Confederation Bridge, opened in 1997, is the first highway link to this Canadian island province
Prince Edward Island
The 13-kilometer Confederation Bridge, the world's longest bridge spanning ice-covered waters, opens between Prince Edward Island and New Brunswick, Canada.
3
April 23 – 42 villagers are killed in the Omaria massacre in Algeria.
July 5 –
William Hickey, American actor (b. 1927)   July  thumb|120px|Robert Mitchum thumb|120px|James Stewart thumb|120px|Gianni Versace  July 1  Robert Mitchum, American actor (b. 1917)  Charles Werner, American cartoonist (b. 1909)  July 2 – James Stewart, American actor (b. 1908)  July 4  Charles Kuralt, American television reporter (b. 1934)  John Zachary Young, British biologist (b. 1907)  July 7 – Royston Tickner, English actor (b. 1922)  July 13 – Alexandra Danilova, Russian dancer (b. 1903)  July 14 –
COLLEGE ATHLETICS: In 1997 the Fighting Sioux of the Univ. of this "North" state won their 6th NCAA hockey title
North Dakota
The Red River of the North breaks through dikes and floods Grand Forks, North Dakota, and East Grand Forks, Minnesota, causing US$2 billion in damage.
3
March 6  Pablo Picasso's Tête de Femme is stolen from a London gallery (recovered a week later).
October 2 – British scientists Moira Bruce and John Collinge, with their colleagues, independently show that the new variant form of the Creutzfeldt–Jakob disease is the same disease as Bovine spongiform encephalopathy.
A Fairfax, Virginia jury finds Mir Aimal Kasi guilty of murdering 2 CIA employees in 1993.
BIG SCREEN BUNNIES: If you were in this 1951 Disney film you'd have had a chance to chase a rabbit along with a little girl
Alice in Wonderland
July 26 – Walt Disney's 13th animated film, Alice in Wonderland, premieres in London, United Kingdom.
3
February 4–February 8 – Surgeons remove an ovarian cyst from Gertrude Levandowski in a 96-hour long operation in Chicago.
The first volunteer-run passenger trains run on Talyllyn Railway, Wales.
Carl Gustaf Emil Mannerheim, President of Finland (b. 1867)  January 29 – Frank Tarrant, Australian cricketer (b. 1880)  January 30 – Ferdinand Porsche, German auto engineer (b. 1875)  February thumb|right|120px|André Gide  February 8 – Fritz Thyssen, German businessman and industrialist (b. 1873)  February 9 –
NUMB WITH NUMBERS: Number of senators in the 82nd Congress, first in session in 1951
96
February 4–February 8 – Surgeons remove an ovarian cyst from Gertrude Levandowski in a 96-hour long operation in Chicago.
3
March 6 –
April 29 – RKO releases the Howard Hawks sci-fi film, The Thing (From Another World).
Traian Băsescu, President of Romania  November 9 –
THE HEAVYWEIGHT CHAMP: He retired in 1949 after an 11-year reign as champ but came out of retirement in 1950, losing to Ezzard Charles
Joe Louis
March  March 1  World heavyweight boxing champion Joe Louis retires.
3
October 7 –
David Rubinstein, American pianist and composer  November 17 – John Boehner, Speaker of the United States House of Representatives   November 19 –
Margaret Mitchell, American writer (b. 1900)  August 17 – Gregorio Perfecto, Filipino jurist and politician (b. 1891)  August 18 – Paul Mares, American musician (b. 1900)  August 23 –
EVEs: In this 1957 film narrated by Alistair Cooke, Joanne Woodward played a woman who had multiple personalities
The Three Faces of Eve
The Academy Award-winning movie The Three Faces of Eve is released.
3
December 18 –
Greg Ryan, American soccer coach  January 22  Mike Bossy, Canadian hockey player  Rene Requiestas, Filipino comedian (d. 1993)  Godfrey Thoma, Nauruan politician  January 23 – Princess Caroline of Monaco  January 24 –
Giuseppe Tomasi di Lampedusa, Sicilian writer (b. 1896)  July 24  Metodija Andonov-Čento, Macedonian statesman (b. 1902)  Sacha Guitry, Russian-born playwright, actor and director (b. 1885)  July 28  Edith Abbott, American social worker, educator and author (b. 1876)  Isaac Heinemann, German-born Israeli scholar and professor of classical literature (b. 1876)  August thumb|110px||Oliver Hardy  August 5 –
THE END: There was no escaping death for this magician; he died on Halloween night in 1926
Harry Houdini
October 31 – Magician Harry Houdini died of gangrene and peritonitis that has developed after his appendix ruptured.
3
The Shakespeare Memorial Theatre in Stratford-upon-Avon was destroyed by fire.
Fonck survived but two of his men are killed.
Klaus Tennstedt, German conductor (d. 1998)  June 9 – Happy Rockefeller, American socialite (d. 2015)  June 10 – Lionel Jeffries, British film director and actor (d. 2010)  June 11 – Frank Plicka, Czech-born photographer (d. 2010)  June 12 – Gaspare di Mercurio, Italian doctor and author (d. 2001)  June 13 –
UP & ATOM: An honorary "Atoms for Peace" award went to this ex-U.S. president in 1969, the year of his death
Eisenhower
The body of former United States General and President Dwight D. Eisenhower is brought by caisson to the United States Capitol to lie in state in the Capitol Rotunda; Eisenhower had died two days earlier, after a long illness, in the Walter Reed Army Medical Center, Washington, D.C.  April  April 1 –
3
July 25 – Vietnam War:
The first-ever episode of Scooby-Doo, Where Are You!
Witold Gombrowicz, Polish novelist and dramatist (b. 1904)  July 25 –
I AM SAM, SAM I AM: In 1969 this Irishman won the Nobel Prize for literature
Beckett
Max Delbrück, Alfred Hershey, Salvador Luria  Literature – Samuel Beckett  Peace –
3
January 10 – the Soviet Union launches Venera 6 toward Venus.
October 31  Wal-Mart incorporates as Wal-Mart Stores, Inc.'''
April  April 5 – Shelby Storck, American television producer (b. 1917)  April 6 –
IN OLD ENCYCLOPEDIAS: In a 1989 Columbia, "many feel" this harsh system formalized in 1948, "will end only by force" (many are wrong)
apartheid
Daniel François Malan defeats Jan Smuts and becomes Prime Minister of South Africa, ushering in the era of apartheid, which is finally dismantled by F. W. de Klerk  in 1994.
3
The United Nations General Assembly adopts the Universal Declaration of Human Rights  December 11–12
Lynette Fromme, American attempted assassin of Gerald Ford  October 23 –
William C. Lee, American general (b. 1895)  June 26 –
HOW "RIGHT" YOU ARE!: By a unanimous vote in 1948, the U.N. adopted a "Universal Declaration of" these
Human rights
The United Nations General Assembly adopts the Universal Declaration of Human Rights  December 11–12
3
June 18    Malayan Emergency: A state of emergency is declared in the Malayan Union due to a communist insurgency.
thumb|150px|Airplane C-54 at airport Berlin-Tempelhof.
Joe Howard, American actor  November 27 – James Avery, American actor (d. 2013)  November 28 – Agnieszka Holland, Polish director and screenwriter  December thumb|120px|JoBeth Williams thumb|120px|Samuel L. Jackson thumb|120px|Gérard Depardieu thumb|120px|Donna Summer  December 2  T. Coraghessan Boyle, American writer  Toninho Horta, Brazilian singer and musician  Christine Westermann, German television and radio host, journalist and author  December 3  Rick Cua, American singer and evangelist  Ozzy Osbourne, English heavy metal singer  December 6  Keke Rosberg, Finnish Formula One champion  Marius Müller-Westernhagen, German actor and musician  JoBeth Williams, American actress and director  December 7  Gary Morris, American country singer and actor  Tony Thomas, American television producer  Mads Vinding, Danish bassist  December 10 – Abu Abbas, founder of the Palestine Liberation Front (d. 2004)  December 11 – Chester Thompson, American rock drummer  December 13  Lillian Board, South African-born English Olympic athlete (d. 1970)  Ted Nugent, American rock guitarist and singer  David O'List, English rock guitarist  December 14  Lester Bangs, American music journalist (d. 1982)  Kim Beazley, Australian politician  December 19 – Ken Brown, Canadian ice hockey player  December 20 – Alan Parsons, English songwriter, musician and record producer  December 21  Samuel L. Jackson, African-American actor and film producer  Willi Resetarits, Austrian musician and cabaret artist  December 22  Noel Edmonds, English TV presenter and DJ  Flip Mark, American child actor  Lynne Thigpen, American actress  (d. 2003)  December 23 – Jim Ferguson, American guitarist, composer, educator, author and music journalist  December 25 – Barbara Mandrell, American country singer  December 27 – Gérard Depardieu, French actor  December 28  Dick Siegel, American songwriter  Mary Weiss, American singer (The Shangri-Las)  December 29 – Peter Robinson, Northern Ireland First Minister  December 31  Joe Dallesandro, American model and actor  Sandy Jardine, Scottish professional footballer playing for Rangers and Hearts and representing Scotland (d. 2014)  Donna Summer, African-American singer and actress (d. 2012)  Date unknown thumb|120px|Judy Nylon  Archana Bhattacharyya, Indian physicist  Miguel Cabrera Cabrera, Spanish architect and politician  Vicatan, born Vicente Doria Catan Jr., Filipino comic book artist (d. 2004)  John Blair Moore, American comic book artist  Johnny Nicholas, American blues musician  Judy Nylon, American artist and musician  Edward Rutherfurd, born Francis Edward Wintle, English novelist  Gudo Hoegel, German actor and voice actor  Deaths  January thumb|120px|Mahatma Gandhi thumb|right|110px|Orville Wright   January 1 –
FUN WITH OPERA: In "Johnny Strikes Up", a violin performance at the North Pole inspires the whole world to do this 1920s dance
the Charleston
Women’s Olympics takes place for first time, in 1928 Summer Olympics  William Ralph "Dixie" Dean wins the Football League, scores 60 goals in 39 matches for Everton F.C. (English Football)  1929  Wally Hammond defeats Australia in The Ashes series (Test Cricket)   Miscellaneous trends   Youth culture of The Lost Generation; flappers, the Charleston, and the bob cut haircut.
3
Large baseball stadiums were built in major U.S. cities, in addition to palatial cinemas.
Africa   Pan-Africanist supporters of Marcus Garvey’s Universal Negro Improvement Association and African Communities League (UNIA-ACL) are repressed by colonial powers in Africa.
June 3:
STADIUMS & ARENAS: Built in 1912, Tiger Stadium & this Red Sox park are the oldest major league ballparks
Fenway Park
April 20 – Fenway Park in Boston, Massachusetts, opens.
3
Paramount celebrates its centennial in 2012.
thumb|right| March 7: Amundsen and the South Pole   September    September 28 –
Nobel Prizes  right|100px  Physics – Nils Gustaf Dalén  Chemistry –
GOVERNORS: When it became a state in 1912, William C. McDonald was its governor
New Mexico
January 6 – New Mexico becomes the 47th state of the United States.
3
The Hamburg America Line's  is launched in Hamburg and is the world's largest ship.
The Scoville Unit (used to measure the heat of peppers) is devised and tested by Wilbur Scoville.
Otto Kretschmer, German submarine commander and Bundesmarine admiral (d. 1998)  May 2   Axel Springer, German journalist and the founder and owner of Axel Springer AG (d. 1985)  Marten Toonder, Dutch comic creator (d. 2005)  May 3 – Virgil Fox, American organist (d. 1980)  May 6 – Bill Quinn, American radio performer (d. 1994)  May 9 – Pedro Armendáriz, Mexican actor (d. 1963)  May 11 – Foster Brooks, American actor and comedian (d. 2001)  May 16 – Studs Terkel, American writer and broadcaster (d. 2008)  May 17  Archibald Cox, American Watergate special prosecutor (d. 2004)  Ace Parker, American baseball and football player (d. 2013)  May 18  Perry Como, American singer (d. 2001)  Walter Sisulu, South African anti-apartheid activist (d. 2003)  May 21  Monty Stratton, American baseball player (d. 1982)  Akiva Vroman, Dutch-born Israeli geologist and Israel Prize recipient (d. 1989)  May 22 –
ASK THE AUDIENCE: When this Stravinsky work premiered in Paris in 1913, the audience went nuts & began a riot
The Rite of Spring
The ballet The Rite of Spring, with music by Igor Stravinsky conducted by Pierre Monteux, choreography by Vaslav Nijinsky and design by Nicholas Roerich, is premièred by Sergei Diaghilev's Ballets Russes at the Théâtre des Champs-Élysées in Paris; its modernism provokes one of the most famous classical music riots in history.
3
August    August 4 – Republic of China: the province of Chungking (Chongqing) declares independence; Republican forces crush the rebellion in a couple of weeks.
R. S. R. Fitter, British writer (d. 2005)  March 2 – Godfried Bomans, Dutch writer (d. 1971)  March 4 – John Garfield, American actor (d. 1952)  March 13 thumb|110px|Rosita Contreras  William Casey, American Central Intelligence Agency director (d. 1987)  Sergey Mikhalkov, Russian writer and lyricist (d. 2009)  March 15 – Rosita Contreras (d. 1962)
Jean Fournet, French conductor (d. 2008)  April 16 –
HAIL TO THE CHIEF: Our heaviest president at 332 pounds, he trimmed down to 244 after he left office in 1913
Taft
March 4  Woodrow Wilson succeeds William Howard Taft as President of the United States.
3
March 20 – Sung Chiao-jen, a founder of the Chinese nationalist party (Kuomintang), is wounded in an assassination attempt and dies two days later.
April 21 – Cunard ocean liner , built by John Brown & Company, is launched on the River Clyde.
The Greek–Serbian Treaty of Alliance is signed, paving the way for the Second Balkan War.
POTPOURRI: This developer of the first practical helicopter built & flew the first 4-engine aircraft in 1913
Sikorsky
May 26 (May 13 O.S.) – Igor Sikorsky becomes the first person to pilot a 4-engine fixed-wing aircraft.
3
The Woolworth Building opens in New York City.
Woody Herman, American musician and band leader (d. 1987)  May 19 – Neelam Sanjiva Reddy, Indian politician and 6th President of India (d. 1996)  May 20   Teodoro Fernández, Peruvian soccer player (d. 1996)  William Hewlett, American businessman (d. 2001)  May 22 – Benedict Garmisa, American politician (d. 1985)  May 24 –
Benjamin Shapira, a German-born Israeli biochemist and recipient of the Israel Prize (d. 1993)  June 11  Vince Lombardi, American football coach (d. 1970)  Risë Stevens, American mezzosoprano (d. 2013)  June 13 –
TECHNOLOGY: Hubert Booth, not Herbert Hoover, developed the first practical electric one of these in 1901
Vacuum cleaner
August 30 – Hubert Cecil Booth patents an electric vacuum cleaner in the United Kingdom.
3
June  June – Emily Hobhouse reports on the genocide in the 45 British concentration camps for Boer women and children in South Africa in which, over an 18-month period, 26,370 people would die, 24,000 of them children under 16.
July 10 –
Margaret Mead, American cultural anthropologist (died 1978)  December 19 – Rudolf Hell, German inventor (died 2002)  December 25 –
GOSH DARN YANKEES: He was born in Brooklyn in 1944 & was mayor of New York City from 1994 to 2002
Rudy Giuliani
Mary Robinson, President of Ireland  May 23  John Newcombe, Australian tennis player  Avraham Oz, Israeli theater professor, translator, and political activist  May 24 – Patti LaBelle, American singer  May 25 – Frank Oz, English puppeteer and film director  May 27 – Chris Dodd, American politician  May 28  Rudy Giuliani, former Mayor of New York City  Gladys Knight, American singer  Rita MacNeil, Canadian folk singer (d. 2013)  Patricia, Lady Stephens (née Quinn), retired Northern Irish actress  May 29 –
3
Only three men, two Norwegians and a Dutchman, return to the UK; of those recaptured, fifty are executed.
September 22 –
– Manuel L. Quezon, Philippine president (b. 1878)  August 2 – Kakuji Kakuta, Japanese admiral (b. 1890)  August 4 –
COMPOSERS GO TO THE MOVIES: Sir William Walton wrote the music for this 1944 Laurence Olivier Shakespearean film that served as a patriotic boost
Henry V
Laurence Olivier's film Henry V, based on Shakespeare's play, opens in London.
3
WWII: American troops enter Cherbourg.
Ray Davies, English rock-singer and songwriter, co-founder of The Kinks  June 24  Jeff Beck, English rock musician  David Mark Berger, American-born Israeli weightlifter, murdered at the Munich Olympics (d. 1972)  June 29 –
Michael Douglas, American film actor and producer  September 26  Veronica Carlson, English actress and model  Anne Robinson, British television host  September 30 – Jimmy Johnstone, Scottish footballer (d. 2006)  October thumb|right|150px||Kati Kovács  October 2 – Vernor Vinge, American science fiction writer  October 4 – Tony La Russa, American baseball player and manager  October 6 – Mylon LeFevre, American singer and evangelist  October 9  John Entwistle, English musician (The Who; d. 2002)
A MANILA FOLDER: This corncob pipe-smoking resident of the Manila Hotel left the Philippines in 1942; he returned in 1944
Douglas MacArthur
American forces land on Red Beach in Palo, Leyte, as General Douglas MacArthur returns to the Philippines with Philippine Commonwealth president Sergio Osmeña, and Armed Forces of the Philippines Generals Basilio J. Valdes and Carlos P. Romulo.
3
Finland is able to resist the attack and thus manages to stay as an independent nation.
November 29 – WWII: Submarine  sinks Japanese aircraft carrier .
Larry H. Miller, American sports owner (Utah Jazz; d. 2009)
THE HOUSE OF BURGESS MEREDITH: In 1945's "Story of G.I. Joe", Burgess played this Pulitzer-winning war journalist who was killed by a sniper that year
Ernie Pyle
April 18 – American war correspondent Ernie Pyle is killed by Japanese machine gun fire on the island of Ie Shima off Okinawa.
3
Brazilian forces liberate the commune of Fornovo di Taro, Italy, from German forces.
One Marine is providing cover fire with his M1 Thompson submachinegun as the other with a Browning Automatic Rifle, prepares to break cover to move to a different position.
They are respectively the last German Head of state and Head of government until 1949.
SCIENCE: This man seen here, born in Oxford in 1942, is among the greatest physicists of our time
Stephen Hawking
1942 FIFA World Cup competition in Association football, which Nazi Germany sought to host, is not held, due to World War II.  Births  January thumb|120px|Stephen Hawking thumb|120px|Muhammad Ali  January 1  Country Joe McDonald, American musician  Gennadi Sarafanov, Russian cosmonaut (d. 2005)  January 2  Dennis Hastert, American politician, Speaker of the United States House of Representatives  Hugh Shelton, American military leader, Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff  January 3  László Sólyom, President of Hungary  John Thaw, English actor (d. 2002)  January 4   Bolaji Akinyemi, Nigerian professor of political science  Dame Marcela Contreras, Chilean-British immunologist and educator  January 5   Maurizio Pollini, Italian pianist  Charlie Rose, American television anchor, talk show host  January 7 – Vasily Alekseyev, Soviet weightlifter  January 8  Stephen Hawking, British physicist  Junichiro Koizumi, 56th Prime Minister of Japan  January 14 – Yogesh Kumar Sabharwal, Chief Justice of India  January 16 – René Angélil, Canadian singer and manager (d. 2016)  January 17  Muhammad Ali, American boxer  Ulf Hoelscher, German violinist  January 19 – Michael Crawford, English actor, singer and entertainer   January 25  Carl Eller, American football player  Eusébio, Mozambican Portuguese footballer (d. 2014)  January 26 – Soad Hosny, Egyptian actress (d. 2001)  January 28   Hans Jürgen Bäumler, German figure skater, actor, pop singer and television host  Erkki Pohjanheimo, Finnish TV-producer and director  January 31  Daniela Bianchi, Italian actress  Derek Jarman, English director and writer (d. 1994)  February thumb|160px|Terry Jones thumb|120px|Ehud Barak thumb|120px|Brian Jones  February 1   Bibi Besch, Austrian-American actress (d. 1996)  Terry Jones, Welsh actor and writer  February 2 – Graham Nash, English rock musician (The Hollies)  February 5 – Roger Staubach, American football player  February 6 – Ahmad-Jabir Ahmadov Ismail oghlu, Azeri professor and academic  February 7 – Gareth Hunt, English actor (d. 2007)  February 9 –
3
Dieppe Raid:
November 9 – WWII: U.S serviceman Edward Leonski is hanged at Melbourne's Pentridge Prison for the "Brown-Out" murders of three women in May.  November 10 – WWII: In violation of a 1940 armistice, Germany invades Vichy France, following French Admiral François Darlan's agreement to an armistice with the Allies in North Africa.
John Rostill, English bassist, musician and composer (The Shadows) (d. 1973)  June 17 –
U.S. CURRENCY: In 1943 the Treasury Dept. minted this coin in zinc-coated steel
Penny
Lois Hamilton, American model, actress and artist (d. 1999)  October 15 – Penny Marshall, American actress, director and producer  October 16 – Paul Rose, Canadian terrorist  October 18  Birthe Rønn Hornbech, Danish politician  Christine Charbonneau, Canadian francophone singer and songwriter (d. 2014)  October 20 – Noreen Corcoran, American child actress and director  October 22 – Catherine Deneuve, French actress  October 27 –
3
April 27 –
August 4 –
October 17 –
WHAT'S IN A CELEBRITY NAME?: This late, great comedienne was named for a character Rita Hayworth played in 1946, the year she was born
Gilda Radner
Gilda Radner, American comedienne and actress (d. 1989)  June 29   Egon von Fürstenberg, Swiss fashion designer (d. 2004)  Gitte Hænning, Danish singer   Ernesto Pérez Balladares, President of Panama  July thumb|120px|George W. Bush thumb|120px|Sylvester Stallone
3
Derby County beat Charlton Athletic in the first FA Cup final since 1939.
The British House of Commons decides to nationalize mines.
D'Argenlieu, French High Commissioner for Indo-China recognizes an autonomous "Republic of Cochin-China" in violation of the March 6 Ho–Sainteny agreement, opening the way for conflict between the Viet Minh and France.
POLAND: Laid to rest temporarily at Arlington in 1941, his remains were returned to Poland in 1992
Jan Paderewski
Evelyn Underhill, British writer (b. 1875)  June 21 – Elliott Dexter, American actor (b. 1870)  June 29 – Ignacy Jan Paderewski, Polish pianist, composer, and third Prime Minister of Poland (b. 1860)  July  July 3 – Friedrich Akel, Estonian diplomat and politician (b. 1871)  July 4 – Antoni Łomnicki, Polish mathematician (b. 1881)  July 10 – Jelly Roll Morton, African-American jazz musician and composer (b. 1890)  July 11 – Arthur Evans, English archaeologist (b. 1851)  July 15 –
3
The Independent State of Croatia, a puppet state of the Axis powers, is established with Ustaše leader Ante Pavelić as head (Poglavnik) of the government.
Amy Johnson, English aviator (b. 1903)  January 8 – Lord Robert Baden-Powell, English soldier and founder of the Boy Scouts (b. 1857)  January 10  Frank Bridge, English composer (b. 1879)  Sir John Lavery, Anglo-Irish artist (b. 1856)  Joe Penner, Hungarian-born American comedic actor (b. 1904)  January 13 – James Joyce, Irish writer and poet (b. 1882)  January 29 – Ioannis Metaxas, dictator of Greece (b. 1871)   February  thumb|right|110px|Frederick Banting  February 2 –
Ernst Udet, German World War I fighter ace; Nazi Luftwaffe official (b. 1896)  November 18  Émile Nelligan, Canadian poet (b. 1879)  Walther Nernst, German chemist, Nobel Prize laureate (b. 1864)  Chris Watson, 3rd Prime Minister of Australia (b. 1867)  November 22   Werner Mölders, German fighter pilot (b. 1913)  Kurt Koffka, German psychologist (b. 1886)  November 23 –
LEONARD MALTIN ON DISNEY: (Leonard Maltin wraps it up.)  My favorite animated Disney film is this 1941 classic in which a lovable misfit becomes a high-flying circus star
Dumbo
October 23 – Walt Disney's fourth animated film Dumbo is released.
3
On March 20, they arrive in Sydney, Australia.
WWII: Arcadia Conference opens in Washington, D.C., the first meeting on military strategy between the heads of government of the United Kingdom and the United States following the latter's entry into the war.
Nick Nolte, American actor  February 10 – Michael Apted, English film director  February 12 – Naomi Uemura, Japanese adventurer (d. 1984)  February 13  David Jeremiah, American televangelist  Sigmar Polke, German painter  February 19 –
SPOTTED CREATURES: The northern spotted variety of this wise old bird has been on the threatened list since 1990
owl
Las Cruces Bowling Alley massacre: 2 people walked into the 10 Pin Alley in Las Cruces, New Mexico, (known then as the Las Cruces Bowl) and shot seven people, four of whom were killed.
3
Syrian military forces invade and occupy Mount Lebanon, ousting General Michel Aoun's government.
It would become the highest grossing live-action family comedy film of all time.
The National Assembly of Bulgaria elects Dimitar Iliev Popov as Prime Minister of Bulgaria.
20TH CENTURY WOMEN: Accused of corruption, this Pakistani prime minister was dismissed in 1990 & again in 1996
Benazir Bhutto
Prime Minister of Pakistan Benazir Bhutto gives birth to a girl, becoming the first modern head of government to bear a child while in office.
3
Robert Mapplethorpe's "The Perfect Moment" show of nude and homoerotic photographs opens at the Cincinnati Contemporary Arts Center, in spite of accusations of indecency by Citizens for Community Values.
Belarus declares its sovereignty, a key step toward independence from the USSR. July 28 – Alberto Fujimori becomes president of Peru.
Lois Moran, American actress (b. 1909) July 15 Margaret Lockwood, English actress (b. 1916) Enn Roos, Estonian Soviet sculptor (b. 1908) Zaim Topčić, Yugoslav and Bosnian writer (b. 1920) July 16 –
DISABILITY AWARENESS: The 1996 Summer Paralympic Games for the disabled were held in this U.S. city
Atlanta
After takeoff from Miami, a fire started by improperly handled oxygen canisters in the cargo hold of Atlanta-bound ValuJet Flight 592, causes the Douglas DC-9 to crash in the Florida Everglades, killing all 110 on board.
3
He is replaced by Włodzimierz Cimoszewicz.
At Düsseldorf International Airport, smouldering polystyrene evolves into a major fire, killing 17 people inside the terminal building.
Allisyn Ashley Arm, American actress  May thumb|150px|Birdy
MONEY TALK: 1996 presidential candidate last name that's also an allotment of money given to those in need
Dole
August 15 – Bob Dole is nominated for President of the United States, and Jack Kemp for Vice President, at the Republican National Convention in San Diego, California.
3
July 16 –
Gustave Solomon, American mathematician and engineer (b. 1930)  February thumb|120px|Gene Kelly 120px|thumb|Martin Balsam thumb|120px|Audrey Munson  February 2    Fred S. Keller, pioneer in experimental psychology (b. 1899)  Gene Kelly, American actor and dancer (b. 1912)  February 3 – Audrey Meadows, American actress (b. 1926)  February 6 – Guy Madison, American actor (b. 1922)  February 7 – Boris Alexandrovich Tchaikovsky, Russian composer (b. 1925)  February 9  Adolf Galland, German general and World War II fighter ace (b. 1912)  Albert Jean Amateau, Turkish rabbi, businessman, lawyer and social activist (b. 1889)  February 11  Kebby Musokotwane, Prime Minister of Zambia (b. 1946)  Cyril Poole, English cricketer (b. 1921)  Phil Regan, American actor (b. 1906)  Amelia Rosselli, Italian poet (b. 1930)  February 12  Bob Shaw, Irish science fiction writer (b. 1931)  Ryōtarō Shiba, Japanese novelist (b. 1923)  February 13 – Martin Balsam, American actor (b. 1919)  February 14  Eva Hart, British survivor of RMS Titanic (b. 1905)  Bob Paisley, English football manager (b. 1919)  February 15  Tommy Rettig, American actor (b. 1941)  McLean Stevenson, American actor (b. 1929)  February 16  Roger Bowen, American actor (b. 1932)  Pat Brown, Governor of California (b. 1905)  Brownie McGhee, American musician (b. 1915)  February 17 – Evelyn Laye, British actress (b. 1900)  February 20  Audrey Munson, American artist's model and film actress (b. 1891)  Tōru Takemitsu, Japanese composer (b. 1930)  February 21 –
Paul Rand, American graphic designer (b. 1914)  November 27 – Gertrude Blanch, American mathematician (b. 1897)  November 28 – Don McNeill, American tennis champion (b. 1918)  November 30 – Tiny Tim, American musician (b. 1932)  December thumb|120px|Marcello Mastroianni thumb|120px|Carl Sagan  December 3 – Babrak Karmal, President of Afghanistan (b. 1929)  December 6 – Pete Rozelle, American commissioner of the National Football League (b. 1926)  December 8 – Howard Rollins, American actor (b. 1950)  December 9  Mary Leakey, British archaeologist (b. 1913)  Diana Morgan, British playwright and screenwriter (b. 1908)  James Basil Wilkie Roberton, New Zealand soldier, doctor, historian and writer (b. 1896)  December 10 – Faron Young, American singer (b. 1932)  December 11 – Willie Rushton, English comedian, actor, and cartoonist (b. 1937)  December 13 Edward Blishen, English author (b. 1920) Clarence Wijewardena, Sri Lankan musician (b. 1943)  December 16 – Quentin Bell, English biographer and art historian (b. 1910)  December 17 – Stanko Todorov, Bulgarian communist politician (b. 1920)  December 18 – Irving Caesar, American lyricist (b. 1895)  December 19 – Marcello Mastroianni, Italian actor (b. 1924)  December 20 – Carl Sagan, American astronomer (b. 1934)
1996: Galileo probe data released in January showed this planet had less water than expected
Jupiter
August 13 – Data sent back by the Galileo space probe indicates there may be water on one of Jupiter's moons.
3
August 28 –
December 5 – Federal Reserve Board Chairman Alan Greenspan gives a speech in which he suggests that "irrational exuberance" may have "unduly escalated asset values".
December 30  In the Indian state of Assam, a passenger train is bombed by Bodo separatists, killing 26.
MAGAZINES: Tho its London casinos earned 63% of this magazine co.'s profits in 1980, they were sold in 1981
Playboy
August 14 – Dorothy Stratten, the 1980 Playboy Playmate of the Year is murdered by estranged husband Paul Leslie Snider, who subsequently commits suicide.
3
January 22 – Andrei Sakharov, Soviet scientist and human rights activist, is arrested in Moscow.
In Vanuatu, followers of John Frum's cargo cult on the island of Tanna declare secession as the nation of Tafea.
population19801975198550px   World4,434,682,0004,068,109,00010px 366,573,0004,830,979,00010px 396,297,00050px   Africa469,618,000408,160,00010px 61,458,000541,814,00010px 72,196,00050px    Asia2,632,335,0002,397,512,00010px 234,823,0002,887,552,00010px 255,217,00050px Europe692,431,000675,542,00010px 16,889,000706,009,00010px 13,578,00050px Latin America& Caribbean361,401,000321,906,00010px 39,495,000401,469,00010px 40,068,00050px   NorthAmerica256,068,000243,425,00010px 12,643,000269,456,00010px 13,388,00050px Oceania22,828,00021,564,00010px 1,264,00024,678,00010px 1,850,000   Births    January   thumb|right|150px|Zooey
SEE & SAY: Say this state that was admitted to the Union in 1859
Oregon
February 14 – Oregon is admitted as the 33rd U.S. state.
3
April 25 –
May 26 – Austro-Sardinian War:
Mikhail Ippolitov-Ivanov, Russian composer (d. 1935)  November 22 – Fusajiro Yamauchi, founder of Nintendo (d. 1940)  November 23 –
QUOTATIONS: On the death of his wife Linda in 1998, this musician said, "I have lost my girlfriend, and that is very sad"
Paul McCartney
Fred Davis, English snooker player (b. 1913)  April 17  Linda McCartney, American photographer and musician and wife of former Beatle Paul McCartney (b. 1941)  Muhammad Metwally Al Shaarawy, Egyptian Muslim jurist (b. 1911)  April 19 – Octavio Paz, Mexican diplomat and writer, Nobel Prize laureate (b. 1914)  April 21  Peter Lind Hayes, American entertainer (b. 1915)  Irene Vernon, American actress (b. 1922)  April 22 – Kitch Christie, South African rugby coach (b. 1940)  April 23  Konstantinos Karamanlis, Greek politician (b. 1907)  James Earl Ray, American assassin (b. 1928)  April 25 – Wright Morris, American photographer and writer (b. 1910)  April 26 –
3
The CIH computer virus is discovered in Taiwan.
Narita Brian, Japanese racehorse (b. 1991)  September 29 – Herbert V. Prochnow, U.S. banking executive, noted toastmaster, and author (b. 1897)  September 30  Dan Quisenberry, baseball player (b. 1953)  Bruno Munari, Italian-born industrial designer (b. 1907)  Pavel Štěpán, Czech pianist (b. 1925)  Robert Lewis Taylor, American author (b. 1912)  October thumb|150px|Roddy McDowall   October 2  Gene Autry, American actor, singer, and sports team owner (b. 1907)  Olivier Gendebien, Belgian race car driver (b. 1924)  October 3 – Roddy McDowall, British actor (b. 1928)  October 6 –  Mark Belanger, American baseball player (b. 1944)  Ambrose Burke, English professor and Catholic priest  (b. 1895)  October 8 – Zhang Chongren, Chinese artist (b. 1907)  October 9 –
The video game Grand Theft Auto: Liberty City Stories is set in 1998  The TV series Ben 10 is set in 1998.
NOTABLE NAMES: Thelonious Monk's Time magazine cover was pulled in 1963 for coverage of this man's death
John F. Kennedy
February 8 – Travel, financial and commercial transactions by United States citizens to Cuba are made illegal by the John F. Kennedy Administration.
2
The TAT-3 transatlantic communications cable goes into operation.
Sergey Bubka, Ukrainian pole vaulter  December 7   Mark Bowen, Welsh footballer  Paul Dobson, British voice actor  December 8  Greg Howe, American guitarist  Toshiaki Kawada, Japanese professional wrestler  December 12   Juan Carlos Varela, President of Panama  Ai Orikasa, Japanese voice actress  December 13  Uwe-Jens Mey, German speed skater  Jake White, South African rugby coach  December 14  Cynthia Gibb, American actress  Vytautas Juozapaitis, Lithuanian baritone, professor and television host  December 16  Benjamin Bratt, American actor  Jeff Carson, American singer  Bärbel Schäfer, German television presenter and talk show host  December 18  Pauline Ester, French singer  Rikiya Koyama, Japanese voice actor  Charles Oakley, American basketball player  Brad Pitt, American actor  December 19   Jennifer Beals, American actress  Til Schweiger, German actor  December 21  Govinda Ahuja, Indian actor and politician  Jacques Simonet, Belgian politician (d. 2007)  December 22  Vladimir Flórez, Colombian cartoonist  Bryan Gunn, Scottish footballer  Luna H. Mitani, Japanese-American Surrealist painter  December 23  Jim Harbaugh, American football player and coach  Donna Tartt, American author  December 26 – Lars Ulrich, Danish-born rock drummer (Metallica)  December 29  Francisco Bustamante, Filipino billiard player  Sean Payton, American football coach  December 30 – Kim Hill, American Christian singer  Date unknown  Wei Brian, Chinese entrepreneur  Gregory Henriquez, Canadian architect  Deaths  January  January 1  Filippo Del Giudice, Italian film producer (b. 1892)  Robert S. Kerr, American businessman and politician (b. 1896)  January 2  Jack Carson, Canadian actor (b. 1910)  Al Mamaux, professional baseball player and manager (b. 1894)  Dick Powell, American actor (b. 1904)  January 5  Rogers Hornsby, American baseball player, (St. Louis Cardinals) and a member of the MLB Hall of Fame (b. 1896)  Erik Strandmark, Swedish film actor (b. 1919)  January 6  Frank Tuttle, American film director (b. 1892)
ON LOCATION: The shoot of the 1963 epic "Cleopatra" was in this city where the film is partly set
Rome
September 29  The second period of the Second Vatican Council in Rome opens.
3
Trois Glorieuses:
In the U.S., the President's Commission on the Status of Women issues its final reports to President Kennedy.
Benny Elias, Australian rugby player  November 18 – Dante Bichette, American baseball player  November 19  Terry Farrell, American actress  Jon Potter, British field hockey player  Peter Schmeichel, Danish football player  November 21 –
SPACE TRAVELERS: A few months after her historic 1963 flight she married fellow cosmonaut Andrian Nikolayev
Valentina Tereshkova
June 16 – Vostok 6 carries Soviet cosmonaut Valentina Tereshkova, the first woman into space.
3
March 28 –
Ivan Sutherland writes the revolutionary Sketchpad program and runs it on the Lincoln TX-2 computer at Massachusetts Institute of Technology.
Sergey Bubka, Ukrainian pole vaulter  December 7   Mark Bowen, Welsh footballer  Paul Dobson, British voice actor  December 8  Greg Howe, American guitarist  Toshiaki Kawada, Japanese professional wrestler  December 12   Juan Carlos Varela, President of Panama  Ai Orikasa, Japanese voice actress  December 13  Uwe-Jens Mey, German speed skater  Jake White, South African rugby coach  December 14  Cynthia Gibb, American actress  Vytautas Juozapaitis, Lithuanian baritone, professor and television host  December 16  Benjamin Bratt, American actor  Jeff Carson, American singer  Bärbel Schäfer, German television presenter and talk show host  December 18  Pauline Ester, French singer  Rikiya Koyama, Japanese voice actor  Charles Oakley, American basketball player  Brad Pitt, American actor  December 19   Jennifer Beals, American actress  Til Schweiger, German actor  December 21  Govinda Ahuja, Indian actor and politician  Jacques Simonet, Belgian politician (d. 2007)  December 22  Vladimir Flórez, Colombian cartoonist  Bryan Gunn, Scottish footballer  Luna H. Mitani, Japanese-American Surrealist painter  December 23  Jim Harbaugh, American football player and coach  Donna Tartt, American author  December 26 – Lars Ulrich, Danish-born rock drummer (Metallica)  December 29  Francisco Bustamante, Filipino billiard player  Sean Payton, American football coach  December 30 – Kim Hill, American Christian singer  Date unknown  Wei Brian, Chinese entrepreneur  Gregory Henriquez, Canadian architect  Deaths  January  January 1  Filippo Del Giudice, Italian film producer (b. 1892)  Robert S. Kerr, American businessman and politician (b. 1896)  January 2  Jack Carson, Canadian actor (b. 1910)  Al Mamaux, professional baseball player and manager (b. 1894)  Dick Powell, American actor (b. 1904)  January 5  Rogers Hornsby, American baseball player, (St. Louis Cardinals) and a member of the MLB Hall of Fame (b. 1896)  Erik Strandmark, Swedish film actor (b. 1919)  January 6  Frank Tuttle, American film director (b. 1892)
WORLD LEADERS: In 1963, 8 years after he resigned as British p.m., he was made an honorary U.S. citizen
Winston Churchill
British statesman Sir Winston Churchill becomes an honorary citizen of the United States.
3
American-born poet Sylvia Plath commits suicide in London.
June   June 3  Huế chemical attacks: The Army of the Republic of Vietnam rains liquid chemicals on the heads of Buddhist protestors, injuring 67 people.
August 1 – Coolio, African-American rapper  August 2 – Laura Bennett, American fashion designer  August 3  Tasmin Archer, English singer  James Hetfield, American musician (Metallica)  August 6 – Kevin Mitnick, American computer hacker  August 7  Hiroaki Hirata, Japanese voice actor  Harold Perrineau, American actor  August 8  Rica Fukami, Japanese voice actress  Emi Shinohara, Japanese voice actress  Stephen Walkom, Canadian ice hockey official and executive  August 9 –
THE 1960s: 1963 protests by members of this religion, some of whom immolated themselves, led to the fall of South Vietnam's govt.
Buddhists
Huế Phật Đản shootings: The Army of the Republic of Vietnam opens fire on Buddhists who defy a ban on the flying of the Buddhist flag on Vesak, the birthday of Gautama Buddha, killing 9.
3
Of the 9,294 participants only 69 manage to finish, making this the heaviest elfstedentocht ever held.
The Urdu keyboard is standardised by the Central Language Board in Pakistan.
Tom Keene, American actor (b. 1896)  August 9 – Patrick Bouvier Kennedy, American infant son of President and Mrs. Kennedy  August 10  Estes Kefauver, American politician (b. 1903)  Ernst Wetter, Swiss Federal Councillor (b. 1877)  August 11 – Clem Bevans, American actor (b. 1879)  August 17 –
FOREIGN COUNTRIES: It took us 10 years, from 1904 to 1914, to build a canal through it
Panama
For $10 million, the United States gains control of the Panama Canal Zone.
3
James Joyce walks to Ringsend with Nora Barnacle; he later uses this date (Bloomsday) as the setting for his novel Ulysses.
The Pi Kappa Phi fraternity is founded at the College of Charleston in Charleston, SC.  December 27 –
Queen Isabella II of Spain (b. 1830)  April 13 – Stepan Makarov, Russian admiral (killed in action) (b. 1849)  May 1 – Antonín Dvořák, Czech composer (b. 1841)  May 6 – Franz von Lenbach, German painter (b. 1836)  May 7 –
AMERICAN FOLKLORE: Immortalized in song, this engineer of the Cannonball Express died in a 1900 crash, saving everyone aboard
Casey Jones
April 30 – Casey Jones, American railway engineer (b. 1863)  May 1 – Mihály Munkácsy, Hungarian painter (b. 1844)  May 9 – Carit Etlar (Carl Brosbøll), Danish author (b. 1816)  May 18 –
3
British soldiers take Pretoria.
July 12 – German cruise liner SS Deutschland breaks the record for the Blue Riband for the first time with an average speed of .
Umberto I, King of Italy (assassinated) (b. 1844)  July 31 – Alfred, Duke of Saxe-Coburg and Gotha, second son of Queen Victoria (b. 1844)
THE WONDER YEARS: Baby doc Benjamin Spock was indicted in 1968 for telling teens to resist this
Draft
In ongoing campus unrest, Howard University students protesting the Vietnam War, the ROTC program on campus and the draft, confront Gen. Lewis Hershey, then head of the U.S. Selective Service System, and as he attempts to deliver an address, shout him down with cries of "America is the Black man's battleground!"
2
July  July 1  The Central Intelligence Agency's Phoenix Program is officially established.
Minnesota Historical Society  External links
IT'S ALL YOUR FAULT!: Speculators were blamed for the 1929 stock market crash that marked the beginning of this decade-long calamity
the Great Depression
282–283 ISBN 0-7656-0143-5 The Far East began to experience economic problems late in the year as the effects of the Great Depression began to spread.
3
Then, from October 24–October 29, stock prices suffered three multi-digit percentage drops, wiping out more than $30 billion from the New York Stock Exchange (10 times greater than the annual budget of the federal government).Gilbert, 767–9 On December 3 U.S. President Herbert Hoover announced to the U.S. Congress that the worst effects of the recent stock market crash were behind the nation, and that the American people had regained faith in the economy.
On June 27 the first public demonstration of color TV was held by H. E. Ives and his colleagues at Bell Telephone Laboratories in New York.
Murray Gell-Mann, American physicist, Nobel laureate
STUPID ANSWERS: Founded in 1929, this New York museum is dedicated to modern art
the Museum of Modern Art
The 1st Academy Awards for film were held in Los Angeles, while the Museum of Modern Art opened in New York City.
3
pp.
Gilbert, Martin.
Kulak property was taken and they were deported by cattle train to areas of frozen tundra.
BIG WORDS: This word famously preceded "wasteland" in a 1961 speech about TV; we'll try not to take it personally
vast
In a speech on "Television and the Public Interest" to the National Association of Broadcasters, FCC chairman Newton N. Minow describes commercial television programming as a "vast wasteland".
3
April 18 –
Catch-22 by Joseph Heller is first published.
Akira Takasaki, Japanese guitarist  February 25 – Davey Allison, American race car driver (d. 1993)  February 27 – James Worthy, American basketball player and analyst  February 28 –
ENDS IN "OOK": As a result of this scandal, in 1992 H. Lawrence Garrett 3rd stepped down as Navy Secretary
Tailhook
United States Secretary of the Navy Henry L. Garrett III resigns in the wake of the Tailhook scandal.
3
The Czechoslovakia Federal Assembly votes to split the country into the Czech Republic and Slovakia, starting on January 1, 1993.
Kamie Crawford, American pageant titleholder  October 27  Emily Hagins, American film director Taiko Katono, Japanese actor and model Stephan El Shaarawy, Italian footballer Brandon Saad, American professional ice hockey player October 28 Lexi Ainsworth, American actress Maria Borges, Angolan model Jermaine Crawford, American actor October 29 – Jacqueline Jossa, English actress October 30 – Tequan Richmond, American actor, model, and rapper October 31 – Vanessa Marano, American actress   November  thumb|150px|Wilfried Zaha thumb|150px|Nathan Kress thumb|150px|Miley Cyrus thumb|150px|Adam Hicks
(b. 1896) July 19 Allen Newell, computer scientist (b. 1927) Paolo Borsellino, Italian judge (b. 1940) July 22 –
WHO WAS THAT MASKED MAN?: In 1988 Michael Crawford picked up a Tony for playing the masked title role in this musical
Phantom of the Opera
The Phantom of the Opera, the longest running Broadway play ever, opens.
3
July 6  The Piper Alpha production platform in the North Sea is destroyed by explosions and fires, killing 165 oil workers and 2 rescue mariners.
The first reported medical waste on beaches in the Greater New York area (including hypodermic needles and syringes possibly infected with the AIDS virus) washes ashore on Long Island.
The Ocean Odyssey drilling rig suffers a blowout and fire in the North Sea (see also July 6).
ELECTION DAY: In 1988 Bush beat Dukakis on this, the latest possible election day
November 8
November 8 – United States presidential election, 1988: George H. W. Bush is elected over Michael Dukakis, becoming the first sitting Vice President of the United States in 152 years to be elected as President of the United States.
3
Accepts $13B Buyout by Philip Morris
November 11 –
–
ART & ARTISTS: In 1956 Time magazine dubbed this abstract expressionist "Jack the Dripper"
Pollock
August 2 – Albert Woolson, last surviving Union veteran of the American Civil War (b. 1847)  August 11 – Jackson Pollock, American painter (b. 1912)  August 14  Bertolt Brecht, German playwright (b. 1898)  Konstantin von Neurath, Nazi German diplomat and foreign minister (b. 1873)  August 16  Bela Lugosi, Hungarian-born film actor (Dracula) (b. 1882)  Lynde D. McCormick, American admiral (b. 1895)  August 23 – Peaches Browning, American actress (b. 1910)  August 24 – Kenji Mizoguchi, Japanese film director (b. 1898)  August 25 – Alfred Kinsey, American sex researcher (b. 1894)  September thumb|120px|Billy Bishop  September 6 – Lee Jung-seob, Korean oil painter (b. 1916)  September 11 – Billy Bishop, Canadian World War I flying ace (b. 1894)  September 20 –
3
July 31 –
November 14 –
– Alan Ruck, American actor  July 2 – Jerry Hall, American model and actress  July 3 – Rick Ducommun, Canadian actor and comedian  July 5 – Sheila Walsh, Scottish Christian artist and former talk-show hostess  July 9 – Tom Hanks, American actor and director  July 11  Amitav Ghosh, Indian-American fiction writer  Sela Ward, American actress  July 12 - Mel Harris, American actress  July 13 - Günther Jauch, German television host  July 14 – Vladimir Kulich, Czech actor  July 15  Ian Curtis, English rock musician (Joy Division) (d. 1980)  Barry Melrose, Canadian hockey player, coach, and commentator  Toshihiko Seko, Japanese long-distance runner  July 16 – Tony Kushner, American playwright  July 18 – Sheila Aldridge, American singer  July 19 – Yoshiaki Yatsu, Japanese professional wrestler  July 24  Charlie Crist, American politician  Pat Finn, American game show host and producer  Carmen Nebel, German television presenter  July 26  Andy Goldsworthy, British sculptor and photographer  Dorothy Hamill, American figure skater and Olympic Gold medalist  July 30 – Delta Burke, American actress  July 31  Michael Biehn, American actor  Deval Patrick, American politician; first African-American Governor of Massachusetts   August  thumb|120px|Bruce Greenwood thumb|120px|Kim Cattrall  August 2 –
SICKNESS & HEALTH: This antibiotic discovered by Fleming in 1928 was isolated & purified by Ernst Chain & Howard Florey
Penicillin
Alexander Fleming, at St Mary's Hospital, London, accidentally rediscovers the antibiotic Penicillin.
3
The Phi Sigma Alpha Fraternity is founded at the University of Puerto Rico, Río Piedras Campus.
The  develops a severe starboard list, is abandoned and sinks approximately 200 miles off Hampton Roads, Virginia.
Domenico Modugno, Italian singer, songwriter, actor and politician (d. 1994)  January 10 – Philip Levine, American poet  January 11  Mitchell Ryan, American actor  David L. Wolper, American television producer (d. 2010)  January 15 –
FAMOUS AMERICANS: "The woman who can create her own job is the woman who will win fame and fortune", said this aviator in 1928
Amelia Earhart
June 17–18 – Aviatrix Amelia Earhart becomes the first woman to make a successful Transatlantic flight, as a passenger in a Fokker F.VIIb/3m piloted by Wilmer Stultz from Newfoundland to Wales.
2
March 21 – Charles Lindbergh is presented the Medal of Honor for his first Transatlantic flight.
June 4 – Zhang Zuolin, Chinese warlord (b. 1873)  June 12 –
THE WINTER OF: ...1924 saw the first of these, held in Chamonix, France
Winter Olympics
The 1924 Winter Olympics open in Chamonix, in the French Alps.
3
Katy Jurado, Mexican actress (d. 2002)  January 19 –
February 17 – Margaret Truman, American novelist and only child of U.S. President Harry S. Truman and Bess Truman (d. 2008)  February 19 –
Rikki Fulton, Scottish comedian and actor (d. 2004)  April 16 – Henry Mancini, American composer and arranger (d. 1994)  April 18  Clarence "Gatemouth" Brown, American blues musician (d. 2005)  Henry Hyde, Member of the U.S. House of Representatives from Illinois (d. 2007)  April 20  Nina Foch, Dutch-born American actress (d. 2008)  Leslie Phillips, English actor  April 23   Ruth Leuwerik, German film actress  Bobby Rosengarden, American jazz drummer (d. 2007)  April 24 Clement Freud, British writer, radio personality, and politician (d. 2009) Nahuel Moreno, Argentine Trotskyist leader (d. 1987)  April 28 – Kenneth Kaunda, former President of Zambia  April 29 –
WOMEN IN POLITICS: Elected in 1916, she was the subject of a 1995 biography called "Bright Star in the Big Sky"
Jeannette Rankin
Republican Jeannette Rankin of Montana becomes the first woman elected to the United States House of Representatives.
3
February 21 – WWI: The Battle of Verdun begins in France.
WWI: Siege of Kut ends with the surrender of British forces to the Ottoman Empire at Kut-al-Amara on the Tigris in Basra Vilayet during the Mesopotamian campaign.
Ernst Rüdin publishes his initial results on the genetics of schizophrenia.
THE WAR OF ART: A dismembered hand clutching a sword in black & white is part of this 1937 work inspired by the bombing of a city
Guernica
Spanish Civil War: Bombing of Guernica in Spain by the Condor Legion of the Nazi German Luftwaffe in support of the Francoists.
3
The coronation of King George VI and Queen Elizabeth takes place at Westminster Abbey, London.
July 20 –
September 21
MIDDLE-EARTH: This type of creature supplies the title of a 1937 Tolkien work; Frodo Baggins is one
Hobbit
George Allen & Unwin, Ltd. of London publishes the first edition of J. R. R. Tolkien's The Hobbit.
3
August 6 – Spanish Civil War:
Of Mice and Men by John Steinbeck is published.
William Martin Conway, British art critic and mountaineer (b. 1856) April 19 –
YOU'VE BEEN EXILED: During exile in the U.S. in 1915, ex-prez Victoriano Huerta of this country was thrown in prison
Mexico
Benjamin F. Isherwood, American admiral and United States Navy Engineer-in-Chief (b. 1822)  June 25 – Tok Janggut, Malayan rebel leader (killed in battle) (b. 1853)   July–December  thumb|right|110px|Paul Ehrlich thumb|right|110px|Alois Alzheimer  July 2 – Porfirio Díaz, former President of Mexico (b. 1830)  July 16 –
3
An act of the United States Congress designates the United States Coast Guard, began in 1790, as a military branch.
May 9 –
Romain Rolland  Medicine – not awarded  Peace – not awarded  Physics – William Henry Bragg and William Lawrence Bragg  Notes   References   1915 Coin Pictures  Pictures of the 1915 Galveston Hurricane at the University of Houston Digital Library
SCULPTURE: In 1915 Gutzon Borglum designed a memorial to the Confederacy on this Georgia mountain
Stone Mountain
– William J. Simmons revives the Civil War era Ku Klux Klan at Stone Mountain, Georgia.
3
Emory College is rechartered as Emory University, and plans to move its main campus from Oxford, Georgia to Atlanta.
This is the first time the British use poison gas in World War I and also their first large-scale use of 'New' or Kitchener's Army units.
Alexander Brott, Canadian conductor and composer (d. 2005)  March 17  Ray Ellington, British singer and bandleader (d. 1985)  Bill Roycroft, Australian equestrian (d. 2011)  March 19 –
EYE ON INDONESIA: This anticommunist general took power from Sukarno in 1966 & has run the country since
Suharto
March 11 Transition to the New Order in Indonesia: President Sukarno gives all executive powers to General Suharto by signing the "Supersemar" order.
3
The Indonesian army demands that the country rejoin the United Nations.
It is an initial failure, but gains a massive cult following in subsequent years.
Erik Aaes, Danish set designer and art director (b. 1899)  March 20  Laurence Abrams, English professional footballer (b. 1889)  Johnny Morrison, professional baseball player (b. 1895)  March 22  Bruno Bieler, German general during World War II (b. 1888)  Horrie Brain, Australian rules footballer (b. 1885)  Henry Bray, Australian rules footballer (b. 1891)  Gen. Sir Dallas Brooks, British military commander, Governor of Victoria, Australia (b. 1896)  March 23  Peggy Allenby, American silent film, television, and radio actress (b. 1901)  August Bach, East German politician (b. 1897)  Bertil Bothén, Swedish sailor, competitor at the 1912 Summer Olympics (b. 1892)  March 24    Carl Becker, German Wehrmacht general during World War II (b. 1895)  Joseph Leonard Burley, Australian rules football executive (b. 1878)  March 25 – G.R. Blanco White, English judge (b. 1883)  March 26 –
U.S. CONGRESSES: Number of the Congress that began its term in 1789
1st
At Federal Hall in New York City, the 1st United States Congress meets and declares the new United States Constitution to be in effect.
3
July 10 –
September 22 – Russo-Turkish War (1787–92)
Petrus Camper, Dutch anatomist (b. 1722)  April 13 –
THE "BALD" & THE BEAUTIFUL: In 1782 it became a national symbol
bald eagle
The bald eagle is chosen as the emblem of the United States of America.
3
December 14 –
William Miller, American preacher (d. 1849)  January 18 – Daniel Webster, American statesman (d. 1852)  March 4 –
Henry Home, Lord Kames, Scottish advocate and philosopher (b. 1697)
VOLCANOES: This Indonesian volcano just west of Java erupted in 1883 causing sea waves almost 130 feet high
Krakatoa
August 26–August 28 – Krakatoa volcano erupts at 10:02 AM (local time); 163 villages are destroyed, 36,380 killed.
3
February –
February 23 –
The Mexican government passes a law allowing real estate companies (controlled by General Porfirio Díaz's political associates) to survey public and "vacant" lands and to retain one third of the land they survey.
BY HALVES: After being made with a new metal in 1883, the U.S. coin known as the half dime became known as this
nickel
During construction of the Canadian Pacific Railway in 1883, blasting and excavation reveal high concentrations of nickel–copper ore at Murray Mine on the edge of the Sudbury Basin located near Sudbury, Ontario, Canada.
3
The Adventures of Pinocchio by Carlo Collodi is first published complete in book form in Italy.
He is succeeded by Carl Johan Thyselius,                          the first non-aristocrat ( Swedish ; "ofrälse" ) to serve as Swedish head of government, and Prime Minister.
Toivo Kuula, Finnish composer (d. 1918)  July 10 –
QUOTATIONS IN LITERATURE: In this 1883 children's classic, a parrot named Captain Flint squawks, "Pieces of eight!  Pieces of eight!"
Treasure Island
May 23 – Robert Louis Stevenson's children's pirate adventure novel Treasure Island is first published in book format, in London.
3
A fire at the Newhall Hotel in Milwaukee kills 73 people.
July 22 – Zulu King Cetshwayo barely escapes a rebel attack with his life.
September 15  The Bombay Natural History Society is founded.
SCIENCE: A 1991 photo of Gaspra taken by the Galileo probe was the first close-up of one of these minor planets
Asteroid
October 29  The American Galileo spacecraft makes its closest approach to 951 Gaspra, becoming the first probe to visit an asteroid.
3
Dublin begins its year as the European Capital of Culture.
July 17 – President Bush and President Gorbachev reach an agreement on START II, which is formally signed on July 31.
October 7 –
THE FOOD BUSINESS: In 1991 Louis Rich introduced a bacon made out of this meat
turkey
March   March–April – Iraqi forces suppress rebellions in the southern and northern parts of the country, creating a humanitarian disaster on the borders of Turkey and Iran.
3
A deadly earthquake kills at least 1,200 people in Pakistan and Afghanistan.
In the Finnish parliamentary election, the Centre Party wins 55 of 200 seats in the Parliament of Finland, ending 25 years of dominance by the Social Democratic Party of Finland.
The Soviet Union responds with similar unilateral reductions on October 5.
THE 1990s: George Holliday videotaped the LAPD's notorious encounter with this man in 1991
Rodney King
March 3  An amateur video captures the beating of motorist Rodney King by Los Angeles police officers.
3
March 9 –
Alba Riquelme, Paraguayan model  February 8 – Nam Woo-hyun, South Korean singer, dancer and actor.
Aiden Grimshaw, English singer  December 9  Prince Joachim of Belgium, Archduke of Austria-Este, Belgian prince  Choi Minho, South Korean rapper and TV host SHINee  December 12  Dyllan Christopher, American actor  Daniel Magder, Canadian actor  December 11 –
THE NATIONAL FILM REGISTRY: Films from 1940 include this Disney puppet tale & the ever-popular "Tacoma Narrows Bridge Collapse"
Pinocchio
RKORandy Orton release Walt Disney's second full-length animated film, Pinocchio.
3
May   May 6 –
Armistice Day Blizzard: An unexpected blizzard kills 144 in the Midwestern United States.
Carol Heiss, American figure skater  January 21  Jeremy Jacobs, American businessman, owner (Boston Bruins)  Jack Nicklaus, American golfer  January 22 –
SOUTH AMERICA: Abdicating in 1889, this Brazilian emperor was the last monarch in the Americas
Pedro
Field Marshal Deodoro da Fonseca organizes a military coup which deposes Emperor Pedro II of Brazil and abolishes the Brazilian monarchy.
3
November 15 –
William D. Francis, Australian botanist (d. 1959)  March 7 –
June 10 – Abraham Hochmuth, Hungarian rabbi (b. 1816)  June 15 – Mihai Eminescu, Romanian poet (b. 1850)  June 25 –
THE OLD WEST: Wyatt Earp's brother Morgan survived this 1881 gunfight but was murdered 5 months later
O.K. Corral
The Gunfight at the O.K. Corral occurs in Tombstone, Cochise County, Arizona, USA.  October 29 – Judge (U.S. magazine) is first published.
3
October 13 –
New York City's oldest independent school for girls, the Convent of the Sacred Heart New York (91st Street), is founded.
Irving Langmuir, American chemist, Nobel Prize laureate (d. 1957)  February 11 –
FAST FOOD: In 1962 Glen Bell opened the first of these fast food restaurants in Downey, California
Taco Bell
March 21 – Taco Bell fast food restaurant chain is founded by Glen Bell in Downey, California.
3
Heavy storms flood Germany's North Sea coast, mainly around Hamburg; more than 300 people die and thousands lose their homes.
May 2  An OAS bomb explodes in Algeria – this and other attacks kill 110 and injure 147.
November 3 – Earliest recorded use of the term "personal computer" in the report of a speech by computing pioneer John Mauchly in The New York Times.
WORLD NEWS: It gained independence from France in 1962; now a new constitution allows multiple political parties
Algeria
French President Charles de Gaulle calls for Algeria to be granted independence.
3
The Dubliners is formed at O'Donoghue's Pub in Dublin.
Jim Carrey, Canadian actor and comedian  January 18 – Mike Lynch, American cartoonist  January 20  IKKO, Japanese make-up artist  Sakiko Tamagawa, Japanese voice actress  Sophie Thompson, English actress  January 21  Tyler Cowen, American economist  Marie Trintignant, French actress (d. 2003)  January 22  Mizan Zainal Abidin, current Yang di-Pertuan Agong of Malaysia  Lyudmila Dzhigalova, Russian athlete  January 23  Stephen Keshi, Nigerian footballer and manager  Richard Roxburgh, Australian actor  January 25 –
R. H. Tawney, English historian and social critic (b. 1880)  January 19 –
LABOR: In 1962 federal employees were given the right to organize, but not the right to do this, as other workers can
Strike
A 2-day steel strike begins in Italy in support of increased wages and a five-day working week.
3
January 3 –
June 6 –
Aida Turturro, American actress  September 26  Melissa Sue Anderson, American actress  Gregory Crewdson, American photographer  Steve Moneghetti, Australian long-distance runner  Al Pitrelli, American guitarist  Jacky Wu, Taiwanese talk show host, singer and actor  September 27 –
CHAMPIONS: Emmanuel Lasker was world champion of this game from 1894 until defeated by Capablanca in 1921
Chess
Arthur Grumiaux, Belgian violinist (d. 1986)  March 24  Wilson Harris, Guyanese writer  Vasily Smyslov, Soviet chess player (d. 2010)  March 25 –
3
Women's suffrage is attained in Sweden.
Jancsó thumb|right|120px|Deborah Kerr
September 2 – Josephine Lenard, American professional baseball player (d. 2007)  September 3 –
FAMOUS FIRSTS: In 1876 this man became the first person not to get a busy signal on the other end of a phone line
Alexander Graham Bell
March 7 – Alexander Graham Bell is granted a United States patent for an invention he calls the telephone (patent #174,466).
3
Morgan Bulkeley of the Hartford Dark Blues is selected as the league's first President.
May 17 – Nikolaus Otto files his patent for the four-stroke cycle internal combustion engine.
The Transcontinental Express arrives in San Francisco via the First Transcontinental Railroad, 83 hours and 39 minutes after having left New York City.
AMERICAN LITERATURE: This title character in an 1876 novel asks, "Does a boy get a chance to whitewash a fence every day?"
Tom Sawyer
June 24 – First published review of The Adventures of Tom Sawyer by Mark Twain, in a British magazine; the book's first edition had appeared earlier in June in England.
3
November 4 –
November 7 – U.S. presidential election, 1876: After long and heated disputes, Rutherford Birchard Hayes is eventually declared the winner over Samuel Jones Tilden.
William Sealy Gosset, English chemist (d. 1937)  June 19 – Sir Nigel Gresley, English steam locomotive engineer (Flying Scotsman & Mallard) (d. 1941)   July–September  thumb|110px|right|Wilhelm Cuno thumb|110px|right|Mata Hari thumb|110px|right|Muhammad Ali Jinnah thumb|110px|right|Adolf Otto Reinhold Windaus  July 2 – Wilhelm Cuno, Chancellor of Germany (d. 1933)  July 12   Max Jacob, French poet (d. 1944)  Alphaeus Philemon Cole, American portrait painter, engraver, and etcher (d. 1988)  July 16 – Alfred Stock, German chemist (d. 1946)  July 19 – Joseph Fielding Smith, president of The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints (d. 1972)  August 7 – Mata Hari, exotic dancer and spy (d. 1917)  August 17  Eric Drummond, 16th Earl of Perth, British politician (d. 1951)   Henri Winkelman, Dutch general (d. 1952)  August 25 – Eglantyne Jebb, English co-founder of the Save the Children Fund and champion of children's human rights (d. 1928)  September 1 –
SUPREME COURT REJECTS: This president lost Haynsworth & Carswell but won with Harry Blackmun in 1970
Nixon
President Nixon assigns military units to New York City post offices.
3
June June 1 – Soyuz 9, a two-man spacecraft, is launched in the Soviet Union.
The wreck of the Confederate submarine Hunley is found off Charleston, South Carolina, by pioneer underwater archaeologist, Dr. E. Lee Spence,Cover Story: Time Capsule
E. L. Grant Watson, Australian scientist and writer (b. 1885) May 22 – Joseph Wood Krutch, American writer and naturalist.
1807: Later to lead the revolutionary Redshirts, he was born on the Fourth of July
Garibaldi
Ann Pouder, supercentenarian (d. 1917)  April 20 – John Milton, Governor of Florida (d. 1865)  May 28 – Louis Agassiz, French zoologist and geologist (d. 1873)  June 6 – Adrien-François Servais, Belgian musician (d. 1866)   July–December  thumb|110px|right|Giuseppe Garibaldi  July 4 – Giuseppe Garibaldi, Italian patriot (d. 1882)  August 8 – Emilie Flygare-Carlén, Swedish author (d. 1892)  August 11 –
3
__NOTOC__   Events   January–March   February – Napoleon attacks Russia.
Harriet Taylor, English philosophical writer (d. 1858)
Jean-François Rewbell, French politician (b. 1747)  December 19 –
OLD NAMES ON THE MAP: After the British took over this island in 1797, the anglicized Puerto de Espana to Port of Spain
Trinidad
Spanish Governor José María Chacón peacefully surrenders the colony of Trinidad to a British naval force commanded by Sir Ralph Abercromby.
3
January 26 –
British troops attack protestors against enforced recruitment into the militia at Tranent in Scotland, killing 12.
I of Germany thumb|110px|right|Heinrich Heine  January 1 – Utagawa Kuniyoshi,  Japanese woodblock print or ukiyo-e  (d. 1861)  January 10 – Annette von Droste-Hülshoff, German writer (d. 1848)  January 31 –
CHARITY: In 1971 this Beatle headlined the "Concert for Bangladesh", rock music's first major charity event
Harrison
Births    January  thumb|right|120px|Jeremy Renner thumb|right|120px|Pep Guardiola thumb|right|120px|Lee Young-ae  January 1  Sammie Henson, American wrestler, Olympic silver medalist  Bridget Pettis, American basketball player  January 2  Lisa Harrison, American basketball player  Taye Diggs, African-American actor  January 3 – Cory Cross, Canadian ice hockey player  January 5 – Mayuko Takata, Japanese actress  January 7  DJ Ötzi, Austrian entertainer and singer  Jeremy Renner, American actor, singer and producer  January 9 – Scott Thornton, Canadian hockey player  January 11 – Mary J. Blige, African-American singer  January 12 – Jay Burridge, British artist and television presenter  January 13 –
3
Cambodian Prime Minister Lon Nol resigns, but remains effectively in power until the next elections.
The Harris Poll claims that 60% of Americans are against the Vietnam War.
July 10–July 11 –
FIRE WHEN READY: A 1967 accident aboard the U.S.S. Forrestal, one of these ships, caused a tragic fire
aircraft carrier
July 29  An explosion and fire aboard the U.S. Navy aircraft carrier  in the Gulf of Tonkin leaves 134 dead.
3
A military coup takes place in Sierra Leone.
President Gamal Abdal Nasser of Egypt demands withdrawal of the peacekeeping UN Emergency Force in the Sinai.
August 18 – The State of Tamil Nadu, India is established.
SOUTH AFRICA: In 1967 this South African surgeon performed the world's first human heart transplant
Christiaan Barnard
December 3 – Christiaan Barnard carries out the world's first heart transplant at Groote Schuur Hospital in Cape Town.
3
New Orleans District Attorney Jim Garrison claims he will solve the John F. Kennedy assassination, and that a conspiracy was planned in New Orleans.
May 25 -
Richard Herring, British comedian and writer  July 13 –
NORDIC TRACK: In 1965 UNICEF won this honor bestowed by a committee elected by the Norwegian parliament
the Nobel Peace Prize
August 150px|thumb|Le Corbusier  August 6  Nancy Carroll, American actress (b. 1903)  Everett Sloane, American actor (b. 1909)  August 8 – Shirley Jackson, American author (b. 1916)  August 9 – Creighton Hale, American actor (b. 1882)  August 13 – Hayato Ikeda, former Prime Minister of Japan (b. 1899)  August 25 – Moonlight Graham, American baseball player (b. 1879)  August 27 – Le Corbusier, Swiss architect (b. 1887)  August 28 – Giulio Racah, Israeli physicist (b. 1909)  August 29 – Paul Waner, American baseball player (Pittsburgh Pirates) and a member of the MLB Hall of Fame (b. 1903)  September  September 4  Alfred Bossom, English architect and politician (b. 1881)  Albert Schweitzer, Alsatian physician and missionary, recipient of the Nobel Peace Prize (b. 1875)  September 8  Dorothy Dandridge, American actress (b. 1922)  Hermann Staudinger, German chemist, Nobel Prize laureate (b. 1881)  September 10 – Bobby Jordan, American actor (b. 1923)  September 14 – J. W. Hearne, English cricketer (b. 1891)  September 15 – Steve Brown, American musician (b. 1890)  September 16 – Fred Quimby, American animated film producer (b. 1886)  September 25 – Henry Hugh Tudor, British general (b. 1871)  September 27  Clara Bow, American silent film actress (b. 1905)  Sir William Stanier, English steam locomotive engineer (London, Midland and Scottish Railway) (b. 1876)  October  October 1 – Gareth Hughes, Welsh actor (b. 1894)  October 3 – Zachary Scott, American actor (b. 1914)  October 6 –
3
Operation Hump: The 173rd Airborne is ambushed by over 1,200 Viet Cong.
December 5  Charles de Gaulle is re-elected as French president with 10,828,421 votes.
Dorothy Kilgallen, American newspaper columnist (b. 1913)  November 12 –
TENNIS: In the Astrodome in 1973, Billie Jean King beat this senior male player in a "Battle of the Sexes"
Bobby Riggs
May 13 Bobby Riggs challenges and defeats Margaret Court, the world's #1 women's player, in a nationally-televised tennis match set in Ramona, CA northeast of San Diego.
3
The Bahamas gains full independence within the Commonwealth of Nations.
December 3 – Pioneer program: Pioneer 10 sends back the first close-up images of Jupiter.
Date unknown  ODECA functions are suspended.
GOING COUNTRY: In 1975 the fall of Saigon ended the war in this country
Vietnam
January 20  In Hanoi, North Vietnam, the Politburo approves the final military offensive against South Vietnam.
3
June 23 – Markus Zusak, writer of the Book Thief and Messenger is born.
Elijah Muhammad, African-American Nation of Islam leader (b. 1897)  February 26 – Stephen Tibble, London police officer (shot) (b. 1953)  February 28 – Sir Neville Cardus, British music and cricket writer (b. 1888)  March thumb|110px|right|George Stevens  March 3 – Therese Giehse, German actress (b. 1898)  March 7  Mikhail Bakhtin, Russian philosopher and literary scholar (b. 1895)  Ben Blue, Canadian actor and comedian (b. 1901)  March 8 – George Stevens, American director, producer, and cinematographer (b. 1904)  March 9  Gleb W. Derujinsky, Russian American sculptor (b. 1888)  Joseph Dunninger, American mentalist (b. 1892)  March 10 –
David Baltimore, Renato Dulbecco, Howard Martin Temin  Literature –
THAT '70s SHOW: Beginning in 1978 it was the Barnes family versus the Ewings on this prime-time soap
Dallas
April 2 – Dallas debuted on CBS and gave birth to the modern day primetime soap opera.
3
March 17 –
Panama recognizes the Sahrawi Arab Democratic Republic (SADR).
December 25 – Vietnam launches a major offensive against the Khmer Rouge of Cambodia.
SMILE!: In office for only 33 days in 1978, he was there long enough to earn the sobriquet "The Smiling Pope"
John Paul I
Pope John Paul I succeeds Pope Paul VI as the 263rd Pope.
3
February 8 – United States Senate proceedings are broadcast on radio for the first time.
October 20 –
Candice Michelle, American professional wrestler and model   October  thumb|right|150px|James Valentine thumb|right|150px|Usher thumb|right|150px|Virendra Sehwag thumb|right|150px|CM Punk  October 2 –
USA: This city's first casino opened in 1978 & took in more than $2 million its first week
Atlantic City
In Atlantic City, New Jersey, Resorts International, the first legal casino in the eastern United States, opens.
3
May 20 – Mavis Hutchinson, 53, becomes the first woman to run across the U.S.; her trek took 69 days.
Jenny Frost, English singer (Atomic Kitten)
Ruben Studdard, African-American singer  September 14  Ben Cohen, English rugby union player  Carmen Kass, Estonian supermodel  September 15  Eiður Guðjohnsen, Icelandic football player  David Sneddon, Scottish singer-songwriter  September 20  Jason Bay, Canadian baseball player  Patrizio Buanne, Italian singer  Sarit Hadad, Israeli pop singer  September 21 – Doug Howlett, New Zealand rugby union player  September 22 –
QUOTATIONS: On signing the 1979 peace treaty with Israel, this Egyptian said, "Let there be no more suffering or denial of rights"
Anwar Sadat
In a ceremony at the White House, President Anwar Sadat of Egypt and Prime Minister Menachem Begin of Israel sign a peace treaty.
3
June 25 – Belgium: NATO Supreme Allied Commander Alexander Haig escapes an assassination attempt by the Baader-Meinhof terrorist organization.
The Sony Walkman goes on sale for the first time in Japan.
Nuclear false alarm: the NORAD computers and the Alternate National Military Command Center in Fort Ritchie, Maryland, detect an apparent massive Soviet nuclear strike.
1987: This British prime minister won a rare third term in June
Margaret Thatcher
March 31 – Margaret Thatcher, Prime Minister of the United Kingdom, is given a 45-minute interview on television in the Soviet Union.
3
The Simpsons cartoon first appears as a series of shorts on The Tracey Ullman Show.
Microsoft releases Windows 2.0.
Fargo (1996): The film takes place in Minnesota, 1987  Adventureland (2009): The film takes place in Pittsburgh, summer 1987  Romy and Michele's High School Reunion (1997): The year that Romy and Michele had their high school prom and graduated takes place in Los Angeles 1987    Precious:
SCI-FI TV: A deep space probe (launched in 1987!) ended up getting this guy frozen in suspended animation until "the 25th century"
Buck Rogers
The scene at the start with Jordan Belfort takes place in New York City 1987  Television:  Buck Rogers in the 25th Century (1979): NASA launches the last of America's deep-space probes, the Space Shuttle Ranger 3, which is piloted by Captain William "Buck" Rogers.
3
May   May 9 –
May 27 –
U.S. warships destroy 2 Iranian oil platforms in the Persian Gulf.
QUOTATIONS: The London Times quoted her in 1987: "I don't mind how much my ministers talk--as long as they do what I say"
Thatcher
March 31 – Margaret Thatcher, Prime Minister of the United Kingdom, is given a 45-minute interview on television in the Soviet Union.
3
November 1 – InterCity 125 breaks world diesel powered train speed record reaching 238 km/h (147.88 mph).
Microsoft releases Windows 2.0.
December 17  Gustáv Husák resigns as General Secretary of the Communist Party of Czechoslovakia.
AMERICAN HISTORY: This statue got a new torch in 1986; the old one was 100 years old
the Statue of Liberty
The Statue of Liberty is reopened to the public after an extensive refurbishment.
3
February 7 – President Jean-Claude Duvalier ("Baby Doc") flees Haiti, ending 28 years of family rule.
One of the victims, Michael Griffith, is run over and killed by a motorist while attempting to flee the attackers.
Howard Da Silva, American actor (b. 1909)  February 17  Jiddu Krishnamurti, Indian philosopher (b. 1895)  Red Ruffing, American baseball player (New York Yankees) and member of the MLB Hall of Fame (b. 1905)  February 19 – Francisco Mignone, Brazilian classical music (b. 1897)  February 21  Helen Hooven Santmyer, American writer (b. 1895)  Mart Stam, Dutch architect (b. 1899)  February 24 –
1986: On April 26 one of the reactors in this Ukrainian nuclear plant went out of control
Chernobyl
Chernobyl disaster: A mishandled safety test at the Chernobyl Nuclear Power Plant in Pripyat, Ukrainian SSR, Soviet Union "killed at least 4056 people and damaged almost $7 billion of property".
3
January 25 – Yoweri Museveni's National Resistance Army Rebel group takes over Uganda after leading a 5-year guerrilla war in which up to half a million people are believed to have been killed.
March 8 –
Kim Ok-bin, South Korean actress and model  December 30 –
"Y"s: After this, the world's first national park, was created in 1872, hunting was still legal there
Yellowstone
March 1 – In the United States, Yellowstone National Park (once dubbed "Colter's Hell" after John Colter, of the Lewis and Clark Expedition) is established as the world's first national park.
3
The magazine Popular Science is first published in the United States.
July–September   July 4 –
John O'Connell, American baseball player (d. 1908)  May 18 – Bertrand Russell, English philosopher and mathematician, recipient of the Nobel Prize in Literature (d. 1970)  May 21 –
INSPIRED CHARACTERS: This Victorian P.M.'s scandalous affair with Lady Henrietta Sykes inspired his 1877 novel "Henrietta Temple"
Benjamin Disraeli
Events    January–March   January 1 – Queen Victoria is proclaimed Empress of India by the Royal Titles Act 1876, introduced by Benjamin Disraeli, the Prime Minister of the United Kingdom .
3
The army loses 29 soldiers and the Indians lose 89 warriors in an Army victory.
Russian forces successfully reduce the Ottoman fortress at Lovcha.
thumb|right|110px|Frederick Soddy  July 2   Rinaldo Cuneo, American artist ("the painter of San Francisco") (d. 1939)  Hermann Hesse, German-born writer, Nobel Prize laureate (d. 1962)  July 3 – Shafiqah Shasha (شفيقة شعشع), Lebanese-Australian matriarch (d. 1953)  July 6 – Arnaud Massy, French golfer (d. 1950)  July 13 – Erik Scavenius, Prime Minister of Denmark (d. 1962)  July 17 –
THE 1930s: Harbour Bridge, one of the largest arch bridges in the world, opened in this city in 1932, mate
Sydney
The Sydney Harbour Bridge opens.
3
January 3 –
May 6 –
October 23 – Fred Allen's radio comedy show debuts on CBS in the United States.
FROM THE CIA WORLD FACTBOOK: Though illegal, the Muslim Brotherhood is the main opposition to this African in power since 1981
Hosni Mubarak
October 14 – Vice President Hosni Mubarak is elected President of Egypt, one week after Anwar Sadat was  assassinated.
3
December   December 1 – An Inex-Adria Aviopromet McDonnell Douglas MD-80 strikes a mountain peak and crashes while approaching Ajaccio Airport in Corsica, killing all 180 people on board.
Births  January  thumb|right|150px|Pitbull thumb|right|150px|Alicia Keys thumb|right|150px|Elijah Wood thumb|right|150px|Justin Timberlake  January 1  Zsolt Baumgartner, Hungarian race car driver  Mladen Petrić, Croatian football player  Eden Riegel, American actress  January 2 – Maxi Rodríguez, Argentine footballer  January 3 –
January 22  Chantelle Anderson, American basketball player  Willa Ford, American singer, television hostess, and actress  Beverley Mitchell, American actress  Ben Moody, American guitarist (formerly of Evanescence)  January 25  Alicia Keys, American singer  Toše Proeski, Macedonian singer (d. 2007)  January 26 –
CAMILLA: In an irony to end all ironies, Prince Charles proposed to this woman in 1981 on the grounds of Camilla's estate
Lady Diana Spencer
A worldwide television audience of over 700 million people watch the Wedding of Charles, Prince of Wales, and Lady Diana Spencer at St Paul's Cathedral in London.
3
In Riyadh, the Gulf Cooperation Council is created between Bahrain, Kuwait, Oman, Qatar, Saudi Arabia and the United Arab Emirates.
Kiribati, Papua New Guinea, Nauru, Solomon Islands and Tuvalu recognize the Sahrawi Arab Democratic Republic (SADR).
November 23 – Iran–Contra affair: U.S. President Ronald Reagan signs the top secret National Security Decision Directive 17 (NSDD-17), authorizing the Central Intelligence Agency to recruit and support Contra rebels in Nicaragua.
1981: This man shot President Reagan, James Brady & 2 security men in March
John Hinckley
March 30 – U.S. President Ronald Reagan is shot in the chest outside a Washington, D.C. hotel by John Hinckley, Jr.; 2 police officers and Press Secretary James Brady are also wounded.
3
May 11 – Bob Marley dies aged 36 from cancer.
The Pope successfully recovers.
George McCartney, British footballer  May  thumb|150px|Shiri Maimon thumb|150px|Daniel Bryan thumb|right|150px|Georges St-Pierre thumb||right|150px|Stephen Amell  May 1  Alexander Hleb, Belarusian football player  Wes Welker, American football player  May 2 – Rina Satō, Japanese voice actress  May 3  Farrah Franklin, American singer  Natalie Tong, Hong Kong actress  U;Nee, South Korean singer and actress (d. 2007)  May 4 – Jacques Rudolph, South African cricketer  May 5  Craig David, English singer  Danielle Fishel, American actress  May 8  Andrés Romero, Argentine golfer  Stephen Amell, Canadian actor  May 11  Lauren Jackson, Australian basketball player  Daisuke Matsui, Japanese football player  Dusán Mukics, Slovene journalist and reporter in Hungary  Terry Pheto, South African actress  May 12  Rami Malek, American actor  Kentaro Sato, Japanese composer  May 13  Rebecka Liljeberg, Swedish actress  Sunny Leone, Canadian pornstar and Bollywood actress  Jimmy Wang Yang, Korean professional wrestler  May 15
YOU'RE HISTORY!: In 1542 this 50ish SWK (single white king) was looking for lucky wife No. 6
King Henry VIII
This time King Henry VIII of England is allied to the Emperor, while James V of Scotland and Sultan Suleiman I are allied to the French.
3
Date unknown   The first contact of Japan with the West occurs when a Portuguese ship, blown off its course to China, lands Fernão Mendes Pinto, Diogo Zeimoto and Cristovão Borralho in Japan.
Lucas Fernández, Spanish dramatist and musician (born c. 1474)
References     Category:World Digital Library related
GEORGIA ON MY MIND: Stolen during the 1862 Andrews railroad raid, this locomotive is on display in Kennesaw, Georgia
the General
Andrew's Raid - Union volunteers steal a Confederate locomotive, setting off the Great Locomotive Chase, famously involving the use of The General steam locomotive, which still exists in the 21st century.
3
April 25 – American Civil War  –
Meanwhile, the Battle of Stones River opens near Murfreesboro, Tennessee.
William E. Johnson, American leader of the Anti-Saloon League (d. 1950)  March 28 – Aristide Briand, French politician, winner of the Nobel Peace Prize (d. 1932)  March 29 – Adolfo Müller-Ury, Swiss-born American painter (d. 1947)   April–June   April 2 –
COLLEGES & UNIVERSITIES: Girton, Cambridge University's 1st college for these people, was founded in 1869
women
The P.E.O. Sisterhood, a philanthropic educational organization for women, is founded at Iowa Wesleyan College in Mount Pleasant, Iowa.
3
June 30-July 2 –
November 19 –
Max Hoffmann, German general (d. 1927)  February 11  Helene Kröller-Müller, Dutch museum founder and patron of the arts (d. 1939) Else Lasker-Schüler, German-born poet and author (d. 1945)  February 14 –
1899: Just days after he was found guilty in a retrial, this French Army Captain was pardoned
Dreyfus
September 19 – Alfred Dreyfus is pardoned in France.
3
June 25 –
The FC Barcelona Association football club is founded.
December 16  The Association football club A.C. Milan is founded in Italy.
MICROBIOLOGY MILESTONES: In 1892 Dimitri Ivanovski showed there were agents smaller than bacteria causing disease; we know them as these
viruses
Viruses are discovered by the Russian–Ukrainian biologist Dimitri Ivanovski.
3
April–June   April –
The Cook Islands issue their first postage stamps.
July 8 –
1891: One of his patents that year was for a motion-picture projector, the kinetoscope
Thomas Edison
May 20 – Thomas Edison's prototype kinetoscope is first displayed at Edison's Laboratory, for a convention of the National Federation of Women's Clubs.
3
October 1 – Stanford University in California opens its doors.
thumb|110px|right| October 1 Stanford University opens its doors.
New Scotland Yard becomes the HQ of the London Metropolitan Police.
NOTORIOUS: After a serious illness in 37 A.D., this Roman emperor became cruel & mentally unbalanced
Caligula
The Roman Senate annuls Tiberius's will and proclaims Caligula Roman Emperor.
3
The denomination 37 for this year has been used since the early medieval period, when the Anno Domini calendar era became the prevalent method in Europe for naming years.
April 9 –
Births   December 15 – Nero, Roman Emperor (d. 68 AD)  Josephus, Jewish historian (d. c. 100 AD)   Deaths   March 16 –
NOTABLE WOMEN: Many believe her 1985 murder was in retaliation for her trying to stop the poaching of gorillas in Africa
Dian Fossey
American naturalist Dian Fossey is found murdered in Rwanda.
3
Sarney will become Brazil's first civilian president in 21 years, upon Neves' death on April 21.
June 15 – Studio Ghibli, an animation studio, is founded in Tokyo.
September   September 1 – The wreck of the RMS Titanic (1912) in the North Atlantic is located by a joint American-French expedition led by Dr. Robert Ballard (WHOI) and Jean-Louis Michel (IFREMER) using side-scan sonar from RV Knorr.
TAKE THIS CATEGORY LAST!!: In the category "SINGERS", each of the vocalists sang on this 1985 Quincy Jones-produced song
"We Are The World"
In Hollywood, the charity single "We Are the World" is recorded by USA for Africa.
3
U.S. Vice President George H. W. Bush serves as Acting President for 8 hours, while President Ronald Reagan undergoes colon cancer surgery at Bethesda Naval Medical Center in Bethesda, Maryland.
October 3 –
Percy Fender, English cricketer (b. 1892)  June 17 –
MRS. SMITH GOES TO WASHINGTON: In 1989 she was awarded the Presidential Medal of this
Freedom
August 23  Two million indigenous people of Estonian, Latvian and Lithuanian SSRs join hands to demand freedom and independence from Soviet occupation, forming an uninterrupted 600 km human chain called the Baltic Way.
3
March 24 – Exxon Valdez oil spill: In Alaska's Prince William Sound, the Exxon Valdez spills  of oil after running aground.
Boris Yeltsin gains a seat on the Supreme Soviet of the Soviet Union.
Tadeusz Mazowiecki of Solidarity is elected Prime Minister of Poland.
THE CANINE FILM FESTIVAL: A cocker spaniel & a mutt are the title characters of this 1955 animated classic
Lady and the Tramp
June 16 – Lady and the Tramp, the Walt Disney company's 15th animated film, premieres in Chicago.
3
January 28 – United States Congress authorizes President Dwight D. Eisenhower to use force to protect Formosa from the People's Republic of China.
Karen Dotrice, Guernsey-born child actress  November 10 – Roland Emmerich, German film director  November 11 –
Ray Ozzie, American computer programmer  November 21  Kyle Gann, American composer and music critic  Cedric Maxwell, American basketball player  November 22 – George Alagiah, Ceylonese-born British newsreader, journalist and television news presenter  November 23  Steven Brust, American author  Ludovico Einaudi, Italian pianist and composer  November 24 – Sir Ian Botham, English cricketer  November 25 – Bruno Tonioli, film, music video and theater choreographer  November 26 – Tracy Hickman, American author  November 27 –
NEWSPAPERS & MAGAZINES: A former foreign editor of Time magazine founded this rival of Time in 1933
Newsweek
February 17  Newsweek magazine is published for the first time in the United States.
3
January 11 – Sir Charles Kingsford Smith makes the first commercial flight between Australia and New Zealand.
An earthquake in Long Beach, California kills 117 people.
The American Totalisator Company unveils its first electronic pari-mutuel betting machine at the Arlington Park race track near Chicago.
BUSINESS & INDUSTRY: The 1997 model of this Chevrolet sports car is only the 4th redesign since its 1953 introduction
Corvette
June 30  The first Chevrolet Corvette is built at Flint, Michigan.
3
April 16  President Eisenhower delivers his "Chance for Peace" speech to the National Association of Newspaper Editors.
October 6 – UNICEF, the United Nations Children's Fund, is made a permanent specialized agency of the United Nations.
December 2 –
ARTISTS: In 1922 Marc Chagall left this country, his native land
Russia
In the Russian Soviet Federative Socialist Republic, the Cheka becomes the Gosudarstvennoye Politicheskoye Upravlenie (GPU), a section of the NKVD.  February 14  Finnish Minister of the Interior Heikki Ritavuori is assassinated by Ernst Tandefelt.
3
Fighting in Dublin lasts until July 5.
The final signings of Treaty 11, an agreement between George V, King of Canada, and various Canadian First Nations, are conducted at Fort Liard.
A broadcasting license fee of ten shillings is introduced in the United Kingdom.
THE 16th CENTURY: In 1582 the man born Ugo Buoncompagni proclaimed this solar dating system still used today
the Gregorian calendar
However, this year also saw the beginning of the Gregorian Calendar switch, when the Papal bull known as Inter gravissimas introduced the Gregorian calendar, adopted by Spain, Portugal, the Polish–Lithuanian Commonwealth and most of present-day Italy from the start.
3
John Dee practices angel magic with scryer Edward Kelley, including the Angelic Alphabet.
May 1 – Marco da Gagliano, Italian composer (d. 1643)  May 28 – William Fiennes, 1st Viscount Saye and Sele, English statesman (d. 1662)  August 28 – Taichang Emperor, of the Ming dynasty of China (d. 1620)  October 17 –
Sigismondo d'India, Italian composer (d. 1629)   Deaths   January 26 – Thomas Platter, Swiss humanist scholar (b. 1499)  March 18 – Juan Jauregui, attempted assassin of William I of Orange (b. 1562)  March 30 –
"J" MART: He succeeded a daughter of Henry VIII in 1603
James I
thumb|King James I of England/VI of Scotland, the first monarch to rule the Kingdoms of England and Scotland at the same time.
3
March 24  Queen Elizabeth I of England dies at Richmond Palace (having ruled since 1558) and is succeeded by her cousin's grandson, King James VI of Scotland (where he has ruled since 1567), uniting the crowns of Scotland and England.
Ceremonies are limited because of plague.
September 20
REAL TO REEL: African captives revolt aboard their slave ship & then have to stand trial in this movie based on an 1839 event
Amistad
July 1  Slaves aboard the Amistad rebel and capture the ship.
3
A disastrous cyclone slams India with terrible winds and a giant 40-foot storm surge, wiping out the port city of Coringa; 300,000 people die.
Births    January–June  thumb|110px|right|Paul Cézanne thumb|110px|right|Josiah Willard Gibbs  January 8
Caroline Testman, women's rights activist  (d. 1919)  February 11  Josiah Willard Gibbs, American physicist and chemist (d. 1903)  Almon Strowger, American telecommunications engineer (d. 1902)  February 18 –
ASTRONOMY: In 1905 Percival Lowell began a search for this planet, which was discovered in 1930, 14 years after his death
Pluto
February 18  While studying photographs taken in January, Clyde Tombaugh confirms the existence of Pluto, a celestial body considered a planet until redefined as a dwarf planet in 2006.
3
May   May 5 – Mahatma Gandhi is re-arrested.
July 13 –
Cecil George Paine, a pathologist at the Sheffield Royal Infirmary in England, achieves the first recorded cure (of an eye infection) using penicillin.
FAMOUS AMERICANS: At his death in 1790, he left 200-year trust funds to the cities of Boston & Philadelphia
Benjamin Franklin
thumb|right|110px| Joseph II, Holy Roman Emperor  February 20 – Joseph II, Holy Roman Emperor (b. 1741)  March 4 – Henry Wisner, American Continental Congressman for New York (b. 1720)  March 12  András Hadik, Austro-Hungarian general (b. 1710)  William Grayson, American Continental Congressman and United States Senator for Virginia (b. 1740)  April 17 – Benjamin Franklin, American scientist and statesman (b. 1706)  May 4 – Matthew Tilghman, American Continental Congressman for Maryland (b. 1718)
3
February 4 – Louis XVI of France declares to the National Assembly that he will maintain the constitutional laws.
June 20 –
William Hooper, American signer of the Declaration of Independence and Continental Congressman for North Carolina (b. 1742)  October 19 –
PROTESTANTISM: This edict in effect from 1598 to 1685 allowed the Huguenots in France the freedom of worship
Edict of Nantes
April 13 – Edict of Nantes: Henry IV of France grants French Huguenots equal rights with  Catholics; this is considered the end of the French Wars of Religion.
3
thumb|September 25: Battle of Stångebro.
December 16 (November 19 (lunar calendar))
April 10 – Jacopo Mazzoni, Italian philosopher (b. 1548)  May 3 – Anna Guarini, Italian singer (b. 1563)  June –
MILLION: The "3 Million Bill" passed by Congress in 1847 appropriated $3 million for the purchase of land from this country
Mexico
United States forces under General Winfield Scott invade Mexico near Veracruz.
3
February 5 –
June 26 –
September 30 –
HODGEPODGE: In 1844 Charles Goodyear earned a patent to inhibit this material from melting & sticking
Rubber
June 15 – Charles Goodyear receives a patent for vulcanization, a process to strengthen rubber.
3
Annual British iron production reaches 3 million tons.
George Washington DeLong, American naval officer and explorer (d. 1881)  August 23 – Hamilton Disston, American land developer (d. 1896)  August 29 – Edward Carpenter, English Socialist poet (d. 1929)  August 30 – Emily Ruete, princess of Zanzibar (d. 1924)  September 13 – Ludwig von Falkenhausen, German general (d. 1936)  September 16 –
Alexandra of Denmark, queen of Edward VII of England (d. 1925)  December 8 – Émile Reynaud, French science teacher and animation pioneer (d. 1918)  December 18 – Takashima Tomonosuke, Japanese general (d. 1916)   Date unknown   probable –
ROYALTY: Originally, this woman born in 1755 had the middle names Antonia, Josepha, & Joanna
Marie Antoinette
John Marshall, American jurist (d. 1835)  November 2 – Marie Antoinette, Queen of France (d. 1793)  November 12 – Gerhard von Scharnhorst, Prussian general (d. 1813)  November 17  Louis XVIII of France (d. 1824)  Charles Manners-Sutton, Archbishop of Canterbury (d. 1828)   Deaths  thumb|left|110px|Montesquieu  February 10 – Montesquieu, French writer (b. 1689)  February 11 –
3
February 20 – General Braddock lands in Virginia to take command of the British forces against the French in North America.
thumb|150px|right| November 1:
Francesco Scipione, marchese di Maffei, Italian archaeologist (b. 1675)  March 2 – Louis de Rouvroy, duc de Saint-Simon, French writer (b. 1675)  April 6 –
THE U.S. ARMY: Opened in 1802, the U.S. Army's military academy is at West Point in this state
New York
The United States Army Corps of Engineers is re-established and the United States Military Academy at West Point, New York established under its management, opening on July 4.
3
April 26 –
By the Law of 20 May 1802, Napoleon reinstates slavery in the French colonies, revoking its abolition in the French Revolution.
Although poorly enforced, it pioneers a series of Factory Acts.
CLASSIC CARTOON CHARACTERS: The 1935 cartoon "I Haven't Got a Hat" was the first of many cartoons that paired him with a cat named Beans
Porky Pig
March 9 – Porky Pig makes his debut as the first major Looney Tunes character in I Haven't Got a Hat.
3
Births    January  thumb|150px|Elvis Presley  January 4 – Floyd Patterson, African-American boxer (d. 2006)  January 7  Kenny Davern, American jazz clarinetist (d. 2006)  Valeri Kubasov, Russian cosmonaut (d. 2014)  January 8 – Elvis Presley, American rock & roll singer, guitarist and film actor (d. 1977)  January 9  Bob Denver, American actor (d. 2005)  Earl G. Graves, Sr.
Fujio Akatsuka, Japanese cartoonist (d. 2008)  September 15 – Dinkha, Iraqi patriarch (d. 2015)  September 16  Carl Andre, American artist  Bob Kiley, American public transit planner  September 17  Ken Kesey, American author (d. 2001)  Serge and Beate Klarsfeld, Romanian Nazi hunter  September 18 – John Spencer, English snooker player (d. 2006)  September 21 –
Benjamin Abalos, Filipino politician, COMELEC Chairman  September 23 –
WORLD HISTORY: The Geneva Accords of 1954 split this SE Asian country in 2 at 17 degrees North latitude
Vietnam
After authorizing $385 million over the $400 million already budgeted for military aid to Vietnam, President of the United States Dwight D. Eisenhower warns against his country's intervention in Vietnam.
3
A C-47 transport with French nurse Geneviève de Galard on board is wrecked on the runway at Dien Bien Phu.
June 14 –
September 9 –
REWRITTEN TOMBSTONES: 1822-1885:"I don't want to hear any jokes about who's buried in my tomb"
Ulysses S. Grant
Ulysses S. Grant, 18th President of the United States (d. 1885)  May 20 – Frédéric Passy, French economist, recipient of the Nobel Peace Prize (d. 1912)  May 26 – Edmond de Goncourt, French writer (d. 1896)  May 11 –
3
The last public whipping is carried out in Edinburgh.
August 22 –
September 22 –
EARLY MAN: Homo erectus reached this island between 1 & 2 million B.C.; Homo Dutch traderensis, in 1596 A.D.
Java
Dutch ships, commanded by Frederick de Houtman, reach Sumatra and Java for the first time.
3
June 17 –
September 17 –
Serb Uprising of 1596–97   Births  thumb|110px|right|René Descartes
GAME SHOW HOSTS: An aggressive "60 Minutes" interviewer, back in the 1950s he hosted "Guess Again" & "The Big Surprise"
Mike Wallace
Initially, 60 Minutes aired as a bi-weekly show hosted by Harry Reasoner and Mike Wallace, debuting on September 24, 1968, and alternating weeks with other CBS News productions on Tuesday evenings at 10:00 p.m. Eastern Time.
3
Further, to extend the magazine motif, the producers added a "Vol.
Bryant Gumbel (1998–2002) - now at HBO Sports  Katie Couric (2006–2011)  Byron Pitts (2009–2013) - now at ABC News  Alison Stewart (2012) † = Deceased  Commentators Commentators for 60 Minutes have included:  Shana Alexander †
At the time, McVeigh had already been convicted and sentenced to death for the April 1995 bombing of the Alfred P. Murrah Federal Building and subsequent deaths of 168 people.
19th CENTURY NAMES: He wasn't "The Greatest", but he did rule Egypt from 1805 to 1848
Muhammad Ali
Muhammad Ali Pasha founds his dynasty in Egypt.
3
June 13 – Lewis and Clark Expedition in the United States:
October 16–19 – War of the Third Coalition, Ulm Campaign: Battle of Ulm –
John Lloyd Stephens, American traveler, diplomat and Mayanist archaeologist (d. 1852)  December 2 – Cicero Price, American commodore (d. 1888)  December 22 –
EXPLORATION: His ship the Half Moon reached the coast of Nova Scotia in 1609 & headed south as far as Chesapeake Bay
Hudson
English explorer Henry Hudson in the service of the Dutch East India Company sets out from Amsterdam in the Halve Maen.
3
April 4  King Philip III of Spain signs an edict to expel of all moriscos from his country (see September 11).
July 23 –
Cardinal-Infante Ferdinand of Austria, Governor of the Habsburg Netherlands (d. 1641)  June 29 – Pierre-Paul Riquet, French engineer and canal builder (d. 1680)  August 6 –
EARLY AMERICA: Drawn up in 1620, this document formed the basis of Plymouth Colony's legal system
The Mayflower Compact
41 Plymouth Colony settlers sign the Mayflower Compact, the first governing document of the colony, onboard the ship.
3
thumb|September: Battle of Cecora.
thumb|Back of a violin.
September 4 – Ernest Gottlieb, Prince of Anhalt-Plötzkau (d. 1654)  September 6 – Isabella Leonarda, Italian composer (d. 1704)  September 18 – Albert II, Margrave of Brandenburg-Ansbach, German prince (d. 1625)  September 29 – John Louis of Elderen (d. 1694)  October 1 – Nicolaes Pieterszoon Berchem, Dutch Golden Age painter of pastoral landscapes (d. 1683)  October 4 – François-Henri Salomon de Virelade, French lawyer (d. 1670)  October 15 – William Borlase (died 1665), English politician (d. 1665)  October 16 –
WHATEVER: Unlike most birds, which have 4, ostriches have this many toes on each foot, adapted to aid in running
2
Births   Columella, Roman writer (d. 70)  Daemusin of Goguryeo, King of Goguryeo (d. 44)  Some believe that Jesus of Nazareth was actually born this year  Deaths   Gaius Caesar (b. 20 BCE), son of Marcus Vipsanius Agrippa and Julia the Elder, dies from wounds suffered during a campaign in Artagira, Armenia.
3
Events  By place   Roman Empire   Emperor Caesar Augustus summons Tiberius to Rome, and names him his heir and future emperor.
The Lex Aelia Sentia regulates the manumission of slaves.
Wang Mang is given the title "superior duke".
4: To complete a foursome, mathematician Herman Minkowski added this to length, width & height
time
At the time, it was known as the Year of the Consulship of Catus and Saturninus (or, less frequently, year 757 Ab urbe condita).
2
Sextus Aelius Catus becomes consul.
References   Sources              als:0er#Johr 4
ATTENTION!: (4 x 22)divided by(11 x 8)equals this
1
By topic   Arts and sciences   Nicolaus of Damascus writes the 15-volume History of the World.
3
__NOTOC__ Year 4 (IV) was a common year starting on Wednesday or a leap year starting on Tuesday (link will display the full calendar) of the Julian calendar (the sources differ, see leap year error for further information) and a leap year starting on Tuesday of the Proleptic Julian calendar.
Julia the Elder returns from exile to live in Rhegium in disgrace.
References   Sources              als:0er#Johr 4
SCIENCE: Base 10 equivalent to the binary number "11"
3
At the time, throughout the Roman Empire it was known as the year of the consulship of Dolabella and Silanus (or, less frequently, year 763 ab urbe condita).
3
__NOTOC__ Year 10 (X) was a common year starting on Wednesday (link will display the full calendar) of the Julian calendar.
Events   By place    Roman Empire    Differentiation of localized Teutonic tribes of the Irminones.
By topic    Arts    Ovid completes Tristia (the "Sorrows", 5 books) and Epistulae ex Ponto (Letters from the Black Sea, 4 books) describing the sadness of banishment.
HITHER & YON: Of 6, 12 or 18, the number of streets that radiate out from the Arc de Triomphe
12
__NOTOC__ Year 12 (XII) was a leap year starting on Friday (link will display the full calendar) of the Julian calendar.
2
At the time it was known as the Year of the Consulship of Caesar and Capito (or, less frequently, year 765 Ab urbe condita).
He completes 6 books that detail festivals found in the Roman Calendar.
TOP 40 MATH: The Crests' "Candles" plus Boyz II Men's "Season Of Loneliness"
20
Births   March 1 – Martial, Latin poet (d. 102)  July 13 – Gnaeus Julius Agricola, Roman governor of Britain (d. 93 AD)  Pedanius Dioscorides, Greek physician (approximate date) (d. 90 AD)  Frontinus, Roman general and military author (approximate date) (d. 103)  Dio Chrysostom, Greek philosopher and historian (approximate date) d. c. 120)  Claudia Octavia, daughter of Claudius and Messalina (d. 62)  Empress Ma of the Han dynasty (d. 79)   Deaths   January –
3
__NOTOC__ Year 40 (XL) was a leap year starting on Friday (link will display the full calendar) of the Julian calendar.
Approximate date of start of construction on the Pont du Gard aqueduct in Gallia Narbonensis.
Europe   The Germanic Quadi tribe begin settling in present-day Moravia and Slovakia.
NUMBER PATTERNS: 400, 200, 100, 50, __
25
Births   Cai Lun, Chinese inventor of paper and the papermaking process (d. 121)   Deaths   Abgarus of Edessa, king of Osroene  Aulus Cornelius Celsus, author of De Medicina (approximate date) (b. c. 25 BC)  Gamaliel the Elder, the Nasi of the Jewish people in Babylonia   Phaedrus, Roman fabulist (b. c. 15 BC)  Philo of Alexandria, Jewish philosopher (b. 20 BC) (approximate date)   References      als:50er#50
3
In Judea a Roman soldier seized and burned a Torah-scroll.
Asia   The Yuezhi tribes are united under the Kushan leader Kujula Kadphises, thus creating the Kushan Empire in Afghanistan and northern India.
Pamphilus of Alexandria writes a poetic lexicon.
HEY 19: She was Queen of France for 19 years, from 1774 to 1793
Marie Antoinette
October 16 – French Revolution: Marie Antoinette, the widowed queen consort of Louis XVI of France, is guillotined in the Place de la Révolution in Paris at the conclusion of a 2-day trial before the Revolutionary Tribunal.
2
February 25 – George Washington holds the first Cabinet meeting as President of the United States.
July 17 – Charlotte Corday is executed.
HISTORY: In 781 he persuaded Pope Adrian I to crown his sons Pepin & Louis kings of Italy & Aquitaine
Charlemagne
Events   By place    Europe   King Charlemagne has his son Carloman (renamed Pepin) anointed "king of Italy" and is crowned by pope Adrian I with the Iron Crown of Lombardy.
3
He is credited with reforming the tax system for peasants, reducing the power of the aristocratic classes, and eliminating their tax-free estates.
July 31 –
Deaths   Alchmund, bishop of Hexham (approximate date)  Fergus mac Echdach, king of Dál Riata (Scotland)  Guo Ziyi, general of the Tang Dynasty (b. 697)  Isonokami
GUYS & DUDES: Ol' King George must've loved this general's 1781 win at Guilford Courthouse but his 1781 Yorktown loss...not so much
Cornwallis
A French fleet under Comte de Grasse enters Chesapeake Bay, cutting British General Charles Cornwallis off from escape by sea.
3
January 6 – Battle of Jersey: British troops prevent the French from occupying Jersey in the Channel Islands.
March – Riots break out in Socorro, Santander, and spread to other towns.
Alston's troops surrender after Fanning's men attempt to ram the house with a cart of burning straw.
DAVY CROCKETT: In 1832 Crockett & his fellow Whigs opposed this president's position against the Bank of the United States
Andrew Jackson
December 3 – U.S. presidential election, 1832: Andrew Jackson is re-elected president.
3
The Black Hawk War begins.
Canada: The Rideau Canal in eastern Ontario is opened.
References
STREETCAR: Beginning service in 1832, this city's first streetcar ran along Bowery Street
New York
The City of Buffalo in New York is incorporated.
3
The Florida Legislative Council grants a city charter for Jacksonville, Florida.
May 11 – Greece is recognized as a sovereign nation; the Treaty of Constantinople ends the Greek War of Independence in July.
The Cumberland and Oxford Canal connects the largest lakes of southern Maine with the seaport of Portland, Maine.
WAY TO GO: Opened in 1825 to connect New York City & the Great Lakes, it's now used mainly for pleasure boating
the Erie Canal
The Erie Canal opens, providing passage from Albany, New York to Buffalo and Lake Erie.
3
Artisans and skilled mechanics receive a right to leave the United Kingdom.
– John Haggin, "Indian fighter" and one of the earliest settlers of Kentucky (b. 1753)  March 25 –
Claude Henri de Rouvroy, comte de Saint-Simon, French politician (b. 1760)  May 22 – Laskarina Bouboulina, Greek independence fighter (shot)  May 23 – Ras Gugsa of Yejju, Regent of the Emperor of Ethiopia  June 27 –
SCIENTISTS: In 1783 these brothers were walking on air after being named to the French Academy of Sciences
Montgolfier
__NOTOC__   Events   January–June  thumb|200px|The first manned hot-air balloon, designed by the Montgolfier brothers, takes off from the Bois de Boulogne, on November 21, 1783  February 3 – American Revolutionary War: The Kingdom of Great Britain acknowledges the independence of the United States of America.
3
April 8   –
November 2 –
November 29 – New Jersey earthquake: An earthquake of 5.3 magnitude strikes New Jersey.
POP SINGERS ON BROADWAY: R&B sensation Deborah A. Cox reigned on Broadway in 2004 as this title African princess
Aida
March 8 – Muhammad Zaidan, founder of the Palestine Liberation Front (b. 1948)  March 15 –
3
May 17 – Massachusetts legalizes same-sex marriage, in compliance with a ruling from the state's Supreme Judicial Court (Goodridge v. Department of Public Health).
November 28 –
One of the worst natural disasters in recorded history hits Southeast Asia, when the strongest earthquake in 40 years, measuring 9.3 on the Richter scale, hits the entire Indian Ocean region, which generates an enormous tsunami that crashes into the coastal areas of a number of nations including Thailand, India, Sri Lanka, the Maldives, Malaysia, Myanmar, Bangladesh, and Indonesia.
"B" BOYS: The surrender of this British general's forces at Saratoga in 1777 helped bring France into the war as a U.S. ally
Burgoyne
After a bombardment by British artillery under General John Burgoyne, American forces retreat from Fort Ticonderoga, New York.
3
Kunsthochschule Kassel is founded.
Carl Friedrich Gauss, German mathematician, astronomer, and physicist (d. 1855)  May 4 – Richard Bourke, Australian governor (d. 1855)
I of Russia   October 1 – Zaro Aga (claimed to have been born this year or 1774; d. 1934)  October 16  Lorenzo Dow, American Methodist preacher (d. 1834)  Levi Barber, surveyor, court administrator, banker and legislator (d. 1833)  October 18  Auguste François-Marie de Colbert-Chabanais, French general (d. 1809)  Heinrich von Kleist, German poet, dramatist, novelist and short story writer (d. 1811)  November 7 – Richard Bassett (clergyman), Welsh cleric (d. 1852)  November 14 –
THE AGE OF REASON: In 1773 this ex-printer & inventor published "Rules By Which A Great Empire May Be Reduced to A Small One"
Benjamin Franklin
The Public Advertiser publishes a satirical essay titled Rules By Which A Great Empire May Be Reduced To A Small One, written by Benjamin Franklin.
3
October 14 –
Ludwig Tieck, German writer (d. 1853)  June 13 – Thomas Young, English scientist (d. 1829)  July 23 – Thomas Brisbane, Scottish astronomer and Governor of New South Wales (d. 1860)  August 12 – Karl Faber, German historian (d. 1853)  August 22 –
Alexis Piron, French writer (b. 1689)
MR. BUSINESSMAN: Conrad Hilton started with a hotel in 1919; James Christie started with one of these houses in 1766
auction house
December 5 – James Christie holds the first sale at Christie's auction house in London.
3
July–December   July 1 – François-Jean de la Barre, a young French nobleman, is tortured and beheaded before his body is burnt on a pyre along with a copy of Voltaire's Dictionnaire philosophique nailed to his torso for the crime of not saluting a Roman Catholic religious procession in Abbeville and for other sacrileges including desecrating a crucifix.
The last Colonial governor of New Jersey, William Franklin, signs the charter of Queen's College (later renamed Rutgers University).
Date unknown   The Burmese begin to invade the Thai kingdom of Ayutthaya.
MAKING THE BAND: In 1751 Robert Clive's small band of Brits defeated the French in this country, later part of the empire
India
December 3 – Battle of Arnee in India (Second Carnatic War): A British East India Company-led force under Robert Clive defeats and routs a much larger Franco-Indian army under the command of Raza Sahib at Arni.
3
October 27 –
Maria Anna Mozart ("Nannerl"), Austrian pianist, singer, composer and violinist, sister of Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart  September 1
Henri François d'Aguesseau, Chancellor of France (b. 1668)
ALL "AMERICAN": In 2009 the U.S. Mint issued a quarter for this territory featuring an ava bowl, a whisk & a coconut tree
American Samoa
Many communities and harbors in Samoa and American Samoa are destroyed, and at least 189 are killed.
3
Following more than a quarter-century of fighting, the Sri Lankan Civil War ends with the total military defeat of the LTTE.  May 19 – Sri Lanka announces victory in its 27-year war against the terrorist organisation Liberation Tigers of Tamil Eelam.
June 3 –
A public memorial service is held for Michael Jackson.
HERE'S ANDERSON COOPER: (Anderson Cooper reads the clue.)  In 2005 I reported on the anti-Syrian demonstrations that came to be known as the Cedar Revolution in this country
Lebanon
February 14  Former Prime Minister of Lebanon Rafic Hariri is killed in Beirut after an assassination attempt by suicide bombing; it also kills at least 16 other people and injures 120 others.
3
February  February 9 –
June  June 21 –
August  August 2 – Air France Flight 358 overruns Runway 24L at Toronto Pearson International Airport.
MOUNT VERNON: (Sarah of the Clue Crew reads the clue from the dining room, Mount Vernon, VA.) It was here in the dining room that Charles Thomson, secretary of the Congress, told Washington he had been unanimously elected president in this year
1789
The Congress of the Confederation (1781-1789) was the legislature of the United States under the Articles of Confederation.
3
The National Congress of Honduras (Spanish: Congreso nacional) is the legislative branch of the government of Honduras.
Other countries with Congresses In France, the Congress of France (congrès) denotes a formal and rarely convened joint session of both houses of Parliament to ratify an amendment to the Constitution or to listen to a speech by the President of the French Republic.
Political parties and organizations Congress is included in the name of several political parties, especially those in former British colonies: Guyana People's National Congress India Indian National Congress All India Trinamool Congress Kerala Congress Nationalist Congress Party Tamil Maanila Congress YSR Congress BSR Congress NR Congress Lesotho Basotho Congress Party Lesotho Congress for Democracy Lesotho People's Congress Malawi Malawi Congress Party Malaysia Malaysian Indian Congress Namibia Congress of Democrats Pakistan Peoples Revolutionary Congress Pakistan Sudan National Congress (Sudan) Fiji National Congress of Fiji Canary Islands National Congress of the Canaries Nepal Nepali Congress Sierra Leone
FIBERS: The soft white fibers attached to the seeds of plants belonging to the genus Gossypium, of the mallow family
cotton
Gossypium is the cotton genus.
2
The genus Gossypium comprises around 50 species,Jonathan F. Wendel, Curt Brubaker, Ines Alvarez, Richard Cronn and James McD. Stewart.
Biol.
VOLCANOES: Magma that reaches the earth's surface is called this
Lava
thumb|right|300px|Lava flow on Hawaii.
2
Magma, as liquid, preferentially forms in high temperature, low pressure environments within several kilometers of the Earth's surface.
When enough rock is melted, the small globules of melt (generally occurring in between mineral grains) link up and soften the rock.
COMPUTER HISTORY: This 3-letter abbrev. used for devices from Palm was 1st used in '92 by Apple CEO John Sculley for the Newton launch
PDA
Botany  Palm (plant), a plant in the family Arecaceae or Palmae  Traveller's Palm or Ravenala madagascariensis, a species of banana-like plant from Madagascar  Technology  Palm (PDA), a personal digital assistant  Palm OS, the initial operating system of such PDAs (succeeded by WebOS)  PALM, the acronym for Photoactivated Localization Microscopy PALMS, the acronym for Particle Analysis by Laser Mass Spectrometry, an aerosol mass spectrometry instrument  Business  Palm, Inc., a mobile OS developer and hardware manufacturer of personal digital assistants and smartphones  Palm Breweries, a Belgian company  Palm Pictures, an arthouse film distribution company  Palm Records, a Hawaiian company  Palms Casino Resort, a resort and residential tower in Las Vegas, Nevada  The Palm (restaurant), a restaurant chain originating in New York City  Places  Palm Grove, New South Wales, Australia  Palm Islands, three artificial islands off the coast of Dubai Palm Jumeirah Palm Jebel Ali Palm Deira  Palms, Los Angeles, USA  Palms station, a train station in Palms, Los Angeles, USA  Palmgrove National Park, Queensland, Australia  Thousand Palms, California, USA  Twentynine Palms, California, USA  Other uses  Palm (name), a name (including a list of people with the name)  Palm (unit)  Palm branch (symbol)  Palm Springs (disambiguation)  Palm Sunday  Palm or palme attachments to certain military decorations (e.g. Croix de Guerre) indicate additional awards  Palms (band), an American rock band featuring members of Deftones and Isis  Palms (album), a first full-length studio record from Palms  See also  Palmer (disambiguation)  Palming, a sleight-of-hand technique  Palmistry  Sago  The Palms (disambiguation)  Category:Germanic-language surnames Category:Jewish surnames  bg:Палма (пояснение)
1
Palm or Palms may refer to:  Palm, the central region of the front of the hand (see Hand or Metacarpus).
CBS: The 36th season of this CBS news magazine included stories on Internet piracy, Equatorial Guinea & "Jeopardy!"
60 Minutes
CBS's radio programming after 1972 The retirement of Arthur Godfrey in April 1972 marked the end of long-form programming on CBS radio; programming thereafter consisted of hourly news summaries and news features, known in the 1970s as Dimension, and commentaries, including the Spectrum series that evolved into the "Point/Counterpoint" feature on the television network's 60 Minutes and First Line Report, a news and analysis feature delivered by CBS correspondents.
3
The company is headquartered at the CBS Building in New York City with major production facilities and operations in New York City (at the CBS Broadcast Center) and Los Angeles (at CBS Television City, CBS Columbia Square and the CBS Studio Center).
Barnouw, Golden, p. 155
The initial version was a very ambitious campaign that attempted to elevate CBS out of last place (among the major networks); the motif centered around network stars interacting with each other in a remote studio set, getting ready for photo and television shoots, as well as for the new season on CBS.
MUSIC: Name shared by the operatic heroines of "Fidelio" and "Il Trovatore"
Leonora
These revisions are seen largely in the expansion of the role of Leonora.
3
It was Gutiérrez's most successful play, one which Verdi scholar Julian Budden describes as "a high flown, sprawling melodrama flamboyantly defiant of the Aristotelian unities, packed with all manner of fantastic and bizarre incident."Budden, p. 59
The New Penguin Opera Guide, New York: Penguin Putnam.
Italian Film in the Light of Neorealism.
STICK OUT YOUR MOTHER TONGUE: "The Barber of Seville" premiered in this language February 20, 1816
Italian
The Barber of Seville, or The Futile Precaution ( ) is an opera buffa in two acts by Gioachino Rossini with an Italian libretto by Cesare Sterbini.
3
Pauline Viardot began the practice of inserting Alexander Alyabyev's "Nightingale".
Bartolo and Basilio are astounded, and Rosina makes fun of them.
Music in New Orleans: The Formative Years 1791–1841.
HOW GREAT THOU ART: I'll scream with delight if you identify this man's Madonna seen here
Munch
Madonna (from medieval Italian , meaning "my lady") most commonly refers to:  Madonna, Mary (mother of Jesus), a religious figure in Christianity and Islam  Madonna (entertainer) (born 1958), American singer-songwriter and producer  Madonna may also refer to:  People  Madonna, leader of 1990s gang 5T  "Madonna", nickname of American singer Joan Baez during the 1970s  Geography  Madonna, Maryland, a populated place in Maryland  Madonna di Campiglio, a comune in Trento  Madonna di Campagna, a quarter and subway station in Turin  Art, entertainment, and media Art  Madonna (art), pictorial or sculptured representations of Mary, Mother of Jesus  Madonna (Edvard Munch), a painting by the Norwegian expressionist painter Edvard Munch  Film  Madonna (1999 film) (Bogorodica), a 1999 Croatian film  Madonna (2015 film), a 2015 South Korean film  Literature  Madonna (book), a 2001 biography of the entertainer by Andrew Morton  Music Albums and EPs  Madonna (Madonna album), the singer's self-titled first album and related music video collection  Madonna (...
3
And You Will Know Us by the Trail of Dead album), a 1999 album  Madonna (EP), by South Korean band Secret  Songs
"Madonna" (Secret song), a 2011 song from the Secret EP  "Lady Madonna", a 1968 song by The Beatles  "Madonna", a 1988 song by Sparks from Interior Design  "Madonna", a 2015 song by Drake from
If You're Reading This
BY THE NUMBERS: Musical about Continental Congress, it included song "Sit Down, John"
1776
Although the delegates were divided early on as to whether to break from Crown rule, the second Continental Congress on July 2, 1776, gave a unanimous vote for independence, issuing the Declaration of Independence two days later declaring themselves a new nation: the United States of America.
3
The Continental Congress was a convention of delegates called together from the Thirteen Colonies which became the governing body of the United States (USA) during the American Revolution.
In the course of time, this land was divided over the course of many decades into Ohio, Michigan, Indiana, Illinois, Wisconsin, and part of Minnesota.
Americans at War: Society, Culture and the Homefront vol 1 (2005), articles by scholars  Primary sources  Smith, Paul H., ed.
AMERICAN HISTORY: Witchcraft trials held in this town in 1692 led to the hangings of 19 people
Salem
thumb|June 10: The Salem witch trials begin months of hangings.
3
March 22 –
By the end of September, 14 women including Bridget Bishop and 5 men had been hanged.
Carlo Innocenzio Maria Frugoni, Italian poet (d. 1768)   Deaths   May 9 – Albrecht of Saxe-Weissenfels, German prince (b. 1659)  May 18 –
ROYALTEASE: This teenage girl who had a brief 1553 reign knew Latin, Greek & Hebrew
Lady Jane Grey
Four days after the death of her cousin King Edward VI of England, Lady Jane Grey is proclaimed Queen of England –
3
Maurice is mortally wounded.
Cherubino Alberti, Engraver and painter (d. 1615)  March 29 – Vitsentzos Kornaros, Greek writer (d. 1613)  April 15 – Mózes Székely, Hungarian noble (d. 1603)  April 24 –
Roger Wilbraham, Solicitor-General for Ireland (d. 1616)  November 23 – Prospero Alpini, Italian physician and botanist (d. 1617)  November 28 –
ATHLETES: The last Major League Baseball player to hit .400 in a season, he was John Glenn's wingman in the Korean War
Ted Williams
The war interrupted the careers of stars including Stan Musial, Ted Williams, and Joe DiMaggio, but baseball clubs continued to field their teams.
3
See respective team articles for more information.
American League Championship Series and National League Championship Series, each a best-of-seven-games series played between the surviving teams from the ALDS and NLDS.
The league champions are informally referred to as the AL and NL pennant winners.
NEXT IN LINE, PLEASE: Mars, Jupiter, Saturn...
Uranus
(Uranus and Neptune are ice giants.)
3
Full size video here The oval object rotates counterclockwise, with a period of about six days.
The discovery was a major point in favor of Copernicus' heliocentric theory of the motions of the planets; Galileo's outspoken support of the Copernican theory placed him under the threat of the Inquisition.
A basic sub-division is a grouping of the eight inner regular moons, which have nearly circular orbits near the plane of Jupiter's equator and are thought to have formed with Jupiter.
CARY GRANT FILMS: She done Cary right casting him as her co-star in "She Done Him Wrong"
Mae West
thumb|right|Grant with Mae West in I'm No Angel (1933) In 1933, Grant garnered attention for appearing in the Pre-Code films She Done Him Wrong and I'm No Angel opposite Mae West.
2
In March 1918, Archie was expelled from Fairfield.
He later performed in drag in Coney Island, a place which he detested.
YOU GIVE ME THE WILLIES: He duetted with Waylon Jennings on the No. 1 country hit "Mammas Don't Let Your Babies Grow Up to be Cowboys"
Willie Nelson
The Outlaws with Willie Nelson, Tompall Glaser, and Jessi Colter, the first platinum country music album.
3
McShan liked his style and hired him for a weekly 30-minute program.
The single that headlined the album became a hit for Jennings, and was his first approach to Outlaw Country.
Colter and Jennings had one son, Waylon Albright "Shooter" Jennings (born May 19, 1979).
EROS MYTH: In the epic "Argonautica", Eros' arrow makes Medea fall in love with this man
Jason
thumb|Medea by Evelyn De Morgan In Greek mythology, Medea (; , Mēdeia, , Medea) is a sorceress who was the daughter of King Aeëtes of Colchis,Colchis was an ancient Georgian Kingdom niece of Circe, granddaughter of the sun god Helios, and later wife to the hero Jason, with whom she had two children, Mermeros and Pheres.
3
It was known to the composer of the  Little Iliad, part of the Epic Cycle.
Unable to determine where the rock had come from, the soldiers attacked and killed each other.
According to Apollodorus, Talos was slain either when Medea drove him mad with drugs, deceived him that she would make him immortal by removing the nail, or was killed by Poeas's arrow (Apollodorus 1.140).
EXPLORERS: Some say the Portuguese sent him to India in 1497 after his brother Paulo turned down the command
Vasco Da Gama
July 8 – Vasco da Gama's fleet departs from Lisbon, beginning his expedition to India.
3
Date unknown   Ivan the Great issues his law code, the Sudebnik.
Giovanni Paolo I Sforza, Italian condottiero (d. 1535)  April 2 –
Benedetto Accolti the Younger, Italian cardinal (d. 1549)  date unknown  Jean Fernel, French physician (d. 1558)  Mōri Motonari, Japanese daimyo (d. 1571)  Anne Seymour, Duchess of Somerset, English noblewoman (d. 1587)  Gonzalo de Sandoval, Spanish conquistador (d. 1528)  Johann Wild, German preacher (d. 1554)  probable  Francesco Berni, Italian poet (d. 1536)  John Heywood, English playwright (d. 1580)   Deaths   January 2 – Beatrice d'Este, Duchess of Milan (b. 1475)  January 30 –
LANGUAGES & DIALECTS: The oldest known text in this Slavic language is the religious hymn "Bogurodzica", which dates back to 1408
Polish
Births   April 8 – Jadwiga of Lithuania, Polish princess (d. 1431)  April 23 – John de Vere, 12th Earl of Oxford (d. 1462)  May 9 – Sri Tallapaka Annamacharya the mystic saint composer of the 15th century is the  earliest known musician of South India to compose songs called "" in praise of Lord Venkateswara, the deity of Seven Hills in Tirumala.
3
Date unknown   The Moldavian town of Iaşi is first mentioned.
Zheng He delivers 300 virgins from Korea to the Chinese emperor.
(d. 1503)
NATHANIEL HAWTHORNE: Hawthorne based "The Celestial Railroad" on this John Bunyan work, one of his boyhood favorites
Pilgrim's Progress
John Bunyan (; baptised 30 November 162831 August 1688) was an English writer and Baptisthttp://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/6049/pg6049.txt preacher best remembered as the author of the religious allegory The Pilgrim's Progress.
3
Bunyan's later years, in spite of another shorter term of imprisonment, were spent in relative comfort as a popular author and preacher, and pastor of the Bedford Meeting.
There had been Bunyans in north Bedfordshire since at least 1199.Brittain 1950: 42  Bunyan's father was a brazier or tinker who travelled around the area mending pots and pans, and his grandfather had been a chapman or small trader.
There were however occasions when he was allowed out of prison, depending on the gaolers and the mood of the authorities at the time, and he was able to attend the Bedford Meeting and even preach.
THEY ALL PLAYED COUNTRY SINGERS: Best known as "Marcia, Marcia, Marcia" on "The Brady Bunch", she starred in the 1997 TV movie bio of Barbara Mandrell
Maureen McCormick
Premise Mike Brady (Robert Reed), a widowed architect with three sons, Greg (Barry Williams), Peter (Christopher Knight), and Bobby (Mike Lookinland), marries Carol Martin (Florence Henderson), who herself has three daughters: Marcia (Maureen McCormick), Jan (Eve Plumb), and Cindy (Susan Olsen).
3
Nonetheless, the outstanding success of the United Artists film (the 11th highest grossing film of 1968) was a factor in ABC's decision to order episodes for the series.
He got his hair permed at Mike's urging ("All the Brady men have perms"), then Chuck and his six siblings reprised some of the more famous scenes from the show.
Paramount/CBS has released the series on DVD in other countries as well.
BUSINESS & INDUSTRY: This toothpaste "with Flouristan" was advertised in the 1950's with special paintings by Norman Rockwell
Crest
The family lived at 24 Lord Kitchener Road in the Bonnie Crest neighborhood of New Rochelle, New York.
3
There, he was taught by Thomas Fogarty, George Bridgman, and Frank Vincent DuMond; his early works were produced for St. Nicholas Magazine, the Boy Scouts of America (BSA) publication Boys' Life, and other youth publications.
Ultimately, Rockwell published 323 original covers for The Saturday Evening Post over 47 years.
Erikson is said to have told the artist that he painted his happiness, but did not live it.
MORE DYSFUNCTIONAL ROYAL FAMILIES: Fed up with his in-laws, this "confessor" banished them in 1051 & sent his wife to a nunnery
Edward
Events   Godwin, Earl of Wessex, is exiled from England by King Edward the Confessor for refusing to take action against the townspeople of Dover.
3
__NOTOC__ Year 1051 (MLI) was a common year starting on Tuesday (link will display the full calendar) of the Julian calendar.
May 19 –
Births   Edgar Atheling, uncrowned King of England, 1066, after the Battle of Hastings  Mi Fu, Chinese poet, painter, and calligrapher (d. 1107)   Deaths   January 22 –
SCIENTISTS: Though oxygen was discovered by Joseph Priestley, this 18th century French chemist gave it its name
Antoine Lavoisier
He is usually credited with the discovery of oxygen, having isolated it in its gaseous state, although Carl Wilhelm Scheele and Antoine Lavoisier also have a claim to the discovery.
3
It was his metaphysical works, however, that had the most lasting influence: leading philosophers including Jeremy Bentham, John Stuart Mill, and Herbert Spencer credit them among the primary sources for utilitarianism.
Schofield (1997), 62–69; Jackson, 44–47; Gibbs, 10–11; Thorpe, 22–29; Holt, 15–19.
He believed that each age would improve upon the previous and that the study of history allowed people to perceive and to advance this progress.
QUOTES: Carl Sandburg wrote, "Sometime they'll give" one of these "and nobody will come"
War
Sandburg volunteered to go to the military and was stationed in Puerto Rico with the 6th Illinois Infantry during the Spanish–American War,* disembarking at Guánica, Puerto Rico on July 25, 1898.
3
Elmhurst Historic Archives. "Sandburg"
Carl Sandburg Library first opened in Livonia, Michigan, on December 10, 1961.
Carl Sandburg at Gettysburg (1961) (documentary) Honey and Salt (1963) (poetry) The Letters of Carl Sandburg (1968) (autobiographical/correspondence) (edited by Herbert Mitgang) Breathing Tokens (poetry by Sandburg, edited by Margaret Sandburg) (1978) (poetry)
JAZZ TUNES: Duke Ellington co-wrote "In A Sentimental Mood" & this "mood"y 1931 standard
"Mood Indigo"
The other records of this era include: "Mood Indigo" (1930),  "Sophisticated Lady" (1933), "Solitude" (1934), and  "In a Sentimental Mood" (1935)  While the band's United States audience remained mainly African-American in this period, the Ellington orchestra had a huge following overseas, exemplified by the success of their trip to England and Scotland in 1933 and their 1934 visit to the European mainland.
3
Ellington credited his chum Edgar McEntree for the nickname.
Duke Ellington: Grammy Hall of Fame Award  Year Recorded Title Genre Label Year Inducted 1932 "It Don't Mean a Thing
Life: A Biography of Billy Strayhorn.
ON BROADWAY: 1970: Based on "All About Eve", it featured Lauren Bacall as Margo Channing
Applause
The mirrors transform Phoebe into multiple images of herself, and she bows regally, as if accepting the award to thunderous applause, while triumphant music plays.
3
Davis, who long had a strong gay fan base, expressed support for gay men in her 1972 interview with The Advocate.
Black-and-white George W. Davis, Lyle R. Wheeler and Thomas Little, Walter M. Scott  Best Cinematography –
The first radio adaptation was broadcast on the Lux Radio Theatre on NBC on October 1, 1951 starring Bette Davis, Gary Merrill and Anne Baxter.
UNREAL ESTATE: Though ancient Greeks thought it gloomy, this underworld wasn't for punishment like Dante's hell
hades
In the Homeric epics, the Greeks of prehistory are viewed as the ancestors of the early classical civilization of Homer's own time, while the Mycenaean pantheon included many of the divinities (e.g. Zeus, Poseidon and Hades) attested in later Greek religion.
3
> Yet, Hellenism also embodied an ancestral dimension through aspects of Athenian literature that developed and influenced ideas of descent based on autochthony.<ref>{{cite book |title=The Invention of Racism in Classical Antiquity|last= Benjamin |first= Isaac |year= 2004|publisher= Princeton University Press |isbn= 0-691-12598-8|page= 504|quote= Autochthony, being an Athenian idea and represented in many Athenian texts, is likely to have influenced a broad public of readers, wherever Greek literature was read.}}</ref>
[[Greek diaspora]] into Europe begins.
1.5 million of Asia Minor and Pontic Greeks settle in Greece, and some 450 thousands of Muslims settle in Turkey.
"B-U-T" FULL: Elizabeth Taylor starred in it
BUtterfield 8
Although she disliked her role in BUtterfield 8 (1960), her last film for MGM, she won the Academy Award for Best Actress for her performance.
3
They moved to London in 1929 and opened a gallery on Bond Street; their first child, a son named Howard, was born the same year.
Her third film role that year was playing a blonde diner waitress in Peter Ustinov's Faust parody Hammersmith Is Out (1972), her tenth collaboration with Burton.
Through stars like Taylor, we sense the world-disordering impact of legendary women like Delilah, Salome, and Helen of Troy."
THE VIKINGS: In 1066 this great-great grandson of Rollo made what some call the last Viking invasion of England
William the Conqueror
Rollo is the great-great-great-grandfather of William the Conqueror, or William I of England.
3
After the Norman conquest of England and their conquest of southern Italy & Sicily over the following two centuries, the descendants of Rollo and his men came to rule Norman England (the House of Normandy), the Kingdom of Sicily (the Kings of Sicily) as well as the Principality of Antioch from the 10th to 12th century AD, leaving behind an enduring legacy in the historical developments of Europe and the Near East.
Richer of Reims, who lived in the 10th century, named Rollo's father as one Catillus, or Ketil.
The Frankish Kingdom under the Carolingians, 751–987.
THE SWEET SPOT: In 1959 Elia Kazan directed this Tennessee Williams play
Sweet Bird of Youth
Best Director—A Streetcar Named DesireTony Awards  1959: Best Direction—J.B. 1949: Best Director—Death of a Salesman 1947: Best Direction—All My SonsNominations  1956: Best Director—Cat on a Hot Tin Roof 1958: Best Play—The Dark at the Top of the Stairs  1958: Best Director—The Dark at the Top of the Stairs 1960: Best Direction of a Play—Sweet Bird of Youth 1965: Best Producer of a Play—Tartuffe  Cannes Film Festival Awards  1955: Best Dramatic Film—East of Eden Nominations  1952: Grand Prize of the Festival—Viva Zapata!  1955: Palme d'Or (Golden Palm)—East of Eden  1972: Palme d'Or—The Visitors  Golden Globe Awards  1948: Best Motion Picture Director – Gentleman's Agreement  1954: Best Motion Picture Director – On The Waterfront   1958: Best Motion Picture Director – Baby Doll   1964: Best Motion Picture Director – America, America  Venice Film Festival Awards  1950: International Award—Panic in the Streets  1951: Special Jury Prize—A Streetcar Named Desire  1954: Italian Film Critics Award—On the Waterfront  1954: Leone d'Argento (Silver Lion)—On the Waterfront  1955:
3
Kazan writes, "I don't move unless I have some empathy with the basic theme." His first such "issue" film was Gentleman's Agreement (1947), with Gregory Peck, which dealt with anti-Semitism in America.
To oppressed people, America is still a dream."
She adds: "He respects his script, but casts and directs with a particular eye for expressive action and the use of emblematic objects."Rapf, Joanna E.
THE WRITER: Peru's version of "Super Mario", he won the 2010 Nobel Prize for Literature
Mario Vargas Llosa
Mario Vargas Llosa  Peace –
3
Protests in Bangkok, Thailand, end with a bloody military crackdown, killing 91 and injuring more than 2,100.
Repeated eruptions of Mount Merapi volcano in Central Java, Indonesia, and accompanying pyroclastic flows of scalding gas, pumice, and volcanic ash descending the erupting volcano kill 300 people and force hundreds of thousands of residents to evacuate.
Benoît Mandelbrot, French-American mathematician (b. 1924)  October 16 – Barbara Billingsley, American actress (b. 1915)  October 19 –
TV PILOTS: In an unsold pilot, this "Fame" singer starred as aspiring singer "Irene"
Irene Cara
Irene, Irina, Irini, Eirene, Eireni, or Ireen may refer to:  As a given name  Mythical figures  Eirene (Greek goddess), one of the Horae  Eirene (daughter of Poseidon)  People  Irene, baptismal name of Tzitzak (died 750), wife of Byzantine Emperor Constantine V  Irene of Athens (c. 752–803), wife of Byzantine Emperor Leo IV and empress regnant, 797–802  Princess Irene of Greece and Denmark (born 1942)  Princess Irene of the Netherlands (born 1939)  Saint Irene (disambiguation), various saints  Eirene (artist), ancient Greek artist  Irene Bae (born 1991) Singer (Red Velvet)  Irene Bedard (born 1967), Native American actress  Irene Bridger (21st century), Canadian singer  Irene Cara (born 1959), American singer, songwriter, and actress  Irene Castle (1893–1969), half of the ballroom dance team of Vernon and Irene Castle  Irene Charnley (born 1960), South African businesswoman  Irene Chepet Cheptai (born 1992), Kenyan distance runner  Irene Dick (born 1949), Curaçaoan politician  Irene Dunne (1898–1990), American actress  Irene Eijs (born 1966), Dutch rower  Irini Georgatou, Greek tennis player  Irini Giannatou, birth name of Greek actress and singer Rena Dor  Irene Hunt, American children's writers  Irene Jacob (born 1966), French-born Swiss actress  Irène Joliot-Curie (1897-1956), French scientist  Irini Karra, Greek fashion model  Eirini Kavarnou, Greek swimmer  Irene de Kok (born 1963), Dutch judoka  Irene Lentz (1900–1962), American clothing designer, better known in Hollywood as "Irene"  Irene Papas (born 1926 or 1929), Greek actress  Irene Piotrowski (born 1941), Lithuanian-Canadian athlete  Irini Psyhrami, Greek pop singer  Irene Ryan (1902–1973), American actress  Irene Saez (born 1961), Venezuelan politician and former Miss Universe  Irene Tedrow (1907–1995), American character actress  Irini Terzoglou, Greek shot putter  Irene van Dyk (born 1972), New Zealand netball player  Places  Irene, Gauteng, a small town in South Africa  Irene, South Dakota, United States, a town  Irene, Texas, United States, an unincorporated community Irene, West Virginia  Lake Irene, a small lake in Rocky Mountain National Park, Colorado, United States  Lake Irene, a lake in Minnesota  Eirini station, an ISAP metro station in Ano Maroussi, Greece  14 Irene, an asteroid  Storms and hurricanes  Tropical Storm Irene (1947), part of the 1940–49 Pacific typhoon seasons  Tropical Storm Irene (1959), caused minor damage to the Florida Panhandle  Hurricane Irene–Olivia, struck Nicaragua in 1971  Hurricane Irene (1981), part of the 1981 Atlantic hurricane season, eventually struck France  Hurricane Irene (1999) passed over Cuba and inflicted much damage on Florida   Hurricane Irene (2005)  Hurricane Irene (2011), caused extensive damage to the Greater Antilles and the US East Coast—name was retired after 2011  Literature and entertainment  Films and anime  Irene (1926 film)  Irene (1940 film), an American film  Irene (2009 film), a French film  Eirene, a character in the anime SoltyRei  Irene, the female protagonist of the 2011 movie Drive  Irene, name of famous and bloody mission in Somalia, also seen in movie Black Hawk
3
Irene is a name derived from εἰρήνη—the Greek for "peace".
Down  In literature  Irene (play), a play written by Samuel Johnson between 1726 and 1749  Irene Redfield, a character in the novel Passing, by Nella Larsen  Irene, also known as The sleeper, a poem or Edgar Allan Poe  Irene Adler, a character in the Sherlock Holmes story "A Scandal in Bohemia"  Irene Forsyte, a character in The Forsyte Saga  Irene Pollock, a character in the 44 Scotland Street series  Irene Van de Kamp, a character in the Good Girls (comics) series  Destiny (Irene Adler), a Marvel Comics character  In music  "Irene", a song by tobyMac on his album Momentum (TobyMac album)  Irene (musical), a 1919 Broadway musical  Irene, a character in the opera Tamerlano by Handel  Irene, a character in the opera Bajazet by Vivaldi  Irene, a song by Beach House  Irene, a song by mike oldfield on his album man on the rocks  In television  Irene the Concierge, character in the TV series The Suite Life of Zack & Cody  Irene Frederic, a character in the series Warehouse 13  *Irene, a character in Minecraft Diaries.
A series on YouTube made by Aphmau  Ships  , a British refrigerated cargo liner in service from 1961 to 1970  , a Greek-owned freighter  Irene-class cruiser, of the German Imperial Navy  , a German protected cruiser in service from 1887 to 1921  Irene (sternwheeler), a steamboat of the Puget Sound Mosquito Fleet in the early 1900s  TSS Irene (1885), a steam turbine cargo vessel operated by the London and North Western Railway from 1885 to 1906  , a Greek-owned supertanker  Irene (ketch), a sailing ship built in 1907 in Bridgwater  HMS Princess Irene  Other  Irene, in chemistry the hydrocarbon (CH3)4C10H8 formed by dehydration of irone  a rosemary cultivar   See also   Irina (disambiguation)  Irena (disambiguation)  Iren (disambiguation)  Category:Given names of Greek language origin Category:Greek feminine given names
FRED THOMPSON, ACTING SENATOR: Sen. Fred played the White House Chief of Staff in this 1993 Clint Eastwood Secret Service pic
In the Line of Fire
Other popular films include the Western Hang 'Em High (1968), the psychological thriller Play Misty for Me (1971), the crime film Thunderbolt and Lightfoot (1974), the Western The Outlaw Josey Wales (1976), the prison film Escape from Alcatraz (1979), the action film Firefox (1982), the suspense thriller Tightrope (1984), the Western Pale Rider (1985), the war film Heartbreak Ridge (1986), the action thriller In the Line of Fire (1993), the romantic drama The Bridges of Madison County (1995), and the drama Gran Torino (2008).
3
In 1997, Eastwood directed and starred in the political thriller Absolute Power, alongside Gene Hackman (with whom he had appeared in Unforgiven).
Supporting Actor for Robbins – with Eastwood garnering nominations for Best Director and Best Picture.
The speech was met with a huge response by the media with both praise and criticism.
COURTROOM DRAMAS: Ambulance chaser Denzel Washington represents Tom Hanks against the main line law firm that fired him in this 1993 film
Philadelphia
He is known for his roles in Splash (1984), Big (1988), Philadelphia (1993), Forrest Gump (1994), Apollo 13 (1995), Saving Private Ryan, You've Got Mail (both 1998), The Green Mile (1999), Cast Away (2000), The Da Vinci Code (2006), Captain Phillips, and Saving Mr. Banks (both 2013), as well as for his voice work in the animated films The Polar Express (2004) and the Toy Story series.
3
Hanks studied theater at Chabot College in Hayward, and transferred to California State University, Sacramento two years later.
*Includes former students who attended –
1989's Turner & Hooch was Hanks' only financially successful film of the period.
ASIAN CAPITALS: John McCain was shot down over this capital in 1967
Hanoi
In October 1967, while on a bombing mission over Hanoi, he was shot down, seriously injured, and captured by the North Vietnamese.
3
While there, he earned a reputation as a partying man.
Retrieved May 11, 2011.
The Reliable Source", The Washington Post (June 16, 1998).
ARTISTS ON FILM: Anthony Quinn in "Lust for Life"
Paul Gauguin
Quinn won his second Oscar for Best Supporting Actor for his portrayal of painter Paul Gauguin in Vincente Minnelli's Lust for Life (1956).
3
more commonly known as Anthony Quinn, was a Mexican-born American actor, painter and writer.
At age eleven, however, he joined the Pentecostals in the International Church of the Foursquare Gospel (the Pentecostal followers of Aimee Semple McPherson).Anthony Quinn.
Quinn grew up first in El Paso, Texas, and later the Boyle Heights and the Echo Park areas of Los Angeles, California.
NOVEL VOCABULARY: "What a mommet of a maid!" (mommet meaning scarecrow) is said of this Thomas Hardy title character
Tess
Initially, therefore, he gained fame as the author of novels, including Far from the Madding Crowd (1874), The Mayor of Casterbridge (1886),  Tess of the d'Urbervilles (1891), and Jude the Obscure (1895).
3
Barnes & Noble Classics, 2005.
The Short Stories of Thomas Hardy.
Pinion, F. B. Thomas Hardy: His Life and Friends.
ROBERT SCHUMANN: Pathetic & deranged, on February 27, 1854 Schumann attempted suicide by leaping into this river
the Rhine
On 27 February 1854, he attempted suicide by throwing himself from a bridge into the Rhine River.
3
thumb|upright|Music room of Schumann  1830–34 During Eastertide 1830 he heard the Italian violinist, violist, guitarist, and composer Niccolò Paganini play in Frankfurt.
thumb|left|upright|Clara Wieck in 1838 Despite the opposition of Clara's father, she and Robert continued a clandestine relationship which matured into a full-blown romance.
Rob was played by Herbert Grönemeyer, Clara by Nastassja Kinski, and Clara's father by Rolf Hoppe.
AMMAN, JORDAN: At a park named for this late king, you can see his car collection, including Lawrence of Arabia's armored Rolls
King Hussein
In 2015 the festival hosted 40 different organizations at King Hussein Business Park in Amman that inspired their audience to be visionary and think differently about the world through presentations and workshops.
3
Between 1872–1910, tens of thousands of Circassians were forcibly relocated to Ottoman Syria from historical Circassia by the Russian Empire during the events of the Russo-Circassian War.
Climate Amman's position on the mountains near the Mediterranean climate zone places it under the semi-arid climate classification (Köppen climate: BSk).
The recent construction of a public transportation system and a national railway, and the expansion of roads, are intended to ease the traffic generated by the millions of annual visitors to the city.
KIDDY LIT: While in his 40s, this Edinburgh-born author wed Elspeth Thomson & wrote "The Wind in the Willows" for their son
Kenneth Grahame
The Wind in the Willows is a children's novel by Kenneth Grahame, first published in 1908.
3
They get along well and spend many more days boating, with Rat teaching Mole the ways of the river.
A mild-mannered, home-loving animal, and the first character introduced.
A fancier centenary edition was produced two years later.
KJPY HIT RADIO: Caller number 99, you're going to Manhattan to see Dave Matthews at this 7th Avenue & 31st Street arena
Madison Square Garden
In 1961, the Pennsylvania Railroad unveiled plans to tear down the old Penn Station and replace it with a new Madison Square Garden and office building complex.
3
NoMad?
Languages As of 2010, 59.98% (902,267) of Manhattan residents, ages five and older, spoke only English at home, while 23.07% (347,033) spoke Spanish, 5.33% (80,240) Chinese, 2.03% (30,567) French, 0.78% (11,776) Japanese, 0.77% (11,517) Russian, 0.72% (10,788) Korean, 0.70% (10,496) German, 0.66% (9,868) Italian, 0.64% (9,555) Hebrew, and 0.48% (7,158) African languages as a main language.
As of October 2014, New York City hosted 300,000 employees in the tech sector, with a significant proportion in Manhattan.
YEARS: In this year Senator Henry Clay pushed for a compromise in his last big speech before the Senate
1850
As part of the "Great Triumvirate" or "Immortal Trio," along with his colleagues Daniel Webster and John C. Calhoun, he was instrumental in formulating the Missouri Compromise of 1820 and the Compromise of 1850.
3
They opposed the "tyranny" of Jackson, as their ancestors had opposed the tyranny of King George III. Clay strongly opposed Jackson's refusal to renew the charter of the Second Bank of the United States, and advocated passage of a resolution to censure Jackson for his actions.
The main issue was the policy of continuing the Second Bank of the United States.
pp.
LITERARY TOURISM: Theatre fans know the home seen here is this playwright's birthplace:(in Stratford-upon-Avon)
William Shakespeare
Stratford is commonly used as both a family name and a place name as follows:  People Stratford (surname)  Places Stratford is a common English place name that may refer to: England  Warwickshire Stratford-upon-Avon, a town in Warwickshire and the birthplace of William Shakespeare Stratford-on-Avon District, a local government district of Warwickshire Stratford-on-Avon (UK Parliament constituency) (1885–1918, 1950–present), in Warwickshire  London Stratford, London, a locality of the London borough of Newham and site of the 2012 Summer Olympics Stratford station, a railway, London Underground, London Overground, National Rail and Docklands Light Railway station in the London Borough of Newham Stratford International station, a main line railway and Docklands Light Railway station in the London Borough of Newham Stratford High Street DLR station, a Docklands Light Railway station in the London Borough of Newham Stratford West Ham (UK Parliament constituency) (1918–1950), in East London Stratford-atte-Bow, or Stratford, historical name of Bow in London Stratford Place, a small road in London, off Oxford Street, containing Stratford House  Gloucestershire Stratford Park, a green flag-awarded area of Stroud in Gloucestershire, southwest England  Suffolk Stratford St Andrew, a small village and a civil parish just off the A12 road, in the Suffolk Coastal District, in the county of Suffolk Stratford St. Mary, a village in Suffolk in the heart of 'Constable Country'.
3
John Constable painted a number of paintings in and around Stratford.
Wiltshire Stratford-sub-Castle, a suburb of Salisbury Stratford Tony, a village Stratford Toney Down, a 23.1 hectare biological Site of Special Scientific Interest  Buckinghamshire Fenny Stratford, Milton Keynes Old Stratford, a village in the south of Northamptonshire, on the border of Buckinghamshire Stony Stratford, a constituent town of Milton Keynes Water Stratford, a village  Hampshire Stratford Saye, a village also called Stratford Sea, Strathfieldsay and Stratfield Saye Stratford Turgis, a village also called Stratfield Turgis Stratford Mortimer, a civil parish and village in Berkshire and part of Hampshire - also called Stratfield Mortimer  Australia Stratford, Queensland, a suburb of Cairns Stratford, Victoria, a town in the state district of Gippsland East Stratford railway station, Victoria, a railway station on the Bairnsdale railway line in Stratford, Victoria Stratford, New South Wales, a town in the state district of Upper Hunter  Canada Stratford, Ontario, a city in Perth County Stratford, Prince Edward Island, a suburb of Charlottetown, the provincial capital Stratford, Quebec, a village in Le Granit Regional County
See also Stretford, a town in Trafford, Greater Manchester, England Stratford Shoal Light, a lighthouse in Long Island Sound, Connecticut The Stratford Residences, a building in Makati City, Philippines Stafford (disambiguation) Strafford (disambiguation) Stratford High School (disambiguation) Stratford Shakespeare festival (disambiguation)
THE OSCARS: Paul Newman's only win for Best Actor was for the second time he played this character
"Fast Eddie" Felson
Twenty-five years after The Hustler, Newman reprised his role of "Fast Eddie" Felson in the Martin Scorsese–directed film The Color of Money (1986), for which he won the Academy Award for Best Actor.
3
His mother, Theresa, whose year of birth remains unclear but appears to have been between 1889 and 1895, was a practitioner of Christian Science, and was born to a Slovak Roman Catholic family at Homonna, Peticse, Kingdom of Hungary, Austro-Hungarian Empire (now Humenné, Ptičie, Republic of Slovakia)."Paul Newman, A Big Gun at 73".
It also commented that "Newman was a generous heart, an actor of a dignity and style rare in Hollywood quarters."
New York, 1959–60 Baby Want a Kiss – New York, 1964 Love Letters – Westport, 2000 The Constant Wife – Westport, 2000 Our Town by Thornton Wilder – Westport, New York, 2002–3 Trumbo – New York, 2004  Additional awards and honors Newman is one of four actors to have been nominated for an Academy Award in five different decades.
FUN STUFF: This 155-year-old chocolate co. named for an Italian is based in San Francisco, a city named for an Italian
Ghirardelli
Catering to the needs and tastes of the growing population, Levi Strauss opened a dry goods business and Domingo Ghirardelli began manufacturing chocolate.
3
And when they got together / They produced the native son."   Entrepreneurs sought to capitalize on the wealth generated by the Gold Rush.
Development of the Port of San Francisco and the establishment in 1869 of overland access to the Eastern U.S. rail system via the newly completed Pacific Railroad (the construction of which the city only reluctantly helped supportConstruction of the Pacific Railroad was partially (albeit reluctantly) funded by the City and County of San Francisco Pacific Railroad Bond issue under the provisions of "An Act to Authorize the Board of Supervisors of the City and County of San Francisco to take and subscribe One Million Dollars to the Capital Stock of the Western Pacific Rail Road Company and the Central Pacific Rail Road Company of California and to provide for the payment of the same and other matters relating thereto." approved on April 22, 1863, as amended by §5 of the "Compromise Act of 1864" approved on April 4, 1864.
San Francisco also has a county jail complex located in San Mateo County, in an unincorporated area adjacent to San Bruno.
THE RED, WHITE & BREW: Produced in California & made without ice, steam beer has become a trademark of this San Francisco brewery
Anchor
In 1835, Englishman William Richardson erected the first independent homestead, near a boat anchorage around what is today Portsmouth Square.
3
Among major U.S. cities, San Francisco has the coolest daily mean, maximum, and minimum temperatures for June, July, and August.
The California Culinary Academy, associated with the Le Cordon Bleu program, offers programs in the culinary arts, baking and pastry arts, and hospitality and restaurant management.
157–58:2 (1945), p. 69–75)  San Francisco (article) (1870)
ON THE "TELE": This San Francisco hill is named for the semaphore installed at its crest in 1850
Telegraph Hill
Also in this quadrant are Russian Hill, a residential neighborhood with the famously crooked Lombard Street; North Beach, the city's Little Italy and the former center of the Beat Generation; and Telegraph Hill, which features Coit Tower.
3
thumb|upright|left|Cars navigate Lombard Street to descend Russian Hill.
The U.S. Census Bureau estimates San Francisco's population increased to 852,469 as of July 1, 2014.
With over 30 international financial institutions, six Fortune 500 companies, and a large support infrastructure of professional services—including law, public relations, architecture and design—San Francisco is designated as an Alpha(-) World City, and is ranked in 10th place among the top global financial centers.
LITERATURE A LA SEUSS: So on again, o again, from Laputa to Glubbdubdrib / I'm giving up, something something a Flubbdubgrib
Gulliver's Travels
thumb|right|Gulliver discovers Laputa, the flying island (illustration by J. J. Grandville) Laputa is a flying island described in the 1726 book Gulliver's Travels by Jonathan Swift.
3
Description Laputa is described as being exactly circular and  in diameter, giving an area of .
Uttering the phrase to the character causes his death.
The 'Kingdom of Zeal" in Chrono Trigger heavily resembles Laputa.
KISS, THE BAND: Gene Simmons speaks 4 languages: English, German, Hungarian & this one he learned in his native Haifa
Hebrew
Studies of Savages and Sex, Kessinger Publishing (revised and reprinted) (2006)  A distinctive element in the Christian liturgy was noted by Justin in the 2nd century, now referred to as the "kiss of peace," and once part of the rite in the primitive Mass. Conybeare has stated that this act originated within the ancient Hebrew synagogue, and Philo, the ancient Jewish philosopher called it a "kiss of harmony," where, as Crawley explains, "the Word of God brings hostile things together in concord and the kiss of love."
3
He notes, however, that the categories are somewhat contrived and overlapping, and some cultures have more kinds, including the French with twenty and the Germans with thirty.
Kissing quickly on the lips with mouth closed is commonly used as a greeting or farewell in some places of Western culture such as South Africa and Australia, especially in rural areas, including when being introduced by a mutual friend or family member for the first time.
A kiss on the cheek is a very common form of greeting among members of the same sex in most Islamic countries, following the south European pattern.
COLORFUL BOOKS: In it, Billie Holiday said she didn't like singing the same song the same way two nights in a row
"Lady Sings the Blues"
I was a huge success."Autobiography "Lady Sings the Blues"
3
The reason given for her firing varies from person to person.
Retrieved on 2010-11-13.
Hit records In 1986, Joel Whitburn's Record Research, Inc. company compiled information on the popularity of record releases from the pre-rock and roll era and created pop charts dating all the way back to the beginning of the commercial recording industry.
THE UNIVERSITY OF...: The incoming freshmen of 2001 at this Philadelphia university had averaged 1,412 on their SATs
the University of Pennsylvania
Philadelphia's largest private employer is the University of Pennsylvania followed by the Children's Hospital of Philadelphia.
3
It has seven judges elected by the voters.
Philadelphia once comprised six congressional districts.
thumb|The Ben Franklin Bridge, viewed at night from Center City toward Camden, New Jersey Interstate 476, commonly nicknamed the "Blue Route" through Delaware County, bypasses the city to the west, serving the city's western suburbs, as well as providing a link to Allentown and points north.
GET YOUR FACTS STRAIGHT: Ernesto Miranda's case gave us the rights read to a suspect; Carmen Miranda sang the aptly titled "The Lady In" this "Hat"
The Tutti-Frutti
Shari Roberts. "The Lady in the Tutti-Frutti Hat: Carmen Miranda, a Spectacle of Ethnicity," Cinema Journal 32, no. 3 (1993): 6.
3
The film was a great success and grossed $2 million that year in the American market.
Down Argentine Way Herself 1941
1978.
ISLANDS: It lies 25 miles south of Barbuda
Antigua
Barbuda is an island in the Eastern Caribbean, and forms part of the state of Antigua and Barbuda.
2
Activities include a bird sanctuary, swimming, snorkeling, fishing, and caving.
Only two operating resorts are located on the island, the rest are abandoned after poor management, difficult infrastructure and hurricane damage.
THE INDIANS: The international airport in New Delhi bears her name
Indira Gandhi
Transport  Air Indira Gandhi International Airport, situated to the southwest of Delhi, is the main gateway for the city's domestic and international civilian air traffic.
3
In addition, it also serves as the seat of Government of Delhi.
The central axis of New Delhi, which today faces east at India Gate, was previously meant to be a north-south axis linking the Viceroy's House at one end with Paharganj at the other.
On December 16, 2015, the Supreme Court of India mandated several restrictions on Delhi's transportation system to curb pollution.
VERY ANIMATED ACTORS: This actress provided the inspiration & voice for Stone Age sexpot Ann-Margrock on "The Flintstones"
Ann-Margret
The last names "Flintstone" and "Rubble", as well as other common Bedrock surnames such as "Shale" and "Quartz", are in line with these puns, as are the names of Bedrock's celebrities: "Gina Loadabricks" (Gina Lollobrigida), "Gary Granite" (Cary Grant), "Stony Curtis" (Tony Curtis), "Ed Sullivanstone/Sulleystone" (Ed Sullivan), "Rock Pile/Quarry/Hudstone" (Rock Hudson), "Ann-Margrock" (Ann-Margret), "Jimmy Darrock" (James Darren), "Alvin Brickrock" (Alfred Hitchcock), "Daisy Kilgranite" (Dorothy Kilgallen), "Perry Masonry/Masonite" (Perry Mason as played by Raymond Burr), "Mick Jadestone and The Rolling Boulders" (Mick Jagger and The Rolling Stones, called "Mick Jagged and the Stones" in live-action film The Flintstones in Viva Rock Vegas), "Eppy Brianstone" (Brian Epstein) and "The Beau Brummelstones" (The Beau Brummels).
3
17 Movement 2, composed in 1801/02.
Hanna and Barbera hired many writers from the world of live-action including two of Jackie Gleason's writers, Herbert Finn and Sydney Zelinka, as well as relative newcomer Joanna Lee while still using traditional animation story men like Warren Foster and Michael Maltese.
The Flintstones premiered on September 30, 1960, at 8:30pm, and quickly became a hit.
MEL ____: His voice brought Daffy Duck to life
Mel Blanc
In fact, the only aspects of the character that have remained consistent through the years are his voice characterization by Mel Blanc and his black feathers with a white neck ring.
2
Thus 'despicable' became 'desthpicable.'"
Pairing of Bugs and Daffy, 1951–1964 Bugs' ascension to stardom also prompted the Warner Bros. animators to recast Daffy as the rabbit's rival, intensely jealous and determined to steal back the spotlight, while Bugs either remained indifferent to the duck's jealousy or used it to his advantage.
CENTERS OF POWER: (Alex reports from aboard the Maid of the Mist at Niagara Falls.)  The huge hydroelectric potential of the falls led to a war of inventors; it was only settled when Westinghouse was given the right to build the A.C. generators that were designed & patented by this man
Tesla
Also on Goat Island are the Three Sisters Islands, the Power Portal where a huge statue of Nikola Tesla (the inventor whose patents for the AC induction motor and other devices for AC power transmission helped make the harnessing of the falls possible) can be seen, and a walking path that enables views of the rapids, the Niagara River, the gorge, and all of the falls.
3
Water diversion is regulated by the 1950 Niagara Treaty and is administered by the International Niagara Board of Control (IJC).
thumb|right|The American Falls and Bridal Veil Falls (Niagara Falls) viewed from the Canadian side  In 2013 New York State initiated an effort to renovate The Sisters Islands located on Goat Island.
Over the falls  thumb|Bobby Leach and his barrel after his trip over Niagara Falls, 1911  In October 1829, Sam Patch, who called himself "the Yankee Leapster", jumped from a high tower into the gorge below the falls and survived; this began a long tradition of daredevils trying to go over the falls.
SAME FIRST & LAST LETTER: A concluding part added to a literary work where you might read, "Billy would become Canada's P.M. in 2022"
epilogue
Television American Horror Story: Hotel episode "Be Our Guest", the epilogue takes place in the year 2022.
2
Date unknown The 2022 FIFA World Cup is scheduled to be held in Qatar.
If the plan was set in motion, the gold would be radiated until 2022.
RECENT FILMS: He played wise wizard Gandalf in 2001's "Lord of the Rings"
Ian McKellen
Adaptations thumb|left|Gandalf in the 1978 animated film thumb|Ian McKellen as Gandalf the White in The Two Towers (2002)
3
Along with the other Maiar who entered into the world as the five Wizards, he took on the specific form of an aged old man as a sign of his humility.
Carpenter acknowledged that Tolkien was probably mistaken about the origin of the postcard.
325.
COLLEGE TEAM NICKNAMES: Colorful demons of Duke University
the Blue Devils
Athletics  Duke University teams are known as the Blue Devils.
3
Retrieved January 12, 2011.Twenty-two Duke Graduates, Grad Students Receive Fulbright Scholarships.
Retrieved August 25, 2011.
The Chronicle.
ORGAN RECITAL: The wood for the organ in this Salt Lake City edifice came from Utah's Parowan Mountains
the Mormon Tabernacle
Salt Lake City is the home of the Mormon Tabernacle Choir, founded in 1847.
3
Each councillor represents approximately 26,000 citizens.
The theater plans have come under criticism, however, especially from nearby smaller theaters which host Off-Broadway tours and claim that such a theater cannot be supported and will hurt their business.
A select few local shops are allowed to attend, but the highlights of the convention are well-known artists who are booked for the convention.
LOUISIANA: The more familiar name of New Orleans’ 85-block “Vieux Carre”
the French Quarter
Every street crossing Canal Street between the Mississippi River and Rampart Street, which is the northern edge of the French Quarter, has a different name for the "uptown" and "downtown" portions.
3
Such musical funerals are still held when a local musician, a member of a social club, krewe, or benevolent society, or a noted dignitary has passed.
New Orleans Zephyrs Baseball PCL Zephyr Field (10,000)
Following Hurricane Katrina, the state of Louisiana took over most of the schools within the system (all schools that fell into a nominal "worst-performing" metric); many of these schools, in addition to others that were not subject to state takeover, were subsequently granted operating charters giving them administrative independence from the Orleans Parish School Board, the Recovery School District and/or the Louisiana Board of Elementary and Secondary Education (BESE).
HODGE PODGE: A specialty of New Orleans, a muffuletta is one of these
a sandwich
New Orleans is known for specialties like beignets (locally pronounced like "ben-yays"), square-shaped fried pastries that could be called "French doughnuts" (served with café au lait made with a blend of coffee and chicory rather than only coffee); and Po-boy  and Italian Muffuletta sandwiches; Gulf oysters on the half-shell, fried oysters, boiled crawfish, and other seafood; étouffée, jambalaya, gumbo, and other Creole dishes; and the Monday favorite of red beans and rice.
3
in the United States.
Walter Johnson, Soul by Soul: Life Inside the Antebellum Slave Market, Cambridge: Harvard University Press, 1999, p.2 and 6  According to the historian Paul Lachance,  the addition of white immigrants [from Saint-Domingue] to the white creole population enabled French-speakers to remain a majority of the white population until almost 1830.
The Michoud facility lies within the enormous New Orleans Regional Business Park, also home to the National Finance Center, operated by the United States Department of Agriculture (USDA), and the Crescent Crown distribution center.
U.S. CITIES: 12 miles NW of downtown Miami, this Florida city is famous for its thoroughbred racetrack
Hialeah
Beneath the plain lies the Biscayne Aquifer, a natural underground source of fresh water that extends from southern Palm Beach County to Florida Bay, with its highest point peaking around the cities of Miami Springs and Hialeah.
3
Miami-Dade.gov Port of Miami.
It was named for the nearby Miami River, derived from Mayaimi, the historic name of Lake Okeechobee.
Completion of the Miami Intermodal Center is expected to be completed by winter 2011, and will serve over 150,000 commuters and travelers in the Miami area.
JAY: In 1985 he & Frederick Loewe were honored at the Kennedy Center for their musicals
Alan Jay Lerner
He collaborated with lyricist Alan Jay Lerner on a series of Broadway musicals, including the long-running My Fair Lady and Camelot, both of which were made into films.
3
At 13, he was the youngest piano soloist ever to appear with the Berlin Philharmonic.
In 1924, his father received an offer to appear in New York City, and Loewe traveled there with him, determined to write for Broadway.
Their adaptation of George Bernard Shaw's Pygmalion, with the leads, Henry Higgins and Eliza Doolittle, being played originally by Rex Harrison and Julie Andrews, was a huge hit in New York and London.
THE REEL WORLD: Samuel L. Jackson played this cool detective in a 2000 remake
Shaft
He is a highly prolific actor, having appeared in over 100 films, including Die Hard with a Vengeance (1995), Unbreakable (2000), Shaft (2000), The 51st State (2001), Black Snake Moan (2006), Snakes on a Plane (2006) and the Star Wars prequel trilogy (1999–2005), as well as the Marvel Cinematic Universe.
3
After joining a local acting group to earn extra points in a class, Jackson found an interest in acting and switched his major.
While he was suspended, Jackson was employed as a social worker in Los Angeles.
In 2002, he played a recovering alcoholic attempting to keep custody of his kids while fighting a battle of wits with Ben Affleck's character in Changing Lanes.
JAZZ: With Dizzy Gillespie, this "Bird" originated the bebop style of jazz
Charlie Parker
In the 1940s Gillespie, with Charlie Parker, became a major figure in the development of bebop and modern jazz.
3
He taught and influenced many other musicians, including trumpeters Miles Davis, Jon Faddis, Fats Navarro, Clifford Brown, Arturo Sandoval, Lee Morgan, Chuck Mangione, and balladeer Johnny Hartman  Dizzy Gillespie, a Bahá'í since 1968,[41] was one of the most famous adherents of the Bahá'í Faith which helped him make sense of his position in a succession of trumpeters as well as turning his life from knife-carrying roughneck to global citizen, and from alcohol to "soul force",[42] in the words of author Nat Hentoff, who knew Gillespie for forty years.
He is honored with weekly jazz sessions at the New York Bahá'í Center in the memorial auditorium.
In Redondo Beach/Jazz in America (	Embassy)  1991 Dizzy Gillespie: A Night in Tunisia (VIEW)  1993 Live in London (Kultur Video)  1998 Dizzy Gillespie & Charles Mingus (Vidjazz)  1998 Dizzy Gillespie: Ages (Vidjazz)  1999 Jazz Casual: Dizzy Gillespie (Rhino)  2001 Jivin'in Be-Bop (Jazz Classic Video)  2001 Dizzy Gillespie: A Night in Chicago (VIEW)  2001 Live at the Royal Festival Hall 1987 (Pioneer)  2002 Live in Montreal (Image)  2003 20th Century Jazz Masters  2003 Swing Era (with Mel Tormé) (Idem)
I DON'T: In this most traditional of the 3 main branches of U.S. Judaism, I don't travel on Saturday
Orthodox
In the Eastern Orthodox Church, Saturdays are days on which the Theotokos (Mother of God) and All Saints are commemorated, and the day on which prayers for the dead are especially offered, in remembrance that it was on a Saturday that Jesus lay dead in the tomb.
3
According to these authors, it was a principle of astrology that the heavenly bodies presided, in succession, over the hours of the day.
Samstag is always used in Austria, Liechtenstein, and the German-speaking part of Switzerland, and generally used in southern and western Germany.
Holy Saturday is the day before Easter.
ANDREW LLOYD WEBBER: (I'm Andrew Lloyd Webber.)  This ex-"Phantom" plays Count Fosco in my latest musical "The Woman in White", which opened in London in Sept. 2004
Michael Crawford
He wrote the part of Christine for his then-wife, Sarah Brightman, who played the role in the original London and Broadway productions alongside Michael Crawford as the Phantom.
3
Many years later, Lloyd Webber and Ayckbourn revisited this project, producing a thoroughly reworked and more successful version entitled By Jeeves (1996).
I saw no black faces on the programme Eurovision 2012.
In 2013, Webber reunited with Christopher Hampton and Don Black on Stephen Ward the Musical.
POETRY: In "Harlem" he asked, "What happens to a dream deferred? Does it dry up like a raisin in the sun?"
Langston Hughes
Langston Hughes House La Marqueta Lenox Lounge Manhattan Avenue-West 120th-123rd Streets Historic District Mink Building
3
Co., 1903.
Infectious diseases and diseases of the circulatory system were to blame, with a variety of contributing factors, including consumption of the deep-fried foods traditional to the South, which may contribute to heart disease.
Retrieved on January 30, 2009.
FAMOUS WOMEN: She's the Brontë sister who wrote "Wuthering Heights"
Emily Brontë
Wuthering Heights is Emily Brontë's only novel.
3
Hindley dies six months after Catherine and Heathcliff thus finds himself master of Wuthering Heights.
Wuthering Heights Vol.1Wuthering Heights Vol.2
Wuthering Heights at GirleBooks free downloads in PDF, PDB and LIT formats.
COUNTRY MUSIC: In 2010 this movie soundtrack featuring Jeff Bridges was a Billboard Top 10 country album
Crazy Heart
He won the Academy Award for Best Actor for his role as Otis "Bad" Blake in the 2009 film Crazy Heart, and earned Academy Award nominations for his roles in The Last Picture Show (1971), Thunderbolt and Lightfoot (1974), Starman (1984), The Contender (2000) and True Grit (2010).
3
The book was formed from what has been described as a "transcript of a five-day “
thumb|right|Bridges at the 2010 Independent Spirit Awards Bridges has performed TV commercial voiceover work as well, including Hyundai's 2007 "Think About It" advertising campaign  as well as the Duracell advertisements in the "Trusted Everywhere" campaign.
Humanitarian efforts In 1984, Bridges and other entertainment industry leaders founded the End Hunger Network aimed at encouraging, stimulating and supporting action to end childhood hunger.
IT'S COLUMBO: Sri Lanka's port city of Colombo is near the mouth of the Kelani River on this ocean
Indian Ocean
Lowest temperature recorded was .Weatherbase   Attractions  Galle Face Green is a ribbon of green space located in the heart of the city along the Indian Ocean coast, and is a popular destination for tourists and residents alike.
3
Department of Census and Statistics, Census 2001, Additional source .
The Western province contributes more than 50% to the GDP and about 80% of industrial value additions although it accounts for only 5.7% of the country’s geographic area.
Main Line –
IN THE ARENA: The Ragin' Cajuns play basketball in the Cajundome arena in this state
Louisiana
Cajuns (;  or Les Cadiens or les Acadiens, ) are an ethnic group mainly living in the U.S. state of Louisiana, consisting of the descendants of Acadian exiles (French-speakers from Acadia in what are now
1
It had been written that every part of the pig except the squeal was used.
HISTORY'S MYSTERIES: According to Plato, Solon, a great Greek lawgiver, went to Egypt & received the story of this lost land
Atlantis
(Dryden translation)/Solon#26  According to Plato's dialogues Timaeus and Critias, he visited Neith's temple at Sais and received from the priests there an account of the history of Atlantis.
3
V. Ehrenberg, From Solon to Socrates: Greek History and Civilization, Routledge (1973) 71–72Stanton, G.R. Athenian Politics
Athenaion Politeia 3.6 s:Athenian Constitution#3Athenaion Politeia 8.2 s:Athenian Constitution#8
However some scholars have doubted whether Solon actually included the Thetes in the Ekklesia, this being considered too bold a move for any aristocrat in the archaic period.
STATES' GEOGRAPHIC CENTERS: The northern part of the city of Worcester
Massachusetts
Twinning and planned twinning Worcester is twinned with the German city of Kleve, the Parisian commune of Le Vésinet, and its larger American namesake Worcester, Massachusetts.
3
Retrieved on 2013-08-02.
University of Birmingham Rowing Club Worcester Athletics Club who meet on Tuesdays and Thursdays at Nunnery Wood Sports Centre Worcester University Climbing and Mountaineering Club Worcester Dominies and Guild Cricket Club  Kempsey Cricket Club  Culture  Festivals and shows Every three years Worcester becomes home to the Three Choirs Festival, which dates from the 18th century and is credited with being the oldest music festival in the British Isles.
The Artistic Director of the Worcester Festival is now actor, director and writer, Ben Humphrey.
JUDY GARLAND: In "For Me and My Gal" bells rang for Judy & this actor who was making his film debut
Gene Kelly
She was noticeably thinner in her next film, For Me and My Gal, alongside Gene Kelly in his first screen appearance.
3
Through the Meglin Kiddies, they made their film debut in a 1929 short-subject called The Big Revue, where they performed a song-and-dance number called "That's the good old sunny south".
MGM hit on a winning formula when it paired Garland with Mickey Rooney in a string of what were known as "backyard musicals".
Adrienne Barbeau played Garland in The Property Known as Garland (2006) and The Judy Monologues (2010) initially featured male actors reciting Garland's words before it was re-vamped as a one-woman show.
CASTLING: Vaduz Castle overlooks the town of Vaduz in this principality
Liechtenstein
thumb|View of Vaduz from space Vaduz (;  or ) is the capital of Liechtenstein and also the seat of the national parliament.
1
It is, however, commonly believed to have been founded circa 1322 by the Counts of Werdenberg.
RIFF RAFF: This band scored the No. 2 riff with "Smells Like Teen Spirit"
Nirvana
"Smells Like Teen Spirit" is a song by the American rock band Nirvana.
2
ISBN 0-306-81271-1, p. 14
UK CD single  "Smells Like Teen Spirit" (Cobain, Grohl, Novoselic) – 4:30 "Drain You" (Cobain) – 3:43 "Even in His Youth" (Cobain, Grohl, Novoselic) – 3:03 "Aneurysm" (Cobain, Grohl, Novoselic) – 4:44  UK picture disc 12" single  "Smells Like Teen Spirit" (Cobain, Grohl, Novoselic) – 5:01 "Even in His Youth" (Cobain, Grohl, Novoselic) – 3:03 "Aneurysm" (Cobain, Grohl, Novoselic) – 4:44 Features album version of "Smells Like Teen Spirit".
LIBRARIES: This Shakespeare library is administered by a board of directors under the auspices of Amherst College
the Folger Library
The Folger produces its own scholarly journal, "Shakespeare Quarterly," and the Library continues to publish the Folger Library Shakespeare editions, which outsell all other editions of the bard's plays.
3
In 1812, funds were raised in Amherst for a secondary school, Amherst Academy; it opened December 1814.History of Amherst College during its first half century 1821-1871.
Nine out of twelve of the trustees voted for the resolutions, which were as follows:  "Resolved, that it is expedient to remove Williams College to some more central part of the State whenever sufficient funds can be obtained to defray the necessary expenses incurred and the losses sustained by removal, and to secure the prosperity of the college, and when a fair prospect shall be presented of obtaining for the institution the united support and patronage of the friends of literature and religion in the western part of the Commonwealth, and when the General Court shall give their assent to the measure."
May 2015}}</ref> the [[Carnegie Foundation for the Advancement of Teaching|Carnegie Foundation]] classifies Amherst as one of the "more selective" institutions whose first-year students’ test scores places these institutions in roughly the top fifth of [[Baccalaureate college|baccalaureate institutions]].<ref name="Carnegie Foundation">{{cite web|url=http://classifications.carnegiefoundation.org/lookup_listings/view_institution.php?unit_id=164465&start_page=institution.php&clq=%7B%22ipug2005_ids%22%3A%22%22%2C%22ipgrad2005_ids%22%3A%22%22%2C%22enrprofile2005_ids%22%3A%22%22%2C%22ugprfile2005_ids%22%3A%22%22%2C%22sizeset2005_ids%22%3A%22%22%2C%22basic2005_ids%22%3A%22%22%2C%22eng2005_ids%22%3A%22%22%2C%22search_string%22%3A%22amherst%22%2C%22first_letter%22%3A%22%22%2C%22level%22%3A%22%22%2C%22control%22%3A%22%22%2C%22accred%22%3A%22%22%2C%22state%22%3A%22%22%2C%22region%22%3A%22%22%2C%22urbanicity%22%3A%22%22%2C%22womens%22%3A%22%22%2C%22hbcu%22%3A%22%22%2C%22hsi%22%3A%22%22%2C%22tribal%22%3A%22%22%2C%22msi%22%3A%22%22%2C%22landgrant%22%3A%22%22%2C%22coplac%22%3A%22%22%2C%22urban%22%3A%22%22%7D |title=More Selective Institution - Amherst College}}</ref>  For the class first enrolled in Fall 2015, Amherst received 8,568 applications and accepted 1,210 for a 14% acceptance rate.<ref name=CommonDataSet>{{cite web |url=https://www.amherst.edu/aboutamherst/glance/common_data_sets/2015 |title=Amherst College Common Data Set 2015-2016 |publisher=Amherst College}}</ref> Of the 477 enrolling, 53% were women.<ref name=CommonDataSet/>
ALAS, MORE SHAKESPEARE!: Cleopatra says of this animal, "Dost thou not see my baby at my breast that sucks the nurse asleep?"
Snake
Several Roman poets, writing within ten years of the event, all mention bites by two asps,Note that an unnamed editor of the respected Loeb Classical Library translation stated the "twin snakes" mentioned in the text are simply a "symbol of death." as does Florus, a historian, some 150 years later.
3
Egypt then became the Roman province of Aegyptus.
Biography  Accession to the throne thumbnail|left|upright|Ptolemaic Queen (Cleopatra VII?), 50-30 B.C., 71.12, Brooklyn Museum The identity of Cleopatra's mother is unknown, but she is generally believed to be Cleopatra V Tryphaena of Egypt, the sister or cousin and wife of Ptolemy XII Auletes, or possibly another Ptolemaic family member who was the daughter of Ptolemy X and Cleopatra Berenice III Philopator if Cleopatra V was not the daughter of Ptolemy X and Berenice III.The German historian Werner Huß (Die Herkunft der Kleopatra Philopator (The descent of Cleopatra Philopator), Aegyptus 70, 1990, pp.
Ptolemy, thirteen years old at that time, had set up a throne for himself on the harbor.
THE RICH LIST: Start your search engines, please-- in 2007 Forbes' youngest U.S. billionaire was Sergey Brin, 33 of this company
Google
Sergey Mikhaylovich Brin (; born August 21, 1973) is a Russian-born American computer scientist and internet entrepreneur who, together with Larry Page, co-founded Google, one of the world's most profitable Internet companies.
3
As their search engine grew in popularity among Stanford users, it required additional servers to process the queries.
The algorithm was named after Page himself.
In September 2012, at the signing of the California Driverless Vehicle Bill, Brin predicted that within five years, robotic cars will be available to the general public.
PUZZLING ANIMATION: Robert Browning told us to do this "along with me. The best is yet to be"
grow old
Legacy  Browning is now popularly known for such poems as Porphyria's Lover, My Last Duchess, How They Brought the Good News from Ghent to Aix, and The Pied Piper of Hamelin, and also for certain famous lines: "Grow old along with me!" (Rabbi Ben Ezra), "A man's reach should exceed his grasp" and "Less is more" (Andrea Del Sarto), and "God’s in His heaven—All’s right with the world!" (Pippa Passes).
3
p. 45
Published in four parts from November 1868 to February 1869, the poem was a success both commercially and critically, and finally brought Browning the renown he had sought for nearly forty years.
(Blackwell, 1993) Woolford, John and Karlin, Daniel.
THE MOVIES: In a 1995 post-apocalyptic film, Sylvester Stallone played this judge who served as jury and executioner
Judge Dredd
In 1995, he played the futuristic character Judge Dredd (from the British comic book 2000 AD) in the eponymous film Judge Dredd.
3
Stated on
The 1990s began with Stallone starring in the fifth installment of the Rocky franchise, Rocky V.
She died at their mother Jackie Stallone's Santa Monica home, after choosing to leave UCLA hospital.
BIBLE QUOTES BY BOOK: "...The children of Israel came nigh: & he gave them in commandment all that the Lord had spoken with him in Mount Sinai"
Exodus
The latter is mentioned many times in the Book of Exodus and other books of the Bible,Joseph J. Hobbs, Mount Sinai (University of Texas Press) 1995, discusses Mount Sinai as geography, history, ethnology and religion. and the Quran.
3
Christians settled upon this mountain in the third century AD. Georgians from the Caucasus moved to the Sinai Peninsula in the Fifth Century, and a Georgian colony was formed there in the Ninth Century.
It also has a Greek Orthodox chapel, constructed in 1934 on the ruins of a 16th-century church, that is not open to the public.
Six articles.
TV GUIDE SAYS: "Howard baffles Sheldon"
The Big Bang Theory
People with the given name Howard or its variants include:   Howard, given name  Howard Duane Allman (1946–1971), American guitar virtuoso  Howard Burnett (born 1961), Jamaican track and field athlete  Howard J. Burnett (born 1929), American president of Washington & Jefferson College  Howard Carter (1874–1939), English archaeologist and Egyptologist  Howard Carter (disambiguation), name of several other people  Howard Cosell (1918–1995), sports broadcaster  Howard Dean (born 1948), American politician  Howard Donald (born 1968), English singer  Howard Devoto (born Howard Trafford, 1952), English singer/songwriter  Howard Duff (1913–1990), American actor  Howard Goodall (born 1958), British musician, musicologist and TV presenter  Howard Grant (born 1966), Jamaican-Canadian boxer  Howard Hawks (1896–1977), American producer  Howard Hesseman (born 1940), American actor  Howard Hughes (1905–1976), American aviation pioneer and film mogul  Howard Johnson (disambiguation), name of several people  Howard Jones (disambiguation), name of several people  Howard Judd (1935–2007), American physician and medical researcher  Howard Kendall, English football player and manager  Howard Lederer (born 1964), professional poker player  H. P. Lovecraft (1890–1937), American writer  Howard McNear (1905–1969), American radio and television actor  Howard Marks (born 1945), former teacher, drug smuggler and author  Howard T. Odum (1924–2002), American ecologist  Howard Allen O'Brien, birth name of American writer Anne Rice  Howard Payne (athlete) (1931–1992), English hammer thrower  Howard Shore (born 1946), Canadian composer  Howard Smothers (born 1973), American football player  Howard Staunton (1810-1874), British chess player and Shakespearean scholar  Howard Stern (born 1954), American talk-radio host  Howard Stidham (born 1954), American football player  Howard Tayler (born 1968), American cartoonist  Howard Turner (1897–1976), American football player  Howard K. Stern (born 1968), attorney for Anna Nicole Smith  Howard Unruh (1921–2009), American spree killer  Howard Wilkinson (born 1943), English football manager  Howard Zinn (1922–2010), American historian, academic, author, playwright, and social activist  Howie, nickname  Howie B (born 1963), Scottish musician and producer  Howie Carr (born 1952), American journalist  Howie Day (born 1981), American singer-songwriter  Howie Dorough (born 1973), American musician with Backstreet Boys  Howie Epstein (1955–2003), American musician  Howie Gordon (born 1971), Big Brother contestant  Howie Gordon (later known as Richard Pacheco), American pornographic actor  Howie Hawkins, American politician and activist  Howie Long (born 1960), American football player  Howie Mandel (born 1955), Canadian comedian and actor, Deal or no Deal- TV Show  Howie Meeker (born 1924), Canadian hockey player, TV sports announcer, Member of Parliament  Howie Morenz (1902–1937), Canadian ice hockey player  Howie Nave (born 1956), American comedian, radio personality, writer, promoter and movie critic  Howie Rose (born 1954), American sportscaster  Howie Winter (born 1929), American mobster  Ward, shortened form  Ward Bond (1903–1960), American actor  Ward Christensen, American computer programmer and creator of the Xmodem and the first BBS  Ward Churchill (born 1947), American controversial writer and political activist  Ward Cunningham (born 1949), American founder of WikiWikiWeb  Ward Weaver III (born 1963), American convicted felon  Fictional characters  Howard Stark, father of Iron Man Tony Stark   Howard Roark, protagonist of Ayn Rand's novel The Fountainhead  Howard the Duck, a comic book character  Howard Wolowitz, a fictional character on the CBS television series The Big Bang Theory, portrayed by actor Simon Helberg.
3
Howard is a popular English given name originating from Old Norse Hávarðr, which means "high guard".
A diminutive is "Howie" and its shortened form is "Ward" (most common in the 19th century).
Top 600.
LITERA-SEA: This author of "The Red Badge of Courage" based his story "The Open Boat" on his own experience after a shipwreck
Stephen Crane
The Red Badge of Courage is a war novel by American author Stephen Crane (1871–1900).
3
Critics in particular have pointed to the repeated use of color imagery throughout the novel, both literal and figurative, as proof of the novel's use of Impressionism.
An anonymous reviewer for The New York Press wrote shortly after the novel's initial publication that "One should be forever slow in charging an author with genius, but it must be confessed that The Red Badge of Courage is open to the suspicion of having greater power and originality than can be girdled by the name of talent." The reviewer for The New York Times was impressed by Crane's realistic portrayal of war, writing that the book "strikes the reader as a statement of facts by a veteran", a sentiment that was echoed by the reviewer for The Critic, who called the novel "a true book; true to life, whether it be taken as a literal transcript of a soldier's experiences in his first battle, or...
Harold Frederic wrote in his own review that "If there were in existence any books of a similar character, one could start confidently by saying that it was the best of its kind.
VEGAS MOVIES: In this 1979 film Robert Redford steals a $12 million horse from a Vegas hotel; Jane Fonda follows him
The Electric Horseman
Fonda and Redford were paired again in the popular big-screen version of Barefoot in the Park (1967) and were again co-stars much later in Pollack's The Electric Horseman (1979).
3
Sponsored Archives: A Robert Redford Retropsective.
While at Colorado, Redford began drinking heavily, and as a result lost his scholarship and was kicked out of school.
In 2013, he starred in All
OXFORD: John Grisham is just one of the famous authors who have lived in Oxford in this southern state
Mississippi
John Grisham graduated from Mississippi State University before attending the University of Mississippi School of Law in 1981.
3
John Ray Grisham, Jr. (; born February 8, 1955)John Grisham's Biography.
By this time, Grisham was halfway through college.
In 2005, Grisham received the Peggy V. Helmerich Distinguished Author Award.
LITERARY HODGEPODGE: In a poem about this city, Bret Harte wrote, "Wrap her, o fog, in gown and hood of her Franciscan brotherhood"
San Francisco
The 1860 massacre of between 80 and 200 Wiyots at the village of Tuluwat was well documented historically and was reported in San Francisco and New York by Harte.
3
oil painting by John Pettie(1884)
Newburgh Daily Journal, May 6, 1902.
His wife, Anna (née Griswold) Harte, died on August 2, 1920.
BODIES OF WATER: Lake Manapouri on South Island is one of this country's deepest lakes
New Zealand
The South Island or Te Waipounamu is the larger of the two major islands of New Zealand, the other being the smaller but more populous North Island.
3
Rural passenger services on branch lines were provided by mixed trains and Vulcan/88 seater railcars but the mixeds had largely ceased to exist by the 1950s and the railcars were withdrawn in the mid-1970s.
This was due to the carriages being steam-heated.
When the glaciers retreated, they left basins that are now filled by lakes.
WHEN THEY WERE IN COLLEGE: Joan Cusack performed with an improv group while studying at this school in Madison
University of Wisconsin
Madison also refers to other U.S. place names:  Madison, Alabama  Madison, Arkansas  Madison, California  Madison, Connecticut  Madison, Florida  Madison, Georgia  Madison, Illinois  Madison, Indiana  Madison, Kansas  Madison, Maine  Madison (CDP), Maine, census-designated place within the town of Madison  Madison, Minnesota  Madison, Mississippi  Madison, Missouri  Madison, Nebraska  Madison, New Hampshire  Madison, New Jersey  Madison (town), New York  Madison (village), New York, within the town of Madison  Madison, North Carolina  Madison, Ohio  Madison, Pennsylvania  Madison, South Dakota  Madison, Tennessee  Madison, Virginia  Madison, West Virginia  Madison (town), Wisconsin, adjacent to the city of Madison  Madison Lake, Minnesota  Madison Park, Seattle, Washington   Streets   Madison Avenue, a famous avenue in New York City  Madison Street (Chicago), a major thoroughfare  Madison Street (Manhattan)   Green places   Madison Blue Springs State Park, in Florida  Madison River, in Wyoming and Montana  Madison Square, a public park in New York City  Mount Madison, in the White Mountains of New Hampshire   Buildings   Madison Square Garden and previous buildings of the same name, all in New York City:  Madison Square Garden (1879), the original open-air arena  Madison Square Garden (1890), an indoor arena built on the same site  Madison Square Garden (1925), an indoor arena built on a different site (not occupied by the current Garden)   Education   University of Wisconsin–Madison, Madison, Wisconsin  James Madison University, Harrisonburg, Virginia  Madison College (disambiguation)  Madison University, Mississippi   Entertainment   Madison (band), a former American rock band from New Jersey  Madison (dance)  Madison (film)  Madison (TV series), a Canadian TV series running 1993–1997  Madison Records, a U.S. record label   Ships   USCS Madison, a survey ship in service with the United States Coast Survey from 1850 to 1858  USS Madison, two United States Navy ships and one United States Revenue Cutter Service (later United States Coast Guard) cutter  USS James Madison, one United States Navy guided-missile submarine and one United States Revenue Cutter Service (later United States Coast Guard) cutter   Nicknames   "Il Madison", an Italian nickname for Land Rover Arena in Bologna  "Madison", the code name for an Itanium 2 processor  "Madison", the code name for a wiki-like platform for drafting and commenting upon legislative text, first used with the Online Protection and Enforcement of Digital Trade Act   Other uses   Madison (cycling), a track cycling event, named after the first and second Madison Square Gardens  Madison (wrestler), a Canadian professional wrestler  Madison piercing, a body piercing at the front of the neck  Madison (dog), an animal actress who is best known for playing the role of Vincent in the TV show Lost   See also   Madisonville (disambiguation)  Madison Avenue (disambiguation)  Madison County (disambiguation)  Madison Heights (disambiguation)  Madison High School (disambiguation)  Madison Township (disambiguation)  Madison Scouts Drum and Bugle Corps  Marbury v. Madison  Maddison, a surname and given name
1
Madison may refer to:   People   Madison (name), a given name and a surname  James Madison, fourth President of the United States   Place names  Madison, Wisconsin is the state capital of Wisconsin.
AND THEN YOU "DY": Michael Fokine created this avian ballet in 1905 for ballerina Anna Pavlova
The Dying Swan
Pavlova is most recognized for the creation of the role The Dying Swan and, with her own company, became the first ballerina to tour ballet around the world.
3
In 1898, she entered the classe de perfection of Ekaterina Vazem, former Prima ballerina of the Saint Petersburg Imperial Theatres.
The Kingdom of the Shades.
Viking, 1984.
THE SILVER SCREEN: The fact that this singing cowboy starred in "Silver Spurs" should "Trigger" your memory
Roy Rogers
Trigger may refer to:  Notable animals and people  Trigger (horse), owned by cowboy star Roy Rogers  Trigger Alpert (1916–2013), American jazz bassist  Bruce Trigger (1937–2006), Canadian archaeologist  Technology  Trigger (firearms), a mechanism that actuates the firing of firearms  Database trigger  Dead man's trigger, a safety device that activates safeguards if the operator is incapacitated  Flip-flop (electronics), called a trigger circuit by IBM   Image trigger, a device used in high speed cameras  Schmitt trigger, an electronic circuit  Trigger function, in event-driven programming  Art, entertainment, and media Fictional entities  Trigger (Only Fools and Horses), a BBC sitcom character played by Roger Lloyd-Pack  Trigger Argee, a fictional character in a series of science fiction short stories by James H. Schmitz   Devil Trigger, a transformation ability found in the Devil May Cry series  Trigger, a fictional horse in "Ernie (The Fastest Milkman in the West)"  Films  Trigger (film), a 2010 Canadian film  Trigger, Jr. (1950), an American film starring Roy Rogers  Literature  The Trigger, a 1999 science fiction novel by Arthur C. Clarke and Michael P. Kube-McDowell  Triggers (novel), a 2012 science fiction novel by Robert J. Sawyer  Music Groups and labels  Trigger (band), Serbian hard rock/heavy metal band  Albums and EPs  Trigger (EP), an EP and song by the Swedish band
1
In Flames  Trigger (Porno Graffitti album), an album by the Japanese band Porno Graffitti  Instruments  Trigger (drums), a transducer that allows a drum to control an electronic device  Trigger (guitar), the Martin N-20 guitar played by Willie Nelson  Trigger (trombone), a switch that enables a trombonist to switch from one set of tubing to another  Trigger pad, a device used in electronic percussion  Brands and enterprises  Trigger (company), a Japanese animation studio founded by Hiroyuki Imaishi  Ships  USS Trigger (SS-237), a submarine  USS Trigger (SS-564), a submarine  Science  Trigger (particle physics), hardware or software based device for the (online-)selection of specific event classes from large datasets  Trigger, one event that makes a slope failure in landslides, in the causes of landslides  Environmental trigger, a factor caused (or aided) by the environment  ATLAS trigger system, in the ATLAS experiment  Biology  Hibernation induction trigger, a blood substance that induces hibernation  Seizure trigger, a factor that can cause a seizure  Spawning triggers, environmental cues that cause fish to breed  Other uses  Trigger, a verb conjugation specifying the subject's role in languages with Austronesian alignment  Casus belli, an event triggering a war  Trauma trigger, an event causing traumatic memories or feelings to resurface  See also
THEIR FIRST FILMS: Kevin Kline chose to debut in this 1982 Meryl Streep film based on a novel
Sophie's Choice
Supporting Actress for Kramer vs. Kramer (1979), and Best Actress for Sophie's Choice (1982) and for The Iron Lady (2011).
3
Vassar drama professor Clinton J Atkinson noted, "I don't think anyone ever taught Meryl acting.
Focusing on three women of different generations whose lives are interconnected by the novel Mrs. Dalloway by Virginia Woolf, the film was generally well received and won all three leading actresses a Silver Bear for Best Actress.
Acting style and legacy   Such is Streep's contemporary position in world cinema that Vanity Fair has commented that "it's hard to imagine that there was a time before Meryl Streep was the greatest-living actress".
THE TUDORS: We're out of wives as Katherine Parr is played by her, acting royalty, the younger daughter of Vanessa Redgrave
Joely Richardson
A member of the Redgrave family of actors, she is the daughter of Sir Michael Redgrave and Lady Redgrave (the actress Rachel Kempson), the sister of Lynn Redgrave and Corin Redgrave, the mother of actresses Joely Richardson and Natasha Richardson, the aunt of British actress Jemma Redgrave, and the mother-in-law of actor Liam Neeson.
3
On screen, she has starred in more than 80 films and is a six-time Oscar nominee, winning the Academy Award for Best Supporting Actress for the title role in the 1977 film Julia.
She also played leading roles in two 2011 historical films: Shakespeare's Coriolanus (which marked actor Ralph Fiennes' directorial debut), in which she plays Volumnia; and Roland Emmerich's Anonymous, as .
Guantanamo Bay (Gitmo) is a concentration camp."
YOUR FILM DAYS ARE NUMBERED: Bruce Willis saves a young boy who sees dead people in this 1999 film
The Sixth Sense
He has appeared in over 60 films, including Color of Night (1994), Pulp Fiction (1994), 12 Monkeys (1995), The Fifth Element (1997), Armageddon (1998), The Sixth Sense (1999), Unbreakable (2000), Sin City (2005), Red (2010), and The Expendables 2 (2012).
3
Willis attended Penns Grove High School in his hometown, where he encountered issues with a stutter.
The starring role, opposite Cybill Shepherd, helped to establish him as a comedic actor, with the show lasting five seasons winning him an Emmy Award for Outstanding Lead Actor in a Drama Series and a Golden Globe Award for Best Actor - Television Series Musical or Comedy.
In Ocean's Twelve (2004), he makes a cameo appearance as himself.
GOOD MORNING, ARMENIA: In recent years Armenia has fought this nation for control of Armenian-populated Nagorno-Karabakh
Azerbaijan
Nagorno-Karabakh is internationally recognized as part of Azerbaijan, but most of the region is governed by the Nagorno-Karabakh Republic, a de facto independent but unrecognized state established on the basis of the Nagorno-Karabakh Autonomous Oblast of the Azerbaijan SSR. Azerbaijan has not exercised political authority over the region since the advent of the Karabakh movement in 1988.
1
Other languages apply their own wording for mountainous, upper, or highland; for example, the official name used by the Nagorno-Karabakh Republic in France is Haut-Karabakh, meaning "Upper Karabakh".
ROYALTY: This country has been ruled by Haakon the Good, Haakon the Old & Haakon the Broad-Shouldered
Norway
Haakon Haraldsson (c. 920–961), also Haakon the Good (Old Norse: Hákon góði, Norwegian: Håkon den gode) and Haakon Adalsteinfostre (Old Norse: Hákon Aðalsteinsfóstri, Norwegian: Håkon Adalsteinsfostre), was the king of Norway from 934 to 961.
3
Claus Krag:
University of Oslo.
Subsequently the Norwegians were tormented by years of war.
BY THE SEA: A visit to the southern Israeli resort city of Eilat might include snorkeling in this sea
Red Sea
Eilat (; Hebrew:  ; ) is Israel's southernmost city, a busy port and  popular resort located at the northern tip of the Red Sea, on the Gulf of Aqaba.
3
ISBN. Archaeological excavations uncovered impressive prehistoric tombs dating to the 7th millennium BC at the western edge of Eilat, while nearby copper workings and mining operations at Timna Valley are the oldest on earth.
When King David conquered Edom, which up to then had been a common border of Edom and Midian, he took over Eilat, the border city shared by them as well.
International relations  Twin towns –
TRIANGLES: The east side of this large, triangular citadel faces Red Square
the Kremlin
It separates the Kremlin, the former royal citadel and currently the official residence of the President of Russia, from a historic merchant quarter known as Kitai-gorod.
3
Three square gates existed on this side of the wall, which in the 17th century, were known as: Konstantino-Eleninsky, Spassky, Nikolsky (owing their names to the icons of Constantine and Helen, the Savior and St. Nicholas which hung over them).
In the mid-century a gilded double-headed eagle was set on top of the tower.
Former Beatle Ringo Starr and His All Starr Band performed at Moscow's Russia Hall in August 1998.
WHO'S YOUR MAMA?: Isabella Rossellini
Ingrid Bergman
Background and early life Rossellini was born in Rome, the daughter of Swedish actress Ingrid Bergman, who was of Swedish and German descent, and Italian director Roberto Rossellini, who was born in Rome from a family originally from Pisa, Tuscany.
3
At Lancôme, in 1990, she was involved in product development for the fragrance Trésor.
In 1996, when she was 44, she was removed as the face of Lancôme for being "too old."
Rossellini explained in a 2013 interview part of the research process for Mammas: "First of all it's about diversity.
A DAY AT THE MUSEUM: (Kelly of the Clue Crew reports from Bilbao, Spain.)This foundation has two of the world's most architecturally innovative museums, in New York & here in Bilbao, Spain
the Guggenheim
Tourism  thumb|Bilbao and the Guggenheim Museum The first notion of Bilbao as a tourist destination came with the inauguration of the railway between Bilbao and the coastal neighbourhood of Las Arenas, in the municipality of Getxo in 1872.
3
Tusell 2004: 22.
There is also the Chamber of Commerce, Industry and Navigation of Bilbao and the Stock Exchange Market of Bilbao, founded in 1890.
Blas de Otero (1916-1979).
STATE YOUR CASE: Woodbury, Middlebury & Waterbury are all cities in this state
Connecticut
England Woodbury, Devon, a village and civil parish in East Devon Woodbury Castle, a hill fort near the village of Woodbury in Devon Woodbury, Dartmouth, a hill fort near  Dartmouth in Devon Little Woodbury, an archaeological site near Salisbur in Wiltshire   New Zealand    Woodbury, New Zealand, a village near Geraldine in Canterbury, New Zealand   United States of America   Woodbury, Davy Woodbury, Connecticut Woodbury, Georgia Woodbury, Indiana Woodbury, Irvine, California Woodbury, Kentucky Woodbury, Illinois  Woodbury, Middlesex County, Massachusetts Woodbury, Michigan Woodbury, Minnesota Woodbury, New Jersey Woodbury, New York (disambiguation) Woodbury, Nassau County, New York, on Long Island Woodbury, Orange County, New York, in the Hudson Valley Woodbury, Pennsylvania Woodbury, Tennessee Woodbury, Vermont Woodbury County, Iowa Woodbury (Leetown, West Virginia), historic house listed on the National Register of Historic Places Woodbury Creek, a stream in Minnesota Fort Woodbury, a fortification on the Arlington Line during the American Civil War  Fictional Woodbury, Georgia - the settlement presided over by The Governor in The Walking Dead franchise  People  People with the given name Woodbury  Woodbury Kane (1859–1905), American yachtsman, bon vivant and soldier  Woodbury Langdon (1739–1805), American merchant, statesman and justice  People with the surname Woodbury  Angus M. Woodbury (1886–1964), American biologist  Austin Woodbury (1899–1979), Australian Catholic philosopher  B.J. Woodbury (born 1959), Canadian actor and comedian  Bruce L. Woodbury (born 1944), American politician and lawyer  Charles Herbert Woodbury (1864–1942), American painter  Charles Johnson Woodbury (1844–1927), American lecturer on poetry and literature  Cliff Woodbury (1894–1984), American racecar driver  Daniel Phineas Woodbury (1812–1864), American soldier and engineer  Egburt E. Woodbury (c. 1860–1920), New York State Attorney General 1915–1917  Ellen Woodbury, animator and sculptor  Eri D. Woodbury (1837–1928), Union Army officer during the American Civil War  Frank B. Woodbury (1867–1962), American leader The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints  Gordon Woodbury (1863–1924), United States Assistant Secretary of the Navy from 1920 to 1921  Helen Laura Sumner Woodbury (1876-1933), American historian, studied children and women in industry  Isaac B. Woodbury (1819–1858), American composer and publisher of church music  Joan Woodbury (1915–1989), American actress  Levi Woodbury (1789–1851), American justice on the United States Supreme Court  Max A. Woodbury, American mathematician  Peter Woodbury (1899–1970), American judge  Richard Woodbury (born 1961), American politician and economist  Tory Woodbury (born 1978), American football player  Urban A. Woodbury (1838–1915), American politician  Walter B. Woodbury (1834–1885), British inventor and pioneering photographer  Wendall Woodbury (1942–2010), American television journalist and news anchor  Woody Woodbury (born 1924), American comedian, actor and television personality  Other uses , one of several ships of the United States Navy  See also Woodbury Common (disambiguation) Woodbury High School (disambiguation) Woodbury House (disambiguation) Woodbury Township (disambiguation) Woodbury College, Montpelier, Vermont, United States Woodbury Common Premium Outlets in Central Valley, New York, United States (part of the town of Woodbury, Orange County) Woodbury matrix identity, a mathematical formula Woodbury Soap Company Woodbury University, Burbank, California, United States
1
Woodbury may refer to:  Geography  Antarctica Woodbury Glacier, a glacier on Graham Land, British Antarctic Territory
ISLANDS: The healthful climate of this south Atlantic island didn't help Napoleon; he died there
St. Helena
It has fewer incredible things in it than ours."Talk Of Napoleon At St. Helena (1903), pp.
3
The state continued to nominate the bishops and to control church finances.
Meanwhile, French territorial rearrangements in Germany occurred without Russian consultation and Napoleon's annexations in the Po valley increasingly strained relations between the two.
A collection of German states intended to serve as a buffer zone between France and Central Europe, the creation of the Confederation spelled the end of the Holy Roman Empire and significantly alarmed the Prussians.
"E"OGRAPHY: Napoleon was able to leave this island February 26, 1815
Elba
He was exiled to the island of Elba.
3
French Admiral Villeneuve then retreated to Cádiz instead of linking up with French naval forces at Brest for an attack on the English Channel.
With crisis after crisis at hand, he rarely rose to the occasion.
Venita Datta, "'L'appel Au Soldat': Visions of the Napoleonic Legend in Popular Culture of the Belle Epoque." French Historical Studies 2005 28(1): 1–30  Reduced to a minor character, the new fictional Napoleon became not a world historical figure but an intimate one – fashioned by individuals' needs and consumed as popular entertainment.
FILMED IN HAWAII: Kauai filled in for South America in this first Indiana Jones film
Raiders of the Lost Ark
Parts of the island were also used for the opening scenes of the Indiana Jones film Raiders of the Lost Ark.
3
Poipū  Kōloa  Lāwai  Kalāheo  Eleele  Hanapēpe  Kaumakani  Waimea  Kekaha  Transportation  Air Located on the eastern end of the island, Lihue Airport is the aviation gateway to Kauai.
Hawaii Route 583, also known as Maalo Road, stretches  from Route 56 just north of Lihuʻe to dead-end at Wailua Falls Overlook in the interior.
Original name and language discussion.
THE BEAT OF THE TOM: In the 1957 group known as Tom & Jerry, Tom was Art Garfunkel & he was Jerry
Paul Simon
He partnered in his earlier years with Paul Simon in the folk rock duo Simon & Garfunkel.
3
Citing personal differences and divergence in career interests, they split following the release of their most critically acclaimed album, Bridge over Troubled Water, in 1970.
In 2009, Garfunkel appeared as himself on the HBO television show Flight of the Conchords episode entitled "Prime Minister".
In the early 1980s, he walked across Japan in a matter of weeks.
MAJOR LEAGUE SOCCER: The excitement generated by this 1994 event was partially responsible for MLS being formed
The World Cup
Major League Soccer's spring-to-autumn schedule results in scheduling conflicts with the FIFA calendar and with summertime international tournaments such as the World Cup and the Gold Cup, causing several players to miss some MLS matches.
3
10 Columbus Crew  1  2008  3  2004, 2008, 2009  20 Chicago Fire  1  1998  1  2003  18 Portland Timbers  1  2015    –  5 Colorado Rapids  1  2010    –
MLS has also introduced various initiatives and rules intended to improve quality of players while still maintaining the salary cap.
Television coverage and revenue have increased since the league's early years.
RELIGION: Followers of this religion believe Moroni was the last of the Nephite prophet-historians
Mormon
According to the Book of Mormon, a religious text of the Latter-day Saint movement, the Nephites (LDS.org: "Book of Mormon Pronunciation Guide" (retrieved 2012-02-25), IPA-ified from «nē´fīt») are one of four groups (including the Lamanites, Jaredites, and Mulekites) to have settled in the ancient Americas.
2
Mosiah II seemed to refer to the civil aspect of this legal system when he refers to "the law which has been given to us by our fathers" (Mosiah 29:15, 25).
Religious law Actions that were contrary to the laws of the Church of Christ but apparently not illegal are also mentioned.
ULYSSES: This goddess of wisdom appears to Ulysses' son Telemachus & tells him to find out what happened to Dad
Athena
330 BC, Louvre (CA 7124) thumb|right|An Empire style chariot clock depicting Telemachus, with the goddess Athena at the back.
3
127; comp.
ad Aen.
Other appearances Telemachus is the subject of François Fénelon's The Adventures of Telemachus, Son of Ulysses (1699), a scathing attack on the monarchy of France.
JULIA: She's also buried (sorry, entombed) at Riverside Dr. & 122nd St.
Julia Grant
Behind the Namehttp://german.about.com/library/blname_top10.htm  List of notable persons with the given name Julia Julia the Elder Julia (daughter of Drusus the Younger), 5 - 43 CE  Julius family In Ancient Rome, women from all branches of the Julius family were called Julia: Julia (gens), one of the most ancient patrician families at Ancient Rome Julia Caesaris, the name of many Julias of the Julii Caesares (Julius Caesar branch) Julia the Elder, (Julia Caesaris) daughter of emperor Augustus Livia Drusilla, Julia Augusta, the wife of emperor Augustus Julia (daughter of Drusus the Younger) or Julia Drusi Caesaris, granddaughter of emperor Tiberius  Daughters of Germanicus: Julia Agrippina or Agrippina the Younger, Julia Drusilla (see Drusilla (sister of Caligula) and Julia Livilla) Julia Drusilla, daughter of emperor Caligula  Other Romans Berenice (daughter of Herod Agrippa I), Julia Berenice, princess of the Herodian Dynasty Julia Urania, wife of Roman client king Ptolemy of Mauretania Julia Bodina, a freedwoman to queen Julia Urania of Mauretania Julia Procilla, mother of general Gnaeus Julius Agricola Julia Iotapa, Queen of Commagene Julia Iotapa, Queen of Cetis Julia Iotapa, Princess of Cilicia Julia Mamaea, second wife of Polemon II of Pontus Julia,  Herodian Princess of Armenia Julia Agricola, daughter of general Gnaeus Julius Agricola and wife to historian Tacitus Julia Flavia, daughter of emperor Titus Julia Balbilla, poetess and companion of Hadrian's wife Vibia Sabina Julia Tertulla, daughter of suffect consul Gaius Julius Cornutus Tertullus Julia Serviana Paulina, niece of emperor Hadrian Julia Crispina, princess and granddaughter of Julia Berenice Julia Fadilla, younger half-sister to emperor Antoninus Pius and paternal aunt to empress Faustina the Younger Julia Domna, empress and wife of emperor Septimius Severus Julia Maesa, Domna's elder sister Julia Soaemias, daughter to Julia Maesa and mother of emperor Elagabalus Julia Avita Mamaea, Soaemias' sister and mother of emperor Alexander Severus Julia Severa or Severina, daughter of emperor Philip the Arab Julia Aurelia Zenobia, Syrian queen of Palmyra Helena of Constantinople or Flavia Julia Helena mother of emperor Constantine I  Christian saints Julia of Corsica, Feast Day May 22 Julia of Mérida, Feast Day December 10 Julia Billiart, Feast Day April 8 Ursula Julia Ledochowska, Saint Ursula, Feast Day October 21 One of the Martyrs of Zaragoza  Other people  Given name Julia Alexandratou (born 1985), Greek pornstar, singer and former model Júlia Almeida (born 1983), Brazilian actress Julia Arthur (1869–1950), Canadian-born stage and film actress Julia Boutros (born 1968), Lebanese singer Julia de Burgos (1914–1953), Puerto Rican poet Julia Child (1912–2004), American gourmet cook, author, and television personality Julia Clarete (born 1979), Filipino singer-actress Julia Dean (1830-1868), stage actress Julia Dean (1878–1952), stage and film actress Julia Duporty (born 1971), Cuban sprinter Julia Fischer (born 1983), German violinist Julia Gillard (born 1961), Australian politician, former Prime Minister and former Deputy Prime Minister Julia Görges (born 1988), German tennis player Julia Grant (1826–1902), wife of 18th U.S. President Ulysses Grant Julia Haworth (born 1979), British actress Julia Ward Howe (1819–1910), wrote poem that became the Battle Hymn of the Republic Julia Hütter (born 1983), German pole vaulter Julia Irwin (born 1951), Australian politician Julia Lathrop (1858–1932), American social reformer Julia Lennon (1914–1958), mother of John Lennon Julia Lipnitskaya (born 1998), Russian figure skater Julia Louis-Dreyfus (born 1961), American actress, costar of the TV series Seinfeld Julia Mancuso (born 1984), American skier Julia Marlowe (1865–1950), English-born American actress known for her interpretations of William Shakespeare.
3
"downy-[haired, bearded]" or alternatively from the name of the Roman god Jupiter.
Like its male counterpart, the given name Julia had been in use throughout Late Antiquity (e.g. Julia of Corsica) but became rare during the Middle Ages, and was revived only with the Italian Renaissance.
Julia Menéndez (born 1985), Spanish field hockey defender Julia A. Moore (1847–1920), American poet Julia Morgan (1872–1957), San Francisco architect, see Hearst Castle Julia Morton (1912–1996), American author and botanist Julia Murney (born 1969), American actress and singer, best known for her role as Elphaba in Wicked Julia Newmeyer (born 1933), actress known as Julie Newmar who played Catwoman Julia Nyberg (1784–1854), Swedish poet Julia Ormond (born 1965), British actress, star of the movie Legends of the Fall Julia Piera (born 1970), contemporary Spanish poet Julia Phillips (1944–2002), film producer and author Julia Roberts (born 1967), American actress Julia Sanderson (1888–1975), American actress and singer Julia Sakara (born 1969), Zimbabwean middle distance runner Julia Sawalha (born 1968), British actress Julia Schruff (born 1982), Görges's German compatriot and tennis player Julia Stiles (born 1981), American actress, star of the movie 10 Things I Hate about You Julia Sweeney (born 1959), American actor and comedian, Alumna of Saturday Night Live Julia Swayne Gordon (1878–1933), American actress Julia Vakulenko (born 1983), Ukrainian tennis player Julia Wells, actress known as Julie Andrews Julia Wilson (born 1978), Australian rower  Fictional characters Julia (Nineteen Eighty-Four), a character in Nineteen Eighty-Four by George Orwell Julia, a character in The Ragwitch by Garth Nix Julia, a character in William Shakespeare's play Two Gentlemen of Verona Julia (Rave Master), a character in manga series Rave Master Julia, a character in the anime series Cowboy Bebop Julia Chang, character in the Tekken video game series Julia "Jules" Cobb, a character played by Courteney Cox on the comedy series Cougar Town Julia Crichton, the female protagonist in Fullmetal Alchemist: The Sacred Star of Milos Julia Fernandez, a character from the manga and anime Beyblade G-Revolutions Julie "Finn" Finlay, a character played by Elisabeth Shue in CSI: Crime Scene Investigation Julia Flyte, a character in Brideshead Revisited by Evelyn Waugh Julia Graham, a character in the 2010 adaptation of Parenthood Julia Houston, a character played by Debra Messing on the TV series Smash Julia McNamara, a character on the U.S. television series Nip/Tuck Julia Sugarbaker, a character in the sitcom Designing WomenJulia, a character in the 2008 movie of the same name played by Tilda Swinton Donna Julia, a character in the poem Don Juan by Lord Byron Julia Ogden, a character in the Canadian television series "Murdoch Mysteries"  List of variants Džūlija, Jūlija (Latvian) Gill (English) Gillian (English) Giulia (Italian) Giuliana (Italian) Giulietta (Italian) Ίουλα, Íoula, Íula (Greek) Ιουλία, Ioulía, Iulía (Greek) Ιουλιέττα or Ιουλιέτα, Ioulietta/Ioulieta, Iulietta/Iulieta'' (Greek) Iuliana, Iouliana (Ιουλιάνα) (Greek) Iulianna, Ioulianna (Ιουλιάννα) (Greek) Iúile (Irish) Iulia (Bulgarian), (Hawaiian), (Romanian) Iuliana (Romanian) Jill (English) Jillian (English) Jillie (English) Jilly (English) Julia (English) Jools (English) Jovita (Spanish) Jules (English) Juli (Hungarian) Júlia (Hungarian), (Portuguese), (Slovak), (Catalan) Júlía (Icelandic) Juliana (Dutch), (English), (German), (Portuguese), (Spanish) Juliane (French), (German) Julianna (English), (Hungarian), (Polish) Julianne (English) Julie (English), (French), (Czech) Julienne (French) Julienna (French) Juliet (English) Julieta (Spanish), (Portuguese) Julietta (Spanish) Juliette (French) Julija (Croatian), (Lithuanian), (Slovene) Jūlija (Latvian) Julijana (Slovene) Julinka (Hungarian) Juliska (Hungarian) Julcia/Julka/Julia (Polish) Julitta (Dutch) Juulia (Finnish, Estonian) Uliana (Ульяна) (Russian)
ADDRESS ME: Patrick Henry gave his rousing "give me liberty or give me death" address in this pre-revolutionary year
1775
Sarah became mentally ill and died there in 1775.
3
Settling in Hanover County, in about 1732 John Henry married Sarah Winston Syme, a wealthy widow from a prominent Hanover County family of English ancestry.
Marriage and family thumb|right|View of Rural Plains near Totopotomoy Creek in Virginia.
But, after inspecting the facilities, Henry  "saw that if he agreed, his wife would be locked into a windowless brick cell containing only a filthy mattress on the floor and a chamber pot.
AND SIX: Julie Andrews sang it as the sixth tone of the diatonic scale
La
She rose to prominence starring in musicals such as My Fair Lady and Camelot, both of which earned her Tony Award nominations.
2
Originally, the doctors assured Andrews that she should regain her voice within six weeks, but Andrews' stepdaughter Jennifer Edwards said in 1999 "it's been two years, and it [her singing voice] still hasn't returned."Andrews sues over lost voice.
For a Walt Disney video release she again portrayed Mary Poppins and narrated the story of The Cat That Looked at a King in 2004.
TOUGH CHICKS: She was played on TV by Diana Rigg & on film by Uma Thurman
Emma Peel
Short film 1997 Batman & Robin Dr. Pamela Isley/Poison Ivy 1997 Gattaca Irene Cassini 1998  Fantine 1998  Emma Peel 1999 Sweet and Lowdown Blanche 2000 Vatel Anne de Montausier 2000  Charlotte Stant 2000 Great Books Narrator TV series; episode: "Les Miserables" 2001 Tape Amy Randall 2001 Chelsea Walls Grace 2002 Hysterical Blindness Debby Miller Television film; also executive producer 2003 Kill Bill: Volume 1 The Bride 2003 Paycheck Dr. Rachel Porter 2004 Kill Bill: Volume 2 Beatrix Kiddo/The Bride 2005 Nausicaä of the Valley of the Wind Kushana (voice) English version 2005 Be Cool Edie Athens 2005 Prime Rafi Gardet 2005  Herself 2005  Ulla 2006 My Super Ex-Girlfriend Jenny Johnson/G-Girl 2007  Diana McFee (adult) 2008  Emma Lloyd Also producer 2008 My Zinc Bed Elsa Quinn Television film 2008  Joy Television film 2009 Motherhood Eliza Welsh 2010 Percy Jackson & the Olympians: The Lightning Thief Medusa 2010 Ceremony Zoe 2012 Bel Ami Madeleine Forestier 2012 Smash Rebecca Duvall TV series; 5 episodes 2012 Playing for Keeps Patti King 2013 Movie 43 Lois Lane Segment "Super Hero Speed Dating" 2013 Nymphomaniac Mrs. H 2014 Jump!
3
Her forename Uma, Sanskrit उमा, meaning "splendour, light", is a name of Parvati,Uma Thurman profile: news, photos, style, videos and more – HELLO!
WENN daily news, IMDb, April 1, 2005.
Activism and charity work  Thurman has been involved in various philanthropic and activist causes.
WHO'S THE BOSS: Named for founder Carlo, it's the crime family of which John Gotti was boss
Gambino
John Joseph Gotti, Jr. (October 27, 1940 – June 10, 2002) was an American mobster who became  boss of the Gambino crime family in New York City.
3
and John Sr.'s wife Philomena (referred to as Fannie),Capeci, Mustain (1996), pp.
1988 also saw Gotti, Gigante and new Lucchese boss Victor Amuso attending the first Commission meeting since the Commission trial.
Victoria DiGiorgio Gotti, up to that point unaware of her son's involvement in the mob, blamed her husband for ruining her son's life and threatened to leave him unless he allowed John Jr. to leave the mob.
JAILHOUSE ROCK: This "Chateau" on a tiny rock in the Mediterranean was a prison in real life, not just in "The Count of Monte Cristo"
Château d'If
After six years of imprisonment in the Château d'If, Dantès is on the verge of suicide when he befriends the Abbé Faria ("The Mad Priest"), a fellow prisoner whom he hears trying to tunnel his way to freedom.
3
Baron Franz d'Épinay: A friend of Albert de Morcerf, first fiancé of Valentine de Villefort.
Cristo”.
111–146  External links  Critical approach on The Count of Monte Cristo by Enrique Javier González Camacho in Gibralfaro, the journal of creative writing and humanities at the University of Malaga (in Spanish)  Tale Spinners for Children: The Count of Monte Cristo MP3 download Pierre Picaud: The "Real" Count "Count of Monte Cristo
NATIONAL MEDAL OF ARTS RECIPIENTS: Actress Jessica Tandy received the medal the same year as her husband, this fellow actor in the film "Cocoon"
Hume Cronyn
Following the end of her marriage to the British actor Jack Hawkins, she moved to New York in 1940, where she met Canadian actor Hume Cronyn.
3
In the mid-1980s she had a career revival.
She also appeared in The Valley of Decision (1945), The Green Years (1946, as Cronyn's daughter), Dragonwyck (1946) starring Gene Tierney and Vincent Price and Forever Amber (1947).
Golden Globe Award for Best Supporting Actress –
POP MUSIC: (Hi, I'm Rebecca Herbst from "General Hospital")  On "G.H." Miguel Morez was played by Ricky Martin, an ex-member of this Puerto Rican singing group
Menudo
Martin began his career at age twelve with the all-boy pop group Menudo.
3
However, "none of us had more than a couple of scratches and bruises" and he arrived at the festival on time by taxi later that day.
Ricky Martin became one of the top-selling albums of 1999, and was certified 7× platinum in the United States, selling over 22 million copies worldwide.
In November 2007, Sony BMG Norte released Ricky Martin Live: Black and White Tour on CD, DVD and Blu-ray Disc.
PACIFIC ISLANDS: Belgian priest Father Damien ministered to lepers on this Hawaiian island
Molokai
thumb|220px|Father Damien's signature  Father Damien or Saint Damien of Molokai, SS.CC. or Saint Damien de Veuster ( or ; January 3, 1840 –
3
He was the tenth person in what is now the United States to be recognized as a saint by the Catholic Church.
" This seems to be an account fulfilling the contemporary European ideas about the Hawaiians more than an accurate record of conditions.
I have set down these private passages, as you perceive, without correction; thanks to you, the public has them in their bluntness.
'56: Queen Elizabeth & the Duke of Edinburgh made an official visit to Lagos in this, Britain's largest African colony
Nigeria
Lagos  (Yoruba: Èkó)  is a conurbation in the Nigerian state of Lagos.
2
Also, on 12 December 1991, the seat of the Federal Government was also formally relocated to Abuja.
The main dry season is accompanied by harmattan winds from the Sahara Desert, which between December and early February can be quite strong.
SCHOOL MOTTOES: Harvard University's motto is simply Veritas, meaning this
truth
thumb|Statue of Veritas outside the Supreme Court of Canada  In Roman mythology, Veritas, meaning truth, was the goddess of truth, a daughter of Saturn and the mother of Virtue.
3
Educational mottos
This Latin word "veritas" now appears in the mottos of many colleges and universities.
University of Cape Coast in Ghana also included Veritas in "Veritas Nobis Lumen".
THE ACE OF HEARTS: During WWI, Lt. Henry goes AWOL & escapes to Switzerland to be with his love Catherine in this Hemingway novel
A Farewell to Arms
Catherine I of Navarre (Queen of the Navarre from 1483 to 1517)  Catherine I of Russia (Empress of Russia)  Catherine II of Russia, more commonly known as Catherine the Great (Empress of Russia)  Catherine, Duchess of Cambridge (known before marriage as Kate Middleton)  Literature  Catherine Ames from East of Eden  Catherine Barkley from A Farewell to Arms   Catherine Crawfield or Kitten, from Jeaniene Frost's Night Huntress  Catherine or Kitty, from Jane Austen's Pride and Prejudice  Catherine Earnshaw from Emily Brontë's Wuthering Heights  Catherine from Roger O. Hirson's Pippin  Catherine Mckenna from Bernard MacLaverty's Grace Notes  Catherine Sloper, the protagonist in Henry James' Washington Square  Catherine the Great: Portrait of a Woman by Robert K. Massie  Music
2
Notable people with the given name include:  Nobility  Catherine of Aragon (Queen of England and first wife of King Henry VIII)  Catherine of Portugal (Queen of Great Britain, wife of Charles II)  Catherine Howard (Queen of England and fifth wife of King Henry VIII).
Catherine, metalcore band  Katerine, French musician  Katheryn Elizabeth Hudson, better known as Katy Perry, singer  Katharine McPhee (born 1984), singer   Movies, television, and video games  Catherine Bell (born 1968), American actress Catherine "Kate" Bosworth (born 1983), American actress Katharine Houghton Hepburn (born 1907), American actress Katie Holmes, (born 1978), American actress Catherine Deneuve, (born 1943), French actress Catherine Keener (born 1959), American actress Catherine Oxenberg (born 1961), American actress Catherine Tate (born 1968), English actress Catherine, a 2011 puzzle-platformer adventure video game  Other fictional characters  Dr. Catherine Halsey, the creator of the SPARTAN supersoldiers in Halo: Reach and other releases in the Halo franchise  Catherine Tramell, the lead character from the film Basic Instinct (1992)  Catherine Willows, a character from CSI: Crime Scene Investigation  Katherine, a character from the television show Ten Things I Hate About You  Katherine Mayfair, a character in the television show
THE DUKES OF HAZARD: We learn that the Duke of Milan set young Miranda & her usurped father adrift at sea in this Shakespeare work
The Tempest
Miranda  may refer to:  Places Uranus Miranda (moon), a moon orbiting Uranus  Australia  Miranda, New South Wales, a community in Sutherland Shire, New South Wales  Miranda railway station, a railway station in Sutherland Shire, New South Wales  Brazil  Miranda, Mato Grosso do Sul, a município in the State of Mato Grosso do Sul  Colombia  Miranda, Cauca, a municipio in Cauca Department  Cuba  Güinía de Miranda, a village in Villa Clara Province  Italy  Miranda, Molise, a comune in the Province of Isernia  New Zealand  Miranda, New Zealand, a community in Waikato District, Waikato  Portugal  Miranda do Corvo, a município in Coimbra District, Centro  Miranda do Douro, a freguesia in Bragança District, Norte  Miranda do Douro, a município in Bragança District, Norte  Terra de Miranda, a plateau in Bragança District, Norte  Spain  Belmonte de Miranda, a concejo or municipio in the Principality of Asturias  Miranda de Arga, a municipio in the Chartered Community of Navarre  Miranda de Ebro, a municipio in the Province of Burgos  United States  Miranda, California, an unincorporated community in Humboldt County  Miranda, South Dakota  Venezuela  Miranda (state), one of the 23 states which make up the country  Francisco de Miranda, Anzoátegui, a municipio in the state of Anzoátegui  Francisco de Miranda, Guárico, a municipio in the state of Guárico  Francisco de Miranda, Táchira, a municipio in the state of Táchira  Miranda, Carabobo, a municipio in the state of Carabobo  Miranda, Falcón, a municipio in the state of Falcón  Miranda, Mérida, a municipio in the state of Mérida  Miranda, Trujillo, a municipio in the state of Trujillo  Miranda, Zulia, a municipio in the state of Zulia  People  Miranda (given name), includes list of real and fictional people with given name Miranda  Miranda (surname), includes list of people with surname Miranda  Miranda (footballer) (born 1984), Brazilian footballer  Miranda (singer) (born 1976), French-born Spanish singer  Miranda (Colombian singer), Colombian singer, winner of La Voz Colombia  Fictional characters  Miranda (Doctor Who), a character in the British novel series Eighth Doctor Adventures  Miranda (The Tempest), a character in the play The Tempest by English writer William Shakespeare  Miranda (W.I.T.C.H.), a character in the American television series W.I.T.C.H.  Arts and entertainment Films and television  Miranda (1948 film), a film by English director Ken Annakin  Miranda (1985 film), a film by Italian director Tinto Brass  Miranda (2002 film), a film by British director Marc Munden  Miranda (TV series), a British television series  Miranda, a country in the French film The Discreet Charm of the Bourgeoisie  Miranda II, a spaceship in the Japanese television series Transformers: Energon  Miranda-class starship, a starship in the American film series Star Trek  Miranda, a fictional planet in the American film Serenity (based on the TV series Firefly)  Literature  Miranda (novel), a novel by Polish writer Antoni Lange  Music   Miranda (group), French Eurodance group  Miranda!
1
, an Argentine band  Miranda (album), an album by Icelandic band Tappi Tíkarrass  Other uses  Miranda (programming language), a computer programming language  Miranda (satellite), a British satellite in low earth orbit  Miranda satellite, second Venezuelan satellite in low earth orbit   Miranda, a station of on the Los Teques Metro (Navy Blue) line of the Caracas Metro in Venezuela  Miranda aurantia, a North American spider  Miranda Camera Company, a Japanese camera manufacturer  Miranda herba, a Sri Lankan carnivorous plant  Miranda House, University of Delhi, an Indian university college  Miranda IM, a computer software instant messaging client  Miranda Naturalists' Trust, a New Zealand conservation organisation  Miranda v. Arizona, an American legal case  Miranda warning, an American police warning given to suspects about their rights, before they are interrogated  See also   Mirinda
CELEBRITY LIVES: (Hi, I'm Bob Woodward.) In my book "Wired", I wrote about "the short life & fast times" of this comedian
John Belushi
(Jeff Beck album), 1976  Wired (Hugh Cornwell album), 1993 Songs  "Wired", a song by Prism from their album Beat Street  "Wired", a song by Sevendust from their eponymous debut album  Publications and internet  Wired (book), a 1984 by Bob Woodward about the American actor and comedian John Belushi  Wired (magazine), an American science and technology magazine  Wired (website) (formerly Wired News or HotWired), a formerly separately-run website which publishes technology blogs and includes parts of the magazine  Wired UK, a UK offshoot monthly science and technology magazine owned by Condé Nast  Television Series  Wired (TV series), a 2008 British television miniseries  Wired, 1988 TV series produced by  Tim Graham  Episodes  "Wired", a 2005 two-part episode of Power Rangers: SPD  "Wired", a 2002 two-part episode of  The Zeta Project animated series  Other  Wired (demoparty), a Belgian annual demoparty which ran from 1994 to 1998  Wired, an energy drink containing caffeine and taurine  Wired, slang term for being under the influence of caffeine  Workforce Innovation in Regional Economic Development (WIRED), a branch of the United States Department of Labor  WZMP, a radio station at 96.5 FM licensed to Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, formerly known as "Wired 96.5"  See also  Wire (disambiguation)
1
Wired may refer to:  Art, entertainment, and media Fictional entities  The Wired, a fictional virtual reality/computer network in the cyberpunk anime series Serial Experiments Lain  Film  Wired (film), a 1989 adaptation of the book by Woodward  Music Albums  Wired
RED SOX IT TO ME: With 44 homers, 121 RBIs & a .326 average, Carl Yastrzemski is the last baseball player to win this
the Triple Crown
In , Yastrzemski achieved a peak in his career, leading the Red Sox to the American League pennant for the first time in over two decades, in that season being voted the American League MVP, and was the last winner of the Triple Crown for batters in the Major Leagues until Miguel Cabrera achieved the feat in 2012.1967 American League Batting Leaders at Baseball Reference1967 American League Most Valuable Player Award voting resultsa at Baseball Reference
3
In an article he co-wrote for the November 1967 issue of SPORT Magazine, Yastrzemski credited Boston's remarkable season to manager Dick Williams and an infusion of youth, including Rico Petrocelli and Tony Conigliaro.
He is one of two players to win the All-Star Game MVP Award despite playing for the losing team, Brooks Robinson having done so in 1966.
He was also known for modifying his batting helmets by enlarging the right ear hole (for comfort) and removing part of the right ear flap (for better vision of the ball as it was being pitched).
LUKE: Elizabeth demanded that her son not be called Zacharias but this
John the Baptist
Elizabeth may also refer to:  People Saints   St. Elizabeth (Biblical figure), the mother of John the Baptist  St. Elisabeth of Schönau (1129–1164), a German Benedictine visionary  St. Elisabeth of Hungary (1207–1231), the daughter of King Andrew II of Hungary  St. Elizabeth of Aragon or Elizabeth of Portugal (1271–1336), Queen consort of Portugal  St. Elizabeth Ann Seton (1774–1821), the first canonized American saint  St. Princess Elisabeth of Hesse and by Rhine (1864–1918), Elizabeth the New-Martyr  Empresses  Elizabeth of Russia  Elisabeth of Bavaria, wife of Austrian Emperor Franz Joseph I, also known as Empress Elisabeth or "Sisi"
2
Other royal women  Elizabeth of Bosnia (c.1339–1387), 14th century Queen of Hungary and Poland  Elizabeth of York (1466–1503), the Queen Consort of King Henry VII of England  Elizabeth Stuart, Queen of Bohemia (1596–1662), daughter of James VI&I of Scotland & England, the "Winter Queen" of Bohemia, and grandmother of George I of Great Britain  Elizabeth Báthory (1560–1614), niece of the Polish King Stephen Báthory; Hungarian countess and murderess  Elisabeth of the Palatinate (1618–1680), Bohemian princess and philosopher  Élisabeth de France (Élisabeth Philippine Marie Hélène; 1764–1794), sister of Louis XVI of France, also known as Madame Élisabeth  Princess Elizabeth of the United Kingdom (1770–1840), daughter of George III  Princess Elisabeth of Hesse-Darmstadt (1864-1918), Russian grand duchess and Orthodox martyr, wife of Grand Duke Sergei Alexandrovich of Russia and granddaughter of Queen Victoria  Elisabeth of Romania (1894–1956), the Queen Consort of King George II of Greece  Princess Elisabeth of Denmark (1935–)  Princess Elizabeth of Yugoslavia (1936–)  Ships  HMS Elizabeth, various ships  Elisabeth (schooner), built in 1922  Places Australia  Elizabeth, South Australia  Elizabeth Reef  South Africa  Port Elizabeth, Eastern Cape  United States  Elizabeth, Colorado  Elizabeth, Illinois  Elizabeth, Indiana  Hopkinsville, Kentucky, originally known as Elizabeth  Elizabethtown, Kentucky  Elizabeth, Louisiana  Cape Elizabeth, Maine  Elizabeth Islands, Massachusetts  Elizabeth, Minnesota  Lake Elizabeth Township, Minnesota  St. Elizabeth, Missouri  Elizabeth, New Jersey (largest city with the name in the U.S.)
Elizabeth City, North Carolina  Elizabethtown, North Carolina  Elizabeth, Pennsylvania  Elizabeth Township, Pennsylvania (disambiguation)  Elizabethton, Tennessee  Elizabeth City County, Virginia  Elizabeth, West Virginia  Media and entertainment Films and television series  Elizabeth R (TV series), 1971  Elizabeth (telenovela), 1980  Elizabeth (film), 1998  Elizabeth: The Golden Age, 2007  Stage  Elisabeth (musical), a Viennese German-language musical written by Michael Kunze and composed by Sylvester Levay, about the life of Elisabeth of Bavaria  Songs  "Elizabeth" by Aiden  "Elizabeth" by The Airborne Toxic Event  "Elisabeth" by Billy Gilman  "Elizabeth" by Catie Curtis  "Elisabeth" by Dreamshade  "Elizabeth" by Elephanz  "Elizabeth" by Ghost (Swedish band)  "Elisabeth" by Hansi Hinterseer  "Elizabeth", a three-part song by Kamelot  Elizabeth (The Statler Brothers song) by The Statler Brothers  "Elizabeth" by Street Dogs  "Elizabeth" by Tom Odell  "Elizabeth" by Trading Yesterday  Albums  Elisabeth (album), a 1990 album by Elisabeth Andreassen  Elizabeth by Killah Priest  Poems  "Elizabeth" by Edgar Allan Poe  Video games  Elizabeth (BioShock)  See also    Elizabeth (given name)  Elizabeth Cup (disambiguation)  Elizabeth Stakes (disambiguation)  Saint Elizabeth (disambiguation)
LANDMARKS: If you're in this South African town of about 3 million, take the cableway up Table Mountain, which overlooks it
Cape Town
Table Mountain (Khoikhoi: Hoerikwaggo, Afrikaans: Tafelberg) is a flat-topped mountain forming a prominent landmark overlooking the city of Cape Town in South Africa, and is featured in the Flag of Cape Town and other local government insignia.
3
Legend attributes this phenomenon to a smoking contest between the Devil and a local pirate called Van Hunks.
From 2004 (when monitoring was re-initiated) till 2012 there was only one nesting pair on the cliffs below Noordhoek Peak, (and since then only a single individual), when previously there had been at least three pairs, one of which had a cliff nest near the upper cable station on Table Mountain, in Blinkwater Ravine.
Up until the late 1990s baboons occurred on all the mountains of the Peninsula, including the Back Table immediately behind Table Mountain.
CINEMA OF "BLOOD": Movie in which Jean-Claude Van Damme wins a secret martial arts tournament
Bloodsport
The most successful of these films include Bloodsport (1988), Kickboxer (1989), Lionheart (1990), Double Impact (1991), Universal Soldier (1992), Hard Target (1993), Street Fighter (1994), Timecop (1994), Sudden Death (1995), JCVD (2008) and The Expendables 2 (2012).
3
Exclusive: Jean-Claude Van Damme Talks To Today.
Biography.com.
style="text-align:center;" Win11-1-0 Georges VerlugelsKO19802P.K.A. Middleweight ChampionshipBrussels, BelgiumKickboxing style="text-align:center;" Win10-1-0 Sherman BergmanKKO1979 Nov 410:56Tampa, Florida, USAFull-Contact (Van Damme climbs off floor to win.) style="text-align:center;" Win9-1-0 Rolf RisbergKKO19791Ingelmunster, BelgiumKickboxing style="text-align:center;" Win8-1-0 Emile LeibmanKKO19791Iseghem, BelgiumKickboxing style="text-align:center;" Win7-1-0 Cyrille NolletKKO19781Iseghem, BelgiumKickboxing style="text-align:center;" Win6-1-0 Orlando LangKO197810:26Antwerp, BelgiumKickboxing style="text-align:center;" Win5-1-0 Jacques PiniarskiKKO19781BelgiumKickboxing style="text-align:center;" Win4-1-0 Eric "Basel" StraussKKO197810:18Antwerp, BelgiumKickboxing style="text-align:center;" Win3-1-0 Andre "Robar" RobaeysKKO19781Mulhouse, BelgiumKickboxing style="text-align:center;" Win2-1-0 Michel JuvillierKO197810:39Antwerp, BelgiumFull-Contact style="text-align:center;" Loss1-1-0 Etienne "Tuf"
ENTERTAINING JOHNS: This director's credits include "A Better Tomorrow", "Once a Thief" & "Windtalkers"
John Woo
A Better Tomorrow () is a 1986 Hong Kong crime film directed by John Woo and starring Ti Lung, Leslie Cheung and Chow Yun-fat.
3
Although Ti Lung was the film's lead actor, co-star Chow Yun-fat's breakout performance out-shined him, solidifying the latter's status as one of the top superstars in the Hong Kong film industry.
Ho flatly refuses.
French star Alain Delon sent Chow a personal thank you note.
TV & MOVIE ACTORS: Jennifer Saunders was in "Space World" & played Edina on this sitcom about 2 spicy British women
Absolutely Fabulous
She received worldwide acclaim through the early to mid-1990s for writing and playing the lead role of Edina Monsoon in the sitcom Absolutely Fabulous.
3
Both Saunders and French became continuing members of the Comic Strip, which included Peter Richardson, Rik Mayall and Robbie Coltrane, as well as Saunders' future husband Adrian Edmondson.
The show's creator, Sharon Horgan, stated that she 'begged' Saunders to take the role, having been a fan of Saunders' previous comedy work.
Retrieved 5 October 2007.
RETITLED CINEMA: We're not sure how "Unluckly Son-in-Law (To Be) Meets Tricky Daddy", this Ben Stiller film, fit on Thai Marquees
Meet the Parents
About Mary, the Meet the Parents trilogy, DodgeBall, Tropic Thunder, the Madagascar series, and the Night at the Museum trilogy.
3
His mother, actress Anne Meara (1929-2015), who was from an Irish Catholic background, converted to Reform Judaism after marrying his father.
He started performing on the cabaret circuit as opening act to the cabaret siren Jadin Wong.
He then put together Elvis Stories, a short film about a fictitious tabloid focused on recent sightings of Elvis Presley.
HOLLYWOULDN'T: John Candy, John Belushi & Chris Farley have all been linked to film versions of this John Kennedy Toole novel
A Confederacy of Dunces
Unfinished projects Candy was in talks to portray Ignatius J. Reilly in a now-shelved film adaptation of John Kennedy Toole's Pulitzer Prize-winning novel A Confederacy of Dunces.
3
Episode Guide - Police Surgeon (Series) (1971-1975)Jan 23, 1975 - "Web of Guilt" Dr Locke intervenes when a woman judge (Nancy Olson) endangers herself by becoming too protective of her brother who is accused of murder.
, Summer Rental and Uncle Buck.
Harry Crumb Also Executive Producer Speed Zone Charlie Cronan Uncle Buck Buck Russell1990 Masters of Menace Beer Truck Driver Home Alone Gus Polinski – Polka King of the Midwest
MEN IN SONG: Sting's musical tribute to noted author & dandy Quentin Crisp is titled this "in New York"
An Englishman
Entitled An Englishman in New York the production documented Crisp's later years in Manhattan.
3
Crisp left home to move to the centre of London at the end of 1930 and after dwelling in a succession of flats found a bed-sitting room in Denbigh Street where he "held court with London's brightest and roughest characters." His outlandish appearance –
He was cremated with a minimum of ceremony as he had requested and his ashes were flown back to Phillip Ward in New York.
How to Have a Life Style, (1975), Quentin Crisp, 159 pages, Cecil Woolf Publishing, ISBN 0-900821-83-3.
THE OSCARS: This star of "Elmer Gantry" earned his last Oscar nomination for Louis Malle's 1981 film "Atlantic City"
Burt Lancaster
The 1960 film of the same name starred Burt Lancaster as Gantry and Jean Simmons as Sister Sharon Falconer.
3
Elmer Gantry was first published in the United States by Harcourt Trade Publishers in March 1927 and was dedicated by Lewis to the American journalist and satirist H. L. Mencken.
Robert J. Higgs. "Religion and Sports: Three Muscular Christians in American Literature", American Sport Culture: The Humanistic Dimensions ed.
H.L. Mencken and the Debunkers.
WORLD OF BUSINESS: Hilton's first hotel in this city opened in 1999; the earlier "Hilton" there was actually a prison
Hanoi
Known Hotel sponsor of Biketoberfest 2015  Vietnam  Hanoi Hilton, a former prison in Hanoi  Schools  Hilton College of Hotel and Restaurant Management — an academic college at the University of Houston  Hilton College (South Africa) in Hilton, KwaZulu-Natal, South Africa  Hilton High School in Hilton, New York, US  C. D. Hylton High School in Woodbridge, Virginia, US  Hylton Red House School, a comprehensive secondary school for ages 11–16 located in Redhouse, Sunderland, England  Hilton Head Preparatory School, a private school for grades Kindergarten through 12th grade, located in Hilton Head Island, South Carolina, US  Hilton Central School District, a public school district in New York State, US  Hilton Head Christian Academy, a private Christian school for grades Kindergarten through 12th grade, located in Hilton Head Island, South Carolina, US  Hilton Elementary School (Newport News, Virginia), an elementary school in Newport News, Virginia, US  Hilton D. Bell Intermediate School, a large intermediate school in the Garden Grove Unified School District in Garden Grove, California  Hilton Leech House and Amagansett Art School, a historic school in Sarasota, Florida   People   Hilton (surname)  Hilton (given name)  Other  Bangkok Hilton (1989), an Australian television miniseries  Chip Hilton Player of the Year Award, presented to a basketball player who has demonstrated personal character both on and off the court  Conrad N. Hilton Humanitarian Prize, the largest humanitarian award in the world  Eckmann–Hilton argument, an argument in mathematics about two monoid structures on a set where one is a homomorphism for the other  The Hanoi Hilton (film) (1987), a Vietnam War film which focuses on the experiences of American prisoners of war who were held in the Hanoi Hilton  Hilton Flight, a horse ridden in international show jumping by Richard Spooner  Hilton International Stakes, a Group 2 Australian thoroughbred horse race  Hilton Quota, the quota applied to beef imported from certain countries into the European Union  Hilton v. Guyot (1895), a U.S. Supreme Court case in which the court described the factors to be used when considering the application of comity  Hilton's law, an observation on topological anatomy  Hilton's white line, a boundary in the anal canal  Hylton v. United States (1796), a U.S. Supreme Court case involving judicial review  I Want To Be a Hilton (2005), a weekly NBC reality television series that was hosted by Kathy Hilton  London Hilton bombing, a 1975 explosion at the Hilton Hotel in London, England  Sydney Hilton bombing, a 1978 explosion outside the Hilton Hotel in Sydney, Australia  See also Hilton Hotel (disambiguation) Hilton House (disambiguation)  Hiltonia, Georgia
2
Hilton or Hylton may refer to:  Companies  Hilton Worldwide, a global hospitality company based in the United States  Hilton Hotels, an international chain of hotels trademarked by Hilton Worldwide  Hilton Garden Inn, a chain of hotels trademarked by Hilton Worldwide  Homewood Suites by Hilton, a chain of hotels trademarked by Hilton Worldwide  Home2 Suites by Hilton, a new chain of hotels trademarked by Hilton Worldwide  Hilton Grand Vacations Company, a subsidiary of Hilton Worldwide  DoubleTree by Hilton, a chain of hotels trademarked by Hilton Worldwide  Embassy Suites Hotels, a chain of hotels trademarked by Hilton Worldwide  Conrad Hotels & Resorts, an international chain of luxury hotels owned and operated by Hilton Worldwide  Waldorf Astoria Hotels & Resorts, a chain of luxury hotels and resorts owned and operated by Hilton Worldwide  Hilton HHonors, the loyalty program for all brands of Hilton Worldwide hotels and resorts  Hilton Cigarettes, a Brazilian brand of cigarettes popular  Hilton instruments, a supplier of laboratory equipment, consumables and chemicals, based in the UK  Ladbrokes, a British based gambling company, known as Hilton Group plc from May 1999 to February 2006  Places Australia  Hilton, South Australia, a suburb of Adelaide  Hilton, Western Australia, a suburb of Perth  Hilton South Wharf Melbourne  Hilton
On the Park Melbourne  Hilton Airport, Tullamarine Hilton Sydney  Canada  Hilton, Ontario, a township in the Canadian province of Ontario  Hilton Beach, Ontario, a small village surrounded by the township  Hilton Falls Conservation Area, located in Campbellville, Ontario  Norway  Hilton, a farm near Kløfta, Ullensaker, known as the birthplace of Augustus Hilton, father of American hotelier Conrad Hilton  South Africa  Hilton, KwaZulu-Natal, a town next to Pietermaritzburg  Hilton, Bloemfontein, a suburb of Bloemfontein  United Kingdom England  Hilton Park (stadium), a multi-use stadium in Leigh, Greater Manchester  Hilton Hall, an 18th-century mansion house now in use as an office and business centre at Hilton, near Wolverhampton, Staffordshire  Hilton Park services, a motorway service station, between junctions 10a and 11 of the M6 motorway in Staffordshire  Hilton, Cambridgeshire, a village  Hilton, Cumbria, a village  Hilton, Derbyshire, a village  Hilton, Dorset, a village  Hilton, County Durham, a village  Hilton, North Yorkshire, a village  Hilton, Shropshire, a village  Hilton, Staffordshire, a village  Hylton Castle in Hylton district of Sunderland  Cauld Lad of Hylton, the ghost of a murdered stable boy that haunts the ruins of Hylton Castle  North Hylton, a suburb of Sunderland, in northeast England  South Hylton Metro station, serves the village of South Hylton on the banks of the River  South Hylton in Sunderland Scotland  Hilton, Aberdeen, a former village, now a neighbourhood  Hilton of Cadboll, a village  Hilton of Cadboll Stone, a Class II Pictish stone discovered at Hilton of Cadboll  Hilton, Berwickshire, a village  Hilton, Inverness, a former village, now part of the city  United States  Hilton Coliseum, a 14,057-seat multi-purpose arena in Ames, Iowa  Hilton Head Island, South Carolina, a town, located on an island of the same name  Hilton Head Airport, a county-owned, public-use airport located in northeastern Hilton Head Island  Foxwoods Theatre, formerly named the Hilton Theatre, a Broadway theatre located at 213 West 42nd Street in New York City  Hilton Village, a planned, English-village-style neighborhood in Newport News, Virginia  Hilton Pier/Ravine, a park located in the village  Hilton, Kentucky  Hilton, New Jersey  Hilton, New York, a village  Hilton, Oklahoma, an unincorporated community  Hiltons, Virginia, an unincorporated community in Scott County, Virginia  Savannah/Hilton Head International Airport, located 7 miles (11 km) northwest of Savannah, Georgia  Willis, Floyd County, Virginia, also known as Hylton, an unincorporated community in Floyd County, Virginia  Hilton (Columbus, Georgia), listed on the National Register of Historic Places  Hilton (Catonsville, Maryland), listed on the National Register of Historic Places  Hilton (Santa Fe, New Mexico), Hilton Santa Fe Historic Plaza  Hilton (Daytona Beach, Florida), Hilton North Atlantic Ave.
WORLD HISTORY: Mungo Park disappeared in 1806 while exploring this west African river
Niger
The Africans (band)  Publishing African Business, a monthly magazine covering business events across Africa African Communist, a political magazine published in Johannesburg African Film (magazine), Nigerian weekly magazine    See also     Africana (disambiguation)  Africanus (disambiguation)  African American  African British  Afro-Caribbean  Afro-Bahamian  Category:African diaspora
2
African(s) may refer to:  Anything from or pertaining to Africa:  African people, people who live in Africa or trace their ancestry to indigenous inhabitants of Africa  Ethnic groups of Africa  African cuisine  African culture  African languages  African music   African grey parrot, an Old World parrot Books and radio   The African (short story), autobiographical story by French author J. M. G. Le Clézio
The Africans (radio program) Music  "African" a song by Peter Tosh from his 1977 album Equal Rights (album)
"MOON" ME AT THE MOVIES: Judd Hirsch & Marilu Henner played themselves in this movie bio about Andy Kaufman
Man on the Moon
In the fictionalized version of Kaufman's life, Man on the Moon, Kaufman would punish such audiences by reading the novel The Great Gatsby by F. Scott Fitzgerald to them.
3
His character was given multiple personality disorder, which allowed Kaufman to randomly portray other characters.
, about bringing his act to the New York wrestling territory.
Andy, the Robot  Taxi (1978) TV Series ....
AVATAR: Matsya, the first avatar of Vishnu, saved the world from a flood; he's often depicted as half man, half this
a fish
fish) is the avatar of the Hindu god Vishnu in the form of a fish.
3
It identifies the fish with Prajapati-Brahma.Krishna
On the predicted day, the devastating floods came and Manu entered the ship he built, as the waters rose.
Once when he was offering water oblation in the Kritamala River, a tiny shaphari fish was caught in his folded hands.
NONFICTION: On his own he wrote "Veil" & "Wired"; with Carl Bernstein he wrote "All The President's Men"
Bob Woodward
All the President's Men is a 1974 non-fiction book by Carl Bernstein and Bob Woodward, two of the journalists investigating the first Watergate break-in and ensuing scandal for The Washington Post.
2
In 2005 Deep Throat was revealed to be then-FBI Associate Director W. Mark Felt.
That same year, a sequel to the book, The Final Days, was published, which chronicled the last months of Nixon's Presidency, starting around the time that their previous book ended.
TONY AWARD WINNERS: (Hi, I'm Martin Short.) I won a 1999 Tony for Cy Coleman & this playwright's "Little Me"; I also received a Tony nomination for his "The Goodbye Girl"
Neil Simon
The original screenplay by Neil Simon centers on an odd trio: a struggling actor who has sublet a Manhattan apartment from a friend, the current occupant (his friend's ex-girlfriend, who has just been abandoned), and her precocious young daughter.
3
At the time he became the youngest man to win an Oscar for Best Actor.
He rewrote the screenplay in six weeks.
A 2004 TNT remake  with Jeff Daniels and Patricia Heaton keeps the screenplay from the original version.
DIFFERENT STOKES: Once a sheep-raising area, Stokes National Park is in the southwest of this vast country
Australia
Stokes National Park is a national park in Goldfields-Esperance region of Western Australia, 538 km south-east of Perth.
3
The National Park is located  west of Esperance on the southern coast.
A vehicle entry fee applies to Stokes National Park.
The park is mostly areas of coastal heath and scrubland, smaller areas of low dense forest and sandy beaches around the inlet and coast to the south of the park.
ALL THE PRESIDENTS' CHILDREN: While only 2 of the 6 children from his marriage lived to maturity, he may have fathered others with Sally Hemings
Thomas Jefferson
Sarah "Sally" Hemings ( 1773 – 1835) was an enslaved woman of mixed race owned by President Thomas Jefferson and who is believed to have had a long-term relationship and six children with him, of whom four survived and all were given freedom by Jefferson.
3
Note: The Monticello website says that Hemings' children by Wayles were Robert, James, Thenia, Critta, Peter, and Sally.
From then on the Jeffersons lived in the white community.
Their second son William Giles Roberts was also a leader.
SNL PRESIDENTIAL PLAYERS: Dana Carvey not only played Bush Sr. during the '92 race, he also played this independent Texan challenger
Ross Perot
He is well known for his impersonations of George H. W. Bush  and Ross Perot on Saturday Night Live.
3
Released a week after former colleague Mike Myers' successful (and similar) film Austin Powers in Goldmember, most critics compared the movies and panned Carvey's effort.
On June 14, 2008, Carvey filmed a second HBO stand-up special, the first in 13 years, entitled Squatting Monkeys Tell No Lies.
He donated the money to charity.
1998 MOVIES: Adam Sandler quenched America's thirst for comedy with this 1998 sports movie
The Waterboy
He is best known for his comedic roles, such as in the films Billy Madison (1995), the sports comedies Happy Gilmore (1996) and The Waterboy (1998), the romantic comedy The Wedding Singer (1998), Big Daddy (1999), and Mr. Deeds (2002), and voicing Dracula in Hotel Transylvania (2012) and Hotel Transylvania 2 (2015).
3
Adam Richard Sandler (born September 9, 1966) is an American actor, comedian, screenwriter, film producer, and musician.
Sandler is a Republican (Sandler in Zimbio's list of "Famous Republicans" [accessed May 8, 2012]).
1999 Best Comedic Performance
THE MOVIES: Mike Myers travels from '60s London to Vegas in the '90s as this "International Man of Mystery"
Austin Powers
He is known for his run as a featured performer on Saturday Night Live from 1989 to 1995, and for playing the title roles in the Wayne's World, Austin Powers, and Shrek films.
2
In 1998, he played one of his rare non-comedic roles in the film 54: Steve Rubell, proprietor of New York City's famous Studio 54, a 1970s discotheque.
as well as making comparisons between the Guardians of Peace and Grand Old Party.
TIME TO "B" SPECIAL: In "The Jungle Book", he's Mowgli's instructive panther
Bagheera
Bagheera, the black panther, befriends Mowgli because both he and Mowgli have parallel childhood experiences; as Bagheera often mentions, he was "raised in the King's cages at Oodeypore" from a cub, and thus knows the ways of man.
3
Finally, Mowgli stumbles across the village where his adopted human mother (Messua), is now living, which forces him to come to terms with his humanity and decide whether to rejoin his fellow humans.
There was also a BBC radio adaptation in 1994, starring actress Nisha K. Nayar as Mowgli, Freddie Jones as Baloo and Eartha Kitt as Kaa.
P. Craig Russell's Jungle Book Stories'' (1997) collects three stories, actually adapted from The Second Jungle Book, which originally appeared between 1985 and 1996.
PRESIDENTIAL FACIAL HAIR: In 1903 John Singer Sargent painted his presidential mustache seen here
Theodore Roosevelt
The second, Portrait of Robert Louis Stevenson and his Wife (1885), was one of his best known.http://www.jssgallery.org/Paintings/Robert_Louis_Stevenson_and_His_Wife.htm  He also completed portraits of two U.S. presidents: Theodore Roosevelt and Woodrow Wilson.
3
In 1888, Sargent released  his portrait of Alice Vanderbilt Shepard, great-granddaughter of Cornelius Vanderbilt.
During a visit to Rome in 1906 Sargent made an oil painting and several pencil sketches of the exterior staircase and balustrade in front of the Church of Saints Dominic and Sixtus, now the church of the Pontifical University of Saint Thomas Aquinas, Angelicum.
Even at his leisure, in escaping the pressures of the portrait studio, he painted with restless intensity, often painting from morning until night.
COKE'S NON-SECRET INGREDIENTS: What's called this on a Diet Coke label is also marketed as NutraSweet
Aspartame
Diet Coke was sweetened with aspartame, an artificial sweetener, after the sweetener became available in the United States in 1983; to save money, this was originally in a blend with saccharin.
3
Diet Coke and Diet Cherry Coke change logo.
2011 – Diet Coke surpasses Pepsi in sales for the first time to become the second most popular soda in the United States after Coca-Cola.
(US 2000)  "Live Your Life" (US 2001)  "Do what feels good" (US 2002)  "It's a Diet Coke thing" (US 2004)  "Life is how you take it" (US 2005)  "Light it up!" (US 2006)  "Yours" (US 2007)  "Enjoyment" (US 2007)  "What life should be like." (US 2008)
THE LOU: He partnered with straight man Joe Lyons before he teamed with Bud Abbott
Lou Costello
He is best remembered as the straight man of the comedy team of Abbott and Costello, with Lou Costello.
3
Between 1940 and 1956 they made 36 films and earned a percentage of the profits on each.
But Abbott called it quits, remarking that "No one could ever live up to Lou." The following year, Abbott performed in a dramatic television episode of General Electric Theater titled "The Joke's On Me".
Bud Abbott dies at 78 His remains were cremated and his ashes were spread into the Pacific Ocean.
THEATER ALFRESCO: As a young man, Andy Griffith spent several seasons playing this Elizabethan courtier in "The Lost Colony"
Sir Walter Raleigh
He performed as a cast member of the play for several years, playing a variety of roles, until he finally landed the role of Sir Walter Raleigh, the namesake of North Carolina's capital.
3
Griffith was nominated for "Distinguished Musical Actor" at the 1960 Tony Awards, losing to Jackie Gleason.
Two television films for NBC in 1977, The Girl in The Empty Grave and Deadly Game, were attempts for Griffith to launch a new series featuring him as Police Chief Abel Marsh, a more hard-edged version of Andy Taylor; despite strong ratings, both were unsuccessful.
In July 2010, he also starred in advertisements about Medicare.
POP MUSIC: When David Lee Roth left Van Halen, he jumped in
Sammy Hagar
In 1985, the band replaced lead singer David Lee Roth with ex-Montrose lead vocalist Sammy Hagar.
3
Eventually the brothers started playing music together in the 1960s –
As reported by Slawterhouse, in 2000 at 5150, the band worked with Roth writing new music before falling out again.
Lead vocals Eddie Van Halen –
WHO WON THE OSCAR?: Rosie Perez, for "Fearless";Holly Hunter, for "The Firm";Anna Paquin, for "The Piano"
Anna Paquin
The Piano was written and directed by Jane Campion, and stars Holly Hunter, Harvey Keitel, Sam Neill, and Anna Paquin, in her first acting role.
3
The film is an international co-production by Australian producer Jan Chapman with the French company Ciby 2000.
Alisdair proves to be a shy and diffident man, who is jokingly called "old dry balls" by his Māori neighbors.
Costume DesignJanet PattersonBest Film EditingVeronika JenetACE Eddie AwardBest Edited Feature Film –
COLLEGES & UNIVERSITIES: Senator Paul Wellstone once taught at Carleton College in Northfield in this state
Minnesota
Paul David Wellstone (July 21, 1944 – October 25, 2002) was an American academic and politician who represented Minnesota in the United States Senate from 1991 until he was killed in a plane crash in Eveleth, Minnesota in 2002.
3
Significant discrepancies were also found in the captain's flight logs in the course of the post-accident investigation, indicating he had probably greatly exaggerated his flying experience, most of which had been accrued before a 9–10 year hiatus from flying due to a fraud conviction and poor eyesight.
The American Federation of Labor and Congress of Industrial Organizations has created the AFL-CIO Senator Paul Wellstone Award for supporters of the rights of labor unions.
His distinctive green bus was present, as well as hundreds of supporters and loved ones.
FOREIGN STATES: Tripura, Sikkim & Punjab
India
Sikkim () is a landlocked Indian state located in the Himalayan mountains.
3
Later, the 36th Amendment repealed the 35th Amendment, and made Sikkim a full state, adding its name to the First Schedule of the Constitution.
The soil is coarse, with large concentrations of iron oxide; it ranges from neutral to acidic and is lacking in organic and mineral nutrients.
Among the animals more commonly found in the alpine zone are yaks, mainly reared for their milk, meat, and as a beast of burden.
& THE OSCAR GOES TO...: Him, for his role of Rod Tidwell in "Jerry Maguire"; show him the Oscar!
Cuba Gooding, Jr.
Jerry Maguire is a 1996 American  romantic comedy-drama sports film written, produced and directed by Cameron Crowe, and stars Tom Cruise, Cuba Gooding, Jr. and Renée Zellweger.
1
Andy Partridge and Harold Budd – "Through the Hill"  a clip of John Coltrane, Miles Davis, and Charles Mingus performing (Mingus' piece is "Haitian Fight Song")  "Secret Garden," originally a Bruce Springsteen track from 1995, was re-released in 1997 after its exposure in the film and on the soundtrack, and peaked at No.
ENTERTAINMENT AWARDS: At the 1998 Golden Globes, it was "As Good As It Gets" when he won the Best Actor award
Jack Nicholson
It stars Jack Nicholson as a misanthropic, racist, obsessive-compulsive novelist, Helen Hunt as a single mother with a chronically ill son, and Greg Kinnear as a gay artist.
3
She reluctantly accepts the invitation, and relationships among the three develop.
Melvin's comments during the dinner greatly flatter—and subsequently upset—Carol, and she abruptly leaves.
Retrieved January 11, 2010
ROBIN: He's starred in 2 "Good" movies: "Good Morning, Vietnam" & "Good Will Hunting"
Robin Williams
Good Will Hunting is a 1997 American drama film directed by Gus Van Sant, and stars Matt Damon, Robin Williams, Ben Affleck, Minnie Driver and Stellan Skarsgård.
3
Will is particularly struck by Sean's story of how he met his wife by giving up his ticket to the historic sixth game of the 1975 World Series, after falling in love at first sight.
The Baskin-Robbins / Dunkin' Donuts, in front of which Will mocked Harvard student Clark Much of the filming was done on location in the Greater Boston area and Toronto between April and June 1997.
Directors Guild of America Award for Outstanding Directorial Achievement in Motion Pictures – Gus Van Sant  Nominated: Writers Guild of America Award for Best Screenplay
ALPHA MALES: This innovative French director ventured into science fiction with 1965's "Alphaville"
Jean-Luc Godard
Alphaville may refer to:  Alphaville (film), a French science fiction film directed by Jean-Luc Godard  Alphaville (band), a German music group  Alphaville, São Paulo, real estate of São Paulo, Brazil, and its gated communities.
1
A fictional city in The Sims Online game  A fictional city in ALPH, a science fiction novel by Charles Eric Maine  Alphaville Films, an American film production company founded in the early 1990s by James Jacks and Sean Daniel, whose notable films include The Mummy series  FT Alphaville, a blog-style online publication of the Financial Times newspaper  Lost in Alphaville, 2014 album by The Rentals
THE LADIES OF ROCK: Ja Rule has teamed with this pop star for 2 No. 1 hits, "I'm Real" & "Ain't It Funny"
Jennifer Lopez
From 1999 to 2005, Ja Rule had several hits that made the top 20 of the U.S. Billboard Hot 100 chart, including "Between Me and You" with Christina Milian, "I'm Real (Murder Remix)" and Ain't It Funny with Jennifer Lopez, which both topped the US Billboard Hot 100, the Grammy-nominated #1 hit, "Always on Time" with Ashanti, "Mesmerize" also with Ashanti, and "Wonderful" with R. Kelly and Ashanti.
3
Early life Atkins was born in the Queens borough of New York City.
Meanwhile, in 2005, The Inc. Records had come under investigation because of drug trades by Kenneth "Supreme" McGriff, who was associated with Irv Gotti, after the label's offices were raided by FBI agents and NYPD officers a couple years earlier.http://www.billboard.com/articles/news/72794/report-feds-raid-murder-inc-in-irv-gotti-probe
In 2004, police investigated whether a feud involving The Inc. led to a fatal shooting outside a nightclub party hosted by Ja Rule and Leon Richardson where they thought he shot Proof of D12.
BANDS BY THE NUMBER: It's really just Trent Reznor as singer, guitarist & keyboardist for this band
Nine Inch Nails
As a vocalist and multi-instrumentalist, he has led the industrial rock project Nine Inch Nails since 1988.
1
He produced Marilyn Manson's first album, Portrait of an American Family (1994), and several tracks on Manson's albums Smells Like Children (1995) and Antichrist Superstar (1996).
TELEVISION: On "I Love Lucy", it was Lucy Ricardo's maiden name
McGillicuddy
(Lucille Ball's real-life home town), later corrected to West Jamestown, that she graduated from Jamestown High School, that her maiden name was "McGillicuddy" (indicating a Scottish or Irish ethnicity at least on her father's side, though she once mentioned her grandmother was Swedish; there are sizable Irish and Swedish communities in Jamestown), and that she met Ricky on a boat cruise with her friend from an agency she once worked for.
3
Lucy's hairdresser, Eve McVeagh, fixes her up in an Italian-style black wig.
Lucy even went so far as to parody Johnny Roventini's image as the Philip Morris "bellhop" in the May 5, 1952, episode, "Lucy Does a TV Commercial".
By the spring of 2003, the third season on DVD began to be released with about six episodes released every six weeks to mail order subscribers.
WHAT CENTURY ARE YOU LIVING IN?: Generals George Meade & P.G.T. Beauregard
19th century
His reputation among the public and 19th century historians suffered as a result of his short temper, his bad relationship with the press, his place in the shadow of the victorious Grant, and particularly the damaging fallout from the controversies with Dan Sickles.
3
After that war he was chiefly involved in lighthouse and breakwater construction and coastal surveying in Florida and New Jersey.
Woodford, Arthur, Charting the Inland Seas: A History of the U.S. Lakes Survey, Wayne State University Press, 1994, ISBN 978-0-8143-2499-8.
ISBN 0-395-86760-6.
OF CHAMPIONS: Formula One champion Ayrton Senna from this South American country began driving at age 4
Brazil
Ayrton Senna da Silva (; 21 March 1960 – 1 May 1994) was a Brazilian racing driver who won three Formula One world championships in 1988, 1990 and 1991.
3
Prost kept his foot down and soon edged Senna into the first corner and started pulling away.
Prost took the 1989 world title after a collision with Senna at the Suzuka Circuit in Japan, the penultimate race of the season, which Senna needed to win to remain in contention for the title.
Senna was also instrumental in bringing Audi cars into his native country, both as an import and manufacturing business.
BORN IN IRELAND: In 1790 this future Waterloo-winning general was elected to the Irish parliament
Duke of Wellington
O'Connell spearheaded a vigorous campaign that was taken up by the Prime Minister, the Irish-born soldier and statesman, the Duke of Wellington.
3
Carson, R.A.G. and O'Kelly, Claire:
The majority, approximately 175,000 in number, under John Redmond, took the name National Volunteers and supported Irish involvement in the war.
The total number of species is 574  and is distributed as follows:  264 Rhodophyta (red algae)  152 Phaeophyceae (brown algae including kelps)  114 Chloropyta (green algae)  31 Cyanophyta (Blue-green algae)
SONG LYRICS: Who could forget this Duran Duran song that begins, "Telegram force and ready, I knew this was a big mistake"
"Union Of The Snake"
The new album, Seven and the Ragged Tiger, included the late 1983 hit "Union of the Snake" (with the soprano sax solo by Andy Hamilton).
3
The band retained creative control of their visual presentation and worked closely with graphic designer Malcolm Garrett and many others over the years to create album covers, tour programs and other materials.
"The band was a natural for music television," noted Rolling Stone magazine.
Omnibus Press.
THE SPORT PLAYED: Mario Lemieux, Brett Hull & Wayne Gretzky
Ice Hockey
Mario Lemieux, OC, CQ (; ; born October 5, 1965) is a Canadian former professional ice hockey player.
3
He and his older brothers Alain and Richard grew up in a working class family in the Ville-Émard district.
At this point, Lemieux stepped in with an unusual proposal to buy the team.
—2003–04Pittsburgh PenguinsNHL101896 — — — —
'90s MUSIC: The chorus of this Beck song mentions "Two turntables and a microphone"
"Where It's At"
The record produced several hit singles, including "Where It's At", "Devils Haircut", and "The New Pollution", and was nominated for the Grammy Award for Album of the Year in 1997, winning a Grammy Award for Best Alternative Music Album as well as a Grammy Award for Best Male Rock Vocal Performance for "Where It's At".
3
The song also charted in the UK, Australia, New Zealand, and throughout Europe.
Working with producer Nigel Godrich, Beck built a studio in his garden, where they wrote many of the tracks.
Beyond his work as a performer, Beck acted as the album's curator, bringing together a diverse collection of artists—including Amon Tobin, Tyondai Braxton, Nosaj Thing, and Memory Tapes—whose work had also been influenced by Glass.
SMART CHOICES: He married Catherine Zeta-Jones
Michael Douglas
The picture also featured her real life husband Michael Douglas; through they were engaged when principal photography took place, none shared screen time.
3
Career  1980s–90s: Early acting credits  Zeta-Jones made her professional acting debut when she played the lead in Annie, a production at Swansea Grand Theatre.
Her first 2013 release was the crime thriller Broken City, directed by Allen Hughes and where she co-starred with Mark Wahlberg and Russell Crowe.
The Mask of Zorro  1999 MTV Movie Awards  Best Breakthrough Performance
"WORLD" CINEMA: When filming this 1956 motion picture, Cantinflas got many stamps in his "Passepartout"
Around the World in 80 Days
To audiences in the United States, he is best remembered as co-starring with David Niven in the Academy Award winner for Best Picture film Around the World in 80 Days, for which Moreno won a Golden Globe Award for Best Actor – Motion Picture Musical or Comedy.
3
He married Valentina Ivanova Zubareff, of Russian ethnicity, on October 27, 1936, and remained with her until her death in January 1966.
The riddle of Cantinflas: Essays on Hispanic popular culture, 1st ed.
According to one obituary, "Cantinflas" is a meaningless name invented to prevent his parents from knowing he was in the entertainment business, which they considered a shameful occupation.
SWEDEN: As well as automaker Volvo, Goteborg is home to Hasselblad, a world-famous maker of these
Cameras
Victor Hasselblad AB is a Swedish manufacturer of medium-format cameras and photographic equipment based in Gothenburg, Sweden.
2
Company history   The company was established in 1841 in Gothenburg, Sweden, by Fritz Wiktor Hasselblad, as a trading company, F. W. Hasselblad and Co.
This camera was on display at the Carl Zeiss booth during photokina 2008.
LITERARY CROSSWORD CLUES "G": Lancelot's ladylove             (9)
Guinevere
He typically features as King Arthur's greatest champion, the lord of Joyous Gard and the greatest swordsman and jouster of the age — until his adultery with Queen Guinevere is discovered, causing a civil war exploited by Mordred which brings about the end of Arthur's kingdom.
3
According to Pamela Raabe, Lancelot is portrayed in Chrétien de Troyes’ work as the bravest of knights and one whom everyone is forced to describe as uniquely perfect.
It is instead his son Galahad who ultimately achieves the Grail to drink from, along with Lancelot's cousin Sir Bors and Sir Percival, the son of King Pellinore.
She refuses to kiss Lancelot one last time, telling him to return to his lands and that he will never see her face again.
ROCKS & MINERALS: Mark Twain defined it as a hole in the groud with a liar standing at the top
mine
In 1865, his humorous story, "The Celebrated Jumping Frog of Calaveras County", was published, based on a story he heard at Angels Hotel in Angels Camp, California, where he had spent some time as a miner.
3
They had three daughters: Susy (1872–1896), Clara (1874–1962) and Jean (1880–1909).
King Leopold's Soliloquy is a stinging political satire about his private colony, the Congo Free State.
New York:
SCIENCE FICTION FILMS: Although its title is a holiday, this 1996 Will Smith film went into general release one day before that holiday
Independence Day
In 1996, Smith starred as part of an ensemble cast in Roland Emmerich's Independence Day.
3
Smith was reported in 2008 to be developing a film entitled The Last Pharaoh, in which he will star as Taharqa.
CTE is a degenerative disease caused by severe trauma to the head that can be discovered only after death.
Principal photography started on October 27, 2014.
ALEXANDRE DUMAS: Alexandre is known as Dumas this to distinguish him from his son (Dumas fils)
père
Archived 31 October 2009. also known as Alexandre Dumas, père, was a French writer.
3
His father died of cancer in 1806 when Alexandre was four.
In 1830 Dumas participated in the Revolution that ousted Charles X and replaced him with Dumas' former employer,  the Duke of Orléans, who ruled as Louis-Philippe, the Citizen King.
The Knight of the Red House, or The Knight of Maison-Rouge)  The Black Tulip (La Tulipe noire, 1850)  The New Troy (Montevideo, ou une nouvelle Troie, 1850), inspired by the Great Siege of Montevideo  Olympe de Cleves (Olympe de Cleves, 1851-2)  The Page of the Duke of Savoy (Catherine Blum, 1853-4)  The Mohicans of Paris (Les Mohicans de Paris, 1854)  The Wolf-Leader (Le Meneur de loups, 1857) the Sainte-Hermine trilogy:  The Companions of Jehu
ASTRONOMERS: Karl Schwarzschild has a type of this named after him; Schwarz is a clue
Black hole
The Schwarzschild solution, which makes use of Schwarzschild coordinates and the Schwarzschild metric, leads to a derivation of the Schwarzschild radius, which is the size of the event horizon of a non-rotating black hole.
3
thumb|Karl Schwarzschild's grave in Göttingen From 1912, Schwarzschild was a member of the Prussian Academy of Sciences.
Schwarzschild's struggle with pemphigus may have eventually led to his death.
This occurs, for example, when the mass of a neutron star exceeds the Tolman-Oppenheimer-Volkoff limit (about three solar masses).
MOMMY DEAREST: On a plane showing "One Fine Day", this star wouldn't let her daughter see mommy kiss George Clooney
Michelle Pfeiffer
He followed its success with the romantic comedy One Fine Day with Michelle Pfeiffer, and the action-thriller The Peacemaker with Nicole Kidman.
3
His maternal great-great-great-great-grandmother, Mary Ann Sparrow, was the half-sister of Nancy Lincoln, mother of President Abraham Lincoln.
The same year he directed, produced, and starred in Good Night, and Good Luck, a film about 1950s television journalist Edward R. Murrow's famous war of words with Senator Joseph McCarthy.
The documentary was broadcast on American cable TV as well as in the UK and France.
TENORS: This last name of the great tenor Beniamino  was hijacked for the title of a poorly reviewed 2003 Ben Affleck film
Gigli
After a career downturn, during which he appeared in Daredevil and the much-derided Gigli (both 2003), Affleck received a Golden Globe nomination for his performance in Hollywoodland (2006).
3
I think the sky's the limit when he wants to focus.
He has also discussed politics in interviews on Channel 4 News (2012), The O'Reilly Factor (2004, 2012), The Rachel Maddow Show (2009), Face the Nation (2012), This Week (2012, 2014), and NPR (2010, 2014).
Still in the Race with Lopez - Ben Affleck, Jennifer Lopez.
INTERNATIONAL AUTHORS: Starting in 1948 at Cornell, he lectured on books written in his native language, like "Dead Souls" & "Anna Karenina"
Vladimir Nabokov
His opinion was shared by Vladimir Nabokov, who especially admired "the flawless magic of Tolstoy's style," and by William Faulkner, who described the novel as "the best ever written."Tolstoy, Leo.
3
Widely regarded as a pinnacle in realist fiction, Tolstoy considered Anna Karenina his first true novel, after he came to consider War and Peace to be more than a novel.
Meanwhile, Stiva acts as a matchmaker with Levin: he arranges a meeting between him and Kitty, which results in their reconciliation and betrothal.
McLean's recommendations are the Kent–Berberova revision of Garnett's translation and the Pevear and Volokhonsky version.
RODNEY DANGERFIELD: As fun-loving businessman Thornton Melon, Rodney returned to college to help out his son in this comedy
Back to School
He is also remembered for his 1980s film roles, especially in Easy Money, Caddyshack, and Back to School.
3
Rodney Dangerfield (born Jacob Rodney Cohen, November 22, 1921 – October 5, 2004) was an American stand-up comedian and actor, known for the catchphrase
After his father abandoned the family, his mother moved him and his sister to Kew Gardens, Queens, and he attended Richmond Hill High School, where he graduated in 1939.
In December 1983, the "Rappin' Rodney" single became one of the first Hot 100 rap records, and the associated video was an early MTV hit.
UP ON THE "BIG" SCREEN: In this "of 1938" Bob Hope introduced "Thanks For The Memory"
The Big Broadcast
thumb|left|Bob Hope in The Ghost Breakers trailer (1940)  Hope moved to Hollywood when Paramount Pictures signed him for the 1938 film The Big Broadcast of 1938, also starring W. C. Fields.
3
The sentimental, fluid nature of the music allowed Hope's writers (he depended heavily upon joke writers throughout his career) to later create variations of the song to fit specific circumstances, such as bidding farewell to troops while on tour.
The show became the top radio program in the country.
From them he had several grandchildren, including Andrew, Miranda, and Zachary Hope.
BALLET'S IN THE HOUSE: The Royal Ballet at Covent Garden
London
Covent Garden () is a district in London on the eastern fringes of the West End, between St. Martin's Lane and Drury Lane.
3
The Royal Opera House seats 2,268 people and consists of four tiers of boxes and balconies and the amphitheatre gallery.
The original market, consisting of wooden stalls and sheds, became disorganised and disorderly, and the 6th Earl requested an Act of Parliament in 1813 to regulate it, then commissioned Charles Fowler in 1830 to design the neo-classical market building that is the heart of Covent Garden today.
Architectural Press.
ECONOMICS: This Georgian succeeded Alan Greenspan as Chairman of the Fed
Ben Bernanke
Greenspan's term as a member of the Board ended on January 31, 2006, and Ben Bernanke was confirmed as his successor.
3
Early life and education Greenspan was born in the Washington Heights area of New York City.
Although Greenspan was initially a logical positivist, he was converted to Rand's philosophy of Objectivism by her associate Nathaniel Branden.
He said he himself had to make such compromises, because he believes that "we did extremely well" without a central bank and with a gold standard.
NEW YEAR'S DAY: The Mummers New Year's Day Parade in this city started officially in 1901
Philadelphia
The Odunde Festival is also called the "African New Year" is celebrated in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania in the United States on the second Sunday of June.
3
Regional celebrations  In European countries, the New Year is greeted with private fireworks.
In Russia and the other 14 former republics of the Soviet Union, the celebration of Novi God is greeted by fireworks and drinking champagne.
Although not an official holiday, it marks the end of the holiday season and is usually when people take down trees and other decorations.
GRAVESIDE HUMOR: Perhaps he's still compiling "Notes from Underground" in St. Petersburg's Tikhvin Cemetery
Dostoyevsky
Established in 1823, some of the notables buried here are:  Mily Balakirev - (1836-1910), composer  Alexander Borodin  -  (1833-1887), composer  César Cui - (1835-1918), composer  Fyodor Dostoyevsky  -  (1821-1881), author  Leonhard Euler  -  (1707-1783), mathematician and physicist  Alexander Glazunov - (1865-1936), composer  Mikhail Glinka  -  (1804-1857), composer  Vera Komissarzhevskaya – (1864-1910), actress   Ivan Krylov  -  (1769-1844), author  Arkhip Kuindzhi - (1842-1910), artist  Modest Mussorgsky -  (1839-1881), composer  Marius Petipa - (1818-1910), ballet master and choreographer  Nikolai Rimsky-Korsakov - (1844-1908), composer  Anton Rubinstein - (1829-1894), pianist, conductor and composer   Vladimir Stasov - (1824-1906), critic  Fyodor Stravinsky - (1843-1902), operatic bass, father of composer Igor Stravinsky  Pyotr Il'yich Tchaikovsky - (1840-1893), composer    External links  Online tour on Tikhvinskoye cemetery  Guide to the Tikhvinskoye Cemetery  Category:Cemeteries in Saint Petersburg Category:Christian Orthodox cemeteries Category:Buildings and structures in Saint Petersburg Category:Religion in Saint Petersburg Category:Visitor attractions in Saint Petersburg
2
Tikhvin Cemetery (Тихвинское кладбище)  is located at the Alexander Nevsky Monastery, in Saint Petersburg, Russia.
right|thumb|200px|The grave of Pyotr Ilyich Tchaikovsky.
BIT PARTS: Ricky Gervais created this series concerning bit-part actors in England
Extras
It was followed by Extras in 2005.
3
He arrived to study biology but changed to philosophy after two weeks, and earned an upper second-class honours degree in the subject.
There are no plans for further episodes of Meets..., although editions with John Cleese and Matt Groening were recorded in 2006 for broadcast in 2007.
Gervais named an Asian black bear, also known as a moonbear, Derek after his character Derek Noakes from his series Derek''.
CAPITALS OF THE WEST INDIES: From 1936 to 1961 this capital was called Ciudad Trujillo after dictator Rafael Trujillo
Santo Domingo
As the rebels marched toward Santo Domingo, Vásquez ordered Trujillo to suppress them.
3
Rafael Leónidas Trujillo Molina (; 24 October 1891 – 30 May 1961), nicknamed El Jefe (, The Chief or The Boss), ruled the Dominican Republic from February 1930 until his assassination in May 1961.
On 13 August 1913, Trujillo married Aminta Ledesma Lachapelle.
He divorced Bienvenida in 1935 and married Martínez.
RABBI: Rabbi Abraham Isaac Kook became the first chief rabbi of Palestine formed under this league's mandate
the League of Nations
Jewish Affairs, in Report by His Majesty's Government in the United Kingdom of Great Britain and Northern Ireland to the Council of the League of Nations on the Administration of Palestine and Trans-Jordan for the year 1935 by His Majesty's Government in the United Kingdom of Great Britain and Northern Ireland to the Council of the League of Nations on the administration of Palestine and Trans-Jordan for the year 1935, The Office of High Commissioner for Palestine and Trans-Jordan, Jerusalem, 1935  thumb|Letter
3
I brought them examples of this from the past, from the incidents that took place due to people’s sins [during the Berlin Enlightenment], from which came forth groups that turned away from G-d and abandoned the source of living waters.
Therefore I promised them I would attend.
ISBN 149-090-936-2.
BRIT READ: In "Glamorama", this "American Psycho" author takes on the world of supermodels
Bret Easton Ellis
American Psycho  is a novel by Bret Easton Ellis, published in 1991.
3
(University of Puerto Rico, Mayaguez).
Adaptations   2000 film  In 2000, writer Guinevere Turner and writer/director Mary Harron adapted American Psycho into a dark, comic film released by Lions Gate Films.
As a promotion for the film, one could register to receive e-mails "from" Patrick Bateman, supposedly to his therapist.
THE LIGHT: E.T. had one that Neil Diamond sang about
Heartlight
Yesterday's Songs", "Heartlight" and "I'm a Believer". "Sweet Caroline" is played frequently at sporting events, and has become an anthem for the Boston Red Sox.
3
Barbra Streisand covered the song on her Songbird album, and later, a Diamond-Streisand duet, spurred by the success of radio mash-ups, was recorded.
1980s A planned film version of "You Don't Bring Me Flowers" to star Diamond and Streisand fell through when Diamond instead starred in a 1980 remake of the Al Jolson classic The Jazz Singer (1980), alongside Laurence Olivier and Lucie Arnaz.
Diamond's record sales slumped somewhat in the 1980s and 1990s, his last single to make the Billboard's Pop Singles chart coming in 1986.
DOUBLE TALK ROCK: Neil Diamond had his first Top 10 hit with this song that says, "She got the way to move me"
"Cherry, Cherry"
" Among them were "Cherry, Cherry" and "Solitary Man."
3
Interview, Friday Night with Jonathan Ross, transmitted on May 23, 2008 (BBC One).
On April 28, 2008, Diamond appeared on the roof of the Jimmy Kimmel building to sing "Sweet Caroline" after Kimmel was jokingly arrested trying to sing the song dressed up as a Diamond impersonator.
UMG also took over Diamond's Columbia and Bang catalogues, which meant that all of his recorded output would be consolidated for the first time.
BEWITCHING CINEMA: In this 1971 Disney film would-be witch Angela Lansbury tries to stop a Nazi invasion
Bedknobs and Broomsticks
These included leading roles in the stage musicals Gypsy, Sweeney Todd, and The King and I, as well as in the hit Disney film Bedknobs and Broomsticks (1971).
2
Their marriage was troubled; Cromwell was gay, and had married Lansbury in the unsuccessful hope that it would turn him heterosexual.
She followed this with an appearance in 1960s Broadway performance of A Taste of Honey at the Lyceum Theatre, directed by Tony Richardson and George Devine.
"H.D." TV: Now Democratic National Committee chairman, this former pres. candidate appears regularly on "Meet the Press"
Howard Dean
|- | August 14, 1988 || New Orleans, Louisiana || 1988 Republican National Convention |- | December 3, 1989 || Malta || Malta Summit |- | July 16, 1989 || Paris, France || G7 |- | September 9, 1990 || Helsinki, Finland || Helsinki summit |- | July 12, 1992 || New York City, New York || 1992 Democratic National Convention |- | August 16, 1992 || Houston, Texas || 1992 Republican National Convention |- | April 4, 1993 || Vancouver, British Columbia, Canada || Clinton-Yeltsin summit |- | January 30, 1994 || Atlanta, Georgia || Super Bowl XXVIII at the Georgia Dome, Buffalo Bills went for and lost their fourth straight game; Russert publicly prayed on-air with his father |- | September 16, 2001 || Camp David || Interview with then–Vice President Dick Cheney in the aftermath of the September 11 attacks |- | January 18, 2004 || Des Moines, Iowa || 24 hours before the Iowa caucuses |- | January 25, 2004 || Bedford, New Hampshire || 48 hours before the New Hampshire primary |- | February 1, 2004 || Milwaukee, Wisconsin || Interview with Howard Dean |- | February 8, 2004 || Oval Office || Interview with then-President George W. Bush |- | July 25, 2004 || Boston, Massachusetts || 2004 Democratic National Convention, Barack Obama made an appearance on the show as he was going to give the keynote address |- | August 29, 2004 || New York City, New York || 2004 Republican National Convention |- | October 31, 2004 || New York City, New York || Two days before the 2004 U.S. Presidential Election |- | October 8, 2007 || Des Moines, Iowa || Interview with John Edwards |- | November 11, 2007 || Des Moines, Iowa || Interview with Barack Obama |- | December 30, 2007 || Des Moines, Iowa || Interview with Mike Huckabee, two days before the 2008 Iowa caucuses |- | January 6, 2008 || Bedford, New Hampshire || Two days before the New Hampshire primaries |- | January 13, 2008 || South Carolina || Interview with Hillary Clinton during her 2008 presidential campaign |- | January 20, 2008 || New York City, New York || Roundtable discussion |- | January 27, 2008 || Tampa, Florida ||  |- | June 29, 2008 || Jackson Hole, Wyoming || Western Governors' Association annual meeting and Simi Valley, California (Reagan Library) |- | July 27, 2008 || London, England || Barack Obama's overseas trip |- | August 10, 2008 || Beijing, China || 2008 Beijing Olympics |- | August 24, 2008 || Denver, Colorado || 2008 Democratic National Convention |- | August 31, 2008 || Saint Paul, Minnesota || 2008 Republican National Convention |- | September 7, 2008 || Wilmington, Delaware || Senator Joe Biden appears on the show |- | October 26, 2008 || Waterloo, Iowa || John McCain's campaign stop |- | December 7, 2008 || Chicago, Illinois || Barack Obama's appearance on the show; while the show was taped in Chicago, Brokaw introduced and ended the show in D.C. |- | June 14, 2009 || Wilmington, Delaware || Vice President Joe Biden appears on the show |- | August 29, 2010 || New Orleans, Louisiana || Special broadcast five years after Hurricane Katrina, moderated by Brian Williams |- | January 1, 2012 || Des Moines, Iowa || Interview with Rick Santorum, two days before the 2012 Iowa caucuses |- | January 8, 2012 || Bedford, New Hampshire || Two days before the New Hampshire primaries |- | November 2, 2014 || New York City, New York || Two days before midterm elections |}  Notable guests and events The following is a partial list of notable guests and milestones for the show.
3
Originally a half-hour program for most of its history, the show expanded to 60 minutes starting with the September 20, 1992, broadcast.
Although some sources credit Spivak with the program's creation, Rountree developed the idea on her own, and Spivak joined as co-producer and business partner in the enterprise after the show had already debuted.
Russert signed off each edition by saying, "That's all for today.
SARAH TONE IN...: A song to Jimmy Kimmel about Matt Damon
Sarah Silverman
It involved celebrities who were previously involved in the "feud", including Robin Williams, Ben Affleck, and Sarah Silverman.
3
Born and raised in Cambridge, Damon made his professional acting debut in the film Mystic Pizza (1988).
Damon has also performed voice-over work and established several production companies.
He also has a step-daughter, Alexia Barroso (b. 1999), from Luciana's previous marriage.
FILM ALIAS: Matt Damon as this title character murders Dickie Greenleaf & assumes his identity
Mr. Ripley
He received further praise for performances as the eponymous character in Saving Private Ryan (1998), the anti-hero in The Talented Mr. Ripley (1999), a fallen angel in Dogma, and received critical acclaim for performances in dramas such as Syriana (2005) and The Good Shepherd, as well as his role as a villain in the neo-noir crime drama The Departed (2006).
3
He is among Forbes magazine's most bankable stars and one of the top-40 highest-grossing actors of all time.
In January 2012, it was announced that Damon had signed a multi-year deal to be the voice of TD Ameritrade advertisements, replacing Sam Waterston as the discount brokerage's spokesman.
He spent $25,000 at the WSOP while researching his role as a professional poker player in Rounders (1998) and, after finishing the film, was busted out of the 1998 WSOP by poker professional Doyle Brunson.
R&B: The title cut from Aretha Franklin's "A Rose Is Still A Rose" album was written & produced by this Fugees phenom
Lauryn Hill
The members of the group were rapper/singer/producer Wyclef Jean, rapper/singer/producer Lauryn Hill, and rapper/producer Pras Michel.
3
The trio's name was later changed to Fugees, which was purposely taken from a word often used derogatorily to refer to Haitian-Americans (refugee).Foege, Alec. "
09/05/1996: 40-47.
The Score The musical qualities of their first record would be revisited with their second album The Score which was released in February 1996.
ON "Q": In the animated "Hunchback of Notre Dame", Tom Hulce was the voice of this character
Quasimodo
As an actor, he is best known for his role as "Pinto" in National Lampoon's Animal House (1978), the Oscar-nominated portrayal of Mozart in Amadeus (1984), and the voice of Quasimodo in The Hunchback of Notre Dame (1996, Disney).
2
His mother, Joanna (née Winkleman), sang briefly with Phil Spitalny's All-Girl Orchestra, and his father, Raymond Albert Hulce, worked for the Ford Motor Company."Playing Ordinary Man Difficult for Hulce", Charlotte Observer, December 11, 1988.
1993 Helen Hayes Award Outstanding Lead Actor, Resident Play [nominee] (for Hamlet, The Shakespeare Theatre)
I'LL ALWAYS BE "TRUE": Ironically, this Milli Vanilli album went to No. 1 in 1989
Girl You Know It's True
Beginnings According to VH1's Behind the Music, the single "Girl You Know It's True" was first produced by Jesse Powell and had already been completed before Rob Pilatus and Fab Morvan were recruited.
3
A Morvan/Pilatus lookalike named Ray Horton was depicted on the cover and provided vocals on four tracks.
Pilatus' death was ruled accidental.
In April 2011, Morvan released the single "Anytime" on iTunes.
GEORGE STRAIT TO NO. 1: "You Can't Make" this organ "Love Somebody"
The Heart
The year 1982 also saw the release of Strait's second album, the critically acclaimed Strait from the Heart, which featured the first number one single of his career, "Fool Hearted Memory", and the top five "Amarillo by Morning", regarded by many as one of the greatest country songs of all-time.
3
After several unsuccessful trips to Nashville in search of a record deal in which Strait was turned down by every label in town, he considered giving up music altogether.
He also appeared as himself in Grand Champion (2002).
Strait also holds those same records for wins and nominations for the ACM Awards.
INCA HOOTS?: When in Peru, don't forget to check out the cute pygmy owls named for these mountains
the Andes
Peru is an  extremely biodiverse country with habitats ranging from the arid plains of the Pacific coastal region in the west to the peaks of the Andes mountains vertically extending from the north to the southeast of the country to the tropical Amazon Basin rainforest in the east with the Amazon river.
3
San Martin settled in Huacho on 12 November, where he established his headquarters while Cochrane sailed north blockading the port of Callao in Lima.
Instituto Nacional de Estadística e Informática. .
Lima: INEI, 2001.
FUNERAL PLOTS: The title of this film tells you what events Hugh Grant & his friends will be attending (though not in that order)
Four Weddings and a Funeral
Grant achieved international success after appearing in the Richard Curtis-scripted Four Weddings and a Funeral (1994).
3
Inside the Actors Studio in 2002, he credited her with "any acting genes that [he] might have." Both his parents were children of military families, but, despite his parents' backgrounds, Grant has stated that his family was not always affluent while he was growing up.
Grant has described himself as a reluctant actor, has called being a successful actor a mistake and has repeatedly talked of his hope that film stardom would just be "a phase" in his life, lasting no more than ten years.
Grant is also patron of the Fynvola Foundation, named after his late mother; the foundation supports the Lady Dane Farmhouse, a home in Faversham for adults with learning disabilities.
MOVIES BY THE NUMBERS: Hugh Grant played perennial best man Charles in this 1994 film
Four Weddings and a Funeral
Grant achieved international success after appearing in the Richard Curtis-scripted Four Weddings and a Funeral (1994).
3
He added that Grant's "pillowy cheeks are flatter and a bit drawn, and the eyes that used to peer with 'love me' cuteness now betray a shark's casual cunning.
" The film, with its revenues totalling $145 million, allowed Grant to mock disposable pop stardom and fleeting celebrity through its washed-up lead character.
Sports  As a young boy, he played rugby union on his school's first XV team at centre and played football as an avid fan of Fulham F.C..
MOVIES BY INITIALS: 2008, starring Robert Downey Jr.: "I.M."
Iron Man
Beginning in 2008, Downey has portrayed the role of Marvel Comics superhero Tony Stark/Iron Man in the Marvel Cinematic Universe, appearing in several films as either the lead role, member of an ensemble cast, or in a cameo.
3
In 2007, Downey appeared in David Fincher's mystery thriller Zodiac, which was based on a true story.
Downey's other commercial film release of 2010 was the comedy road film Due Date.
Downey's sole 2011 film credit was the sequel to the 2009 version of Sherlock Holmes, Sherlock Holmes: A Game of Shadows, which opened worldwide on December 16, 2011.
NEPAL: Told to jump from 600 feet, these tough Nepalese soldiers, not knowing they'd get chutes, said 300 feet was easier
Gurkhas
W.B., P. 34 Land of the Gurkhas  The name of the country is also identical in origin to the name of the Newar people.
3
Nepal is also mentioned in Hindu texts such as the Narayana Puja.
From , are temperate broadleaf forests: the eastern and western Himalayan broadleaf forests.
Jumla District 5.
TRAVEL & TOURISM: You may be surprised to find casinos in this capital of Nepal; you'll find one at the Hotel Yak & Yeti
Kathmandu
Kathmandu is the nation's capital city and largest metropolis.
3
By Lok Raj Baral  Tibeto-Burman-speaking people probably lived in Nepal 2500 years ago.
At the lowest elevations is the Terai-Duar savanna and grasslands ecoregion.
The annual population growth rate is 1.35%.
COUNTRY TIME: Nepal's western, eastern & southern boundaries are with this country
India
It is located in the Himalayas and bordered to the north by China and to the south, east, and west by India.
3
History  thumb|upright|Lumbini, listed as the birthplace of Gautama Buddha by the UNESCO World Heritage Convention  Ancient thumb|left|Sculpture of the Vedic god Indra from Nepal Neolithic tools found in the Kathmandu Valley indicate that people have been living in the Himalayan region for at least eleven thousand years.
Prime Minister Baburam Bhattarai announced that new elections will be held on 22 November 2012.
More than half of primary students do not enter secondary schools, and only one-half of them complete secondary schooling.
TV PRODUCERS: He moved from "Melrose Place" to the east coast for "Central Park West" & "Sex & the City"
Darren Star
The show was created by Darren Star for Fox and executive produced by Aaron Spelling for his company, Spelling Television.
3
Guest Laura Leighton, recurring as Jane's trouble-making younger sister Sydney Andrews in season one, was upgraded to series regular for season three.
Charvet was written out in the middle of season 6, and the beginning of season seven saw the departure of Shue, Rinna, Langton, Milano, and Ashby.
Laura Leighton was nominated in 1995 for Best Performance by an Actress in a Supporting Role in a Series for her role as Sydney Andrews.
MOVIE TITLE TRANSLATIONS: In Spain, this Woody Harrelson film was "White Men Don't Know How To Stick It In"
White Men Can't Jump
Some notable film characters include basketball hustler Billy Hoyle in White Men Can't Jump, one-handed bowler Roy Munson in Kingpin, Haymitch Abernathy in The Hunger Games film series, Tallahassee in Zombieland, serial killer Mickey Knox in Natural Born Killers, magazine publisher Larry Flynt in The People vs. Larry Flynt, and country singer Dusty in A Prairie Home Companion.
3
Harrelson's career gained momentum when he starred in the Miloš Forman film The People vs. Larry Flynt, in which he played Larry Flynt, publisher of Hustler magazine.
He appeared in the action film After the Sunset and the Spike Lee film She Hate Me. In 2005, Harrelson was in The Big White and North Country.
Harrelson was a guest on Ziggy Marley's track "Wild and Free", a song advocating the growing of cannabis.
BILLY WILDER FILMS: Wilder directed this big 1950 film in which Gloria Swanson says, "I am big.  It's the pictures that got small!"
Sunset Boulevard
Gloria May Josephine Swanson (; March 27, 1899 – April 4, 1983) was an American actress, singer, and producer best known for her role as Norma Desmond, a reclusive silent film star, in the critically acclaimed 1950 film Sunset Boulevard.
3
Swanson set out to get the rights to the play by having Schenck pretend to buy it in the name of United Artists, never to be used.
In the last years of her life Swanson professed a desire to see Beyond the Rocks, but the film was unavailable and considered lost.
ISBN 0-8019-5954-3.
"J.P.": (Jon of the Clue Crew doesn't fret at all.)  This man who revolutionized bass playing with the group Weather Report made his own fretless bass by pulling out the frets & filling in the grooves
Jaco Pastorius
Other prominent members at various points in the band's lifespan included Jaco Pastorius, Peter Erskine, Alex Acuña, Alphonso Johnson, Victor Bailey, Airto Moreira and Chester Thompson.
3
Weather Report appeared on the Burt Sugarman-produced series The Midnight Special, performing both "Birdland" and "Teen Town".
Night Passage (1980) and Weather Report (1982) thumb|left|220px|Drummer Thomas, left, and Shorter, performing in Amsterdam, in 1980 At the beginning of 1980, Pastorius recruited hand-drummer Bobby Thomas Jr. (a fellow Floridan, whom he'd jammed with previously) into the band.
We had to find another bass player… Basically, Jaco went his way and we had to go ours."
ARTHUR'S CAMELOT: In some writings, it was Perceval, not Galahad, who went on a quest for this vessel
the Holy Grail
Sir Galahad (; sometime referred to as Galeas  or Galath ), in Arthurian legend, is a knight of King Arthur's Round Table and one of the three achievers of the Holy Grail.
3
King Pelles also knows that Lancelot will only lie with his one true love, Queen Guinevere.
Print.
Print.
WORLD TRAVEL: A £4.5 million visitor center in Stoke-on-Trent tells the story of this British pottery founded in the 1700s
Wedgwood
Industry  Pottery Since the 17th century, the area has been almost exclusively known for its industrial-scale pottery manufacturing.thepotteries.org Companies such as Royal Doulton, Dudson Ltd, Spode (founded by Josiah Spode), Wedgwood (founded by Josiah Wedgwood), Minton (founded by Thomas Minton) and Baker & Co. (founded by William Baker) were established and based there.
3
Hartshill Park in Stoke is also a nature reserve, and Bucknall Park is home to the City Farm.
The independent volunteer-run art-house cinema, The Stoke-on-Trent Film Theatre, is located very near the railway station, and shows art-house and subtitled films, as well as films that have finished their run in larger cinemas.
geocities.com Master illusionist Andrew Van Buren was born in the area and is still based there, although he is more often found performing out of the country.
IWO JIMA: The intense fighting at Iwo Jima involved the 4th & 5th divisions of this U.S. Armed Forces branch
the Marines
Fifty Years Later, Iwo Jima Photographer Fights His Own Battle  Within the next month of fighting, three of the Marines raising the flag were killed:
3
It is famous as the setting of the February–March 1945 Battle of Iwo Jima between the United States and elements of the British Pacific Fleet versus the Empire of Japan during World War II.
Global Volcanism Program:Iwo Jima Such uplifting occurs on the island at a varying rate of between  per year, with an average rate of  per year.
Those who could not bring themselves to commit suicide hid in the caves during the day and came out at night to prowl for provisions.
NYC AUTHORS: James Baldwin called this "the only human part of New York", but left it anyway
Harlem
Early life Baldwin was born after his mother, Emma Berdis Jones, left his biological father for drug abuse and moved to the Harlem section of Manhattan in New York City.
3
The only known gay men in the movement were James Baldwin and Bayard Rustin.
In a 1979 speech at UC Berkeley, he called it, instead, "the latest slave rebellion."  In 1968, Baldwin signed the “Writers and Editors War Tax Protest” pledge, vowing to refuse tax payments in protest against the Vietnam War."Writers and Editors War Tax Protest", January 30, 1968, New York Post.
Gwin, Minrose. "Southernspaces.org" March 11, 2008.
'60s POP QUIZ: This group's 1968 album "Waiting for the Sun" included a poem, "The Celebration of the Lizard King"
The Doors
Waiting for the Sun is the third studio album by the American rock band The Doors, recorded from February to May 1968 and released in July 1968.
3
Guitarist Robby Krieger's skills with the flamenco guitar can be found present in "Spanish Caravan", with Granainas intro and a reworking of the melody from the classical piece Asturias (Leyenda) composed by Isaac Albéniz.
Gibson G-101 and Vox Continental organs, RMI Electra piano, piano, backing vocals, percussion on "My Wild Love"  Robby Krieger – guitar, backing vocals, percussion on "My Wild Love"  John Densmore –
album cover photograph  William S. Harvey – sleeve art direction and design  Jac Holzman –
U.S. GOVERNMENT: Sen. Ted Stevens of this state chairs the Commerce, Science & Transportation Committee
Alaska
(November 18, 1923 – August 9, 2010) was a United States Senator from Alaska, whose tenure extended from December 24, 1968, until January 3, 2009.
2
He resigned his ranking-member position on the committee due to his indictment.
Nonetheless, during a debate with his opponent Mark Begich days after his conviction, Stevens continued to claim innocence.
SWISS WATCHING: The Kapellbrucke, the symbol of Lucerne, is wooden covered one of these
Bridge
One of the city's famous landmarks is the Chapel Bridge (Kapellbrücke), a wooden bridge first erected in the 14th century.
3
The city's urban area consists of 17 cities and towns located in three different cantons with an overall population of about 250,000 people.
Published in the 21st century  Francisca Loetz:
ISBN 3-907631-36-6, ISBN 978-3-907631-36-2.
ISN'T IT BYRONIC?: Of John, Paul, or George, Byron's given name
George
Gilbert Prousch,documenta Archiv: Gilbert ProuschWebsite of San Martin de Tor's Tourist Board: Gilbert Prousch's birthplace sometimes referred to as Gilbert ProeschGuggenheim Collection: BiographyEncyclopaedia Britannica: Gilbert and George (born 17 September 1943 in San Martin de Tor, Italy) and George Passmore (born 8 January 1942 in Plymouth, United Kingdom) are two artists who work together as a collaborative duo called Gilbert & George.
2
Adopting the slogan ‘
The suits they wore for this became a sort of uniform for them.
CLASSIC TV TITLE ROLES: Police captain Hal Linden
Barney Miller
In 1975, he landed his best-known role as the title character in the television comedy series Barney Miller.
2
The album features a collection of jazz, Broadway and pop standards that Linden began recording around the time he was touring in the early 1980s.
Television movie 1983 Starflight: The Plane That Couldn't Land Josh Gilliam  Television movie 1983 The Other Woman Lou Chadway  Television movie 1984 Second Edition Cliff Penrose  Television movie 1985 My Wicked, Wicked Ways: The Legend of Errol Flynn Jack L. Warner Television movie 1986 Blacke's Magic Alexander Blacke 13 episodes 1989 Dream Breakers Harry Palliser  Television movie 1990 The Ray Bradbury Theater Captain Black Episode: "Mars Is Heaven" 1991 The Golden Girls John Episode: "What a Difference a Date Makes" 1992-1993 Jack's Place Jack Evans 18 episodes 1994 American Experience Narrator Episode: "America and the Holocaust:
NOTIONS: In the shade of apple trees with William Stukeley, he said it was just like when the notion of gravity came to him
Newton
He was friends with Isaac Newton and was among Newton's first biographers.
3
William Stukeley FRS, FRCP, FSA (7 November 1687 – 3 March 1765) was an Anglican clergyman and English antiquarian who pioneered the archaeological investigation of the prehistoric monuments of Stonehenge and Avebury.
New Haven:
right|thumb|300px|A 1721 view of Gloucester Blackfriars by Stukeley.
THE THUNDERBIRDS: (Sarah reports from the rear seat of a jet.) We won't go there today, but the Thunderbirds can reach ceilings of about 50,000 feet & fly 1500 miles per hour, roughly 2 on this scale
Mach
Abraham buried her in the Cave of the Patriarchs (also called the Cave of Machpelah), near Hebron which he had purchased, along with the adjoining field, from Ephron the Hittite and laid her to rest in the cave.
2
Pharaoh's harem thumb|left|Sarai Is Taken to Pharaoh's Palace by James Tissot.
Sarah, being barren, subsequently gave him her Egyptian handmaiden, Hājar (Hagar), to wed as his second wife.
CLUB TED: After leaving ABC's "Nightline", he became the managing editor for the Discovery Channel
Ted Koppel
Created by Roone Arledge, the program featured Ted Koppel as its main anchor from March 1980 until his retirement in November 2005.
3
Once the original format returned, reverting to a 31-minute structure, it remained unchanged through the end of Koppel's tenure; it was changed following his retirement.
Many candidates for government offices, such as David Duke (in November 1991) have appeared on Nightline to try to promote themselves.
In a 2008 interview with correspondent Bob Woodruff featured on the program, former United States Senator and 2004 Democratic presidential candidate John Edwards admitted to having had an adulterous affair unbeknownst his wife, Elizabeth, with a campaign staffer (later identified as Rielle Hunter) who worked on his campaign for the then-forthcoming 2008 presidential election, which we would drop out of.
THE NFL: In 1956 this Giants halfback & future "Monday Night Football" announcer was the NFL's Most Valuable Player
Frank Gifford
The December 9,  contest featured a rare instance of two celebrities entering the booth, with Lennon being interviewed by Howard Cosell and California governor Ronald Reagan speaking with Frank Gifford, with Reagan explaining the rules of American football (off-camera) to Lennon as the game went along.
3
From 2003 to 2005, one game was played on Thursday and another Monday under the Monday Night Football banner.
However, the studio programming uses the new motif only for introductions and transitions, while the actual insert graphics use the standard ESPN package used for SportsCenter and all other sports.
See also NFL on CBS NFL on Fox NFL on NBC Monday night games before 1970 Monday Night Mayhem
BUSINESS & INDUSTRY: This company introduced Kleenex in 1924
Kimberly-Clark
Often used as a genericized trademark, especially in the United States, the name Kleenex is a registered trademark of Kimberly-Clark Worldwide, Inc.  Kleenex products are manufactured in 30 countries and sold in more than 170 countries.
2
Such Kleenex brands include VIVA, Cottonelle and Huggies.
A few years after the introduction of Kleenex, the company's head researcher tried to persuade the head of advertising to try to market the tissue for colds and hay fever.
PLAYING HIMSELF: In "The Man with Two Brains", this creator of "Jeopardy!" played himself (& turned out to be "the elevator killer ")
Merv Griffin
Stepping into an elevator, he finds that Dolores has just been murdered by the Elevator Killer, who turns out to be Merv Griffin.
2
On a honeymoon and business trip to a medical conference in Vienna, a city living in fear of the serial "Elevator Killer," Hfuhruhurr meets mad scientist Dr. Alfred Necessiter
Hfuhruhurr takes Dolores' corpse, and Griffin promises to turn himself in to the police (the film's credits later state that he did not).
EVERYDAY TECHNOLOGY: (Cheryl of the Clue crew is in the lab.)  This trademarked DuPont technology protects each fiber of a carpet to prevent stains; you might know it better from cookware
teflon
In the 20th century, DuPont developed many polymers such as Vespel, neoprene, nylon, Corian, Teflon, Mylar, Kevlar, Zemdrain, M5 fiber, Nomex, Tyvek, Sorona and Lycra.
3
DuPont developed Freon (chlorofluorocarbons) for the refrigerant industry, and later more environmentally friendly refrigerants.
In 1950 DuPont also agreed to build the Savannah River Plant in South Carolina as part of the effort to create a hydrogen bomb.
The organization has developed guidelines for measuring sustainability cited by the Natural Resources Defense Council and the Environmental Defense Fund, and its Vision 2050 blueprint for slowing and reversing environmental damage has been highlighted by The Guardian.
WHOM DID SHE PORTRAY?: Anne Bancroft in "The Miracle Worker"
Annie Sullivan
(Though her role was quite equal to Fonda's, he, an established film actor, was the star, and so she was eligible in the featured category.)  She subsequently won the Tony Award for Best Performance by a Leading Actress in a Play in 1960, again with playwright Gibson and director Penn, when she played Annie Sullivan, the young woman who teaches the child Helen Keller to communicate in The Miracle Worker.
3
Her last film, Delgo, was dedicated to her memory.
Dead and Loving
It Madame Ouspenskaya (Gypsy Woman) 1996  Dr. Renata Baumbauer 1997
THE GLOBE THEATRE: This city's Abbey Theatre was famous for debuting the plays of Synge, O'Casey & Yeats
Dublin
The Abbey Theatre (), also known as the National Theatre of Ireland (), in Dublin, Republic of Ireland, first opened its doors to the public on 27 December 1904.
3
The Abbey served as a nursery for many of the leading Irish playwrights and actors of the 20th century, including William Butler Yeats, Lady Gregory, Sean O'Casey and John Millington Synge.
This is illustrated by the story of how one new work was said to have come to the Gate Theatre.
The Abbey and the genius of Irish theatre.
SINGERS WHO ACT: Reba McEntire made her TV acting debut as his leading lady in "The Gambler Returns:  The Luck of the Draw"
Kenny Rogers
The album's only other single, a cover of Kenny Rogers' "Sweet Music Man", went to No. 36.
3
In the early 1990s, McEntire branched into film starting with 1990's Tremors.
Country Standard Time called the tracks "Whoever's in New England" and "You Lie" the album highlights.
Despite reports that Malibu Country was the most-watched freshman comedy in its debut season (8.7 million), the show was canceled on May 10, 2013, after eighteen episodes.
MYTHIC OBITS: Decapitated by Perseus; survived by 2 immortal sisters
Medusa
Perseus beheaded the Gorgon Medusa and saved Andromeda from the sea monster Cetus.
3
Cassiopeia, having boasted her daughter Andromeda equal in beauty to the Nereids, drew down the vengeance of Poseidon, who sent an inundation on the land and a sea serpent, Cetus, which destroyed man and beast.
He mentions the shrine to Perseus that stood on the left-hand side of the road from Mycenae to Argos, and also a sacred fountain at Mycenae called Persea.
246.
WAAAY DOWN SOUTH: Antarctica's largest human community, McMurdo Station, is maintained by this country
United States
It is operated by the United States through the United States Antarctic Program, a branch of the National Science Foundation.
3
All personnel and cargo going to or coming from Amundsen–Scott South Pole Station first pass through McMurdo.
The  being led by the Russian icebreaker Krasin to McMurdo Station during Operation Deep Freeze 2006.
Plaque: The bronze plaque is about  in size, and is secured to a large vertical rock half way up the west side of Observation Hill, at the former site of the PM-3A nuclear power reactor at McMurdo Station.
MUSICIANS & THEIR INSTRUMENTS: At 14 Wynton Marsalis was a featured soloist on this instrument with the New Orleans Philharmonic
Trumpet
Wynton Learson Marsalis (born October 18, 1961) is a trumpeter, composer, teacher, music educator, and artistic director of Jazz at Lincoln Center in New York City, United States.
3
Also, in 1995, National Public Radio aired the first of Marsalis' 26-week series, entitled Making the Music.
(The other artist is polka bandleader Jimmy Sturr.
As a comparison standpoint, but in a different realm, Bill Cosby has earned six consecutive Grammys for Best Comedy Performance/Recording.)
RADIO PERSONALITIES: This "idol" worshipper replaced Casey Kasem as host of "American Top 40"
Ryan Seacrest
He retired in 2004, handing off the show to Ryan Seacrest.
3
In 2008, he was the voice of Out of Sight Retro Night which aired on WGN America, but was replaced by rival Rick Dees.
From 1973 until 1985, he voiced Robin on several SuperFriends franchise shows.
As for his recognizable voice quality, "It's a natural quality of huskiness in the midrange of my voice that I call 'garbage,'" he stated to The New York Times.
CITY OF BIRTH: The controversial Ahmed Chalabi
Baghdad
Souad Mekhennet, "In Bahrain, Worries Grow of Violent Shiite-Sunni Confrontation", 25 January 2012, The New York Times,    Early life  Chalabi was the son of a prominent Shi'a family, one of the wealthy power elite of Baghdad.
3
Ahmed Abdel Hadi ChalabiSometimes transcribed as Ahmad al-Jalabi.
A left Ahmad Chalabi".
Beginning 25 January 2004, Chalabi and his close associates promoted the claim that leaders around the world were illegally profiting from the Oil for Food program.
TERRITORIAL GOVERNORS: Missouri's governor from 1813 to 1820, he named one of his sons after Meriwether Lewis
William Clark
Meriwether Lewis (August 18, 1774 – October 11, 1809) was an American explorer, soldier, politician, and public administrator, best known for his role as the leader of the Lewis and Clark Expedition, also known as the Corps of Discovery, with William Clark.
2
Circumstances According to a lost October 18, 1809 letter to Thomas Jefferson, Lewis stopped at an inn on the Natchez Trace called Grinder's Stand, about  southwest of Nashville on October 10, 1809.
His grave was located about 200 yards from Grinder's Stand, alongside the Natchez Trace.
NATIVE AMERICANS: Meriwether Lewis named a tributary of the Musselshell River in Montana for her
Sacagawea
When they left Fort Mandan in April 1805 they were accompanied by the sixteen-year-old Shoshone Indian woman, Sacagawea, the wife of the French-Canadian fur trader, Toussaint Charbonneau.
3
Bates was accused of undermining Lewis to seek Lewis's dismissal and his own appointment as governor.
The Democratic Clarion October 20, 1809, microfilm, Tennessee State Library and Archives Money that Lewis had borrowed from Major Gilbert Russell at Fort Pickering to complete the journey was missing.
Edited by Donald Dean Jackson.
WHO'S YOUR MOMMY?: Kate Hudson
Goldie Hawn
Early life Hudson was born in Los Angeles, California, the daughter of Academy Award–winning actress Goldie Hawn and Bill Hudson, an actor, comedian, and musician.
3
Hudson has stated that her biological father "doesn't know me from a hole in the wall", and that she considers Russell her father.
Hudson and Bellamy became engaged in April 2011 and have a son born in July 2011."It's a boy!
1997 EZ Streets  Larraine Cahill  Episode: "Neither Have I Wings to Fly" (season 1) 2000  Saturday Night Live  Herself/Host  Episode: "Kate Hudson/Radiohead" (season 26)
"G.G.": This composer's "Porgy And Bess" is perhaps the most popular opera ever written by an American
George Gershwin
thumb|upright=1.4|Boston try-out prior to the Broadway opening Porgy and Bess is an English-language opera composed in 1934 by George Gershwin, with a libretto written by DuBose Heyward and Ira Gershwin from Heyward's novel Porgy and later play of the same title.
2
Early reviews of the show were positive to mixed.
The Best of 2011: Theater", Time magazine, December 19, 2011 issue, p. 77
TV OR NOT TV: Kurt Russell hit this sci-fi travel device in '94; Richard Dean Anderson was good as Goa'uld in TV's "SG-1"
Stargate
In 1993, he starred as Wyatt Earp in the western film Tombstone, and in 1994, Russell had a starring role in the military science fiction film Stargate.
3
by John W. Campbell, Jr., which had been interpreted on film before, albeit loosely, in 1951's The Thing from Another World.
Hawn's son and daughter with Bill Hudson, actors Oliver and Kate Hudson, consider Russell to be their father.
Episodes: "Nemesis" / "In a Plain Paper Wrapper"1964, 1974GunsmokePacky Kerlin / Buck HenryEpisodes: "Blue Heaven" / "Trail of Bloodshed"1965Gilligan's IslandJungle BoyEpisode: "Gilligan Meets Jungle Boy"1965–1969Daniel
JOHN CUSACK MOVIES: Cusack plays a journalist who's sent to Savannah, Georgia in this 1997 film based on a book of the same name
Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil
Lloyd Dobler1989Fat Man and Little BoyMichael Merriman 1990The GriftersRoy Dillon 1991True ColorsPeter Burton1991Shadows and FogStudent Jack1992The Player HimselfCameo1992Roadside ProphetsCaspar1992Map of the Human HeartThe Mapmaker1992Bob RobertsCutting Edge Live Host1993Money for NothingJoey Coyle1994FlounderingJC1994Bullets over BroadwayDavid Shayne1994The Road to WellvilleCharles Ossining1996City HallDeputy Mayor Kevin Calhoun1997Grosse Pointe BlankMartin Q. BlankAlso co-writer and producer1997Con AirU.S. Marshal Vince Larkin1997Chicago CabScary Man1997AnastasiaDimitriVoice role1997Midnight in the Garden of Good and EvilJohn Kelso1998This
3
His sister Joan Cusack and close friend Jeremy Piven appeared in many of his films, such as Say Anything... and Grosse Pointe Blank.
He has also been spotted at multiple Chicago Bears games and attended many Stanley Cup Finals games in support of the Chicago Blackhawks.
1998 Blockbuster Entertainment Awards Favorite Supporting Actor – Action/Adventure Con Air   1998 Satellite Awards Outstanding Motion Picture Ensemble
HISTORY ON THE SCREEN: Jean Stapleton played this towering American on the big screen in "Eleanor, First Lady of the World"
Eleanor Roosevelt
1122–1204), wife of Louis VII of France and Henry II of England, mother of Richard I and King John  Eleanor of England, Queen of Castile (1161–1214), daughter of Henry II of England, wife of Alfonso VIII of Castile  Eleanor, Fair Maid of Brittany (1184–1241), daughter of Geoffrey, Duke of Brittany  Eleanor of Castile (1202-1244) (1202–1244), wife of James I of Aragon  Eleanor of Leicester (1215–1275), daughter of King John of England, wife of Simon de Montfort, 6th Earl of Leicester  Eleanor of Provence (1222–1291), wife of Henry III of England, mother of Edward I  Eleanor of Castile (1241–1290), wife of Edward I of England, mother of Edward II  Eleanor of England, Countess of Bar (1269–1298), daughter of Edward I, betrothed to Alfonso III of Aragon, and wife of Henry III of Bar  Eleanor of Anjou (1289-1341), daughter of Charles II of Naples and Mary of Hungary, and wife of Frederick III of Sicily  Eleanor of Castile (1307-1359) (1307–1359), wife of Alfonso IV of Aragon  Eleanor of Woodstock (1318–1355), daughter of Edward II, wife of Reynold II, Count of Gelderland  Eleanor of Arborea (1347 – 1404), Sardinian judge  Eleanor of Sicily (1349-1375), wife of Peter IV of Aragon  Leonor Telles de Menezes (1350–1386), wife of Ferdinand I of Portugal  Eleanor of Castile (d. 1416) (136x–1416), wife of Charles III of Navarre  Eleanor of Viseu (1458–1525), wife of John II of Portugal  Eleanor of Austria (1498–1558), Queen consort of Portugal (1516–1521) and of France (1530–1547)  Eleanor of Toledo (1522–1562), Spanish noblewoman and Duchess and Regent of Florence (1539)  modern  Eleanor Bodel (born 1948), Swedish singer  Eleanor Gwynn (known colloquially as "Nell") (1650-1687), Restoration actress and mistress of Charles II of England  Ulrika Eleonora of Sweden, its reigning queen 1719-1720  Eleonora, three 17th century Swedish queens consort  Countess Palatine Eleonora Catherine of Zweibrücken, Swedish princess  Eleanor Marx (1855–1898), British writer and daughter of Karl Marx  Elinor Glyn (1864–1943), British novelist  Eleanor Porter (1868–1920), American novelist  Eleanor Rathbone (1872–1946), British politician  Eleanour Sinclair Rohde (1881-1950), British garden designer  Eleanor Farjeon (1881–1965), British writer  Eleanor Roosevelt (1884–1962), First Lady of U.S. President Franklin Roosevelt  Eleanor Lansing Dulles (1895–1996), American economist and diplomat  Elinor Wylie (1885–1928), American writer  Eleanor Boardman (1898–1991), American actress  Elinor Fair (1903–1957), American actress  Eleanor Audley (1905–1991), American actress  Eleanor Hibbert (1906–1993), British novelist  Elinor Smith (1911–2010), American aviator  Eleanor Powell (1912–1982), American tap dancer and actress  Eleanor Parker (1922-2013), American actress  Eleanor Helin (1932–2009), American astronomer  Elinor Ostrom (1933–2012), American political scientist and Nobel prize winner  Eleanor Duckworth (born 1935), Canadian psychologist and educator  Elinor Donahue (born 1937), American actress  Eleanor Holmes Norton (born 1937), American politician  Eleanor Bron (born 1938), British actress and author  Eleanor Montgomery (1946–2013), American high jumper  Eleanor McEvoy (born 1967), Irish musician, singer/songwriter  Eleanor Friedberger (born 1976), American musician  Eleonora Dziekiewicz (born 1978), Polish volleyball player  Eleanor James (born 1986), English actress  Eleonora "Ellen" van Dijk (born 1987), Dutch road and track cyclist  Elinor Joseph (born 1991), Israeli soldier  Eleanor Tomlinson (born 1992), English actress  Elinore Pruitt Stewart (18761933), American homesteader in Wyoming and memoirist  Fictional characters Eleanora, principal woman's rôle in Strindberg's 1901 Easter   Ellie Bishop, in the television series NCIS  Elinor Dashwood, in the 1811 novel Sense and Sensibility by Jane Austen  Eleanor of Tristain, fictional character in the novels and anime
3
The Annalista Saxo states that the mother of Judith was 'cognatione beati Ethmundi regis', without naming her or giving a more precise origin.
Proceedings of the Battle Conference 1986 (1989),  p. 8
Ellie Woodcomb aka Eleanor "Ellie" Bartowski-Woodcomb, in the television series Chuck (TV series)   See also             References  Category:French feminine given names Category:English feminine given names
THE ASSASSINATION BUREAU: Spencer Perceval, the only British prime minister to be assassinated, was killed in the meeting place of this body
the House of Commons
After a late entry into politics, his rise to power was rapid; he was solicitor and then attorney general in the Addington Ministry, Chancellor of the Exchequer and Leader of the House of Commons in the Portland Ministry, and became prime minister in October 1809.
3
Henry Brougham's motion for a select committee was defeated in the Commons, but, under continuing pressure from manufacturers, the government agreed to set up a Committee of the Whole House to consider the Orders in Council and their impact on trade and manufacture.
That same morning an inquest was held at the Cat and Bagpipes public house on the corner of Downing Street and a verdict of wilful murder was returned.
Perceval's assassination inspired poems such as Universal sympathy on the martyr'd statesman (1812):  One of Perceval's most noted critics, especially on the question of Catholic emancipation, was the cleric Sydney Smith.
LESSER-KNOWN NAMES: Only one British prime minister, Spencer Perceval in 1812, left office due to this; 4 U.S. presidents did
assassination
Prime minister 1809–1812 thumb|A painting depicting the assassination of Perceval.
3
Perceval was opposed to Catholic emancipation and reform of Parliament; he supported the war against Napoleon and the abolition of the slave trade.
Portland’s ministry contained three future prime-ministers – Perceval, Lord Hawkesbury and George Canning – as well as another two of the 19th-century’s great statesmen: Lord Eldon and Lord Castlereagh.
In 1853 he stood unsuccessfully against William Gladstone in the election for an MP to represent Oxford University.
SUPREME COURTSHIP: This chief justice & diplomat married the daughter of William Livingston, the first post-Revolutionary gov. of New Jersey
John Jay
She married John Jay at the age of 17 and became United States First Lady (age 22) while Jay served as the President of the Continental Congress from 1778–1779.
3
He went on to New York City, where he studied law and became a law clerk for James Alexander and William Smith.
as was Governor Livingston High School in Berkeley Heights, New Jersey.
See also  Livingston family  Isaac Collins (printer)  References   External links      – cenotaph at Trinity Churchyard   –
GEOGRAPHY: Balaklava lies on the tip of this peninsula, opposite Yalta
Crimean Peninsula
Crimean Tatar: Yalta) is a resort city on the South coast of the Crimean Peninsula surrounded by the Black Sea.
3
It is situated on a deep bay facing south towards the Black Sea, surrounded by the mountain range Ai-Petri.
History  12th-19th centuries The existence of Yalta was first recorded in the 12th century by an Arab geographer, who described it as a Byzantine port and fishing settlement.
Following the dissolution of the Soviet Union in 1991, Yalta has struggled economically.
HISTORY: Pocahontas was married to this man for just 3 years before her death in 1617
John Rolfe
In April 1614, she married tobacco planter John Rolfe, and in January 1615, bore their son, Thomas Rolfe.
3
With Spelman's help translating, Argall pressured Iopassus to assist in Pocahontas's capture by promising an alliance with the English against the Powhatans.
In 2005 Terrence Malick directed The New World, a movie depicting the founding of the Jamestown, Virginia settlement and depicts the role that Pocahontas had on the colony and its people, the movie featured Q'orianka Kilcher as Pocahontas.
Symonds, William.
AUDIO BOOKS: Stephen Covey made time to read his own bestseller "The 7 Habits of" these people
Highly Effective People
His most popular book was The Seven Habits of Highly Effective People.
3
He promotes what he labels "The Character Ethic": aligning one’s values with so-called "universal and timeless" principles.
In March 2008, Covey launched the Stephen Covey's Online Community.
Washington Post, 17 July 2012, My Story
BUSINESS & INDUSTRY: These new Nabisco animal cookies were almost called "Grrrrahams"
Teddy Grahams
In A Biskit Kool Stuf Kraker Bran Lorna Doone Mallomars Nabisco Classics Nutter Butter Nilla Orchard Crisps Oreo Oreo Cakesters Oro Saiwa Pecanz Pirate Premium Plus  Premium Saltines Rice Thins Ritz Crackers Sportz Team Flakes Teddy Grahams Thinsations (Canada) Toasted Chips Toastettes Trakinas (Defunct
3
a decade when the bakery business underwent a major consolidation.
The F. A. Kennedy Steam Bakery in Boston, known for inventing Fig Newtons and producing Lorna Doone cookies, was one of the very first acquisitions made by Nabisco, joining the company in 1898.url=http://www.cambridgehistory.org/discover/candy/nabisco.html thumb|A Nabisco silo in Toledo, Ohio  Packaging breakthrough  After the consolidation, the president of Nabisco, Adolphus Green, asked Frank Peters to create a package to distribute fresher products.
In 1995 Nestle agreed to buy the Ortega Mexican foods business from Nabisco Inc.
AMERICAN ART & ARTISTS: The title of this Grant Wood painting refers to the style of the house that's behind the farmer & his daughter
American Gothic
He is best known for his paintings depicting the rural American Midwest, particularly American Gothic, an iconic painting of the 20th century.
3
Chicago Tribune, Review of R Tripp Evan, Grant Wood, A Life Wood taught painting at the University of Iowa's School of Art from 1934 to 1941.
Clio Press, 1935.
New York: Viking Press, 1975.
PSYCH 101: Benjamin Rush, whose silhouette is seen on the seal of the APA, this group, was an advocate of bloodletting
American Psychiatric Association
APA may refer to:   Associations   American   American Payroll Association  Allied Pilots Association, the certified collective bargaining agent for American Airlines pilots  American Philological Association, North American scholarly organization devoted to Greek and Roman civilization  American Philosophical Association, main professional organization for philosophers in the United States  American Planning Association, a professional organization representing the field of city and regional planning in the United States  American Polygraph Association  American Poolplayers Association  American Poultry Association  American Protective Association, an American anti-Catholic organization during the Gilded Age  American Psychiatric Association  American Psychological Association; also  APA style, writing format developed by the above  American Psychoanalytic Association  American Psychopathological Association  APA –
1
The Engineered Wood Association, formerly known as the American Plywood Association  Other   Aborigines Progressive Association, an Australian organization  All Peoples' Association (1930–1936), a British voluntary organization  Association of Panamerican Athletics  Australian Parkour Association  Japan Advertising Photographers' Association  Association of Publishing Agencies   Entertainment and culture   Acolytes Protection Agency, a former professional wrestling tag-team  Agency for the Performing Arts, a talent and literary agency  Amateur press association, a group of people who self-publish material among themselves  American pale ale  Americanist Phonetic Alphabet, now known as the Americanist phonetic notation  Anglican Province of America  ARCAM Private Army, a protagonist in the Spriggan (manga)  The Hong Kong Academy for Performing Arts  apa, ISO 639 code of the Southern Athabaskan languages (excluding Navajo)  Antarctic Protected Area   Military   Army Prosecuting Authority  APA, the US Navy's Hull Number prefix for Attack transports   Politics and government   Adirondack Park Agency  Administrative Procedure Act, an American statute controlling government agency actions  Advance Pricing Agreement  Anti-pedophile activism  Australian Progressive Alliance  NSDAP Office of Foreign Affairs (Außenpolitisches Amt der NSDAP)   Transport   A-P-A Transport Corp.   Apache Railway, from its reporting mark  Centennial Airport, Arapahoe County, Colorado, United States, IATA airport code   Other uses   Aldosterone-Producing Adenoma  All Points Addressable  Amplified piezoelectric actuator  Anderson Preparatory Academy, a school in Indiana, United States  Asian Pacific American  Asset purchase agreement  Atypical polypoid adenomyoma  Australian Postgraduate Awards  Austria Press Agency (German: )  Azerbaijan Press Agency   Apa (without caps)    Father (1966 film) (Hungarian: Apa), a 1966 Hungarian film  Apa, Iran, a village in Hormozgan Province, Iran  Apa, Nigeria, a Local Government Area in Benue State, Nigeria  Apa, Satu Mare, a commune in Satu Mare County, Romania  a type of sword named after the village; see Bronze Age sword  Apa Sherpa, a Nepali Sherpa and famous Mt. Everest mountaineer  Apa, an Amazonas-class corvette of the Brazilian Navy
NONFICTION: Dave Eggers not-so-modestly titled his memoir "A Heartbreaking Work of" this
Staggering Genius
He is known for the best-selling memoir A Heartbreaking Work of Staggering Genius and for his subsequent work as a novelist and screenwriter.
3
When Eggers was still a child, the family moved to the upscale suburb of Lake Forest, near Chicago, where he attended high school and was a classmate of actor Vince Vaughn.
…
Travel and Dislocation in Contemporary American Fiction.
KEEP THE FAITH: Their magazine is called "The Watchtower" & their churches are called Kingdom Halls
Jehovah's Witnesses
The Watchtower Announcing Jehovah's Kingdom is an illustrated religious magazine, published monthly in 254 languages by Jehovah's Witnesses via the Watch Tower Bible and Tract Society of Pennsylvania.
3
The names of the authors (except in first-person life stories), and other publishing staff are not provided.
As of January 2016, each issue of the Public Edition has an average print run of approximately 59 million copies—the highest magazine circulation in the world.
Audio: In 1988, articles from The Watchtower were recorded on audio cassette, and later on audio CD; audio cassettes are no longer produced.
NEIL DIAMOND'S GEMS: While Neil only had a minor hit with this "colorful" song, UB40 took it to No. 1
"Red Red Wine"
Their hit singles include their debut "Food for Thought" and two US Billboard Hot 100 number ones with "Red Red Wine" and "Can't Help Falling in Love".
3
This lineup of the band lasted long enough to play their first show at the Hare & Hounds pub in Kings Heath in February 1979 and one other, before the band underwent its first lineup change in the form of Babyemi and Lynn leaving the band and Mickey Virtue joining in place of Lynn.
In 1987 Ray "Pablo" Falconer, producer of UB40 music, died in a car crash.
Personnel  Members  Current members  Jimmy Brown (born 20 November 1957, Birmingham) – drums (December 1978 – present)  Robin Campbell (born 25 December 1954, Birmingham) –
TV CASTS: On "Spin City" Michael J. Fox played Mike; this actor who replaced him plays Charlie
Charlie Sheen
Fox departed in 2000 at the conclusion of Season 4 due to his battle with Parkinson's disease: Charlie Sheen assumed the lead role of Charlie Crawford for the remaining two seasons.
3
She is promiscuous and outgoing and often dates unreliable men.
He also leaves after season four for unknown reasons.
Ratings Seasonal rankings (based on average total viewers per episode) of Spin City.
FOOD PEOPLE: Geri Halliwell became famous using this nom de Spice
Ginger Spice
Halliwell came to international prominence in the 1990s as Ginger Spice, a member of the successful girl group the Spice Girls; together they sold over 80 million records worldwide.
3
Halliwell grew up on a council estate in North Watford.
2007–present:
Halliwell picked up further UN work in 2006, by visiting Zambia from 14–16 November, to promote greater international awareness of the urgent need to reduce maternal death and halt the spread of HIV/AIDS.
COMPUTER PROGRAMS: As a sort of e-mail post office, this program from Qualcomm is named for the author of "Why I Live at the P.O."
Eudora
The following year, Qualcomm acquired Eudora, an email client for PC that could be used with the OmniTRACS system.
2
Qualcomm names Mollenkopf president, COO." June 16, 2015.
Speech codec - Qualcomm has developed an audio codec for speech called PureVoice, which, besides use on mobile phones, was also licensed for use in the very popular Chinese instant messaging software Tencent QQ.Qualcomm PureVoice is acknowledged in QQ2008's installation splash screen and in its license.txt  FEC codec -
DUELS: Button Gwinnett was killed in a duel over command of GA.'s military in May 1777, 10 months after signing this
Declaration of Independence
Button Gwinnett (1735 – May 19, 1777) was a British-born American political leader who, as a representative of Georgia to the Continental Congress, was one of the signatories (first signature on the left) on the United States Declaration of Independence.
3
It is believed that he attended the College School, held in Gloucester Cathedral (now called The King's School) as did his older brother but there is no surviving evidence to substantiate this.
He moved to Wolverhampton in 1754 and married a local, Ann Bourne, in 1757, at St. Peter's Church at the age of 22.
As such, he was now the superior of his rival Lachlan McIntosh.
BESTSELLERS: The title of this Rosamunde Pilcher bestseller referes to a painting of the heroine as a child on this beach
The Shell Seekers
The real breakthrough in Pilcher's career came in 1987, when she wrote the family saga, The Shell Seekers.
3
On 7 December 1946, she married Graham Hope Pilcher,  a war hero and jute industry executive who died in March 2009.
In 1955, she also began writing under her real name with Secret to Tell.
However, a number of films whose story setting is Cornwall are in fact filmed elsewhere.
BUSINESS: On April 17, 1973 this company began operations with the launch of 14 small aircraft from Memphis International Airport
Federal Express
Federal Express (now FedEx Express) began operations in Memphis in 1973.
3
From 1993 to 2009 Memphis had the largest cargo operations of any airport worldwide.
Delta Air Lines and Allegiant Air operate out of Terminal B. Delta Air Lines operates a Delta Sky Club lounge in Terminal B. Seasonally, the terminal is used by international charters which operate out of the airport's international gates B42 and B43.
On April 7, 1994, FedEx Flight 705 experienced an attempted hijacking shortly after takeoff.
MOVIES BY QUOTE: "How ironic, Tony.  Trying to rid the world of weapons you gave it its best one ever... and now I'm gonna kill you with it"
Iron Man
It may refer to:  Anthony (given name), includes a list of people with this name  Kawasaki Ki-61, a Japanese WWII-era fighter aircraft, code-named "Tony"  Tony, Wisconsin, a village in the United States  People known by the single name, Tony: Tony Atlas (born 1954), American wrestler Tony Leung Chiu-Wai (born 1962), Hong Kong actor Tony Compagno (1921–1971), American football player Tony Corbin (born 1974), American football player Tony Cristiani, American football player Tony Discenzo (1936–2007), American football  player Antonio Rodríguez Dovale (born 1990), Spanish footballer known as Toni Tony Gaffney (born 1984), American basketball player Tony Hargain (born 1967), American football player Tony Hart (1925 - 2009), English TV presenter Tony Haynes (born 1960), American lyricist, songwriter, author Tony Ippolito (1917–1951), American football player Tony Jeffery (born 1964), American football player Tony Johns (born 1960), Canadian football player Tony Judt (1948–2010), British historian Tony Kaska (1911–1994), American football player Tony Leung Ka-Fai (born 1958), Hong Kong actor Luca Toni (born 1977), Italian World Cup winning footballer Anthony Nwakaeme (born 1989), Nigerian footballer António Conceição da Silva Oliveira (born 1961), Portuguese football coach António José Conceição Oliveira (born 1946), Portuguese international footballer and coach Tony Parker (author) (1923–1996), British oral historian Tony Parker (born 1982), French basketball player Tony Parker (college basketball) (born 1993), American college basketball player Tony da Costa Pinho (born 1983), Brazilian footballer Anthony da Silva (born 1980), French-born Portuguese footballer Antoni Lima Solá (born 1970), Andorran footballer Tony Samuels, American football player Tony Satini (born 1993), Australian Rugby League player Tony Slattery, English comedian and actor Tony Stark, fictional character created by Marvel Comics, alias Iron Man Tony Swatton, Anglo-American blacksmith Tony Sylva (born 1975), Senegalese goalkeeper Tony T., singer, rapper and DJ  Tony Taka, also referred to as just Tony, Japanese illustrator, video game artist and character designer Tony Thurman, American football player Tony Williams (rugby league) (born 1988), Australian Rugby League player  In media:  Tony Award, for Broadway Theatre  Tony (1982 film), a 1982 Kannada film  Tony (2009 film), a 2009 British drama film directed by Gerard Johnson  Tony (2013 film), an upcoming Indian film  "Tony" (Skins series 1), an episode of British dramedy Skins  Tony (album), a 1957 album by Tony Bennett  Tony the Tiger, cartoon mascot for Kellogg's Frosted Flakes  "T.O.N.Y.", a song by Solange Knowles  See also  Tonie, Kraków Tonny, a 1962 Norwegian film Tony's Cronies, a British political accusation.
1
Tony  is a short form of Anthony or  Antonio.
KENNY: Kenny Rogers followed up his TV movie "The Gambler" with the TV movie this person "of the County"
Coward
More success was to follow, including the multi-million selling album The Gambler and another international Number 1 single, "Coward of the County," taken from the equally successful album, Kenny.
3
Gibbs originally wrote the song for Marvin Gaye in an R&B style, only later to change it for the Kenny Rogers album.
Rogers would reunite with Parton in 1984 for a holiday album and TV special, Once Upon a Christmas, as well as a 1985 duet "Real Love," which also topped the U.S. country singles chart.
Rogers also signed with Capitol Records and had more success with the TV advertised release 21 Number Ones in January 2006.
UNDER PRESSURE: CTS, this type of repetitive stress injury, is caused by pressure on the median nerve in the wrist area
carpal tunnel syndrome
Cts or CTS may refer to:   In arts and entertainment   In television   Chinese Television System, a Taiwanese broadcast television station, including:  CTS Main Channel ()  CTS Education and Culture ()  CTS Recreation ()  CTS News ()(on Chunghwa Telecom MOD only)  Christian Television System, in Korea  Crossroads Television System, in Canada  The Catherine Tate Show, a British television program  Other uses in arts and entertainment  Cardboard Tube Samurai, a character in the Penny Arcade webcomic  Businesses  Car Top Systems, a supplier of automotive convertible tops  Cognizant Technology Solutions, a US-based information technology services company  Compagnie des Transports Strasbourgeois, a public transport company based in Strasbourg, France   Educational institutions  Seminaries Chicago Theological Seminary, affiliated with the United Church of Christ, in Chicago, Illinois Christian Theological Seminary, affiliated with the Disciples of Christ, in Indianapolis, Indiana Concordia Theological Seminary, affiliated with the Missouri Synod of the Lutheran Church, in Fort Wayne, Indiana Columbia Theological Seminary, affiliated with the Presbyterian Church, in Decatur, Georgia  Other educational institutions College of Technological Sciences-Cebu, Cebu City, Philippines Calcutta Technical School, West Bengal, India   In science and technology  In computing and telecommunications  Ciphertext stealing in cryptography  Clear to Send control signal  Common Type System, a common set of types in the .NET Framework  Hermes Communications Technology Satellite, a Canadian communications satellite launched in 1976  Computational transportation science, an interdisciplinary field addressing the modeling, planning, and economics of transportation  Card Translator System, formerly used in direct distance dialing  In medicine  Carpal tunnel syndrome, a medical condition causing pain in parts of the hand  Cracked tooth syndrome, a medical condition in which a posterior tooth has developed a crack  Cubital tunnel syndrome, compression of the ulnar nerve at the elbow  Cathepsin, a class of enzymes  Cardiothoracic surgery, a field of medicine involved in surgical treatment of diseases affecting organs inside the thorax (chest)  Other uses in science and technology  Cadillac CTS, a luxury automobile made by Cadillac  Conflict Tactics Scale, a social survey instrument for the study of conflict in relationships  Copper Tube
2
Size  CTS (motorcycle), developed by Chris Tattersall  Cattle Tracing System, administered by the British Cattle Movement Service  Other uses  Catholic Truth Society, an organisation that produces Catholic literature  China Travel Service, the tourism and travel agency of the Chinese government  Combat Zones
That See, a US defense project  Cosmic Top Secret, the highest of four levels of NATO classified information  New Chitose Airport (IATA code)  The Cambridge Tolkien Society
JACK NICHOLSON: One of Jack's memorable moments is stealing this line from Ed McMahon in "The Shining"
"Heeere's Johnny!"
For almost 30 years, McMahon introduced the The Tonight Show with a drawn-out "Heeere's Johnny!"
3
McMahon appeared in several films, including The Incident, Fun With Dick and Jane, Full Moon High, and Butterfly, as well as briefly in the film version of Bewitched.
In the early 2000s, McMahon made a series of Neighborhood Watch public service announcements parodying the surprise appearances to contest winners that he was supposedly known for.
Towards the end of the decade, McMahon took on other endorsement roles, playing a rapper for a FreeCreditReport.com commercial and in a Cash4Gold commercial alongside MC Hammer.
COMEDIES: This Nathan Lane film is basically "Home Alone" with a rodent
MouseHunt
He is known for his roles as Albert in The Birdcage, Max Bialystock in the musical The Producers, Ernie Smuntz in MouseHunt, Nathan Detroit in Guys and Dolls, Pseudolus in A Funny Thing Happened on the Way to the Forum, his voice work in Stuart Little as Snowbell the cat  and The Lion King as Timon the meerkat, and his recurring roles on Modern Family and The Good Wife.
3
In 2006, Lane received a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame, and in 2008, he was inducted into the American Theatre Hall of Fame.
This Is It -- As Happy As i Get, Baby' Nathan Lane".
His performance in the film version, opposite Broadway co-star, Matthew Broderick as Leo Bloom, earned him his second Golden Globe nomination for Best Performance by an Actor in a Motion Picture, Musical or Comedy.
NUMERICAL PHRASES: Arizona's Petrified Forest National Park includes part of the Painted Desert & a stretch of this historic road
Route 66
The park's headquarters is about  east of Holbrook along Interstate 40 (I-40), which parallels the BNSF Railway's Southern Transcon, the Puerco River, and historic U.S. Route 66, all crossing the park roughly east–west.
3
Later, roads and a railway followed similar routes and gave rise to tourism and, before the park was protected, to large-scale removal of fossils.
At least nine species of fossil trees from the park have been identified; all are extinct.
Rangers offer a variety of programs about the park.
WHERE YA FROM?: Elle Macpherson
Australia
Elle Macpherson (born 29 March 1964) is an Australian model, businesswoman, television host and actress.
3
She returned to the runway in 2010 to close the fall Louis Vuitton show for Marc Jacobs in Paris.
Britain and Ireland's Next Top Model In July 2010, Macpherson became the new host of Britain and Ireland's Next Top Model, taking over from Lisa Snowdon.
If Lucy Fell Jane Lindquist 1996 Jane Eyre Blanche Ingram 1996 The Mirror Has Two Faces Candice 1997 Batman & Robin Julie Madison 1997 The Edge Mickey Morse 1998
YOUNG STARS: If you don't know Haley Joel Osment survived this sitcom's move from ABC to NBC, you might be a redneck
The Jeff Foxworthy Show
Throughout the rest of the 1990s, Osment played regular and/or recurring roles in various TV series; including The Jeff Foxworthy Show and the final season of Murphy Brown, where he replaced Dyllan Christopher as Murphy's son, Avery.
3
Osment was raised Roman Catholic.
Osment was a student at Flintridge Preparatory School in La Cañada, California.
Slow Joey 3 episodes	 2015 Drunk History Kid Blink Episode: "Journalism"  Video games  Year Title Role 2002 Kingdom HeartsSora (voice) 2006 Kingdom Hearts II Sora (voice) 2008 Kingdom Hearts Re:Chain of Memories Sora (voice) 2009 Kingdom Hearts 358/2 Days Sora (voice) 2010 Kingdom Hearts Birth by Sleep Vanitas / Sora (voices) 2011 Kingdom Hearts coded Sora (voice) 2012 Kingdom Hearts 3D: Dream Drop Distance Sora / Vanitas (voices) 2013 Kingdom Hearts HD 1.5 Remix Sora (voice) 2014 Kingdom Hearts HD 2.5 Remix Sora / Vanitas (voices)  References  External links  Category:1988 births Category:Male actors from Los Angeles, California Category:American male child actors Category:American male film actors Category:American male television actors Category:American male video game actors Category:American male voice actors Category:American Roman Catholics Category:Living people Category:Tisch School of the Arts alumni Category:20th-century American male actors Category:21st-century American male actors
FANTASTIC VOYAGES: On April 17, 1524 this Italian "bridged" the Atlantic & reached New York Harbor, anchoring at the Narrows
Giovanni da Verrazzano
In 1524 Giovanni da Verrazzano anchored in what is now called The Narrows, the strait between Staten Island and Long Island that connects the Upper and Lower New York Bay, where he received a canoe party of Lenape.
3
The freight was ferried across by the competing railroads with small fleets of towboats, barges, and 323 car floats, specially designed barges with rails so cars could be rolled on.
, NY State Museum, 1992–1998.
The Port Authority of New York and New Jersey by Dr. Jean-Paul Rodrigue, Dept. of Economics & Geography,  Hofstra University, 1998–2006.
POP MUSIC: This Irish group's "Rattle and Hum" album topped both the U.S. & U.K. album charts
U2
Rattle and Hum is the sixth studio album by rock band U2, and a companion rockumentary film directed by Phil Joanou, both released in 1988.
3
Studio recordings
"We thought lightning might strike twice" said guitarist, The Edge.
So powerful was the performance, that the band said they were not sure the song should have been used in the film, and after watching the film, they considered not playing it on future tours.
AMERICAN LITERATURE: He wrote "A Wonder-Book for Girls and Boys" to capitalize on the success of "The Scarlet Letter"
Nathaniel Hawthorne
The Scarlet Letter: A Romance is an 1850 work of fiction in a historical setting, written by Nathaniel Hawthorne, and is considered to be his best work.
3
Schreiner, Samuel A., Jr.
Gartner, Matthew. "The Scarlet Letter and the Book of Esther: Scriptural Letter and Narrative Life".
Waggoner, Hyatt H. Hawthorne: A Critical Study'', 3rd edn.
ALSO A PRESIDENTIAL NAME: Burn on, big river; in 1969 this city's Cuyahoga River actually caught fire
Cleveland
It then flows through Independence, Valley View, Cuyahoga Heights, Newburgh Heights and Cleveland to its northern terminus, emptying into Lake Erie.
2
Others contend such an effort would be expensive and complicated, for at least two reasons: first, the formerly hollow dam was filled in with concrete in the early 1990s, and second, because of the industrial history of Cuyahoga Falls, the sediment upstream of the dam is expected to contain hazardous chemicals, possibly including heavy metals and PCBs.
This is the result of an agreement between the City of Cuyahoga Falls, which owns the dams, and the Northeast Ohio Regional Sewer District, which will provide $1 million of funding to remove the dams.
CONTEMPORARY AUTHORS: He wrote "The Alexandria Quartet" & "The Avignon Quintet"
Lawrence Durrell
The Alexandria Quartet is a tetralogy of novels by British writer Lawrence Durrell, published between 1957 and 1960.
3
A critical and commercial success, the first three books present three perspectives on a single set of events and characters in Alexandria (Egypt), before and during World War II.
Durrell described the ideas behind the Quartet in terms of a convergence of Eastern and Western metaphysics, based on Einstein's overturning of the old view of the material universe, and Freud's doing the same for the concept of stable personalities, yielding a new concept of reality.
Alexandria: City of Memory.
CAPES: Cape Spartel, 6 miles west of Tangier, is the point where the Atlantic Ocean & this strait meet
Gibraltar
It is located on the North African coast at the western entrance to the Strait of Gibraltar where the Mediterranean Sea meets the Atlantic Ocean off Cape Spartel.
3
Ecclesiastical history
For the historical reasons given above, one official list of the Roman Curia places the see in Mauretania Caesarea.
The city has seen a fast pace of rural exodus from other small cities and villages.
WRITERS ON FILM: In 1994 Ferber & Fitzgerald also appeared when Jennifer Jason Leigh played this witty writer
Dorothy Parker
She was nominated for a Golden Globe for her portrayal of Dorothy Parker in Mrs. Parker and the Vicious Circle (1994).
3
In 1995, she starred in a film written by her mother, screenwriter Barbara Turner, titled Georgia.
Leigh has received three separate career tributes: at the Telluride Film Festival in 1993, a special award for her contribution to independent cinema from the Film Society of Lincoln Center in 2002, and a week-long retrospective of her film work held by the American Cinematheque at Los Angeles's Egyptian Theatre in 2001.
The film, a Western set in Wyoming after the Civil War, was released on December 25.
ON THE RADIO: Robin Quivers is the radio consort of this self-proclaimed  "King of All Media"
Howard Stern
Robin Ophelia Quivers (born August 8, 1952) is an American radio personality, author, and actress, best known for being the long-running news anchor and co-host of The Howard Stern Show.
3
From the mid-1990s until April 2007, her long-time boyfriend Tony was a man mysteriously referred to on the radio show as "Mr. X".
Robin claimed she would be a successful racer and even challenged radio personality Bubba the Love Sponge, an experienced driver, to a future race.
Comedian and actor Jamie Foxx once slammed Quivers as a "house Negro" and a "nigger bitch" on his radio show The Foxxhole and his co-host mocked her molestation.
THE NUMBER OF...: Sides on a U.S. stop sign
8
http://news.google.com/news?hl=en&ned=us&ie=UTF-8&q=US&btnG=Search+News vs   http://news.google.com/news?hl=en&ned=us&ie=UTF-8&q=American&btnG=Search+News  The first one nearly triples the ammount of headlines with US including major newspapers, the second is used by mostly local/regional newspapersDamianFinol 14:01, 24 January 2006 (UTC)  US is used in headlines chiefly because it's shorter than American.
3
As for American as now defined being offensive to neighbouring countries, I've already explained that the replacement you propose would be offensive to a neighbouring country (Canada) but apparently Canadians' feelings don't count, eh?
Please point out to me where I have spelled the name of someone in an incorrect manner.
Sure, English-Canadian is English-speaking, but that doesn't mean we need to use a term for it that implies that its  advantages and its flaws are the work of the Angles and Saxons.
BRIDGES: Drivers on U.S. 101 can use the Astoria-Megler bridge to cross this river that separates Oregon & Washington
the Columbia
Dramatists (1918) I. 377 As the East is to the West..or the Aborigines of America to the Columbians of this generation, so is that line to this line.
3
See a parallel?
LtDoc 23:24, 23 November 2005 (UTC)
I just double-checked Webster's and they're synonyms.
THE OLYMPICS: On Feb. 22, 1980 Mike Eruzione scored the winning goal as the U.S. beat this country in hockey
Russia
Why do you think english speakers have Johns, russian speakers have Ivans, spanish ones have Juans and portuguese Joões?
3
Finally, I do want to reach an understanding on this.
If they are inadequate to get you to even consider the arguments for other positions that's the way the mop flops, I guess.
Note that I didn necessary mean illegal alien; I meant non-citizen permanent resident when I wrote that, and that's more applicable here in most cases.
BIRTHPLACES: The only U.S. President born in Milton, Massachusetts
George Bush
I could accept "George Bush is a United States President" but "Julia Roberts is a United States actress" still looks ridiculous to me.
3
I don't think you'll find anyone who agrees with you that U.S. is in any way incorrect.
First, I have no evidence that anyone (other than RickK's statement above) considers either usage to be offensive, pejorative or emotionally loaded.
Many people aren't understanding what's "wrong" with using U.S. or U.S. Citizen.
OUR FLAG: It's the total number of red stripes on the American flag
7
If that sounds strange to you, do a Google search for "a U.S. organization" - 2,780 hits.
3
I ended up considering whether, given my offence at the French use of Anglo-Saxon, I should initiate a move at the French wikipedia to use a less offensive one (assuming, of course, that they use the term in the way I find offensive and haven't dealt with it already).
However, if that were the entire argument I wouldn't think much of it.
The usage extends to cognates in other languages—Greeks will say oi Ameriki when they want to say the United States (reserving oi Hnomenes Politeies for more formal or political contexts).
HIGHWAYS & BYWAYS: The Passetto, a fortified corridor, connects Castel Sant'Angelo with this city
Vatican City
Account of Pedro Tafur in The Travels of Pero Tafur (1435-1439), Chapter III.  thumb|left|300px|The view from Castel Sant'Angelo towards Vatican City.
3
The Castel was once the tallest building in Rome.
Destruction
The Papal state also used Sant'Angelo as a prison; Giordano Bruno, for example, was imprisoned there for six years.
CLASSICAL MUSIC: Joseph Joachim, a friend of this German composer, lived to make a 1903 recording of his works
Johannes Brahms
A close collaborator of Johannes Brahms, he is widely regarded as one of the most significant violinists of the 19th century.
2
Op.
Another 1722 Stradivarius, also owned by the Mendelssohn family.
WEIGHTS & MEASURES: A song from "Guys and Dolls" begins, "I love you a bushel and a peck", which would be a total of this many pecks
5
It is based on "The Idyll of Miss Sarah Brown" and "Blood Pressure"two short stories by Damon Runyon,and also borrows characters and plot elements from other Runyon storiesmost notably "Pick the Winner".Stempel, 435  The premiere on Broadway was in 1950.
3
Just Like Harlem”
“
Wallace  Walter White
CONTEMPORARY ART: Neo-expressionest Julian Schnabel changed canvases & directed this film about Cuban poet Reinaldo Arenas
Before Night Falls
His autobiography, Before Night Falls was on the New York Times list of the ten best books of the year in 1993.
3
A constant theme in his novels and other writing is the condemnation of the Castro government, although Arenas also critiques the Catholic Church, US culture and politics, and a series of literary personalities in Havana and internationally, particularly those who he believed had betrayed him and suppressed his work (Severo Sarduy and Ángel Rama are notable examples).
Necesidad de libertad (1986)
, 1990  El desamparado humor de Reinaldo Arenas / Roberto Valero., 1991  Ideología y subversión : otra vez Arenas'' / Reinaldo Sánchez.
SWEETS: Mascarpone, a rich type of this dairy product, is an ingredient in tiramisu
Cheese
thumb|right|220px|Coffee mascarpone cream Mascarpone (, or ; ) is an Italian cheese made from cream, coagulated by the addition of certain acidic substances, such as lemon juice, vinegar, citric acid or acetic acid.
2
Production process
Ricotta, unlike mascarpone, is made from whey.
WHAT'S THAT SOUND?: This state's outer banks create Pamlico Sound, the largest lagoon on the East Coast of the United States
North Carolina
Orbital photo courtesy of NASA. right|thumb Pamlico Sound ( ) in North Carolina in the US is the largest lagoon along the North American East Coast, extending  long and 24 to 48 km (15 to 20 miles) wide.
3
Core Sound is located at the Pamlico's narrow southern end.
Many other cetaceans including rare species such as fin whales, Cuvier's beaked whales, and orcas are present off Outer Banks and Cape Hatteras.
2014 North Atlantic right (critically endangerend), and North Atlantic humpback were historically common.
BIG ACTORS, SMALL ROLES: This 1987 film finds Dennis Quaid as a shrunken test pilot mistakenly injected into Martin Short's body
Innerspace
Quaid had starring roles in the films Enemy Mine (1985), Innerspace (1987) and The Big Easy (1987).
3
Awards thumb|right|Quaid at the 2009 Texas Film Hall of Fame Awards For his role in Far from Heaven (2002) he won the New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Supporting Actor, the Chicago Film Critics Association Award for Best Supporting Actor, the Online Film Critics Society Award for Best Supporting Actor and the Independent Spirit Award for Best Supporting Male.
The relationship lasted for eight months.
He is a member of the Bel-Air Country Club in Bel Air, Los Angeles, California, and tries to stay at homes on private courses when he is on the road.
PRODUCT PLACEMENT: This disc is a registered trademark of Wham-O
a Frisbee
Wham-O CEO sues over post-purchase ouster  2010,  Wham-O acquires Sprig Toys Inc.  Products and marketing thumb|right|250px|A Frisbee made by Wham-O In 1957, Wham-O, still a fledgling company, took the idea of Australian bamboo "exercise hoops" and manufactured them with Marlex.
3
Other products  thumb|Vintage Blue and white Wham-O Magic Window toy from the 1970s  Wheelie Bar (1966) for wheelie bikes, especially well suited for the popular Schwinn Sting-Ray.
Trac-Ball  Magic sand (1980)  Roller Racer Sit Skate (1983)
In 2003, Wham-O sued to have the film Dickie Roberts: Former Child Star removed from theaters until the "Slip 'N Slide" scene was removed.
AMERICAN FADS: Wham-O said that "new amazing Zectron" gave these 1960s bouncers "50,000 lbs. of compressed energy"
Super Balls
For many years, the company's strategy was to have eight to twelve simple and inexpensive products, such as Frisbees, Band-Aids, Super Balls, and Hula Hoops.
3
After the sale of the company, the various new owners experimented with changes to this formula.
The band Monster Magnet is named after a Wham-O toy from the 1960s.
Wham-O is parodied as Blammo in Ren and Stimpy on Log advertisements, which was a parody of the slinky.
A BUG'S LIFE: Social wasps include hornets & these "well dressed" members, Vespula maculifrons
Yellow jackets
Along with members of their sister genus Dolichovespula, they are collectively known by the common name yellowjackets (or yellow jackets) in North America.
3
The eastern yellowjacket (Vespula maculifrons) and western yellowjacket (Vespula pensylvanica) are native to North America.
, 1887)  Vespula maculifrons (Buysson, 1905) – eastern yellowjacket  Vespula nursei Archer, 1981  Vespula orbata (Buysson 1902)  Vespula pensylvanica (Saussure, 1857) – western yellowjacket  Vespula rufa (Linnaeus, 1758) – red wasp  Vespula rufosignata Eck, 1998  Vespula shidai Ish., Yam.
Vespula vulgaris (Linnaeus, 1758) – common wasp  See also Paravespula, a subgenus of Vespula  References  Category:Vespidae  pl:Osa
TROUBLE: In the Old Testament, Eliphaz warns this patient guy that "man that is born of a woman is... full of trouble"
Job
For the figure from the Book of Job, see Eliphaz (Job).
3
Eliphaz ( "My Elohim is strength", Standard Hebrew Elifaz, Tiberian Hebrew ʾĔlîp̄az / ʾĔlîp̄āz) was the first-born son  of EsauBooks of Chronicles  by his wife Adah.
Book of Genesis  He had six sons,Books of Chronicles  from which Omar was the firstborn, and the others were Teman, Zepho, Gatam, Kenaz and finally Amalek, who was born to his concubine Timna.
Eliphaz was satisfied and left his uncle and rabbi poor, but still alive: (Rashi to Book of Genesis )  See also Obadiah   References   Category:Torah people Category:Esau
THE "L" YOU ARE!: This family of archaeologists has made many important fossil discoveries in Tanzania's Olduvai Gorge
the Leakeys
In addition to an abundance of faunal remains the Leakeys found more than 2,000 stone tools and lithic flakes, most of which they classified as Oldowan (of Olduvai) tools.
3
History thumb|Olduvai Gorge from space thumb|Topography map of the Olduvai Gorge.
These important differences indicated a different species, which eventually was named Homo habilis.
Only in the period 1.65 to 1.53 ma was chert used, and it presents a significant difference in appearance among the assemblages of Olduvai Gorge.
SARGENT/YORK: In 1961 Sargent & York appeared on this Richard Chamberlain medical drama in episodes airing a week apart
Dr. Kildare
George Richard Chamberlain (born March 31, 1934)California Births, 1905 - 1995, George Richard Chamberlain is an American stage and screen actor and singer, who became a teen idol in the title role of the television show Dr. Kildare (1961–66).
2
Early life Chamberlain was born in 1934 in Beverly Hills, California, the son of Elsa Winnifred (née von Benzon; later Matthews) and Charles Axiom Chamberlain, who was a salesman.http://www.ebooksread.com/authors-eng/abram-william-foote/foote-family-comprising-the-genealogy-and-history-of-nathaniel-foote-of-wether-too-18/page-33-foote-family-comprising-the-genealogy-and-history-of-nathaniel-foote-of-wether-too-18.shtml
Will & Grace Clyde Episode: "Steams Like Old Times" 2006 Blackbeard Governor Charles Eden TV movie 2006 Hustle James Whittaker Wright III  Episode: "Whittaker Our Way Out" 2006 Strength and Honor Denis O'Leary  2006 Nip/Tuck Arthur Stiles Episode: "Blu Mondae" 2007 I Now Pronounce
THE PATRIOT LEAGUE: Joshua Chamberlain held Little Round Top during this Civil War battle
Gettysburg
For his gallantry at Gettysburg, he was awarded the Medal of Honor.
3
A Confederate shot at Chamberlain.
Chamberlain left the U.S. Army soon after the war ended, going back to his home state of Maine.
See also   List of Medal of Honor recipients  List of American Civil War Medal of Honor recipients: A–F  List of American Civil War generals  Notes  References  Further reading  External links  Joshua Chamberlain Seeks Assistance for Jaffa Adams Colonists, 1867 Shapell Manuscript Foundation Joshua Lawrence Chamberlain Digital Archive at Bowdoin College Chamberlain-Adams Family Papers.
I'M IN HEAVEN: Stephen Collins, seen here, plays Rev. Eric Camden on this popular series
7th Heaven
Stephen Weaver Collins (born October 1, 1947) is an American actor, writer, director, and musician, best known for playing Eric Camden on the long-running television series 7th Heaven.
3
He is also known for the roles of Captain Will Decker in Star Trek: The Motion Picture, and as Dr. Dayton King on the short-lived ABC TV series No Ordinary Family.
Collins was raised with his two older brothers in Hastings-on-Hudson, New York, and attended Amherst College, graduating cum laude.
Harter  Discography +YearTitleNotes1993Sondheim: Putting It TogetherOff Broadway cast recording2003Stephen Collins2005The Hits of Rick Nelson  Books Collins is the author of two novels: Eye Contact (1994) and Double Exposure (1998).
WHEN THEY WERE IN COLLEGE: Katie Couric was an associate editor of The Cavalier Daily while at this Charlottesville school
University of Virginia
As a high school student, she was an intern at Washington, D.C. all-news radio station WAVA. She enrolled at her father's alma mater, the University of Virginia, in 1975 and was a Delta Delta Delta sorority sister.
3
She has interviewed presidents, cabinet members, celebrities, and business executives around the world, including President Barack Obama, Secretary of State Hillary Rodham Clinton, Former President George W. Bush, Former Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice, John Edwards just after the announcement that his then-wife Elizabeth's cancer had returned, Israeli Foreign Minister Tzipi Livni, Norah Jones and Michael J. Fox.
Couric also guest co-hosted The View and Live! with Regis and Kelly.
88
MUSTY TV: Elizabeth Montgomery played quirky Cousin Serena as well as Samantha on this sitcom
Bewitched
She is best remembered as the star of the TV series Bewitched.
2
Both roles earned her additional Emmy Award nominations.
Despite its poor showing in the ratings, the show was still contracted for a ninth season.
A REAL RHODES SCHOLAR: Robert Reich met this man on the voyage to Oxford, where both were Rhodes Scholars, & later served as his Secretary of Labor
Bill Clinton
He served in the administrations of Presidents Gerald Ford and Jimmy Carter and was Secretary of Labor under President Bill Clinton from 1993 to 1997.
2
In response to a question as to what to recommend to the incoming president regarding a fair and sustainable income and wealth distribution, Reich said, "Expand the Earned Income Tax Credit — a wage supplement for lower-income people, and finance it with a higher marginal income tax on the top five percent.
For the longer term, invest in education for lower income communities, starting with early-childhood education and extending all the way up to better access to post-secondary education."
ACTING PRESIDENTS: Burgess Meredith could have sung "Hello, Dolley!" when he played this man in the film "Magnificent Doll"
James Madison
Battle of New Britain - Narrator (1944)  The Story of G.I. Joe - Ernie Pyle (1945)  A Walk in the Sun - Narrator (voice) (uncredited) (1945)  The Diary of a Chambermaid - Captain Mauger (1946)  Magnificent Doll - James Madison (1946)  Mine Own Executioner - Felix Milne (1947)  On Our Merry Way - Oliver M Pease (1948)  Jigsaw - Jack/Bartender (uncredited) (1949)  A Yank Comes Back (1949)
3
Meredith appeared in various western series, such as Rawhide (four times), The Virginian (twice), Wagon Train, Branded, The Wild Wild West, The Travels of Jaimie McPheeters, Laredo, Bonanza, and Daniel Boone.
His last role before his death was the portrayal of both Hamilton Wofford and Covington Wofford characters in the 1996 video game Ripper by Take-Two Interactive.
Daniel Boone - episode - Three Score and Ten - Alex Hemming (1969)
IN THE BUTTE: In 1912 Butte's new one of these judicial buildings cost twice as much as the state capitol
Courthouse
In many cases, buttes have been given other names that do not use the word butte, for example, Courthouse Rock, Nebraska.
3
The word butte comes from a French word meaning "small hill"; its use is prevalent in the Western United States, including the southwest where "mesa" is also used for the larger landform.
thumb|left|Devils Tower in Wyoming  Three other notable formations that are either named butte or may be considered buttes even though they do not conform to the formal geographer's rule are Scotts Bluff in Nebraska which is actually a collection of five bluffs, Crested Butte which is a  mountain in Colorado, and Elephant Butte which is now an island in Elephant Butte Reservoir in New Mexico.
The harder rock on top of the butte resists erosion.
TV: On this kick-butt series, Keye Luke played the blind Shaolin priest known as Master Po
Kung Fu
He was known for playing Lee Chan, the "Number One Son" in the Charlie Chan films, the original Kato in the 1939–1941 Green Hornet film serials, Brak in the 1960s Space Ghost cartoons, Master Po in the television series Kung Fu, and Mr. Wing in the Gremlins films.
3
Christopher Stipp, /Film, This Week
Dr. Wong Charlie Chan in Shanghai (1935)
Lee Chan Shanghai (1935) Chinese Ambassador's son Charlie Chan at the Circus (1936) Lee Chan Charlie Chan at the Race Track (1936)
THE INC.-UISITION: In 1989 the company called Corning these Works became simply Corning Inc.
Corning Glass Works
The company was known as Corning Glass Works until 1989, when it changed its name to Corning Incorporated.
3
In 1932, George Ellery Hale approached Corning with the challenge of fabricating the required optic for his Palomar project.
Retired Chief Scientist, Xerox Corporation  John A. Canning, Jr.: Co-founder and Chairman, Madison Dearborn, LLC  Robert F. Cummings, Jr.: Vice Chairman of Investment Banking, JPMorgan Chase  James B. Flaws: Vice Chairman and Chief Financial Officer, Corning Incorporated  Gordon Gund: Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, Gund Investment Corporation  Kurt M. Landgraf:
In December 2011, the non-partisan organization Public Campaign criticized Corning for spending $2.81 million on lobbying and not paying any taxes during 2008–2010, instead getting $4 million in tax rebates, despite making a profit of $1.98 billion and having a total compensation for the top 5 executives between $35 and $45 million per year.
READ: "The Red White and Blue" was a 1987 novel by this husband of Joan Didion
John Gregory Dunne
She returned to California with her new husband, writer John Gregory Dunne, and in 1968, published Slouching Towards Bethlehem, her first work of nonfiction, a collection of magazine pieces about her experiences in California.
3
As a child, Didion attended kindergarten and first grade, although, because her father was in the Army Air Corps during World War II and her family was constantly being relocated, she did not attend school on a regular basis.
California ultimately became their home for the next twenty years.
A Star Is Born (1976)
END-"EVER": Pitcher Goose Gossage was famous as one of these
reliever
The starting pitcher begins the game, and he may be followed by various relief pitchers, such as the long reliever, the left-handed specialist, the middle reliever, the setup man, and/or the closer.
3
thumb|420px|right|Brandon Claussen, pitching for the Cincinnati Reds, delivers the ball to home plate  In baseball, the pitcher is the player who throws the baseball from the pitcher's mound toward the catcher to begin each play, with the goal of retiring a batter, who attempts to either make contact with the pitched ball or draw a walk.
The most basic pitch is a fastball, where the pitcher throws the ball as hard as he can.
Typically, the further down in the rotation a starting pitcher is, the weaker he is compared with the others on the staff.
TARTS: This stripper famously hitched her star to Louisiana Gov. Earl Long in the late 1950s
Blaze Starr
His sometimes erratic behavior – including liaison with New Orleans stripper Blaze Starr – appeared to be of minimal consequence to his electoral success.
3
In the 1950s, he quarreled with the state's leading segregationist, then state Senator William M. Rainach of Claiborne Parish in north Louisiana.
Under this scenario, Long planned to run again for governor in the December 1959 Democratic primary but by leaving office early could avoid Louisiana's ban (at the time) on governors' succeeding themselves.
Only out-of-parish people could do the honor.
OSCARDS WILD: In 1992, proving he could keep up with the younger crowd, he did one-armed pushups accepting his "City Slickers" Oscar
Jack Palance
City Slickers is a 1991 American western comedy film directed by Ron Underwood and starring Billy Crystal, Daniel Stern, Bruno Kirby and Jack Palance, with supporting roles by Patricia Wettig, Helen Slater and Noble Willingham.
3
Curly, Jeff, T.R., and the ranch's guests begin the long drive to Colorado.
From there the three easily lead the herd to the Colorado ranch, where they are warmly received by the others.
Mitch returns to New York City with Norman as a happier man, having realized that his family is his "one thing".
THE PRINCESS BRIDE: Single mom Mette-Marit Tjessem Hoiby wed Crown Prince Haakon in 2001, making her a princess of this country
Norway
Crown may refer to:  Arts  Crown (comics),  a fictional character in the Marvel Universe, and an enemy of Spider-Man  The Crown (TV series),  an upcoming television drama series created by Peter Morgan for Netflix   Currency   Crown (Australian coin), the Australian version of the British Crown  Crown (British coin), a heavy silver coin, parallel in size and weight to the United States silver dollar  Crown (currency), a monetary unit used in the countries of Czech Republic, Denmark, Iceland, Norway and Sweden and the territories of Faroe Islands and Greenland  Crown (English coin), originally known as the "crown of the double rose", an English gold coin introduced as part of King Henry VIII's monetary reform of 1526 with the value of five shillings; later a silver coin of the same value  Estonian kroon, the official currency of Estonia for two periods in history: 1928–1940 and 1992–2011  Hungarian korona, the replacement currency of the Austro-Hungarian Krone/korona amongst the boundaries of the newly created post-World War I Hungary  Koruna (disambiguation)  Krona (disambiguation)  Krone (disambiguation)   Dentistry  Crown (dentistry), a dental treatment  Crown (tooth), a portion of a tooth   Motor vehicles   Crown (automobile), an automobile built in Detroit, MI, in 1905  Ford Crown Victoria   Ford LTD Crown Victoria  Toyota Crown, an automobile built for the Japanese and other select Asian markets  Music and audio  Crowns (band), an English folk punk band  "The Crown", a single by Gary Byrd and the GB Experience  The Crown (band), a Swedish death/thrash band  "Crown" (song), a song by Jay-Z   Places   Crown, Inverness (from the Scottish Gaelic: Crùn), an area situated beside the city centre of Inverness, the capital city of the Scottish Highlands  Crown Wetlands, Cayman Islands  The Crown (mountain), a mountain in the Karakoram of China   Science   Crown (anatomy), the top of the head  Crown (botany), the branching leaf-bearing portion of a tree  Crown graph in graph theory  Crown group in phylogenetics  Crown ether in chemistry  Symbols of monarchy or rank  Crown (headgear), often an emblem of the monarchy, a monarch's government, or items endorsed by it  An alternate means to refer to a monarch  The Crown, the legal embodiment of Executive Government in Commonwealth countries  Crown, a military decoration in the ancient Roman Republic, including:  Grass crown, awarded for saving a city in battle  Civic crown, awarded for saving a citizen in battle  Camp crown, awarded for being the first to penetrate the enemy's camp  Mural crown, awarded for being the first to scale the walls of an enemy city  Naval crown, awarded for being the first to board an enemy ship  Other uses  Crown (heraldry), ceremonial headgear, often used in a symbolic way only  HMS Crown, the name of various Royal Navy ships  Crown Prosecutor, the title commonly given, in Commonwealth jurisdictions, to the state prosecutor  Crown, the top or hinge of a bell (instrument)  Crown, the topmost part of a hat  Crown Publishing Group  Crowns brand cigarettes, produced by Commonwealth Brands  Crown Lager, an Australian beer  The grooved knob or dial on the outside of a watch case, used for setting the hands of the watch.
1
bg:Корона da:Krone es:corona eo:Krono io:Krono no:Krone fi:Kruunu uk:Корона (значення)
'80s MUSIC: Hurry up & name this Canadian power-rock trio with the 1981 album "Moving Pictures"
Rush
Moving Pictures may refer to:  Film, television and theatre  Moving picture or film, a story conveyed with moving images  Moving Pictures (TV series), a 1990s UK programme devoted to film  Moving Pictures (originally Glasshouses), a 1981 play by Stephen Lowe  Moving Pictures, a 1999 play by Sharon Pollock   Literature   Moving Pictures (magazine), an American film and film industry periodical  Moving Pictures (novel), a 1990 Discworld novel by Terry Pratchett  Moving Pictures, an autobiography by Ali MacGraw   Music   Moving Pictures (band), an Australian rock group  Moving Pictures (Rush album), 1981  Moving Pictures
2
(Holger Czukay album), 1993  Moving Pictures
(Ravi Coltrane album)  "Moving Pictures" (song), a 2007 song by The Cribs  "Moving Pictures", a song by Fall Out Boy from Fall Out Boy's Evening Out with Your Girlfriend  See also    Film (disambiguation)  Movie (disambiguation)
THEY USED TO BE CHEERLEADERS: Mandy Moore spent years as a cheerleader before playing one in this "Regal" Anne Hathaway film of 2001
The Princess Diaries
Later that year, she appeared as Lana Thomas in the comedy film The Princess Diaries, alongside Anne Hathaway.
3
In 2010, Moore voiced Rapunzel in the animated film Tangled, in which she performed the duet "I See the Light" with Zachary Levi; the song won a Grammy for Best Song Written for Visual Media.
She sang a cover version of The Beach Boys 1966 hit "God Only Knows", with Michael Stipe, that bookended the movie.
The animated series, set between Tangled and Tangled Ever After, will air on Disney Channel in 2017.
SWEET TREATS: This jiggly dessert brand was based on a patented recipe by locomotive inventor Peter Cooper
Jell-O
The patents were later sold to a cough syrup manufacturer who developed a pre-packaged form which his wife named "Jell-O".Topper, Robert Q. "Peter Cooper as Chemical Engineer: The Invention of The Gelatin Dessert" on the Cooper Union website  Cooper later invested in real estate and insurance, and became one of the richest men in New York City.
3
Harding, Robert S. and Oswald, Alison "Western Union Telegraph Company Records 1820–1995" Archives Center, National Museum of American History, Smithsonian Institution, Washington, D.C.
Cooper was surpassed by another unsuccessful candidate: Samuel Jones Tilden of the Democratic Party.
Today Cooper Union is recognized as one of the leading American colleges in the fields of architecture, engineering, and art.
WHAT'S ON THE TUBE?: Keith Carradine's role as Wild Bill Hickok on this series ended when Jack McCall killed Hickok
Deadwood
He was shot from behind and killed while playing poker in a saloon in Deadwood, Dakota Territory (now South Dakota) by an unsuccessful gambler, Jack McCall.
2
On September 4, Hickok was wounded in the foot while rescuing several cattlemen in the Bijou Creek Basin who had been surrounded by Indians.
On April 15, 1871, Hickok became marshal of Abilene, Kansas.
HISTORIC WOMEN: In 1985 Lynette Woodard became the first woman to play on this entertaining basketball team
Harlem Globetrotters
Lynette Woodard (born August 12, 1959) is a retired American basketball player who made history by becoming the first female member of the Harlem Globetrotters and who tasted success abroad before finally reaching, at age 38, her dream of playing in the (newly formed) American women's professional basketball league.
2
She was a four-time All-American at KU, and she averaged 26 points per game and scored 3,649 points in total during her four years there, and was the first KU woman to be honored by having her jersey retired.
Woodard averaged 19.0 points per game and 4.0 rebounds per game, both second best on the team.
BRITISH AUTHORS: "Just So Stories", his 1902 collection for children, was the only book he also illustrated
Rudyard Kipling
Just So Stories for Little Children are a collection written by the British author Rudyard Kipling.
3
The Kangaroo gets its powerful hind legs, long tail, and hopping gait after being chased all day by a dingo, sent by a minor god responding to the Kangaroo's request to be made different from all other animals.
How the Alphabet Was Made — Taffimai and her father invent an alphabet.
The Butterfly That Stamped — how Solomon saved the pride of a butterfly, and the Queen of Sheba used this to prevent his wives scolding him.
BERRY, BERRY GOOD: Daws Butler voiced this animated TV hound
Huckleberry Hound
He worked mostly for the Hanna-Barbera animation production company where he originated the voices of many familiar characters, including Yogi Bear, Quick Draw McGraw, Snagglepuss, and Huckleberry Hound.
3
He had entered them, not with the intention of showing his talent but as a personal challenge to overcome his shyness, with success.
Fibber Fox and Alfy Gator (of Yakky Doodle)  Ali Gator (in two Lantz theatrical shorts)
In 1975, Butler began an acting workshop which spawned such talents as Nancy Cartwright, Corey Burton, Joe Bevilacqua, Bill Farmer, Pat Parris, Tony Pope, Linda Gary, Bob Bergen, Mona Marshall, Joey Camen, writer Earl Kress and many more.
AMERICANA: Inspired by the 5 Olympic rings, the Fountain of Rings is in Centennial Olympic Park in this city
Atlanta
Ironically, both artists would have hits at King working with Rock & Roll Hall of Fame producer Ralph Bass, becoming good friends and routinely competing in battles of the bands at clubs like Atlanta's Royal Peacock in that city's Sweet Auburn section.
3
Brown modeled his first vocal group after the "5" Royales, and both Eric Clapton and legendary Stax guitarist Steve Cropper cite Pauling as a key influence.
The group paired Pauling with vocalists Jimmy Moore, Obadiah Carter, and Otto Jeffries, with Johnny Tanner (November 28, 1926, North Carolina –
Pauling's sound was funky, gutsy.
THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION: During the war General Thomas Conway suggested that this man be replaced as commander-in-chief
George Washington
Based on an introduction from Silas Deane, the Congress appointed him a Brigadier General on May 13, and sent him on to George Washington.
3
This, and Conway's condescending attitude, led to continued friction between the men.
Congress appointed Conway a Major General anyway in December 1777, and made him inspector general of the army.
When he recovered, he wrote an apology to Washington and returned to France.
DATE & PLACE: June 25, 1876, the Montana Territory:This lt. col., under Gen. Alfred Terry, & his 200-man unit
Custer
A column of troops under his command arrived shortly after the Battle of Little Big Horn and discovered the bodies of Custer's men.
2
Unlike Butler, Terry worked well with the Navy under the command of David D. Porter.
In 1991, Terry was portrayed by Terry O'Quinn in the television film Son of the Morning Star.
THEATRE: The 1973 Broadway musical "Gigi" featured this actress perhaps best-known for playing Endora on "Bewitched"
Agnes Moorehead
It was created by Sol Saks under executive director Harry Ackerman, and starred Elizabeth Montgomery, Dick York (1964–1969), Agnes Moorehead, and David White.
3
The ratings fall coincided with the replacement of Dick York by Dick Sargent, but two contributing factors may have been that the series was beginning to run out of fresh ideas as well as face stronger competition from the other networks.
But the wife, I don't know, something's wrong with her.
Cable television channel WTBS carried seasons 3–8 throughout the 1980s and 1990s from DFS on a barter basis like most local stations that carried the show did.
NATIONAL HISTORIC SITES: A Canton, Ohio library is an archive for the contributions of these women, such as Pat Nixon
First Ladies
Education and career  It has been said that few, if any, First Ladies worked as consistently before their marriage as did Pat Nixon.
3
Nixon's yellow-satin inaugural gown by Harvey Berin was criticized as "a schoolteacher on her night out", but Treyz defended her wardrobe selections by saying, "Mrs. Nixon must be ladylike."Nixon also frequently wore wigs that replicated her short blonde hairstyle, especially on political trips when access to a hairdresser would be difficult.
Eisenhower, Julie Nixon (1986), pp.
417–419 On August 7, 1974, the family met in the solarium of the White House for their last dinner.
MADAM SENATOR: Gov. Mel Carnahan died but was nevertheless elected senator, so his wife Jean filled the vacancy for this state
Missouri
A Democrat, he served as the 51st Governor of Missouri (1993-2000) and was elected posthumously to the U.S. Senate.
1
Carnahan and his family were active members of the First Baptist Church of Rolla, where he served as an ordained deacon and member of the building committee.
CINEMATIC CHICAGO: Chicago con men Newman & Redford stage an elaborate revenge on a gangster in this film that won 7 Oscars
The Sting
Some of the more prominent films which have used such setup footage include The Fugitive (1993), which also included a short scene inside of an "L" train, The Sting (1973), and The Blues Brothers (1980).
3
Two years later the South Side "L" introduced multiple-unit control, in which the operator can control all the motorized cars in a train, not just the lead unit.
The exceptions are the Red Line and the Blue Line.
Cermak/Blue Island will be located on the newly built elevated tracks in the Pilsen neighborhood.
BESTSELLING AUTHORS: One of the world's bestselling novelists, he created TV's "I Dream of Jeannie"
Sidney Sheldon
(This event reflects producer Sidney Sheldon's decision that the engagement depicted in the pilot episode would not be part of the series continuity; he realized the romantic triangle he created between Jeannie, "Master", and Melissa Stone would not pan out in the long run.)  Tony at first keeps Jeannie in her bottle most of the time, but he finally relents and allows her to enjoy a life of her own.
3
The cast and crew only made two visits to Florida's Space Coast, both in 1969.
thumb|right|I Dream of Jeannie Lane sign in Cocoa Beach, FL The cast and crew returned on November 25, 1969, for three days for a mock wedding of Eden and Hagman staged for television writers from around the nation (timed to the airing of the nuptials episode on December 2) at the Patrick Air Force Base Officers Club.
It was given to her by her make-up woman after the show was canceled while the show was on hiatus.
GANGSTERS: His fateful July 22, 1934 night at Chicago's Biograph Theater might be featured on "Biography"
John Dillinger
It is notable as the location where bank robber John Dillinger was shot by  FBI agents after watching a gangster movie on July 22, 1934.
3
The theater is on the National Register of Historic Places and was designated a Chicago Landmark on March 28, 2001.
A grand staircase, which was part of the original structure, was restored to lead up to the building's second floor, housing a studio theater seating 135 people and an adjacent rehearsal/multiple-use space.
Chicago Tribune, October 6, 2006  thumb|left|200px|The Biograph Theater and adjoining businesses in 2008 redressed to appear as it did in 1934 for the film Public Enemies.
NAMES BY THE NUMBER: Dopey, Sleepy, Doc, Bashful, Happy, Sneezy & Grumpy
The Seven Dwarfs
DOC, Doc, doc or DoC may refer to:   Media   Doc (2001 TV series), a 2001–2004 PAX series  Doc (1975 TV series), a 1975–1976 CBS sitcom  "D.O.C." (Lost), a television episode  Doc (film), a 1971 Western film  Documentary Organization of Canada, known as DOC, a non-profit organization supporting documentary filmmakers in Canada  Doc Films, a University of Chicago film society   People   Doc (nickname)  An abbreviation of Doctor  Doc Brown (rapper), British rapper and comedian  The D.O.C. (b. 1968), American rapper  Krzysztof Raczkowski (1970–2005), musician  Drew Hankinson (b. 1983), American professional wrestler also known by the ring name DOC   Places   Dominion of Canada  Dóc, a village in Csongrád County, Hungary  Dóc, the Hungarian name for Dolaţ village, Livezile, Timiș, Romania   Fictional characters   Doc (Buffyverse), in Buffy the Vampire Slayer  Doc (Chrono Cross)  Doc (G.I. Joe), two characters in the G.I. Joe universe  Doc (cartoon character), an animated cat introduced by Walter Lantz Studios in 1959  Doc Daneeka, in the novel Catch-22  Doc Hudson, in the film Cars  Doc Louis, in the video game series Punch-Out!!  Doc McStuffins, a Disney Junior title character  Doc Savage, a pulp fiction hero  Emmett Brown, a scientist from Back to the Future  Monte 'Doc' Parker, in the series Third Watch  Doc, in the series Fraggle Rock  Doc, a short-eared, long-legged dog, in the cartoons of Elmer Andrews Bushnell  Doc, in the series Red vs. Blue  Doc, a dwarf in Snow White and the Seven Dwarfs (1937 film)  Doc Saturday, in the series The Secret Saturdays  Doc Boy, from the Garfield series   Government departments   United States Department of Commerce  Department of Conservation (New Zealand)  Department of Corrections (various)   Computing   Doc (computing), a word processing file format, typically used by Microsoft Word.
1
DiskOnChip, a type of flash memory device  Dave's own version of Citadel, a bulletin board software variant   Food and wine appellations   Denominazione di origine controllata, an Italian level of classification  Denominação de Origem Controlada, a Portuguese level of classification  Denominación de Origen Calificada, a Spanish level of classification  Medical abbreviations  DOC, 11-Deoxycorticosterone, a steroid hormone  DOC, 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-chloroamphetamine, a psychedelic amphetamine  DOC, Deoxycholic acid, a bile acid  DOC, drug of choice in pharmacology  DOC, date of conception   Other uses   Dartmouth Outing Club  Day-old cockerel, a term in falconry  Diesel Oxidation Catalyst, a diesel retrofit system for automobiles  Dissolved organic carbon, a molecule classification  Doc (mascot), the Towson University mascot  ISO 639-3 code for the North Dong language or dialect   See also   Dock (disambiguation)  Documentation
THE 20th CENTURY PLAY'S THE THING: "Nothing On" is the farce performed by the actors in this Michael Frayn comedy
Noises Off
He is best known as the author of the farce Noises Off and the dramas Copenhagen and  Democracy.
3
Number One (1984) translated from Jean Anouilh's Le Nombril Benefactors (1984) Wild Honey trans.
Constructions, a volume of philosophical twaddle (1974).
Our part in the creation of the universe (2006).
BELCHING: Novel in which Sam Spade tries to ditch a cop who says, "You belched for help and now you've got to take it"
The Maltese Falcon
Sam Spade is a fictional private detective and the protagonist of Dashiell Hammett's 1930 novel, The Maltese Falcon.
3
Hammett says about him:   Spade has no original.
A 1946-1951 radio show called The Adventures of Sam Spade (on ABC, CBS, and NBC) starred Howard Duff (and later Steve Dunne) as "Sam Spade" and Lurene Tuttle as Spade's devoted secretary "Effie Perrine", and took a considerably more tongue-in-cheek approach to the character.
Comics
HE WAS IN THAT?: Brian Dennehy played a bartender in this film that made Bo Derek a household number...I mean, name
10
Bo Derek (born Mary Cathleen Collins; November 20, 1956) is an American film and television actress, movie producer, and model perhaps best known for her role in the 1979 film 10.
3
Early in her career she used the name Kathleen Collins.
The couple moved to Germany where John Derek would not be subject to the Californian statutory rape law due to Cathleen's young age.
Bolero won other Raspberry awards, including "Worst Director", "Worst Screenplay", "Worst Picture", "Worst New Star" and "Worst Musical Score".
PLAYWRIGHTS & ACTRESSES: He co-starred in his own play "Private Lives" with Gertrude Lawrence, a close friend of his since his youth
Noel Coward
Sullivan, Dan. "The Theater: 'Private Lives' Revived; Noel Coward's Farce Stars Elaine Stritch".
3
Olivierawards.com, accessed 6 March 2011  A Broadway transfer of Davies's West End production, starring Rickman and Duncan, ran for 127 performances at the Richard Rodgers Theatre in 2002.Brantley, Ben. "Theater Review; Take Hate, Add Love and Shake Tenderly for a Coward Cocktail".
IBDB.com, accessed 6 March 2011 during the 1970 awards season.
1969.
ENGLISH LITERATURE: "The Fifth Child" is a recent work by this English author of "The Golden Notebook"
Doris Lessing
The Fifth Child is a short novel by the British writer Doris Lessing, first published in the United Kingdom in 1988, and since translated into a number of languages.
3
James Lovatt.
John.
A young man who takes care of Ben.
COUNTRIES BY COLLEGE: University of Wollongong, Southern Cross University
Australia
Southern Cross University (SCU) is a research intensive Australian public university.
3
The University of New England continues to exist as a single campus in Armidale, New South Wales, as it had been established in 1954.
It is projected that all programs currently offered at the Tweed Heads campuses will be transferred to the new Gold Coast campus progressively over 2013.
The institution is divided into a number of Schools and Colleges.
STATE THE STATE OF THE GOVERNOR: Mark Sanford
South Carolina
He currently serves as the U.S. Representative for South Carolina's 1st congressional district after winning a special election on May 7, 2013.AP: Sanford wins 1st District race, beats Colbert BuschSullivan, Sean.
2
Later in his tenure, he embarked on a plan to reform methods of funding the state's public education system, including measures such as school vouchers– aimed at introducing more competition into the school system as a means of fostering improvement.
Sanford publicly aligned himself with McCain in a March 15, 2008, piece in the Wall Street Journal.
WHAT I REALLY WANT TO DO IS DIRECT: (Hi, I'm Joel Schumacher.)I was encouraged to direct by this man when I was his costume designer on "Sleeper" & "Interiors"
Woody Allen
It may also refer to:  General uses  Sleeper, a sleeping partner in business  Sleeper, a greatly undervalued antique or collectible found offered for sale in a venue where knowledgeable antique dealers do business  Sleeper, a strong internal beam (structure) in construction and shipbuilding  Sleeper dike, a low inland dike, made obsolete by a newer dike closer to shore  Sleeper agent, a secret agent or similar operative left long inactive  Blanket sleeper, a one-piece, footed sleeping garment  Sleeper couch, also known as a fold-out couch or hide-a-bed  Sleeper earring, originally designed to be worn while sleeping to keep the hole in a pierced ear open  Sleeper hit, a work that obtains unexpected recognition or success  Sleeper hold, a rear naked choke hold used in professional wrestling  Transportation  Sleeper bus, designed to carry fewer passengers in greater comfort  Sleeper (car), an automobile that has been modified to improve its performance without changing its outward appearance; the British term for this is Q-car  Sleeper truck, a truck with a sleeping compartment  Sleeping car, a railway passenger car with beds  Railway sleeper, a railroad tie  Biology  Sleepers or sleeper gobies, the common names for fish belonging to the family Eleotridae  Sleeper cichlid, perch-like member of the genus Nimbochromis  Books The Sleeper, poem by Edgar Allan Poe The Sleepers (poem), a poem by Walt Whitman  Sleeper (comic book), published by DC Comics  Sleeper (Marvel Comics), a Nazi German robot utilized by the Red Skull in Marvel Comics  Sleepers, a 1995 novel by Lorenzo Carcaterra  The Sleeper (Wild Cards), a character in the Wild Cards science fiction series who periodically hibernates, awakening each time in a new body  Films  Sleepers (film), a 1996 film based on the novel by Lorenzo Carcaterra  Sleeper (1973 film), a 1973 Woody Allen film  Sleeper (2005 film), a 2005 Austrian/German film  Sleeper (2012 film), a 2012 action/thriller film starring Scott "Raven" Levy and Bruce Hopkins  The Sleeper (film), a 2012 American horror film  Television  "Sleeper" (Buffy episode), from the seventh and final season of Buffy the Vampire Slayer  "Sleeper", an episode from the first season of The New Avengers  "Sleeper" (Torchwood), an episode from Series 2 of the series Torchwood  "Sleepers" (Sanctuary), an episode from the second season of Sanctuary  Sleepers (TV series), a British comedy/drama  Sleepers (TV series 2012), a Turkish television drama series  An extraterrestrial in the U.S. TV series The Event Sleeper (Modern Family), an episode of the TV series Modern Family.
2
A sleeper is a person who is sleeping.
Music Bands  Sleeper (band), a Britpop band in the 1990s  The Sleepers (San Francisco band), a punk/post-punk band active from 1978 until 1981  The Sleepers (Chicago band), an American rock band formed in 2002  Albums  Sleeper (Everyday Sunday album)  Sleeper (Godstar album)  Sleeper (Keith Jarrett album), a live album   Sleeper (Tribe album)  Sleeper (Ty Segall album)  The Sleeper, a 2003 Blue Orchids album  The Sleeper (The Leisure Society album)  Sleepers (album), a solo album from rapper Big Pooh  Songs  "Sleeper", by 10 Years from Minus the Machine  "Sleeper", by Snarky Puppy  Games  "The sleeper", a yo-yo trick  The Sleeper, the main antagonist in the computer game Gothic  Sleeper, the Japanese name for the Pokémon Hypno  Other uses  The Sleepers (New Hampshire), a pair of mountain peaks in the United States Le Sommeil (The Sleepers), a painting by Gustave Courbet
& A BIBLE PERSON TO BE NAMED LATER: "The Prince of Egypt" says Seti gave the order to kill the newborn Hebrews & adopted this Hebrew boy
Moses
The film is an adaptation of the Book of Exodus and follows the life of Moses from being a prince of Egypt to his ultimate destiny to lead the children of Israel out of Egypt.
2
Plot In Ancient Egypt, the descendants of Jacob are being oppressed by the new Pharaoh, Pharaoh Seti I(Patrick Stewart) as they pray for the promised land.
http://books.google.com.au/books?id=aDuy3p5QvEYC&printsec=frontcover&dq=The+Jewish+study+Bible&hl=en&ei=unbbTonKMZGQiQejvpjdDQ&sa=X&oi=book_result&ct=result&resnum=1&ved=0CDsQ6AEwAA#v=onepage&q=The%20Jewish%20study%20Bible&f=false
I DIRECT: He starred as a highly neurotic film director -- what else? -- in 2002's "Hollywood Ending"
Woody Allen
Hollywood Ending is an American comedy film from 2002 written and directed by Woody Allen, who also plays the principal character.
2
When he is thrown off his latest effort (a deodorant commercial being filmed in the frozen north), he desperately seeks a real movie project.
At 114 minutes, it's decisively lacking in the brevity that used to characterize Allen's pictures - even the super-serious, Bergman-inspired stuff.
UNIVERSITY OF MICHIGAN ALUMNI: Lawrence Kasdan wrote this Kevin Kline/Glenn Close ensemble film partially based on his years at Michigan
The Big Chill
(Businessweek, 2013-03-07)  He has been nominated for three Oscars: twice for Best Original Screenplay for The Big Chill and Grand Canyon and once for Best Adapted Screenplay for The Accidental Tourist.
3
He is best known as co-writer of the films The Empire Strikes Back, Raiders of the Lost Ark, and Return of the Jedi.
Retrieved February 12, 2013.
Career Upon graduation, Kasdan was unable to find a teaching position, so he became an advertising copywriter, a profession he did not enjoy, but remained in for five years (even picking up a Clio Award along the way), first in Detroit and later in Los Angeles where he tried to interest Hollywood in his screenplays.
HOT FILMS, COOL FILMS: After "Body Heat" steamed up the screen, Lawrence Kasdan cooled down & directed this movie next
The Big Chill
(Businessweek, 2013-03-07)  He has been nominated for three Oscars: twice for Best Original Screenplay for The Big Chill and Grand Canyon and once for Best Adapted Screenplay for The Accidental Tourist.
3
He is best known as co-writer of the films The Empire Strikes Back, Raiders of the Lost Ark, and Return of the Jedi.
From 1994 to 2003, he made a set of films that, in contrast to the hits he had in the 1980s, failed to break the bank in receipts; among these films were Wyatt Earp and Dreamcatcher, the latter based on the Stephen King best seller.
In 2006, Kasdan received the Laurel Award for Screenwriting Achievement from the Writers Guild of America.
THURSDAY NIGHT TV: In the '90s show "My So-Called Life", Claire Danes' Angela pined for this boy played by Jared Leto
Jordan Catalano
After starting his career with television appearances in the early 1990s, Leto achieved recognition for his role as Jordan Catalano on the television series My So-Called Life (1994).
3
It received multiple awards and nominations, including seven Academy Award nominations; Leto shared a Satellite Award with the rest of the cast.
Critics praised the examination of the state of the modern music industry and its focus on the relationship between artists and record companies.
In recent years, it has expanded to other artists such as Jessie J and Semi Precious Weapons.
ON THE "DOUBLE": A 1984 Melanie Griffith movie, or the function Shelly Michelle served for Julia Roberts in "Pretty Woman"
Body Double
The daughter of actress Tippi Hedren and former stage actor Peter Griffith, she rose to prominence for her role in Brian De Palma's Body Double (1984), which earned her a National Society of Film Critics Award for Best Supporting Actress.
3
Griffith skipped a grade, graduating from Hollywood Professional School when she was 16 years old.
In August 2009, Griffith returned to rehab again for what her publicist called "part of a routine plan.""Melanie Griffith: Return to Rehab Was Planned" interview, parade,com, August 26, 2009.
In December of that year, she had surgery for skin cancer.
THE SMITHS: Howdy Doody, seen here as a bobblehead, was created by this man, his TV costar
Buffalo Bob Smith
The original Dawson Howdy Doody at Detroit Institute of Arts   Howdy Doody himself is a freckle-faced boy marionette with 48 freckles, one for each state of the union (up until January 3, 1959, when Alaska was admitted as the 49th state), and was originally voiced by Buffalo Bob Smith.
3
In June 1956, it began to be shown on Saturdays only, in a morning timeslot (10-10:30), continuing until its final broadcast on September 24, 1960.
Colgate toothpaste, Halo Shampoo, 3 Musketeers candy bars and Poll Parrot Shoes are among the products advertised this way.
In response, NBC set up a special studio at Smith's home so that he could appear live "from Pioneer Village" to do commercials.
"T" TIME: Eartha Kitt sang in this language, in her "delight"ful 1953 pop hit "Uska Dara"
Turkish
A talented singer with a distinctive voice, she recorded the hits "Let's Do It", "Champagne Taste", "C'est si bon" (which Stan Freberg famously burlesqued), "Just an Old Fashioned Girl", "Monotonous", "Je cherche un homme", "Love for Sale", "I'd Rather Be Burned as a Witch", "Katibim" (a Turkish melody), "Mink, Schmink", "Under the Bridges of Paris" and her most recognizable hit "Santa Baby", which was released in 1953.
3
Hot Dance/Disco 1974–2003.
Like many politically active public figures of her time, Kitt was under surveillance by the CIA, beginning in 1956.
It was just the two of us hanging out [during the last days] she was very funny.
DESPOTS & DICTATORS: In the early 1800s Juan Manuel de Rosas went from gaucho to head honcho of this country
Argentina
By 1848, he had extended his power beyond the borders of Buenos Aires and was ruler of all of Argentina.
3
It was used against specific targets, rather than randomly.
Nonetheless, it served as a clear warning that Rosas had no intention of loosening his grip.
A very few loyal friends sent him money, but it was never enough.
49ers: A 1982 playoff reception by Dwight Clark from this quarterback is simply known as "The Catch"
Joe Montana
He caught the winning touchdown pass thrown by quarterback Joe Montana in the NFC Championship Game in January 1982 against the Dallas Cowboys.
3
NFL career Bill Walsh drafted Clark as the first pick of the 10th round of the 1979 NFL Draft.
He has served as a team executive for both the 49ers and the Cleveland Browns as well as starring in the lead role in the 1994 direct-to-video comedy Kindergarten Ninja.
References  External links      Category:1957 births Category:Living people Category:American football wide receivers Category:Clemson Tigers football players Category:Cleveland Browns executives Category:San Francisco 49ers executives Category:San Francisco 49ers players Category:National Football League general managers Category:National Conference Pro Bowl players Category:National Football League players with retired numbers Category:People from Kinston, North Carolina Category:Sportspeople from Charlotte, North Carolina Category:Players of American football from North Carolina Category:Super Bowl champions
THEY WERE THE HOLLYWOOD SQUARES: As this suspender-clad character, Cliff Arquette answered which sense diminishes with age with "my sense of decency"
Charley Weaver
– September 23, 1974) was an American actor and comedian, famous for his TV role as “Charley Weaver.
2
The "Letters from Mamma" The usual pattern of the Letters was:   A strange-name greeting from "Mamma," with Weaver explaining that it related to what "Mamma always wanted me to be."
Several townspeople would regularly be featured, such as:  Elsie Krack, the ugliest and strongest girl in town;  Grandpa Ogg, whose stubbornness usually got him into messes with "Father;"  Grandma Ogg, who (due to a metal plate in her head) could receive television signals onto her glasses so that folks could come and watch shows;  Clara Kimball Moots, the town's high-society leader; and,  Ludlow Bean, Leonard Box, and Wallace Swine, assorted male townspeople who coped with strange everyday occurrences.
LET US PREY: The only 2 creatures that prey on adults of this tallest African animal are lions & man
Giraffe
Geoffrey the Giraffe 125px|thumb|right|The current Geoffrey Giraffe
3
It also operates a portfolio of e-commerce sites including Toysrus.com, Babiesrus.com and FAO.com.
Accessed 12 May 2013.
Amazon eventually reneged on the terms of the contract by allowing third-party retailers to use its marketplace to sell toys, citing Toys "R" Us's failure to carry a sufficiently large range of goods, including the most popular lines.
COPPING OUT ON TV: Sheena Easton played Caitlin, Don Johnson's girlfriend on this '80s cop show
Miami Vice
In November 1987, Easton made her first dramatic acting appearance on the television program Miami Vice.
3
Easton's website states that despite her mother's heavy workload she was always available for her children: "Sheena always speaks very highly of her mum and the wonderful job she did in bringing up her and her siblings, including teaching them all to read at home before they were even enrolled in school."
Sonny and Caitlin ended up married by the end of the episode, the first of five episodes for Easton.
Cordova, Randy. "
EXERCISE WEAR: Dan Empfield competed in this type of event in Kona back in 1981 & created the first wetsuit made for it
triathlon
See also  Ironman World Championship, a triathlon held in the Kona District of Hawaii  Kona Bicycle Company  Kona Brewing Company  Kona International Airport in Kailua-Kona, Hawaii
2
Kona means Leeward in Hawaiian.
In Ancient Hawaii each island had a “Kona” district.
MICHELLE PFEIFFER PFILMS: Michelle plays evil witch Lamia, bent on maintaining her unnatural youth, in this 2007 fantasy film
Stardust
The name is also given to the witch queen in the film adaptation of Gaiman's novel Stardust (a character who goes unnamed in the book).
3
Diodorus Siculus, Library of History xx.
See Nicolas K. Kiessling, "Grendel: A New Aspect" Modern Philology 65.3 (February 1968):191–201.
John Cuthbert Lawson remarks "....the chief characteristics of the Lamiae, apart from their thirst for blood, are their uncleanliness, their gluttony, and their stupidity".Lawson, Modern Greek Folklore and Ancient Greek Religion: A Study in Survivals (Cambridge University Press) 1910:175ff.
THE WRECKING CREW: Wrecking Crew drummer Hal Blaine used tire chains to lay down the crashing sounds on this Simon & Garfunkel No. 1
"Bridge Over Troubled Water"
He was everywhere!"   Grammy Awards A little known Grammy Awards record held by Blaine is that he played on 6 consecutive Record of the Year winners: Herb Alpert & the Tijuana Brass in 1966 for "A Taste of Honey"; Frank Sinatra in 1967 for "Strangers in the Night"; The 5th Dimension in 1968 for "Up, Up and Away"; Simon & Garfunkel in 1969 for "Mrs. Robinson"; The 5th Dimension in 1970 for "Aquarius/Let the Sunshine In"; and Simon & Garfunkel in 1971 for "Bridge over Troubled Water".
3
He is widely regarded as one of the most prolific drummers in rock and roll history, having "certainly played on more hit records than any drummer in the rock era".
A Go GoReview, Drums!
A Go Go, artistdirect.com  1967 Psychedelic Percussion  1968 Have Fun!!!
ANCIENT GREECE: Founder of "Lyceum", his students walked with him as he taught
Aristotle
This original Lyceum is remembered as the location of the peripatetic school of Aristotle.
3
There are other schools that are not affiliated with LPU but have the word "Lyceum" in their names; however, LPU is the original and first bearer of the name and is more closely associated with it.
Turkey The Turkish word for the latest part of pre-university education is lise which is derived from the French word "lycée"  and corresponds to "high school" in English.
The institution of  Εσπερινό Λύκειο (4 years), Esperino Lykeio "Evening Lyceum" was introduced in 1974 to accommodate the secondary education needs of working and adult students.
NCAA TEAM NAME'S THE SAME: University of Wyoming, Oklahoma State University
the Cowboys
Athletics  University of Wyoming athletics teams are named the Cowboys and Cowgirls.
3
The museum's collections include art in many media from around the world, including European and American paintings, prints, sculpture and drawings, 18th and 19th century Japanese Ukiyo-e prints, 15th through 19th century Persian and Indian miniature paintings, 20th century Haitian art, 20th century Japanese netsuke, 20th century and contemporary photography, and Rapa Nui, African, and Native American artifacts.
The two roads are separated by a large park and playing field (Fraternity Mall)
Transit & Parking Services also operates the Night Owl Express, which provides on-call service from 1:000 pm to 6:00 am on weekdays and 24 hours a day on the weekends.
STAMPS CELEBRATE THE 19-AUGHTS: Frank Lloyd Wright's Robie House, on the stamp seen here, exemplifies this style of architecture
Prairie Style
The Trust is following guidelines developed by the Secretary of the Interior's Standards for the Treatment of Historic Properties.http://gowright.org/restoration-project.html  Architecture thumb|Exterior (1911) The Robie House is one of the best known examples of Frank Lloyd Wright's Prairie style of architecture.
3
The Robie House of Frank Lloyd Wright," Connors, Joseph, University of Chicago Press, 1984, p. 46.
As with all Prairie houses, Wright designed the light fixtures for the Robie House.
29, No. 1 (Sept. 1945), p. 64.
MOVIE VILLAINS: Bill McKinney, one of the mountain men who went after Ned Beatty in this 1972 film, has a CD of love songs out
Deliverance
He has had great commercial success in roles such as the executive Bobby Trippe in  Deliverance (1972), Tennessee lawyer Delbert Reese in Nashville (1975) attorney general Dardis in All the President's Men (1976), Bob Sweet in Silver Streak (1976), the priest Edwards in Exorcist II: The Heretic (1977), Lex Luthor's bumbling henchman Otis in Superman (1978) and Superman II (1980), Bates' right-hand man Sydney Morehouse in The Toy (1982), Borisov and Pavel Petrovic in The Fourth Protocol (1987), TV presenter Ernest Weller in Repossessed (1990), Rudy Ruettiger's father in Rudy (1993), attorney McNair in Just Cause (1995), Dexter Wilkins in Life (1999), the simple sheriff in Where the Red Fern Grows (2003), the corrupt Senator Charles F. Meachum in Shooter (2007), United States Congressman Doc Long in Charlie Wilson's War (2007) and the voice of Lots-O'-Huggin' Bear in Toy Story 3 (2010) and Tortoise John in Rango (2011).
3
These nominations stemmed from his performances in films and television series such as Network (1976), Friendly Fire (1979), Last Train Home (1990), Hear My Song (1991), the adaptation film Cat on a Hot Tin Roof (2004), and Toy Story 3 (2010).
In 1956, he made his stage debut at age 19, appearing in Wilderness Road, an outdoor-historical pageant located in Berea, Kentucky.
Stanley "The Big Man" Bolander | |- | 2002 | This Beautiful Life | Bum | |- | 2002 | Thunderpants | Gen. Ed Sheppard | |- | 2003 |
'60s SITCOMS: In 1968 "The Lucy Show" evolved into a new show titled this
Here's Lucy
Thus, in the fall of 1968, an entirely new series, Here's Lucy, debuted.
3
" It was a strategy that Ball herself would use in the future to take control of The Lucy Shows renewal from CBS. With Arnaz's encouragement and persuasion, Ball agreed to do the show, provided it be shown on Monday nights (the night on which I Love Lucy had aired) and that she would be reunited with Vivian Vance and her writers from I Love Lucy.
However, Ball refused to listen and so the error stayed in and that was the last reference to Lucy Carmichael's son.
Many lesser-known actors also guest starred, such as Patrick McVey.
JEOPARDY! PLACE: Trent happens on the hurt Drake & offers to donate his blood, this type, the universal recipient, the same as Drake's!
AB
Drake (capitalised) may refer to:   People   Drake (surname)  Drake (given name)  Drake (rapper), Canadian recording artist   Places   United States   Drake, Arizona, an unincorporated community  Drake, Colorado, an unincorporated community  Drake, Illinois, an unincorporated community  Drake, Kentucky, an unincorporated community  Drake, North Dakota, a town  Drake, South Carolina, an unincorporated community  Drake Park, Bend, Oregon   Elsewhere   Drake County, New South Wales, Australia  Drake, New South Wales, a parish and rural community  Drake, Saskatchewan, Canada, a village  Drake (ward), a ward in the city of Plymouth, United Kingdom  Drake Passage, between Cape Horn and Antarctica  Drake Head, Oates Land, Antarctica, a headland  Drake Icefall, Ellsworth Land, Antarctica   Ships   , several ships in the British Royal Navy  Drake-class cruiser, a Royal Navy class of armoured cruisers in service up to 1920  Drake (ship), various ships   Schools and school/educational facilities   Drake University, Des Moines, Iowa, United States  Drake Stadium, a sports facility on the campus  Drake Relays, an annual track and field meet held at the above stadium  Drake Fieldhouse, an athletic facility  Drake Stadium (UCLA), University of California, Los Angeles  Drake Field (stadium), Auburn University  Drake Performance and Event Center, Ohio State University  J. F. Drake Middle School, Auburn, Alabama  O. B. Drake Middle School, Arvada, Colorado  Drake Planetarium and Science Center, Cincinnati, Ohio   Fictional characters   Drake (Dragonheart), the main character in the film Dragonheart: A New Beginning  Drake (Stonekeep), the main character in the video game Stonekeep  Drake (One Piece), a character in the anime series
2
A drake is a male duck.
By different roots drake is also another word for dragon.
PAINTED LADIES: This painting by Andrew Wyeth depicts his neighbor crawling through the grass toward her farmhouse
Christina's World
One of the best-known images in 20th-century American art is his painting Christina's World, currently in the collection of the Museum of Modern Art in New York City.
3
Work In 1937, at age twenty, Wyeth had his first one-man exhibition of watercolors at the Macbeth Gallery in New York City.
Admirers of Wyeth's art believe that his paintings, in addition to their pictorial formal beauty, contain strong emotional currents, symbolic content, and underlying abstraction.
The director Philip Ridley stated that his film The Reflecting Skin (1990) was inspired in its visual style by the paintings of Wyeth.
SAMUEL: Canadian business executive Samuel Bronfman was the founder & chief operating officer of this distilling company
Seagram's
He and his parents were Jewish refugees of Czarist Russia's anti-Semitic pogroms,Samuel Bronfman: The Life and Times of Seagram's Mr. Sam (Hardcover, 1992); Author: Michael R. Marrus who migrated to Wapella, Saskatchewan.
2
July 10, 1971) was a Canadian businessman and philanthropist.
Business career  Bronfman's Distillers Corporation acquired Joseph E. Seagram & Sons of Waterloo, Ontario, from the heirs of Joseph Seagram in 1928.
STORYTELLERS: ABC radio commentator who tells "The Rest of the Story"
Paul Harvey
The Rest of the Story was a Monday-through-Friday radio program originally hosted by Paul Harvey.
2
After the elder Harvey's death on February 28, 2009, ABC radio host Doug Limerick was chosen as the show's new host.
References   Category:2000s radio series endings Category:American news radio programs
ACTING THE PART: Playing Michael Corleone, this actor said, "I know it was you, Fredo.  You broke my heart.  You broke my heart!"
Al Pacino
Michael Corleone is the main character in the Godfather film trilogy that was directed by Francis Ford Coppola, in which he was portrayed by Al Pacino, who was twice nominated for an Academy Award for his portrayal (Best Supporting Actor for The Godfather, and Best Actor for The Godfather Part II).
3
Within two years, they have two children, Anthony and Mary.
Michael returns to Sicily for Anthony's operatic debut at the Teatro Massimo.
In Godfather Returns, set roughly during the time of Godfather Part II, Michael battles with a new rival, Nick Geraci, while attempting to legitimize the family.http://www.barnesandnoble.com/w/godfather-returns-mark-winegardner/1100393913?ean=9780345478986 Accessed on June 27, 2014 In Godfather's Revenge, set a few years after the second film, he moves to protect his criminal empire against Geraci and the machinations of a powerful political dynasty, while dealing with his guilt over having Fredo murdered.
BRIDGES: A 400-year-old landmark bridge in this nation's city of Mostar was destroyed by Croat forces in 1993
Bosnia-Herzegovina
In December, Croatian President Franjo Tuđman, in a conversation with Bosnian Croat leaders, said that "from the perspective of sovereignty, Bosnia-Herzegovina has no prospects" and recommended that Croatian policy "support for the sovereignty [of Bosnia and Herzegovina] until such time as it no longer suits Croatia." On 9 May 1992, Boban, Josip Manolić, Tuđman's aide, and Radovan Karadžić, president of the self-proclaimed Republika Srpska, secretly met in Graz and formed an agreement on the division of Bosnia and Herzegovina, the Graz agreement.
3
The official inauguration of the Stari grad Agency coincided with the opening ceremony of the Bridge.
Mostar experiences a relatively dry season from June to September.
18 deputies are elected by the election units: 3 deputies from each district and 15 deputies are elected at the level of entire city.
HISTORICAL OPERAS: At the end of Donizetti's opera "Anna Bolena", this woman is Henry VIII's new queen
Jane Seymour
The duet "Sul suo capo aggravi un Dio" between Anna (soprano) and Jane Seymour (mezzo soprano), who later became Henry VIII's third wife, is considered one of the finest in the entire operatic repertoire.
3
Anna says to herself that her fate is sealed.
She says that she does not want to be the cause of Anna's death.
Loewenberg, Alfred (1970).
TV TIME: From the planet Melmac, this title TV character liked to eat cats
ALF
The fictional planet and homeworld to the alien life form in the eponymously titled sitcom ALF (TV series)  A Staten Island, NY based ska band from the late 1990s.
2
Melmac is:   A brand name of dinnerware molded from melamine resin, made by American Cyanamid, most popular in the 1940s through the 1960s.
SKV Melmac, a university korfball club from Tilburg, Netherlands, re-established in 2005  An acronym for the Maine Educational Loan Marketing Corporation
NATIONAL PARKS OF THE WORLD: You can see this North American country's highest volcano, Volcan Citlaltepetl, in Pico de Orizaba National Park
Mexico
The Pico de Orizaba or Citlaltépetl (from Nahuatl citlal(in) = star, and tepētl = mountain), is a stratovolcano, the highest mountain in Mexico and the third highest in North America, after Denali (formerly known as Mount McKinley) of the United States and Mount Logan of Canada.
3
A third name, Poyauhtecatl, which means "the one that colors or illuminates", has also been recorded.
Another  still farther south, Glaciar Occidental breaks away from Gran Glaciar Norte west of the summit crater at about  as a steep,  long glacier having a gradient of 270 m km− 1 (51.1 ft/mi) that ends at .
The volcano's crater is elliptical with a transverse diameter measuring  and a conjugate diameter measuring .
THE WIDE WORLD OF SPORTS: That's the ballgame for this city's Synergy Field, formerly Riverfront Stadium, in December of 2002
Cincinnati
The Cincinnati Bengals' Paul Brown Stadium is in the distance.
3
First on July 14, 1970 with President Richard Nixon in attendance (51,838 total attendance), and again on July 12, 1988 (55,837 attendance).
Consequently, in its last years, the stadium achieved an openness and a degree of aesthetic appeal that it had lacked for most of its existence.
Religious gatherings
AMERICAN LITERATURE: Philip Nolan, who died on board the U.S. Corvette Levant, was called this by Edward Everett Hale
"The Man Without a Country"
His best known work was "The Man Without a Country", published in the Atlantic in 1863 and intended to strengthen support for the Union cause in the North.
3
According to historian Sara Day, their relationship became loving and intimate.
He maintained a summer home in South Kingstown, Rhode Island where he and his family often spent summer months.
He used his writings and the two magazines he founded, Old and New (1870–75) and Lend a Hand (1886–97), to advance a number of social reforms, including religious tolerance, the abolition of slavery and wider education.
SHAKESPEARE-POURRI: "Men are April when they woo, December when they wed", explains Rosalind in this comedy
As You Like It
Rosalind or Rosalinde may refer to:  People Rosalind Ashford (born 1943), American singer, member of Martha and the Vandellas Rosalind Brett, writer of romance novels Rosalind Cash (1938–1995), American singer and actress Rosalind Chao (born 1957), American actress born in Anaheim, California Rosalind Franklin (1920–1958), British physical chemist and crystallographer who made very important contributions to the understanding of the fine structures of coal and graphite, DNA and viruses Rosalind Hursthouse (born 1943), philosopher whose theories are centred to the abortion debate Rosalind Hamilton, Duchess of Abercorn (1869–1958), British aristocrat Rosalind Newman (born 1946), American choreographer Rosalind Peychaud (born 1948), New Orleans civic activist Rosalind Russell (1907–1976), American actress Rosalind Heywood (1895–1980), British psychical researcher Rosalind Rowe (1933–2015), English table tennis player  Horses Rosalind (harness horse), foaled 1933, 1936 Hambletonian winner Rosalind (Thoroughbred), foaled 2011, Kentucky Oaks contender and top three finisher among Breeders' Cup Juvenile Fillies  Astronomy 900 Rosalinde, asteroid Rosalind (moon), moon of Uranus   Places  Rosalind Bank  Other Rosalind (As You Like It), fictional character in William Shakespeare's play As You
1
Like It Rosalind, a Longobard queen and protagonist of a tragic love story Rosalind, Alberta, rural Canadian town Rosalind (play), a play by J. M. Barrie Rosalind (education platform), platform and web project for learning bioinformatics through problem solving  See also Rosalinda (disambiguation)
TRUSTY SIDEKICKS: Sancho Panza, a rustic squire
Don Quixote
{{Infobox character | colour      = #DEDEE2 | colour text =  | name        = Sancho Panza | series      = Don Quixote | image       = 175px | caption     = Statue of Sancho Panza in Madrid
2
Quixote's simplistic and romantic understanding of government may have been the author using the allegorical ínsula to satirize the lack of practical learning on the part of philosopher-doctors' placed in positions of power.
In The Stranglers song "No More Heroes" as well as a song entitled "Sancho Panza" by the Swedish twee pop group Hello Saferide.
MR. OR MS. WILLIAMS: The aquatic Mrs. Fernando Lamas
Esther Williams
Throughout the 1950s, Lamas had leading roles in a number of MGM musicals, including Dangerous When Wet with his future wife Esther Williams.
3
Fernando and Lydia also had a daughter, Alexandra.
The Poor People's Christmas (1947)
Radio appearances  Year  Program  Episode/source 1952 Lux Radio Theatre  Strictly Dishonorable   References  External links       Fernando Lamas at Virtual History  Category:American male film actors Category:American male television actors Category:American television directors Category:1915 births Category:1982 deaths Category:Argentine emigrants to the United States Category:Burials at Angelus-Rosedale Cemetery, Los Angeles Category:Cancer deaths in California Category:Deaths from pancreatic cancer Category:Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer contract players Category:People from Buenos Aires Category:20th-century American male actors
SPORTS: Ben Crenshaw & Phil Mickelson are the only 3-time winners of this college sport's championship tournament
golf
Philip Alfred Mickelson (born June 16, 1970) is an American professional golfer.
2
It was Mickelson's 35th win on tour; he surpassed Vijay Singh for second place on the current PGA Tour wins list.
On November 8, 2009, Mickelson won the WGC-HSBC Champions by one shot over Ernie Els in Shanghai.
AQUATIC-SOUNDING CINEMA: Look at Kate Bosworth, she's Sandra Dee, Bobby Darin's wife, in this crooning biopic
Beyond the Sea
Dee's life with Bobby Darin was dramatized in the 2004 film Beyond the Sea, in which Kevin Spacey played Darin and Dee was played by Kate Bosworth.
2
In a 1959 interview, Dee recalled that she "grew up fast", surrounded mostly by older people, and was "never held back in anything [she] wanted to do"."Sandra Dee, Teen-age Beauty" by Lydia Lane, The Palm Beach Post.
The Carpathian Connection          Profile of Sandra Dee; accessed March 24, 2014.
ROCKY: Argentite, made up partly of this metal, is found in veins of it
silver
thumb|Argentite sample thumb|The unit cell of argentite  In mineralogy, argentite (from the Latin argentum, silver) is cubic silver sulfide (Ag2S), which can only exist at temperatures above 173 °C,Mineralienatlas Lexikon - Argentit (in German) 177 °CArgentite mineral information and data on mindat.org or 179 °C.Argentite on Webmineral
1
The mineral was mentioned in 1529 by G. Agricola, but the name argentite was not used till 1845 and is due to W. Haidinger.
SPORTS STADIUMS: While Huskie Stadium(-skie) belongs to Northern Illinois University, Husky Stadium (-sky) is this school's home field
Washington
Husky Stadium is an outdoor football stadium on the campus of the University of Washington in Seattle, Washington, United States.
3
His initial concept for the wave was for it to travel vertically, from the bottom of the stands to the top, within the UW student section.
They can also enjoy refreshments and a raffle for prizes.
Previous plans have called for open concourses allowing spectators to still view the action on the field while browsing the concession stands.
PLEASE, SIR, I WANT SAMOA: The international airport code for this city of American Samoa is PPG
Pago Pago
Power play goal in ice hockey  Purpurogallin, the aglycon of several glycosides from nutgalls  Push Proxy Gateway, a component of a WAP server in telecommunications  Powered Paragliding, a form of ultralight aviation  IATA airport code for Pago Pago International Airport  Pterygopalatine ganglion, one of the four Parasympathetic ganglia of the head and neck  Pulse pattern generator, a piece of electronic test equipment or software used to generate digital electronics stimuli  Aircraft and aviation  Powered Para Glider, consists of a frame that combines the motor, propeller, harness (with integrated seat) and cage, and fly with a wing.
2
PPG may stand for:   PPG Industries, a U.S. manufacturer, and its PPG Place office complex  PPG tankette, a Soviet armoured vehicle  Pacific Proving Grounds, a former US-operated nuclear test site  Palm Products GmbH, an audio synthesizer company  Penile plethysmograph a device to measure male arousal  Photoplethysmograph, an optically obtained volumetric measurement of an organ  Pittsburgh Post-Gazette, a major newspaper in the Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania region.
It is common in the oil industry, especially as a unit for Mud weight.
ELECTIONS: This year was "The Year of the Woman" with 11 major party Senate candidates who were women
1992
In 1992 these versions ceased production and three models were introduced: The basic Brío (1.3 L), the mid-range Súper (1.3 L) and the Máximo (1.6 L).
3
The 11 was also distinguishable from the 9 by its front end, which featured square twin headlights, which had been introduced on the North American Alliance.
Competition
1,397 cc;  TXE – 1.7 L –
THE OLD TESTAMENT: This man was given the armor, helmet & sword of the first king of Israel, but refused to use them
David
First or 1st may also refer to:  First (Grindelwald), minor summit below the Schwarzhorn in the Bernese Alps in Switzerland  First (Kandersteg), mountain in Bernese Alps in Switzerland  First (magazine), a Singaporean movie magazine   First grade, in primary education  For Inspiration and Recognition of Science and Technology (FIRST), a world-wide youth robotics competition  First, a British undergraduate degree classification  FirstGroup, a large British transportation company operating buses, trains, coaches and trams  FIRST, Far Infrared and Sub-millimetre Telescope, a previous name for Herschel Space Observatory  First Racing, a former racing team  First (communications), principles of communications  FIRST (computer security), Forum of Incident Response and Security Teams   Music   1st, album by Streets  1st, EP by The Rasmus, frequently identified as a single  First, album by Baroness  First, album by David Gates  First, album by O'Bryan  First, album by Raymond Lam  "First", song, by Lindsay Lohan  First, album by Denise Ho  "First", a song by Cold War Kids  "First", a song by Lauren Daigle  See also  FST (disambiguation)      Book:FIRST  :Category:Lists of firsts  1 (disambiguation)  One (disambiguation)  The First (disambiguation)
1
First or 1st is the ordinal form of the number one (#1).
COFFEE: When buying beans from this country, be careful not to mistake "High Mountain" for "Blue Mountain"
Jamaica
Blue Mountain  may refer to:  Mountains   Canada  Blue Mountain (British Columbia), in the city of Coquitlam Blue Mountain (Ontario), Canada, in the Niagara Escarpment Blue Mountain, Kings County, Nova Scotia   Blue Mountain, Pictou County, Nova Scotia   India  Phawngpui, Mizoram, India, also known as Blue Mountain; home of Blue Mountain National Park Nilgiri mountains of south India   Jamaica  Blue Mountain Peak, Jamaica, in the Blue Mountains range   United States  Blue Mountain (Arkansas), in the Ouachita Mountains Blue Mountain (California) Blue Mountain (San Bernardino County, California)  Blue Mountain (Montana), in Missoula  Blue Mountain, a prominence of Kittatinny Mountain in New Jersey.
2
Blue Mountain (New York)
Blue Mountain (Pennsylvania)
INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY: This science & math titan moved to 35 St. Martin's Street in London in 1710, 44 years after his "Annus Mirabilis"
Newton
(However, in 1667 the Dutch burned several major warships of the English fleet in the raid on the Medway and Charles II was forced to sue for peace.)  Isaac Newton  In the year 1666, Isaac Newton made revolutionary inventions and discoveries in calculus, motion, optics and gravitation.
3
Prior to this, however, Thomas Dekker used the phrase mirabilis annus in his 1603 pamphlet The Wonderful Year, "Wherein is shewed the picture of London lying sick of the plague."  1492 –
226.
1905
MATTHEWS: This Matthew has been in the movies "Married to the Mob" & "Short Cuts"
Matthew Modine
The film features an ensemble cast including Matthew Modine, Julianne Moore, Fred Ward, Anne Archer, Jennifer Jason Leigh, Robert Downey, Jr., Madeleine Stowe, Chris Penn, Jack Lemmon, Frances McDormand, Lori Singer, Andie MacDowell, Buck Henry, Lily Tomlin, actress and singer Annie Ross, and musicians Huey Lewis, Lyle Lovett and Tom Waits.
3
The Wymans get into a massive argument just before their dinner party with the Kanes.
Both couples alleviate their stress by drinking heavily, and the party lasts all night long.
The site's critical consensus reads, "Robert Altman's ensemble drama deftly integrates its disparate characters and episodes into a funny, poignant, emotionally satisfying whole."
NICE BUNNIES: One critic says that "Bambi" should be called this, after the little bunny that steals the show
Thumper
The main characters are Bambi, a white-tailed deer, his parents (the Great Prince of the forest and his unnamed mother), his friends Thumper (a pink-nosed rabbit), and Flower (a skunk), and his childhood friend and future mate, Faline.
3
As Mel Shaw claimed   Originally the film was intended to have six individual bunny characters, similar to the dwarfs in Snow White.
The squirrel and chipmunk make only brief appearances in the final film.
References  Further reading    External links           Category:Bambi films Category:1942 animated films Category:1940s American animated films Category:1940s fantasy films Category:American animated films Category:American children's fantasy films Category:American coming-of-age films Category:American films Category:Disney animated features canon Category:English-language films Category:Films about animals Category:Films based on children's books Category:Films featuring anthropomorphic characters Category:Films featuring hunters Category:Films set in North America Category:United States National Film Registry films Category:Animated fantasy films Category:Walt Disney Pictures films Category:Films directed by David Hand Category:Films directed by Bill Roberts Category:Films produced by Walt Disney Category:RKO Pictures films Category:Film scores by Frank Churchill
FRUIT: The name of this Pacific island fruit of the genus Artocarpus implies that it's starchy
breadfruit
Most species of Artocarpus are restricted to Southeast Asia; a few cultivated species are more widely distributed, especially A. altilis (breadfruit) and A. heterophyllus (jackfruit), which are cultivated throughout the tropics.
3
Taxonomy The name Artocarpus is derived from the Greek words artos ("bread") and karpos ("fruit").
Anjily, A. hirsutus, is grown for fruit and timber in the Western Ghats.
Subgenera Recent phylogenetic research, based on leaf arrangement, leaf anatomical characters and stipules, indicates that there are at least two subgenera in Artocarpus: Subgenus
SEATTLE: The main Seattle airport is known as Sea-Tac Airport, for this city to the south
Tacoma
21 Seattle 600,000Eisenberg 2009, pg. 129 King County Medic One Public Health - Seattle & King County 8 71 Tom Rea, MD Auburn, Black Diamond, Burien, Covington, Des Moines, Enumclaw, Federal Way, Kent, Maple Valley, Pacific, Renton, Seatac, Seattle-Tacoma International Airport, Skyway, Tukwila, White CenterKing County Paramedics Association, IAFF Local 2595, The Stations of IAFF 2595 700,000EMS Division 2009, pg.
3
Cardiac Arrest: The Science and Practice of Resuscitation Medicine, pg.
There are six paramedic programs in the Medic One system.
55 2006 2007 2008 All 17% (190/1124) 18% (174/993) 18% (191/1035) 19% (199/1046) Ventricular Fibrillation/Tachycardia (VF/VT) 30% (132/436) 40% (125/310) 40% (120/302) 47% (151/323) Before EMS Arrival 16% (164/1015) 17% (145/875) 16% (143/899) 17% (160/920) VF/VT 29% (113/386) 36% (100/279) 36% (97/267) 39% (112/286) Bystander Witnessed VF/VT Due to Heart Disease  45% (86/193) 41% (80/196) 45% (84/188) 49% (102/208) Asystole 1% (6/473) 1% (5/335) 2% (6/346) 2% (8/354)
LEFTOVERS: This chairman of Occidental Petroleum said he will raise $250 million a year in a "Stop Cancer" drive
Armand Hammer
In 1956 Occidental Petroleum came to the attention of Armand Hammer.http://www.fundinguniverse.com/company-histories/occidental-petroleum-corporation-history/
3
It added to its chemical industries portfolio in 1988 with the outright purchase for $2 billion of Cain Chemical.
Construction began in mid-2014 and is expected to be completed in 2017.
The plaintiffs claimed that the company violated the industry standards and the environmental regulations by dumping a total of  of toxic oil by-products in watersheds used by the Achuar people to fish, drink, and bathe.
GUERRILLAS IN THE MIST: In January 1997 this Chechen capital was renamed in honor of rebel leader Dzhokhar Dudayev
Grozny
Postimees, 8 May 1996: "Nimeline tänav ja orden Dzhohhar Dudajevile"  Chechen politics In May 1990, Dudayev returned to Grozny, the Chechen capital, to devote himself to local politics.
3
He married Alla, a Russian poet and the daughter of a Soviet officer with whom he had three children (a daughter and two sons).
Dudayev's inexperienced and poorly-guided economic policies soon began to undermine Chechnya's economy and, Russian observers claimed, allegedly transformed the region into a criminal paradise.
He retaliated by dissolving parliament and other organs of power.
MOVIE STARS: Actor seen here acting really dumb in "Dumb And Dumber":
Jeff Daniels
Dumb and Dumber (alternatively known as Dumb & Dumber) is a 1994 American road buddy comedy film starring Jim Carrey and Jeff Daniels.
3
The cartoon also features a new character, Kitty, a female pet purple beaver who appears to be smarter than both men.
The animated series was written by Bennett Yellin, co-writer of the film.
The film featured a cast and crew different from the previous film, and the Farrelly brothers had no involvement in the film's production.
SOUTH AMERICAN LITERATURE: The first novel by "Kiss of the Spider Woman" author Manuel Puig was "Betrayed By" this screen siren
Rita Hayworth
Among his best-known novels are La traición de Rita Hayworth (1968) (Betrayed by Rita Hayworth), Boquitas pintadas (1969) (Heartbreak Tango), and El beso de la mujer araña (1976) (Kiss of the Spider Woman), which was adapted as the film Kiss of the Spider Woman (1985), directed by the Argentine-Brazilian director Héctor Babenco; and as the Broadway musical Kiss of the Spider Woman (1993).
3
His career as a screenwriter never took off, however.
He also made much use of popular culture (for example, soap opera) in his works.
The writer's role is played by the actor Fabio Aste.
EUROPEAN LAKES & RIVERS: Lake Albano in the west-central part of this country is the site of Castel Gandolfo, the Pope's summer residence
Italy
Castel Gandolfo (; ; colloquially Castello in the Castelli Romani dialects) is a town located  southeast of Rome in the Lazio region of Italy.
3
As part of its extensive formal gardens is located the existing remains of the complex built by the Roman Emperor Domitian.
Corot (1826).
At this stage the races were held in this discipline, and even today the Italian Federation of Canoe / Kayak considers this one of its most important training sites.
IN THE NEWS: Leftist guerrillas are in their 10th yr. of trying to overthrow this country's gov't now led by Alfredo Cristiani
El Salvador
Alfredo Félix Cristiani Burkard, popularly known as Alfredo Cristiani (born 22 November 1947) was President of El Salvador from 1989 to 1994.
2
During the course of this judicial process, recognized Salvadoran personalities travelled to Spain to intercede for president Cristiani, and remove him from the list of the accused.
Ellacuría was one of the slain scholars during this massacre, in which president Cristiani was implicated.
INITIAL TV: Mark Harmon investigates all crimes involving U.S. Navy & Marine Corps personnel on this drama
NCIS
Since 2003, Harmon has starred as former U.S. Marine Corps Gunnery Sergeant and Sniper turned NCIS Special Agent Leroy Jethro Gibbs in the hit CBS series, NCIS, a role that has become Harmon's best-known role to date while also giving him international recognition.
2
Thanks to his sister Kristen's in-laws, Ozzie Nelson and Harriet Nelson, he landed his first job as an actor in an episode of Ozzie's Girls.
Let's Get Harry Harry Burck, Jr.
COLLEGE TOWNS: Creighton University
Omaha
Creighton University is a private, coeducational, Jesuit, Roman Catholic university located in Omaha, Nebraska, United States.
3
Creighton is the largest private religious university in Nebraska.
Creighton's total enrollment is 7,385, of which 4,133 are undergraduates.
Creightonian.com.
MAD MAGAZINE: Mad is under the corporate control of this comic book company that isn't based in Washington
DC
The college radio station, WNJR broadcasts on the FM broadcast band.
3
Coleman 1956 p. 59
Academics As a liberal arts college, Washington & Jefferson College focuses exclusively on undergraduate education.
Further, students may only bring pets that they have owned for over one year and be over the age of one and one half, to avoid the problem of impulse purchases and abandonment of pets.
CONAN O'BRIEN: Seen here, he produced Conan's talk show after Conan wrote for him on "Saturday Night Live"
Lorne Michaels
Saturday Night Live (abbreviated as SNL) is an American late-night live television sketch comedy and variety show created by Lorne Michaels and developed by Dick Ebersol.
3
Although executives suggested that SNL be left to die, network chief Brandon Tartikoff wanted to keep the show going, believing that the concept was more important to the network than money.
Murray, goaded by the rest of the cast, and Chase came to blows shortly before the show.
Some did moderately well, though others did not—notably, It's Pat, which did so badly at the box office that the studio that made the film, Touchstone Pictures (owned by The Walt Disney Company, which also owns NBC's rival ABC), pulled it only one week after releasing it,Live, From New York, It's the Worst Movies From the Cast of SNL from filmcritic.com and Stuart Saves His Family, which lost $14 million.
ENTERTAINMENT AWARDS: She won a Golden Globe award for her performance in "The Fabulous Baker Boys"
Michelle Pfeiffer
In desperation, they take on a female singer, Michelle Pfeiffer, who revitalizes their careers, causing the brothers to re-examine their relationship with each other and with their music.
3
Like It Hot, and I didn't want her to stop."
The film also won the BAFTA Award for Best Sound.
William Steinkamp was nominated for the Academy Award for Best Film Editing.
MIDDLE NAMES: The most famous George we know whose middle name was Armstrong
Custer
cyclist  Samaire Armstrong – actress  Tommy Armstrong Jr. - Nebraska Cornhuskers quarterback  William Armstrong, 1st Baron Armstrong - engineer Sue Ellen Armstrong a character from the fictional show Arthur  Real people with first name Armstrong  Armstrong Williams, American political commentator Armstrong j Tavarez, politician from Dominican Republic  Fictional people with first name Armstrong  Armstrong, a character in the Valiant Comics comic book Archer & Armstrong   Companies   Armstrong-CCM Motorcycles, British motorcycling company  Armstrong Audio, a British audio/hi-fi manufacturer  Armstrong Group of Companies, a conglomerate begun in Armstrong County, Pennsylvania  Armstrong Telephone Company, a telecommunications provider serving as a local exchange carrier in rural market  Armstrong Tools, an industrial hand tool manufacturer  Armstrong Whitworth, the British engineering conglomerate which became Vickers-Armstrong  Armstrong Whitworth Aircraft, a separate entity  Armstrong World Industries, a manufacturer of flooring and ceilings  Armstrong Engineering Associates, Inc, a technology company specializing in process heat transfer  Armstrong investment managers  Other possible meanings   Armstrong (automobile), an early English car  Armstrong Atlantic State University, a public university in Savannah, Georgia  Armstrong (content management system), an open source news publishing platform  Armstrong (crater), a lunar crater  Armstrong Gun, a rifled breech-loading artillery piece  Armstrong Whitworth Whitley, World War II bomber  Armstrong (DuckTales episode), an episode of DuckTales  Armstrong's axioms, a set of axioms used to infer all the functional dependencies on a relational database  The Armstrongs, a British television series  See also  Ångström (disambiguation)  George Armstrong Custer  Category:Place name disambiguation pages
1
Armstrong may refer to:   Places   Armstrong Creek (disambiguation), various places Antarctica  Armstrong Reef, Biscoe Islands Argentina  Armstrong, Santa Fe Australia  Armstrong, Victoria Canada  Armstrong, British Columbia  Armstrong, Ontario  Armstrong, Thunder Bay District, Ontario United States  Armstrong, California, former name of Termo, California  Armstrong, Florida  Armstrong, Illinois  Armstrong, Iowa  Armstrong, Minnesota  Armstrong, Missouri  Armstrong, Oklahoma  Armstrong, Texas  Armstrong, Wisconsin  Armstrong County, Pennsylvania  Armstrong County, Texas  Armstrong Lake, a lake in Minnesota  Armstrong Township, Vanderburgh County, Indiana  Armstrong Township, Pennsylvania (disambiguation), more than one, including  Armstrong Township, Indiana County, Pennsylvania  Armstrong Township, Lycoming County, Pennsylvania  Louis Armstrong New Orleans International Airport  Armstrong Tunnel, in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania   People   Clans  Clan Armstrong, a Scottish clan from the border area between England and Scotland  Armstrong as surname For people with the surname Armstrong see Armstrong (surname)  Arguably the most famous are:  Billie Joe Armstrong – rock musician  Duncan Armstrong – swimmer  Edwin Armstrong - electrical engineer  Franny Armstrong - movie director  Louis Armstrong – jazz musician  Neil Armstrong – astronaut  Lance Armstrong –
SHOWBIZ FAMILIES: Edwin, Junius,John Wilkes
Booth
Edwin (musician), Canadian musician  Edwin Eugene Aldrin, better known as Buzz Aldrin, American astronaut  Edwin Howard Armstrong American inventor  Edwin Booth, Shakespearean actor  Edwin Cassiani, Colombian boxer  Edwin Centeno, Peruvian race walker Edwin L. Cox, American oilman and philanthropist from Dallas, Texas.
3
It comes from the Old English elements "ead" (rich, blessed) and "wine" (friend).Behind the Name The original Anglo-Saxon form is Eadwine, which is also found for Anglo-Saxon figures.
Starr is most famous for his Norman Whitfield produced singles of the 1970s, most notably the number one hit 'War'.
Edwin Haslam (born 1932), a physical organic chemist and an author of books on polyphenols  Edwin N. Hubbell, American politician  Edwin Hubble, American astronomer for whom the Hubble Telescope is named  Isiah Edwin Leopold, known as Ed Wynn, 20th-century American comic  Edwin McCain, Musician  Edwin Meese, American Attorney General  Edwin Mosquera, Colombian weightlifter   Edwin Orozco, Colombian road cyclist  Edwin van der Sar, Dutch football (soccer) goalkeeper  Edwin Vurens, Dutch football (soccer) player  Edwin Wijeyeratne, Sri Lankan cabinet minister  Edwin Moses, Athlete  Fictional people  Edwin, a doctor who turns out to be a psychopathic killer in the 2010 film Predators  Edwin the Old, mythical Swedish king  Edwin Jarvis, fictional Marvel Comics supporting character  Edwin Odesseiron, fictional wizard in the game Baldur's Gate  Edwin Poole; senior partner, Crane, Poole and Schmitt in the TV series Boston Legal.
AN "ARM" OR A "LEG": 4-word term for Gen. McClellan's Union forces that guarded D.C. against invasion across a certain river
Army of the Potomac
Notable people with the surname include:  Barr McClellan, Texas lawyer and author, father of Mark and Scott McClellan Brian McClellan, American writer of fantasy C. M. S. McLellan (1865–1916), American playwright and composer, also wrote as Hugh Morton Edwin North McClellan (1881–1971), United States Marine Corps officer, author, and historian George McClellan (physician) (1796–1847), surgeon and founder of Jefferson Medical College in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania George McClellan (New York) (1856–1927), U.S. Representative from New York George McClellan (RCMP commissioner) (1908–1982), Commissioner of the Royal Canadian Mounted Police George B. McClellan (1826–1885), American Civil War general and creator of the Army of the Potomac George Brinton McClellan, Jr. (1865–1940), Mayor of New York City and U.S. Representative from New York James H. McClellan, mathematician and electronic engineer, professor at Georgia Institute of Technology John McClellan (chemist), 19th-century English chemist and industrialist John Little McClellan (1896–1977), U.S. Senator from Arkansas Mark McClellan, Medicare and FDA official Peter McClellan, Australian jurist Robert McClellan (1806–1860), U.S. Representative from New York Robert McClellan (New York treasurer), treasurer of New York state Robert H. McClellan (1823–1902), Illinois state senator Samuel McClellan (1730–1807), Brigadier General in the American Revolutionary War Scott McClellan, former White House press secretary Stephen T. McClellan, Wall Street analyst, author  Fictional characters: Clarisse McClellan, a character in Fahrenheit 451 by Ray Bradbury  See also McClellan Air Force Base
2
McClellan is a surname.
McClellan's General Store, listed on the National Register of Historic Places in Henry County, Iowa McClellan Park, California, a census-designated place near Sacramento McClellan–Palomar Airport in Carlsbad, California  McClellan Magnet High School in Little Rock, Arkansas  The McClellan saddle, used in the late 19th century by U.S. Army cavalry USAT McClellan, a US Army Transport ship active during the Spanish-American and First World Wars McLellan Clan MacLellan, Scottish clan
DENNIS, ANYONE?: This actor can do it all; he can sell you insurance as the Allstate spokesman, or run the country as president on "24"
Dennis Haysbert
The corporate spokesperson is Dennis Haysbert.
3
In 1991, the company went public before becoming completely independent in 1995.
In the 1960s and 1970s, TV, print and radio advertising featured Allstate’s spokesman, Ed Reimers.
Top 50 Best Companies for Hispanics to Work - Hispanic Business (2005–2009).
MAGNETS: Used by some trains, "Maglev" is short for this
Magnetic levitation
thumb|SCMaglev test track in the Yamanashi Prefecture, Japan thumb|Transrapid 09 at the Emsland test facility in Germany Maglev (derived from magnetic levitation) is a transport method that uses magnetic levitation to move vehicles without touching the ground.
3
Inductrack System (Permanent Magnet Passive Suspension)
The first man-loading high temperature superconducting maglev test vehicle in the world.
The  line allegedly could reduce travel time between Tehran and Mashhad to about 2.5 hours.
NAME THE WORK: Verne:"Certainly an Englishman, it was more doubtful whether Phileas Fogg was a Londoner"
Around the World in Eighty Days
Phileas Fogg is the protagonist in the 1873 Jules Verne novel Around the World in Eighty Days.
2
In Philip Jose Farmer's The Other Log of Phileas Fogg, he is said to be Eridanean, a member of the (ostensibly) more benevolent of two extraterrestrial factions attempting to control the Earth.
Fogg is a member of Farmer's Wold Newton family.
THE NIFTY 1930s: This ski-nosed comic broke out of Vaudeville & made his Broadway acting debut in the 1933 musical "Roberta"
Bob Hope
It starred Tamara Drasin (billed as Tamara), Bob Hope, George Murphy, Lyda Roberti, Fred MacMurray, Fay Templeton, Ray Middleton (billed as Raymond E. Middleton),  and Sydney Greenstreet.
3
These two  additions became so popular that they are now frequently included in revivals and recordings of Roberta.
A radio adaptation of Roberta was presented on Philip Morris Playhouse on CBS May 14, 1943.
In 2014, New World Records released a complete recording of the score, reconstructed by Larry Moore, with Rob Berman conducting the Orchestra of Ireland and a cast of American, British, and Irish performers, including Jason Graae, Annalene Beechey, Km Criswell, Patrick Cummings, Tally Sessions, Diana Montague, Laura Daniel, Jeanne Lehman, John Molloy, and Eamonn Mulhall.
THIS IS YOUR WIFE!: Eva Longoria
Tony Parker
Eva Jacqueline Longoria"Eva Longoria files for divorce from Tony Parker" November 18, 2010, The Telegraph (born March 15, 1975) is an American actress, producer, director, activist and businesswoman.
3
Longoria received her Bachelor of Science degree in kinesiology at nearby Texas A&M University-Kingsville.
Actress Eva Longoria to be a new face of Bebe Sport EnjoyFashion, January 15, 2007
In terms of food-related promotions, in 2012 and 2013, Longoria paired with Iron Chef Michael Symon for a promotion for Pepsico's Lay's potato chips contest called "Do Us A Flavor".
THE AGE OF AQUARIUMS: Bottom-feeding fish can't get to food in this common form, so don't feed them Wheaties
flakes
It is well known for featuring prominent athletes on the exterior of the package, and has become a cultural icon in the USA.   Primarily a wheat and bran mixture baked into flakes, it was introduced in 1924.
3
Wheaties is a brand of General Mills breakfast cereal.
These were less effective than the overall sponsorship (especially in the case of television), yet also greatly reduced costs for advertising of the product.
Children's consumption of Wheaties did in fact increase, but not enough to offset the decline in adult consumption.
LITERATURE: This Spaniard rides a bony old nag named Rocinante on his quests
Don Quixote
Rocinante () is Don Quixote's horse in the novel Don Quixote by Miguel de Cervantes.
3
One meaning is "before" or "previously".
Rocinante's name, then, signifies his change in status from the "old nag" of before to the "foremost" steed.
As Cervantes describes Don Quijote's choice of name: nombre a su parecer alto, sonoro y significativo de lo que había sido cuando fue rocín, antes de lo que ahora era, que era antes y primero de todos los rocines del mundode Cervantes, Miguel.
ACCENT ON ENGLAND: This North Carolina-born "Hannibal" actress donned an English accent for "An Ideal Husband"
Julianne Moore
It starred Julianne Moore, Minnie Driver, Jeremy Northam, Cate Blanchett and Rupert Everett.
3
The Earl of Caversham, K.G. Lord Goring, his son.
Unable to accept a Sir Robert now unmasked, Lady Chiltern then denounces her husband and refuses to forgive him.
Lady Chiltern initially agrees to support Sir Robert's decision to renounce his career in politics, but Lord Goring dissuades her from allowing her husband to resign.
LITERATURE: Poe's "The Mystery of Marie Roget" was a sequel to this story featuring detective C. Auguste Dupin
"The Murders in the Rue Morgue"
thumb|right|300px|Auguste Dupin in "The Purloined Letter" thumb|right|Facsimile of Poe's original manuscript for "The Murders in the Rue Morgue", the first appearance of C. Auguste Dupin Le Chevalier C. Auguste Dupin  is a fictional detective created by Edgar Allan Poe.
3
According to biographer Joseph Krutch, Dupin is portrayed as a dehumanized thinking machine, a man whose sole interest is in pure logic.
Dupin's method is to identify with the criminal and put himself in his mind.
The Work of Betrayal by Mario Brelich – Dupin investigates the mysterious case of Judas Iscariot.
BESTSELLING AUTHORS: Before playing "Patriot Games", all his military experience was in ROTC at Loyola College in Baltimore
Tom Clancy
Patriot Games (1987) is a novel by Tom Clancy.
3
In a sneak attack posing as telephone repairmen from Bell Atlantic, they try to kill Ryan and his family, and once again target the Royal Family for kidnapping.
Film adaptation
Ford inadvertently struck Bean above the left eyebrow with a boat hook.
WHEN THEY WERE TEENS: Angie Harmon was in history class when she found out that she'd won this teen magazine's cover model contest
Seventeen
Harmon worked as a child model and, in 1987, won a Seventeen modeling contest.
3
The following year, she starred in another ABC pilot, Women's Murder Club.
The show premiered July 12, 2010.
"Star Wattage Dimmer at GOP Convention: Republicans Attracting B-list of Entertainers",  Houston Chronicle, August 31, 2004  She supported John McCain for president in 2008.Dinan, Stephen, and Ralph Z. Hallow.
HALLOWEEN: TRICK OR TREAT: On Oct. 31, 2007 liberal Spaniards got a treat as a law banned public commemorations of this Fascist's rule
Franco
Anti-Franco political dissidents from Spain who moved to Russia during World War II speak a mix of Russian and Spanish, while some speak Catalan and Basque.
3
The Suebi became the first Germanic kingdom to convert officially to Roman Catholicism in 447 AD. under king Rechiar.
Berkeley, California: University of California Press, 1980.
Emerging Complexity: The Later Pre-History of South-East Spain, Iberia, and the West Mediterranean.
LET US WORSHIP: An ignicolist is a worshipper of this vital force
fire
I can guess that Bush feeds certain concepts about Americans: cowboys, arrogrant, trigger-happy, eats big pieces of fire roasted cows, etc.
3
Would you prefer the same mediator for both discussions? -- sannse (talk) 18:48, 18 Apr 2004 (UTC)  I see that he prefers Angela.
That why tehre are such expressions as "seasons greetings" and "happy holidays".
I am beginning to form the impression that you are not only okay with this, but rather pleased by it.
REMOTE PLACES: Kolayat, 100 miles from Jodhpur
India
Jodhpur ( ) is the second largest city in the Indian state of Rajasthan.
2
Jodhpur  Jodhpur has two outdoor stadiums and one indoor stadium complex.
The city is administered by the Jodhpur Nagar Nigam headed by a mayor.
VEGAS ON FILM: (Sofia of the Clue Crew reads from Las Vegas.)  In "Viva Las Vegas", Elvis and his rival, Count Elmo Mancini, tour the strip looking for her
Ann-Margret
Viva Las Vegas is a 1964 American musical film starring Elvis Presley and actress Ann-Margret.
3
However, many others deduced the reasons why many members of the North American public liked the movie so much.
Jorgensen, p. 184.
In January 2010, as part of the 75th anniversary of Elvis' birth, Sony Music finally released an official almost-complete soundtrack album for the first time on CD, which features all twelve songs recorded for the film.
GONE BUT NOT FORGOTTEN, 2001: A former actor, he made millions penning bestsellers like "The Osterman Weekend" & "The Gemini Contenders"
Robert Ludlum
The Gemini Contenders is a 1976 novel by Robert Ludlum.
3
Plot introduction
Savarone schedules the circuitous shipment by train from Salonika, through Yugoslavia and Italy, and finally into the Alps.
His twin sons, Adrian and Andrew, have grown up with privilege, with Adrian attending Princeton and Harvard Law, while Andrew, a West Point graduate, is a Major in the Vietnam War.
WISH I'D SEEN THAT MUSICAL!: TV's Herman Munster, he co-starred with Stephen Collins & Meat Loaf in the 1974 musical "More Than You Deserve"
Fred Gwynne
Herman Munster, 5th Earl of Shroudshire, is a fictional character in the CBS sitcom The Munsters, originally played by Fred Gwynne.
3
Herman married Lily, and eventually the couple and Grandpa (Lily's father) moved to America, where Herman joined the U.S. Army, fighting in World War II.  Family relations  In The Munsters Today, he is given a younger brother named Frank.
Herman has a very distinctive laugh... a loud braying bellow.
Notes
ARTSY FILMS: In the 1998 film version of this Dickens novel, the hero not only pines for Estella, he sketches her
Great Expectations
People Diego de Estella Estella Sneider Estella Warren, Canadian actress Estella, the nom de guerre of Italian labor leader Teresa Noce  Fictional Estella Havisham, a character in Charles Dickens' novel Great Expectations  Places Estella-Lizarra, Navarre, Spain Estella, New South Wales, Australia Estella, Wisconsin, United States Estella Occidental, comarca of Navarre, Spain Estella Oriental, comarca of Navarre, Spain  Other , a United States Navy patrol boat in commission from 1917 to 1919
1
Estella is a feminine given name, a variant of Stella and Estelle.
TV & FILM CELLISTS: On this series, Crystal Bernard plays Helen, an airport lunch counter operator & cellist
Wings
She is known for her seven-year-long role on the comedy Wings.
3
During the 21st century, her work includes a role in the film, Jackpot, and starring roles in Welcome to Paradise, and Grave Misconduct.
The latter includes a gospel track she recorded with her father and one sung with country artist Billy Dean.
Filmography  Film Year  Title  Role  Notes1982Young Doctors in LoveJulie1987Slumber Party Massacre IICourtney Bates1999Gideon Jean MacLemore2001JackpotCheryl2007Welcome to ParadiseDebbie Laramie Television Year  Title  Role  Notes1982Gimme a Break!KellyEpisode: "Hot Muffins"1982–83Happy DaysK.C. Cunningham16 episodes1983Fantasy IslandAlly MillerEpisode: "The Devil Stick/Touch and Go"High School U.S.A.Anne-Marie ConklinMovie1983/85The Love BoatWendy 'Minerva' Pryor / Susie Epshaw2 episodes1984The MasterCarrie BrownEpisode: "State of the Union"1985–89It's a LivingAmy Tompkins93 episodes1989My Two DadsLiz SchaeferEpisode: "The Courtship of Nicole's Fathers"ParadiseLaura Clark Episode: "A Proper Stranger"ChameleonsShellyMovie1990Without Her ConsentMartyMovieWhen Will I Be Loved?Julie
MOVIE TWINS: In this 2003 Farrelly Brothers film, one conjoined twin wants to act
Stuck on You
They have made eleven films, including Dumb and Dumber; Kingpin; Hall Pass; Me, Myself & Irene; Shallow Hal; Stuck on You; Osmosis Jones; There's Something about Mary; Fever Pitch (also known as The Perfect Catch outside America); the 2007 remake of The Heartbreak Kid; The Three Stooges;Pringle, Gill (2011) "A fresh pass from the Farrelly brothers", The Independent, March 4, 2011; retrieved May 8, 2011.
2
Following college they pursued careers as television writers, notably for Seinfeld.
Film credits
ED ASNER: Ed brought this character to life in "Elf", "Olive, the Other Reindeer" & "The Ellen Show"
Santa Claus
Cast  Drew Barrymore as Olive  Jay Mohr as Tim  Joe Pantoliano as Martini  Peter MacNicol as Fido, Olive's pet flea  Dan Castellaneta as The Postman  Billy West as Eskimos  Edward Asner as Santa Claus.
3
Before they can leave the station, Olive is captured by the evil Postman, who tells people that Olive is wanted on several counts of mail fraud, such as "licking self-adhesive stamps and not mailing early for the holidays".
Olive then hears and sees a bus coming and tries to stop it, but fails.
Richard calls the postal service to complain about the Postman, but get's their voicemail.
THE FABRICS OF YOUR LIVES: Sackcloth was originally made of this animal's hair; mohair still is
goat
thumb|Workers in ancient Egypt wearing loincloths, circa 1500-1450 bce Sackcloth (Hebrew שַׂק saḳ) is a term originally denoting a coarsely woven fabric, usually made of goat's hair.
3
One fastens the saḳ around the hips ("sim be-motnayim," Gen. xxxvii. 34; "he'elah 'al motnayim," Amos viii. 10), while, in describing the doffing of the saḳ, the words "pitteaḥ me-'al motnayim" are used (Isa.
Thus Schwally points to the circumstance that the Moslem pilgrim, as soon as he puts his foot on Ḥaram, the holy soil, takes off all the clothes he is wearing, and dons the iḥram.
The text of this article is largely taken from the article Sackcloth in the 1906 Jewish Encyclopedia, now in the public domain in the United States as a work published before 1923.
THEATRE: In 1999 Brian Dennehy played Willy Loman on Broadway in a 50th anniversary production of this play
Death of a Salesman
In 2000, Dennehy was nominated for an Emmy for Outstanding Lead Actor in a Miniseries or TV Movie for a television presentation of his performance as Willy Loman in Arthur Miller's Death of a Salesman which he had performed on Broadway.
3
The family relocated to Long Island, New York, where Dennehy attended Chaminade High School in the town of Mineola.
He went on to star as Harrison in the Australian film The Man from Snowy River II in 1988.
In 2010, he was inducted into the American Theatre Hall of Fame.
IT'S IN THE "BOOK": The 1954 work "Seduction of the Innocent" blamed these publications for corrupting America's youth
Comic books
Seduction of the Innocent is a book by German-American psychiatrist Fredric Wertham, published in 1954, that warned that comic books were a negative form of popular literature and a serious cause of juvenile delinquency.
3
Wertham sympathized with retailers who did not want to sell horror comics, yet were compelled to by their distributors' table d'hôte product line policies.
Will Brooker also points out in Batman Unmasked:
Falsified information and criticism  Wertham "manipulated, overstated, compromised, and fabricated evidence" in support of the contentions expressed in Seduction of the Innocent.
7-LETTER WORDS: Biblical term for one of Jesus' original 12 followers
apostle
Acts of the Apostles (10:37–38 and 19:4) refers to the early ministry of Jesus and its anticipation by John the Baptist.
3
Views on the gospels range from their being inerrant descriptions of the life of Jesus to their providing little historical information about his life beyond the basics.
They show John preaching penance and repentance for the remission of sins and encouraging the giving of alms to the poor (Luke 3:11) as he baptizes people in the area of the River Jordan around Perea and foretells (Luke 3:16) the arrival of someone "more powerful" than he.
After the discovery of the empty tomb, Jesus makes a series of appearances to the disciples.
THE LAST SUPPER: During the meal Jesus predicts that this man will deny knowing him 3 times
Peter
These include the Gospel of Thomas, the Gospel of Peter, and the Apocryphon of James, among many other apocryphal writings.
3
New York: Oxford University Press.
They show John preaching penance and repentance for the remission of sins and encouraging the giving of alms to the poor (Luke 3:11) as he baptizes people in the area of the River Jordan around Perea and foretells (Luke 3:16) the arrival of someone "more powerful" than he.
The Gospels are not biographies in the modern sense, and the authors explain Jesus' theological significance and recount his public ministry while omitting many details of his life.
COLLEGE MOVIES: "Rudy" tells the true story of Rudy Ruettiger, who realized his dream of playing football for this university
Notre Dame
Daniel Eugene "Rudy" Ruettiger (born August 23, 1948) is a motivational speaker who played college football at the University of Notre Dame.
3
Ruettiger actually played for three plays.
The first play was a kickoff, the second play was an incomplete pass, and on the third (and final) play he sacked Georgia Tech quarterback Rudy Allen.
The other is Marc Edwards.
COLLEGE BASKETBALL: (I'm Jalen Rose of the NBA.)  I was part of this school's "Fab Five" that played in 2 NCAA finals in the '90s
the University of Michigan
Jalen Anthony Rose (born January 30, 1973) is an American retired professional basketball player and current sports analyst with ABC/ESPN.  In college, he was a member of the University of Michigan Wolverines' "Fab Five" (along with Chris Webber, Juwan Howard, Jimmy King, and Ray Jackson) that reached the 1992 and 1993 NCAA Men's Division I Basketball Championship games as both freshmen and sophomores.
3
With not winning a NCAA title, he racked up over 1700 points, 400 rebounds, 400 assists, and 100 steals.
Jalen was also a good passer, especially for his height, and Indiana often employed him as a point forward.
Bringing a Quality Education and Jobs to Detroit."
TV SERIES EPISODES: "The Gamesters of Triskelion"
Star Trek
"The Gamesters of Triskelion" is a second season episode of the original science fiction television series Star Trek, produced after John Meredyth Lucas had taken over for Gene L. Coon as the program's operating producer at the latter's request, first broadcast January 5, 1968, and repeated May 3, 1968.
3
Kirk uses this to try to gain information about the Providers from Shahna during their drills by explaining the concept of freedom, but when she does open up, the Providers shock her through the collar.
The Providers replace the wounded Thrall with Shahna.
Asa notes that god-figures, such as those featured in "The Gamesters of Triskelion" are "consistently disappointing, decadent and/or dangerous" and that specifically the Providers of Triskelion use "humanoids as playthings for personal amusement".
WEBSTER'S THIRD, PAGE 1282: Color of the head & neck of the lazuli bunting, a finch found in the western U.S. & on page 1282
Blue
-Vsmith 00:52, 8 Nov 2004 (UTC)  POLL CLOSED  Proposal 2 (A)   Replace the policy:  8.3 Commas  As stated by Kate Turabian's A Manual for Writers of Term Papers, Theses, and Dissertations, the Chicago Manual of Style, Strunk and White, and other authoritative sources, when a conjunction joins the last two elements in a series of three or more elements, a comma is used before the conjunction: "The wires were brown, blue, and green.
3
Factitious 04:21, Nov 9, 2004 (UTC)  Summary  There was no consensus to change anything.
Give it a rest.
English versions
MUSICAL SETTINGS: In this show's first scene, "It's a typical day in Dogpatch, U.S.A."
Li'l Abner
Dogpatch was the fictional setting of cartoonist Al Capp's classic comic strip, Li'l Abner (1934–1977).
3
The inhabitants were mostly lazy hillbillies, who usually wanted nothing to do with progress.
tarnip” fields and hog wallows—and was often referred to by its inhabitants and outsiders as being the most miserable and unnecessary place on earth.
The term was used by American chemical engineers such as William J. Wilcox, Jr. and Warren Fuchs, during World War II who were working on the Manhattan Project; the engineers used the term from the comic strip to describe their first Rochester dormitories, with dark and dismal furniture and used beds from an old YMCA, and kept using the term when they transferred to Oak Ridge, Tennessee.
THE MOVIES: Lt. Col. A.P. Clark played a key role in the elaborate breakout from Stalag Luft III that inspired this 1963 movie
The Great Escape
The camp is best known for two famous prisoner escapes that took place there by tunnelling, which were depicted in the films The Great Escape (1963) and The Wooden Horse (1950), and the books by former prisoners Paul Brickhill and Eric Williams from which these films were adapted.
3
At the end of each working day, a wooden board was placed over the tunnel entrance and covered with surface soil.
One such item was Klim cans; tin cans that had originally held powdered milk, supplied by the Red Cross for the prisoners.
Some genuine civilian clothes were also obtained by bribing German staff with cigarettes, coffee or chocolate.
THE 1880s: In 1885 Tiffany's revised the design of this: it's still seen on the reverse of the U.S. $1 bill
the Great Seal
The company revised the Great Seal of the United States in 1885.
3
Tiffany & Company (known colloquially as Tiffany or Tiffany's) is an American worldwide luxury jewelry and specialty retailer, headquartered in New York City.
Later that year, other stores were opened in the U.S., such as the Natick Collection in Natick, Massachusetts, U.S., which opened in September 2007, and Mohegan Sun Erika's casino in Connecticut, U.S, and the Providence Place mall in Providence, Rhode Island, U.S.,  both of which opened in November 2007.
The second verse of The Eagles' 1976 song "Hotel California" begins with the line "Her mind is Tiffany-twisted".
ROLLING STONE'S 500 GREATEST SONGS: We wonder "how does it feel" for him to be on his own with the No. 1 song "Like A Rolling Stone"
Bob Dylan
"Like a Rolling Stone" is a 1965 song by the American singer-songwriter Bob Dylan.
3
We messed around with the song.
12: The Cutting Edge 1965–1966, released in 2015.
You're a liar!"
DR. SEUSS, REWRITE MAN: Every Who down in Whoville liked Christmas a lot, but this boss of Bob Cratchit most surely did not!
Ebenezer Scrooge
The abused, underpaid clerk of Ebenezer Scrooge, Cratchit has come to symbolize poor working conditions, especially long working hours.
3
Bob and Emily Cratchit.
Here Bob's character is merged with Scrooge's fiancée Belle.
A Looney Tunes Christmas  Gary Oldman in the 2009 animated version  A Christmas Carol  Kandyse Mcclure as Catherine Beadnell in Barbie in a Christmas Carol   References   Category:Fictional characters introduced in 1843 Category:A Christmas Carol characters Category:Fictional people from London Category:Fictional clerks
"P"EOPLE: This Roman historian paired ancient heroes in his "Parallel Lives"
Plutarch
thumb|Engraving facing the title page of an 18th-century edition of Plutarch's Lives  Plutarch's Lives of the Noble Greeks and Romans, commonly called Parallel Lives or Plutarch's Lives, is a series of biographies of famous men, arranged in tandem to illuminate their common moral virtues or failings, written in the late 1st century.
2
G L  Tiberius Gracchus D Land Gaius Gracchus D L  Cicero (D) L  Mark Antony (D) L P  Brutus (D) L P  Galba D L and Otho D L   D G L  D G L  D G L  (N/A)  D G L  D G L  D G L  D G L  G L  D G L  (N/A)  D G L  D G L  D G L  D G L  D G L  (N/A)  (N/A)  D L   D L  D L  D L  (N/A)  Notes
Chronology of the lives   The following chronology of legendary and historical figures whose biographies appear in the Lives is organized by date of death, as birth dates in antiquity are more often uncertain.
NOTABLE WOMEN: The eminent British archaeologist Dorothy Garrod was the first female professor at this British university
Cambridge
In 1913, she entered Newnham College, Cambridge where she was one of very few women students.
1
External links
ESPN ENTERTAINMENT: In the ESPN drama "3", Barry Pepper played this late NASCAR legend
Dale Earnhardt
He portrayed prison guard Dean Stanton in The Green Mile, appeared as Frank Slaughtery in Spike Lee's 25th Hour, as journalist Joseph L. Galloway in We Were Soldiers, his leading role in the film Battlefield Earth, his depiction of Roger Maris in Billy Crystal's HBO film 61*, as Dale Earnhardt in the ESPN produced film 3: The Dale Earnhardt Story, and as Dan Morris in the film Seven Pounds, with Will Smith.
2
He is best known for roles such as Jonnie Goodboy Tyler in Battlefield Earth, Sergeant Michael Strank in Flags of Our Fathers, Dean Stanton in The Green Mile, Private Daniel Jackson in Saving Private Ryan, Roger Maris in 61*, and "Lucky" Ned Pepper in True Grit.
The Kennedys  2011 Prism Awards Best Performance in a Miniseries or a Movie When Love Is Not Enough   References  External links
GOVERNMENT: A GAO study reported this gov't service gave correct answers to only 2/3 of telephone questions
IRS
Towards the end of the 13th century Gao became part of the Mali Empire, but in first half of the 15th century the town regained its independence and with the conquests of Sonni Ali (ruled 1464–1492) it became the capital of the Songhai Empire.
3
History  The history of the Gao Empire precedes that of the Songhay Empire in the region of the Middle Niger.
The inhabitants were very poor and had only a few boats as they lacked wood for their construction.
On 26 June 2012, the tension came to all-out combat in Gao between the MNLA and MOJWA, with both sides firing heavy weapons.
A SIDE OF BACON: Holy triskaidekaphobia! Special FX guru Tom Savini had an arrow shoved through Kevin's throat in this 1980 flick
Friday the 13th
He is known for his makeup and special effects work on many films directed by George A. Romero, including Martin, Dawn of the Dead, Day of the Dead, Creepshow and Monkey Shines; he also created the special effects and makeup for many cult classics like Friday the 13th (parts I and IV), Maniac, The Burning, The Prowler and The Texas Chainsaw Massacre 2.
3
Throughout the years, Savini has appeared in movie roles from cameos as the vampire David Van Etten in Lost Boys: The Tribe, as the sheriff in the 2004 Dawn of the Dead remake, or tongue in cheek characters, like Jesus Christ in Zombiegeddon (2003).
In 2006, Savini essayed the role of Prester John, the mythical villain in the dreamlike Sea of Dust.
Pinnacle Press, 2005.
MORE TANGENTIAL ETRUSCAN POTPOURRI: Etruscans never foresaw in 1875 he'd pen the novel "Roderick Hudson"; "Daisy Miller" would arrive 3 years later
Henry James
{{Infobox book  |  File:[images.jpg] | name           = Daisy Miller | author         = Henry James | image          = File:DaisyMiller.jpg | caption        = First authorized American edition | country        = United Kingdom | language       = English | genre          =  | publisher      = Harper & Brothers| release_date   = 1879 | media_type     = Print | pages          = 43Daisy Miller was pirated by two American magazines, Littell's Living Age and Home Journal, in July–August 1878 }}Daisy Miller is a novella by Henry James that first appeared in Cornhill Magazine in June–July 1878, and in book form the following year.
2
His pursuit of her is hampered by her own flirtatiousness, which is frowned upon by the other expatriates when they meet in Switzerland and Italy.
As an objective analogue to this psychological reality, Daisy catches the very real Roman fever, the malaria that was endemic to many Roman neighborhoods in the 19th century.
U.S. CITY NICKNAMES: "Queen City of the Rockies"
Denver
Manila, as the "Queen City of the Pacific"  iloilo city, as the "Queen City of the South"  Naga, Camarines Sur, as the "Queen City of Bicol"  Santiago City, as the "Queen City of the North"  United States  Ada, Oklahoma, "Queen City of the Chickasaw Nation"  Allentown, Pennsylvania  Anchorage, Alaska  Bangor, Maine  Beach Haven, New Jersey  Buffalo, New York, "Queen City of the Great Lakes"  Burlington, Vermont  Charlotte, North Carolina, named after Charlotte of Mecklenburg-Strelitz, Queen Consort of the United Kingdom  Cincinnati, Ohio, once nicknamed "Queen City of the West"  Clarksville, Tennessee  Cumberland, Maryland, "Queen City of the Alleghenies"  Del Rio, Texas, "Queen City of the Rio Grande"  Denver, Colorado, "Queen City of the Plains"
2
For example, the city of Burlington, Vermont, is larger than the state's capital (Montpelier).
Elmira, New York  Fargo, North Dakota  Gadsden, Alabama  Gainesville, Georgia  Hazard, Kentucky, "Queen City of the Mountains"  Helena, Montana  Manchester, New Hampshire  Marquette, Michigan, "Lake Superior's Queen City"  Meridian, Mississippi  Olyphant, Pennsylvania  Plainfield, New Jersey  Poughkeepsie, New York, "Queen City of the Hudson"  Seattle, Washington, used "Queen City" as its official nickname from 1869 until 1982  Sedalia, Missouri, "Queen City of the Prairies"  Sioux Falls, South Dakota  Springfield, Missouri, "Queen City of the Ozarks"  Titusville, Pennsylvania, so named as the birthplace of the modern oil industry  Tuscaloosa, Alabama  Virginia, Minnesota  Virginia Beach, Virginia  See also  Name of Toronto  List of city nicknames in Canada  List of city nicknames in the United States  Category:City nicknames
FREAKS AND GEEKS ALUMS: Seth Rogen (Ken), in this Steve Carell film: "That's a good looking grandma!  My grandma looks like Jack Palance"
The 40-Year-Old Virgin
He has also starred in lead roles in the films The 40-Year-Old Virgin (2005), Get Smart (2008), Crazy, Stupid, Love (2011), The Incredible Burt Wonderstone and The Way, Way
3
Production ended during the middle of the fourth season of The Office because of Carell's and others' refusal to cross the picket line of the 2007 Writers Guild of America strike.
Carell, a WGA member, has written two episodes of The Office: "Casino Night" and "Survivor Man".
He followed this with another biographical drama, The Big Short, in which he portrayed banker Steve Eisman, whose name was changed in the film to Mark Baum.
IN THE BOOKSTORE: In his recent No. 1 bestseller, Florida doctor Arthur Agatston explains this diet that he developed
the South Beach Diet
Arthur Agatston (born 1947) is an American cardiologist best known as the developer of the South Beach Diet, but also the author of many published scholarly papers in the field of noninvasive cardiac diagnostics.
2
Education  Agatston earned an MD at New York University School of Medicine in 1973,  studied internal medicine at Montefiore Medical Center at the Albert Einstein College of Medicine and completed his cardiology fellowship at NYU.   Career  Dr. Agatston started his medical career on staff at New York University Medical Center.
He currently serves as the Medical Director, Wellness & Prevention at Baptist Health South Florida and practices at South Beach Preventive Cardiology.
STUPID SHOW BIZ ANSWERS: It was the title of the last big-screen remake of "Beau Geste", released in 1977
The Last Remake of Beau Geste
The Last Remake of Beau Geste (1977), starring Marty Feldman, Ann-Margret and Michael York  Beau Peep (started 1978) a strip cartoon in the [[Daily Star (United Kingdom)|Daily Star]] newspaper.
2
He also wrote Good Gestes, a collection of short tales (about half of them about the Geste brothers and their American friends Hank and Buddy, who also feature prominently in Beau Sabreur and Beau Ideal) and Spanish Maine (UK) or The Desert Heritage (USA), where loose ends are tied up and the successive tales of John Geste's adventures come to an end.
The Goon Show episode "Under Two Floorboards (A Story of the Legion)" (1955)  Follow that Camel (1967)
WOMEN: She & her husband Julius were convicted of espionage on the testimony of her brother David Greenglass
Ethel Rosenberg
He later stated that, at the urging of prosecutors, he lied at the Rosenbergs' trial, falsely implicating his sister Ethel Rosenberg, to protect himself and his wife, Ruth.
3
He testified against his sister and her husband in court in 1951 as part of an immunity agreement.
As a result of a surprise defense motion that all testimony about the alleged "secret of the atomic bomb" be impounded, Federal Judge Irving Kaufman at first made all spectators and news reporters leave the room when Greenglass began testifying about his "secrets".
I could not believe that this would be the outcome.
BEASTLY LITERATURE: Jean de Brunhoff wrote & illustrated the first stories about this urbane king of the elephants
Babar
Jean de Brunhoff (December 9, 1899 – October 16, 1937) was a French writer and illustrator known for creating the Babar books, the first of which appeared in 1931.
1
In 1924 he married Cécile Sabouraud, a talented pianist, and they had two sons Laurent and Mathieu in 1925 and 1926; a third son, Thierry, was born nine years later.
TALES: In 1931 Jean de Brunhoff wrote the first of several children's tales about this elephant
Babar
Jean de Brunhoff (December 9, 1899 – October 16, 1937) was a French writer and illustrator known for creating the Babar books, the first of which appeared in 1931.
2
She was trying to comfort Mathieu, who was sick.
New York: Random House, 1936.
ART: Joseph Stella is known for a series of paintings of this amusement park at the southern end of Long Island
Coney Island
thumb|300px|Joseph Stella, Battle of Lights, Coney Island, 1913, oil on canvas, 195.6 × 215.3 cm (77 × 84.75 in), Yale University Art Gallery, New Haven, CT Stella returned to Italy in 1909.
3
He became a part of the Alfred Stieglitz and the Walter Arensberg circles in Manhattan and enjoyed close relationships with fellow expatriates Albert Gleizes and leader of the New York Dada movement Marcel Duchamp (Stella and Arensberg accompanied Duchamp to the plumbing supply store in 1917 to purchase the infamous urinal.
A friend noted that the painting "caused a general sensation, an artistic upheaval as sudden and unexpected as it was universal [in avant-garde circles]."Jaffe, p. 47.
In the 1930s, Stella worked on the Federal Art Project and later traveled to Europe, North Africa, and the West Indies, locations that inspired him to work in various modes.
AWARDS: This school's Hasty Pudding Club has been presenting its Woman of the Year Award since 1951
Harvard
The Hasty Pudding Institute of 1770 is a social club for Harvard students.
3
This culminated in a member, Lemuel Hayward, secretly planning to stage a musical on the night he was to host the Club's meeting.
These include weekly "Members' Nights", dinner and cocktail parties, as well as its elaborate theme parties, such as "Leather and Lace".
Among these rooms is "The Arena", which is a room with no windows or openings to the outside world. "
COLLEGE FOOTBALL: From 1935 through 1974, this bowl game was played in New Orleans' Tulane Stadium
Sugar Bowl
right|thumb|260px|Sugar Bowl - 1948  Tulane Stadium was an outdoor football stadium located in New Orleans, that stood from 1926 to 1980.
3
Tulane Stadium was built on Tulane University's campus (before 1871, Tulane's campus was Paul Foucher's Plantation, where Foucher's father-in-law, Etienne de Bore, had first granulated sugar from cane syrup).
That record would stand alone for 28 years before it was tied by Jason Elam of the Denver Broncos, Sebastian Janikowski of the Oakland Raiders, and David Akers of the San Francisco 49ers.
Upon appeal by the University, the older concrete and brick section was deemed fit to use, but not the newer metal seating section.
YANKEE INGENUITY: In 1931 Miles Laboratories first marketed this effervescent tablet
Alka-Seltzer
In 1979, Bayer AG, whose original U.S. and Canadian aspirin business was seized as enemy property during World War I and subsequently sold as enemy assets, purchased Miles Laboratories and its subsidiary Miles Canada to reestablish a presence in North America, in the process also acquiring such products as Alka-Seltzer, Flintstones Vitamins, One-A-Day Vitamins and Bactine; it also included the S.O.S Soap Pad and Worthington Foods.
2
Miles operated as an independent firm from 1884 until 1979 and as a wholly owned subsidiary of Bayer AG from 1979 until 1995, when it was consolidated into the parent corporation.
Miles Laboratories also operated sites in other parts of the United States, including West Haven, Connecticut, which are now part of Bayer AG.  Category:Bayer brands Category:Companies established in 1885 Category:Companies disestablished in 1995 Category:Companies based in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania Category:Pharmaceutical companies of the United States Category:Companies based in Elkhart County, Indiana
NEVERMORE: The Skyway to Fantasyland closed down in this Calif. theme park in 1994, so now it's just a fantasy
Disneyland
Disneyland   Dedication   History and environs Fantasyland is one of the original themed lands at Disneyland.
2
Princess Fairytale Hall to make royal debut on Sept 18 as Walt Disney World completes new home for Cinderella, Rapunzel
New Fantasyland evolution: Walt Disney World modifies concepts, artwork while Magic Kingdom expansion takes shape The Seven Dwarfs Mine Train opened on May 28, 2014, completing New Fantasyland.http://www.wdwforgrownups.com/articles/new-fantasyland-celebrates-one-year-anniversary-magic-kingdom  Expansion Timeline September 12, 2009:
SOUTH OF THE EQUATOR: A huge statue called "Christ the Redeemer" overlooks this city from atop Corcovado Mountain
Rio de Janeiro
Christ the Redeemer, a reference to Jesus Christ as the Redeemer of humanity, may refer to:  Sculpture Christ the Redeemer (statue), Rio de Janeiro, Brazil Christ of Vũng Tàu, in Vũng Tàu, Vietnam  Christ the Redeemer of the Andes, on the Argentine-Chilean border Cristo della Minerva by Michelangelo, in Rome  Other uses Redeemer (Christianity), the theological concept of Jesus as redeemer Christ the Redeemer (icon), a 15th-century Russian icon Christ the Redeemer Parish, in Azerbaijan Paso Internacional Los Libertadores, a mountain pass in the Andes also known as Cristo Redentor Christ the Redeemer Church, a Maltese church "Cristo Redentor", composed by Duke Pearson and made famous by Charlie Musselwhite, appearing on the latter's debut album, Stand Back!
1
Here Comes Charley Musselwhite's Southside Band; also famously covered by David Sanborn on his 2003 album Time Again  Christo Redentor (album), the 1968 first album release by Harvey Mandel, guitarist and former bandmate of Musselwhite
BAND OF BROTHERS: Identical twins Joel & Benji Madden formed this "Good" group in 1996
Good Charlotte
Madden may refer to:  People Madudan mac Gadhra Mór (died 1008) ancestor of the Madden family of County Galway Ambrose Madden (disambiguation) Aoife Madden (born 1981), Irish film producer and actress Anita Madden (born 1933), American sportswoman and political activist Anne Madden (born 1932), Irish painter Beezie Madden (born 1963), American show jumping competitor Benji Madden (born 1979), American guitarist and vocalist for the band Good Charlotte Bill Madden (disambiguation) Bobby Madden (born 1978), Scottish football referee Bunny Madden (1882–1954), Major League Baseball player Charles Madden (disambiguation) Chris Madden (designer) (born 1948), American interior designer, television host, author and businesswoman Chris Madden (born 1978), American retired professional ice hockey player Ciaran Madden (born 1942), English actress Craig Madden (born 1958), English former professional footballer David Madden (disambiguation) Deirdre Madden (born 1960), Irish writer Denis J. Madden(born 1940), American Roman Catholic bishop Dominic Madden (born 1975), English theatre and venue owner Donald Madden (1928–1983), American theater, television, and film actor Duncan Madden (fl.
2
1967–1969), Airdrieonians F.C. player Ed Madden, American poet and political activist Edward Madden (1878–1952), American lyricist Edward M. Madden (1818–1885), New York politician Sir Frederic Madden (1801–1873), English palaeographer Fred H. Madden (born 1954), American politician Jake Madden (1865–1948), Scottish footballer James Madden (disambiguation)
Joanie Madden, American player of Irish traditional music Joel Madden (born 1979), American singer, record producer, actor, disc jockey, UNICEF Goodwill Ambassador John Madden (disambiguation) Justin Madden (born 1961), former Australian rules footballer and politician Kevin Madden (born 1972), American public relations professional Lawrie Madden (born 1955), English former professional footballer Liam Madden, former United States Marine, a leader of Iraq Veterans Against the War Mark Madden (born 1960), American journalist and broadcaster Martin B. Madden (1855-1928), US Congressman, promoted the Madden Dam for the Panama Canal Matt Madden (born 1968), American comic book writer and artist Max Madden (born 1941), British journalist and Labour Party politician Michael Madden (disambiguation) Niall Madden (born 1985), Irish jockey Owen Madden (disambiguation) Owney Madden (1891–1965), American gangster, night club manager and boxing promoter Paddy Madden (born 1990), Irish footballer Paul Madden, British chemist and Provost of The Queen's College, Oxford Paul Madden (diplomat) (born 1959), British High Commissioner to Australia Peter Madden (disambiguation) Ray Madden (1892–1987), United States Representative from Indiana Richard Robert Madden (1798–1886), Irish physician and historian Richard Madden (born 1986), Scottish stage, film and television actor Samuel Madden (1686–1765), Irish author Samuel Madden (MIT) (born 1976), American computer scientist Simon Madden (born 1957), former Australian rules footballer Simon Madden (Irish footballer) (born 1988) Sinéad Madden, Irish singer-songwriter and fiddle player Steve Madden (born 1958), founder and former CEO of eponymous footwear company Tamara Natalie Madden,  Jamaican-American painter and mixed-media artist Thomas Madden (disambiguation) Timothy Madden, Massachusetts politician J. Warren Madden (1890–1972), American lawyer, judge, civil servant, and educator  Places Madden Dam, a dam across the Chagres River, regulating the water supply to the Panama Canal Madden, County Armagh, a small village in Northern Ireland Madden, Alberta, a hamlet in south-central Alberta, Canada Madden, Mississippi, an unincorporated community 150 West Jefferson, formerly known as the Madden Building, a tall office tower in Detroit, Michigan, USA  Other Madden Most Valuable Protectors Award, NFL trophy Madden NFL, American football simulation video game series Madden NFL Football, American football simulation for the Nintendo 3DS portable game console Titles Madden baronets, UK baronetage
BILLs & TEDs: He's Massachusetts' senior senator
Ted Kennedy
included John F. Kennedy, who was a senator and US president before his assassination in 1963, Robert F. Kennedy, who was a senator, US attorney general and presidential candidate before his assassination in 1968, Ted Kennedy, a senator from 1962 until his death in 2009, and Eunice Kennedy Shriver, a co-founder of the Special Olympics.
3
Villages consisted of lodges called wigwams as well as long houses, and tribes were led by male or female elders known as sachems.
The Revolutionary War  thumb|left|, about the Battles of Lexington and Concord Massachusetts was a center of the movement for independence from Great Britain; colonists in Massachusetts had long uneasy relations with the British monarchy, including open rebellion under the Dominion of New England in the 1680s.
In Eastern Massachusetts, following World War II, the economy was transformed from one based on heavy industry into a service based economy.
THE WRITE STUFF: This author's collection "Tales of a Wayside Inn" is set at the Red Horse Tavern in Sudbury, Massachusetts
Longfellow
Other famous authors and poets born or strongly associated with Massachusetts include Nathaniel Hawthorne, John Updike, Emily Dickinson, Henry Wadsworth Longfellow, E.E. Cummings, Sylvia Plath, and Theodor Seuss Geisel, better known as "Dr. Seuss".
3
160–76.
Logan, Hanscom Field in Bedford, and Worcester Regional Airport are operated by Massport, an independent state transportation agency.
Plymouth is the largest municipality in the state by land area.
U.S. BIRTHPLACES: This Massachusetts city is the "Birthplace of Basketball"
Springfield
The state features four separate metropolitan statistical areas: the Boston-Cambridge-Quincy metropolitan area in the east, the Worcester metropolitan area in the center, the Springfield metropolitan area in the west, and the Barnstable metropolitan area in the southeast.
3
The Massachusetts House of Representatives and Massachusetts Senate comprise the legislature of Massachusetts, known as the Massachusetts General Court.
Boston is the state capital and largest city in Massachusetts.
There are currently a total of 143 hospitals in the state.
SPORTS SHORTS: Even though he was 6'1", NBA star Nate Archibald sported this diminutive nickname
"Tiny"
Nathaniel "Tiny" Archibald (born September 2, 1948) is a retired American professional basketball player.
3
Archibald was a willing passer and an adequate shooter from midrange.
Despite only playing in blowouts as a junior, the shy, quiet teen managed to blossom into a high-school star, being named team captain and an All-City selection in 1966.
he was named the 1981 NBA All-Star Game MVP.  Archibald led the NBA in free throws made three times and free throw attempts twice.
RATING SCALES: A Gemological Institute of America scale for these runs from D, colorless, to Z, light yellow
diamonds
In 1953 the GIA developed its International Diamond Grading System and the Four Cs (cut, clarity, color, and carat weight) as a standard to compare and evaluate the quality of diamonds.http://www.diamonds.net/news/NewsItem.aspx?ArticleID=42801  Today, the institute is headquartered in Carlsbad, California and operates out of 13 countries, with 11 campuses, 9 laboratories and 4 research centers worldwide.
3
The Gemological Institute of America, or GIA, is a nonprofit institute dedicated to research and education in the field of gemology and the jewelry arts.
It houses a growing collection of 38,000 books, 700 international magazines and journals (with current subscriptions to 225 titles), 1,000 videos/DVDs, 80,000 digital images, 300 maps, and approximately 6,000 original jewelry design renderings.
Subjects include natural and synthetic gemstones, gem treatments, jewelry design, manufacturing, and marketing.
ST. PETERSBURG'S HERMITAGE: (Sarah of the Clue Crew reports from the Hermitage in St. Petersburg, Russia.)  Amazingly, this 15th century Italian's Benois Madonna cost just 150,000 Rubles when the Hermitage acquired it in 1914
Da Vinci
Madonna and Child with Flowers, otherwise known as the Benois Madonna, could be one of two Madonnas Leonardo da Vinci had commented on having started in October 1478.
3
The child is thought to be guiding his mother's hands into his central vision.
For centuries, Madonna and Child with Flowers was considered lost.
In 1909, the architect Leon Benois sensationally exhibited it in Saint Petersburg as part of his father-in-law's collection.
CITY LIT: Betty Smith wrote about her hometown in the classic "A Tree Grows in" this borough
Brooklyn
Biography Born on December 15, 1896, in Brooklyn, New York to German immigrants, she grew up poor in Williamsburg, Brooklyn and attended Girls' High School.http://web.njit.edu/~cjohnson/tree/bio/wg.htm "A Tree Grows in Brooklyn.
2
There she honed her skills in journalism, literature, writing, and drama, winning a prestigious Avery Hopwood Award.
On January 17, 1972, she died from pneumonia in Shelton, Connecticut, at the age of 75.
AMERICAN SONGS: (Hi, I'm Richie McDonald) They say this is good news, but not in my band Lonestar's No. 1 song with this title
"No News"
1: "No News", "Come Cryin' to Me", "Amazed", "Smile", "What About Now", "Tell Her", "I'm Already There", "My Front Porch Looking In", and "Mr. Mom". "Amazed" also charted at No 1 on the Billboard Hot 100, becoming the first country song to do so since "Islands in the Stream" in 1983. "Amazed" and "My Front Porch Looking
3
199596: Lonestar Live and Lonestar Lonestar's first release for BNA was an extended play titled Lonestar Live, recorded at the Wildhorse Saloon in Nashville and issued in January 1995.
1, holding that position for three weeks in April 1996.
Also in this album's timespan, McDonald co-wrote Clay Walker's "She's Always Right" and The Wilkinsons' "Jimmy's Got a Girlfriend", which were respectively released in 1999 and 2000.
SPORTS STARS: Amy Van Dyken holds the U.S. record in the 50-meter freestyle event in this sport at 24.87 seconds
Swimming
She began swimming on the advice of a doctor as a way to strengthen her lungs to cope with her condition and prevent future asthma attacks.
2
She also placed second in the 100-yard butterfly and the 100-yard freestyle to Olympian Jenny Thompson.
1996 Summer Olympics At the 1996 Summer Olympics in Atlanta, Georgia, Van Dyken became the first American female athlete in history to win 4 gold medals in a single Olympic games.
PLAY THIS: It's off to Skull Island for Peter Jackson's official video game adaptation of this ape movie
King Kong
thumb|right|The Map of Skull Island as seen in the 1933 King Kong film.
2
Set in 1920, shortly after returning from military service during World War I, Doc Savage searches for his long-lost grandfather (the legendary mariner Stormalong Savage) with his father, the explorer Clark Savage, Sr.
Mr. Murray has created a new classic of the genre—all the while staying completely true to the legends of both Kong and Doc Savage.
MOM ROLES: With the demise of "Party Girl", Swoosie Kurtz moved on to play Brooke Shields' mom on this series
Suddenly Susan
The Magic School Bus| Dorothy Ann's Mom | Episode: "Out of This World" |- | 1991–1996 | Sisters| Alex Reed Barker  | 127 episodesNominated—Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Lead Actress in a Drama Series (1993–94)Nominated—Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Drama Series |- | 1996 | Party Girl| Judy Burkhard | 3 episodes |- | 1997 | Touched by an Angel| Libby King | Episode: "Charades" |- | 1996–1997 | Suddenly Susan| Liz Miller Keane | 3 episodes |- | 1998 | ER| Tina Marie Chambliss | Episode: "Suffer the Little Children"Nominated—Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Guest Actress in a Drama Series |- | 1998 | More Tales of the City| Betty Borg Ramsey | 3 episodes |- | 1999–2000 | Love & Money| Effie Conklin | 13 episodes |- | 2000 |
3
Kurtz attended the University of Southern California where she majored in drama.
That's Life| Valerie Wilkinson | 4 episodes |- | 2002 | Street Time| Victoria Van Kleek | Episode: "The Truth Hurts... Bad"
Betty Smith / Marylin Thacker 6 episodes 2005 Still Standing Helen Michaels 2 episodes 2004–2006 Huff Madeleine Sullivan 8 episodesNominated—Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Guest Actress in a Drama Series (2005–06) 2007–2009
"LETTER"-LETTER WORDS: For TV stations, KABC, WDIV, KTVT
call letters
In 1960, the Texas State Network sold channel 11 to NAFI Telecasting Corporation (which also owned Chris-Craft Industries at the time); the station's call letters were then changed to KTVT on September 1.
3
KTVT transmitted its signal via satellite to C-band satellite subscribers and to about 400 cable systems across the country, mainly in the southwestern United States, from the late 1970s to the early 1990s.
On August 20, 1990, KTVT launched half-hour primetime newscasts at 7:00 and 9:00 p.m. each weeknight, the latter being the first newscast in the 9:00 timeslot to be offered by a commercial television station in the Metroplex (predating KDFW's addition of its own late evening newscast in that slot when it switched from CBS to Fox in July 1995, and the formation of KDAF's news department with the debut of its own 9:00 p.m. newscast in 1999; PBS member station KERA-TV (channel 13) previously carried a 9:00 p.m. newscast from 1970 to 1976); the 7:00 p.m. newscast was cancelled in 1992, leaving only the 9:00 broadcast, which was expanded to one hour.
Iola Johnson - anchor/host of Positively Texas (2000–2008, later contributor for The Texas Daily on KTXD-TV)  Babe Laufenberg - sports director;
THE BRADY BUNCH IN TODAY'S WORKFORCE: Ironically, Greg, who once adopted the rock persona Johnny this, now works for the cable network of the same name
Bravo
West Belfast Brigade  John Adriano Acea (1917–1963), American jazz pianist  Johnny Appleseed, pioneer nurseryman and American legend  Johnny Archer, American professional pool player  Johnny Bench, former professional MLB Cincinnati Reds catcher  Johnny Yong Bosch, actor and martial artist  Johnny Bristol (1939–2004), American musician  Johnny Burke (lyricist), American lyricist  Johnny Carson, American talk show host  Johnny Cash, American singer-songwriter and actor  Johnny Chakravarthy, Indian actor  Johnny Cook (Canadian football), American football player  Johnny Crawford, American actor, singer and musician  Johnny Davis, American kickboxer  Johnny Depp, American actor, film producer, and musician  Johnny Galecki, American actor  Johnny Gilbert, American TV personality  Johnny Gioeli, American singer-songwriter, vocalist of Axel Rudi Peli, Hardline and Crush 40  Johnny Hallyday, French singer and actor  Johnny Huggins (born 1976), American football player  Johnny Karras, American football player  Johnny Knoxville, American actor, daredevil, comedian, screenwriter and film producer  Johnny Lee (actor), American actor  Johnny Lee (singer), American country music singer  Johnny Lewis, American actor  Johnny Mathis, American singer  Johnny Mercer, American lyricist, songwriter and singer  Johnny Moeller, American Guitarist  Johnny Peacock, American baseball player  Johnny Peacock (American football), American football player  Johnny Rivers, American Rock 'n' Roll singer, songwriter, guitarist, and record producer  Johnny Rotten, British lead singer for the Punk Rock band the Sex Pistols  Johnny Sequoyah, American child actress  Johnny Simmons, American actor  Johnny Sims, American football player  Johnny Winter, American blues guitarist, singer, and record producer  Johnny Whitaker, American actor  Johnny Whitworth, American actor  Characters  Johnny Blaze, alternate identity of Ghost Rider, a comic book character   Johnny Cade, character in S. E. Hinton's 1967 novel The Outsiders and the 1983 film of the same name  Johnny Cage, from the Mortal Kombat videogame series  Johnny 5, the robot star of the Short Circuit films  Johnny, portrayed by Tommy Wiseau, the lead character in The Room  Jonathan Lowell Spencer "Johnny" Storm, the Human Torch of the Fantastic Four  Johnny Fiama, a Muppet crooner who is a parody of Frank Sinatra  Films  Johnny (1980 film), Indian Tamil language film  Johnny (1993 film), Indian Malayalam language film  Johnny (2003 film), Indian Telugu language film  Johnny Be Good (1988 film)  Johnny Come Lately (1943 film)  Johnny Dangerously (1984 film)  Johnny English (2003 film)  Johnny English Reborn (2011 film)  Johnny Handsome (1989 film)   Johnny Mnemonic (1995 film)  Johnny Suede (1991 film)  Music  Johnnie & Jack, an American country music duo composed of Johnnie Wright and Jack Anglin  Johnnys, a Japanese boy band active from 1962 to 1967  The Johnnys, Australian pub rock band  Johnny (John Farnham album)  Johnny (Johnny Mathis album)  "Johnny Angel" (song), 1962 song by Shelley Fabares  "Johnny B. Goode" a 1958 song by Chuck Barry  "Johnny" (Suicide song)  "Johnny" (Salmonella Dub song)  "Johnny" (Yemi Alade song)  "Johnny", a song by Vaya Con Dios from the album Vaya Con Dios  "Johnny", a song by System of a Down featured in the special edition of Toxicity  Other  Johnny gown, hospital gown  Johnnie, a 1944 novel by Dorothy B. Hughes  Johnnycake, a cornmeal flatbread  Johnny Test, an American cartoon series  Johnny Bravo, an American cartoon series   Johnny the Homicidal Maniac, a comic book by Jhonen Vasquez  Johnny Reb, a slang term for Southern Confederates during the American Civil War  Rubber Johnny, 2005 short film  See also  Here's Johnny (disambiguation)  Jhonny (disambiguation)  Alternate forms for the name John
2
Johnny and Johnnie  refer to:  People  Johnny (given name), unisex given name.
Johnny Aba, 1970s- and 80s' Papua New Guinean professional feather/super feather/lightweight boxer  Johnny Abarrientos, retired Filipino professional basketball player  Johnny Abbes García (1924-?), governmental intelligence office chief during the Dominican Republic Rafael Trujillo dictatorship  Johnny Abel (1947–1995), Canadian politician  Johnny Abrego, former Major League Baseball Chicago Cubs starting pitcher  Johnny Ace (1929–1954), American rhythm and blues singer  Johnny Ace Palmer, award-winning American close-up magician  John Laurinaitis, also known as Johnny Ace, retired American professional wrestler and senior producer  Johnny Adair ("Mad Dog"), Ulster loyalist, former "C Company" leader, 2nd Battalion Shankill Road, and "Ulster Freedom Fighters" (UFF)
INSPIRED CHARACTERS: A real 19th century whale named Mocha Dick may have inspired this 1851 novel
Moby Dick
In 1902, the New Bedford whaling bark Platina, captained by Thomas McKenzie, harpooned and killed an albino sperm whale near the Azores in the Atlantic Ocean, using a harpoon tipped with an explosive device."The Real Moby Dick", New Bedford Whaling Museum, n.d.
3
Mocha Dick was an albino and partially inspired Herman Melville's 1851 novel Moby-Dick.Delbanco, Andrew.
When agitated he would sound and then breach so aggressively that his entire body would sometimes come completely out of the water.
In 1952, Time Magazine reported the harpooning of a white whale off the coast of Peru."Science: Captain Ahab Avenged", Time.
ALSO A BLOOD TYPE: In baseball statistics, these 2 letters represent stepping up to the plate one time
AB
The Walt Disney Company, owner of the group's label at the time, asked that the lyrics to the original be changed, threatening to not release the album otherwise.
3
The songs "Fat Sweaty Betty," "Willy Bubba," and "I Didn't Mean To Kill 'Em" were all intended to be released on Riddle Box.
Insane Clown Posse (1998).
Liner notes.
SHAKESPEAREAN ACTORS: At 15 she won a Golden Globe for "My So-Called Life"; at 16 she played Leonardo DiCaprio's Juliet
Claire Danes
Claire Danes was Juliet in Baz Luhrmann's modernized 1996 version, Romeo + Juliet, alongside Leonardo DiCaprio as  Romeo.
3
The Friar arranged a planned on how he was going to get both of them back together.
The play may be interpreted differently according to the whim of the reader or viewer.
In The Sims 2 Juliet reappears as Juliette Capp.
CALL ME SHIRLEY: Her "The Haunting of Hill House" is considered a treasure of Gothic horror literature
Shirley Jackson
The Haunting of Hill House is a 1959 novel by author Shirley Jackson.
3
Much of the supernatural phenomena that occur are described only vaguely, or else are partly hidden from the characters themselves.
Dr Montague and Luke force her into her car; she bids them farewell and drives off, but before leaving the property grounds she propels the car into a large oak tree, and it is assumed that she is killed.
The Haunting of Hill House as one of the finest horror novels of the late 20th century and provides a lengthy review.
THOMAS JEFFERSON'S MONTICELLO: (Jon of the Clue Crew reports from Monticello in Virginia.)  Monticello's famous dome, which we have the privilege of seeing from the inside, was inspired by the ancient Temple of Vesta in this city
Rome
The Temple of Vesta (Latin Aedes Vestae, Italian Tempio di Vesta) is an ancient edifice in Rome, Italy, located in the Roman Forum near the Regia and the House of the Vestal Virgins.
2
The temple's most recognizable feature is its circular footprint.
Around the Temple stood The Sacred Grove, in which also there was a graveyard for the priests and virgins.
THE AMERICAN MUSEUM OF NATURAL HISTORY: (Hi, I'm Neil deGrasse Tyson.)  I'm the director of this world-famous planetarium here at the museum, opened in 1935 & named for a philanthropist
the Hayden Planetarium
Since 1996, he has been the Frederick P. Rose Director of the Hayden Planetarium at the Rose Center for Earth and Space in New York City.
2
In addition to wrestling and rowing in college, he was active in dance, in styles including jazz, ballet, Afro-Caribbean, and Latin Ballroom.
Rogers, Patrick (February 28, 2000)"Night Vision".
RELIGIOUS WORKS: J.S. Bach's B Minor one of these religious compositions is "heavy", man
mass
Notable compositions in B minor   J. S. Bach – Mass in B minor   J. S. Bach - Orchestral Suite No. 2 in B Minor, BWV 1067  J. S. Bach –
3
thumb|300px|B melodic minor scale ascending and descending.
Piano Sonata
Adagio from Flute Quartet No. 1, K. 285  Mozart –
THE MOORE THE MERRIER: Once married to producer Grant Tinker
Mary Tyler Moore
Tinker is the former husband of actress Mary Tyler Moore.
3
During World War II, Tinker served in the Army Air Corps Reserve.
During Tinker's tenure in NBC's top position, the network regained ratings and produced popular shows like The Cosby Show, Family Ties, The Golden Girls, Cheers, Night Court, and Hill Street Blues.
That same year, he won a personal Peabody Award "for recognizing, protecting, and fostering creativity of the highest order."64th Annual Peabody Awards, May 2005.
GOLFERS: Now married to Ray Knight, she joined the LPGA Hall of Fame in 1987, the year she turned 30
Nancy Lopez
Ray Knight was previously married to Nancy Lopez, a now retired LPGA golfer.http://www.tampabay.com/sports/golf/nancy-lopez-to-make-first-appearance-at-lpga-legends-tour-open-championship/1201298 They had three daughters together: Ashley Knight who is the oldest, Erinn Knight who is the middle, and Torri Knight who is the youngest.
3
Roger McDowell replaced Jesse Orosco on the mound, and Orosco went into right field.
SeasonsGamesABRunsHits2B3BHRRBISBBBSOHBPAvg.
He later fined himself $250 for the incident.
"L.B."s: Herbie, the endearing Volkswagen in a classic Disney film
The Love Bug
Herbie the Love Bug is an anthropomorphic 1963 Volkswagen Beetle, a character that is featured in several Disney motion pictures starting with the 1968 feature film The Love Bug.
3
In this race, Herbie ultimately divides himself in half (as in the original film) to win the race.
Herbie also received a hood-mounted Carello fog light, and his running boards were now the more conventional black.
The rust seen on the car in this film was painted on some of the Herbie Models.
GAME SHOW WOMEN: KC Winkler, Becky Price & Ruta Lee appeared on various versions of this dice game
High Rollers
Lee guest-starred on many television series and also was a featured panelist on a number of TV game shows, including Hollywood Squares, What's My Line?, and as Alex Trebek's co-host on High Rollers.
3
She also made five guest appearances on the CBS courtroom drama series Perry Mason between 1958 and 1965, including murderer Connie Cooper in "The Case of the Screaming Woman" (1958), and defendant Millie Crest in "The Case of the Foot-Loose Doll" (1959).
Lee appeared as the girlfriend of Bev Harris (Estelle Parsons) whose character disclosed she was gay.
In 2011, she stepped down after 55 years of involvement with the Thalians, and is now an emeritus member.
OF THE CHILDREN: At the park the full bucket type of this is for 2- & 3-year-olds; kids who are 4 & 5 graduate to the half bucket
a swing
There are a few flashbacks shown in the series showing the two together as children, Mona mostly displaying bitterness and jealousy toward her sister, as seen in one flashback where, while pushing Deedee in a swing, she gives it some extra power and throws the smaller girl over and out of the swing.
3
Phyllis produces evidence that proves Charles wasn't quite as distant as it seems.
(3/01/04)  40.
Meanwhile, Adam, upset that being gay is now the main thing, decides that he is going to be straight.
OF THE CHILDREN: At the park the full bucket type of this is for 2- & 3-year-olds; kids who are 4 & 5 graduate to the half bucket
a swing
There are a few flashbacks shown in the series showing the two together as children, Mona mostly displaying bitterness and jealousy toward her sister, as seen in one flashback where, while pushing Deedee in a swing, she gives it some extra power and throws the smaller girl over and out of the swing.
3
I told you...", chastising her daughter or anyone who didn't listen to her for that matter.
Big Dee Dee also takes a pregnancy test, which turns out to be positive.
Their actions backfire, as everyone at the office begins thinking of Dee Dee as a "daddy's girl."
THRILLER: This author's techno-thriller "Rainbow Six" focuses on John Clark, also a hero in "Clear & Present Danger"
Tom Clancy
John Clark (American actor) (1933–2011), American actor who appeared in mainly Spaghetti Westerns John Clark (musician) (born 1944), American jazz horn player and composer John Drury Clark (as John D. Clark; 1907–1988), American author, chemist and rocket scientist John Heaviside Clark (c.1771–1863), Scottish aquatint engraver and painter of seascapes and landscapes  Athletes John Clark (basketball), member of the Northeastern University athletics Hall of Fame John Clark (boxer) (1849–1922), Irish-American bare-knuckle boxer John Clark (English footballer), footballer for Bradford City and Cardiff City John Clark (footballer, born 1941), footballer formerly with Celtic F.C., one of the Lisbon Lions John Clark (footballer, born 1964), footballer formerly with Dundee United John Clark (rugby league) (died 2011), British rugby league footballer of the 1950s and '60s  Politicians, judges, and civil servants American John Clark (Delaware governor) (1761–1821), American governor and farmer of Delaware John Clark (Georgia governor) (1766–1832), American politician and governor of Georgia John Clark (Minnesota politician) (1825/26–1904), Minnesota state senator John Bullock Clark (1802–1885), American politician and U.S. representative from Missouri and Confederate congressman John Bullock Clark, Jr. (1831–1903), American politician and U.S. representative from Missouri John C. Clark (1793–1852), American politician and U.S. representative from New York John Davidson Clark (1886–1961), American lawyer, member of the Council of Economic Advisers (1946–1953) John F. Clark, ninth director of the United States Marshals Service John T. Clark, American politician and civil engineer from New York  Canadian John Clark (Canadian politician) (1835–1896), Scottish-born politician in Ontario, Canada John Arthur Clark (1886–1976), Conservative member of the Canadian House of Commons John Etter Clark (1915–1956), member of the Legislative Assembly of Alberta, 1952–1959  Other John Allworth Clark (1846–1932), Australian politician - mayor of Brisbane John Clark (Roundhead) (fl 1650s), English member of parliament and colonel in Cromwell's army John Harrison Clark (c. 1860–1927), Cape Colony adventurer who ruled much of southern Zambia  Scientists and academics John Brown Clark (1861-1947), mathematician, Vice President of the Royal Society of Edinburgh J. Desmond Clark (1916–2002), British archaeologist J. P. Clark or John Pepper Clark-Bekederemo (born 1935), Nigerian poet and professor John Bates Clark (1847–1938), American economist John Drury Clark (1907–1988), American author (as John D. Clark), chemist and rocket scientist John E. Clark (born 1952), American anthropologist John Frank Clark, American Africanist and professor of International Relations John Gordon Clark (1926–1999), Harvard psychiatrist and pioneer cult researcher John Maurice Clark (1884–1963), American economist John S. Clark (1885–1956), Scottish entomologist John Willis Clark (1833–1910), English academic and antiquarian  Architects John James Clark or J. J. Clark (1838–1915), Australian architect John Porter Clark (1905–1991), American architect John W. Clark (architect), American architect  Military John Clark (spy), American spy during the American Revolutionary War John George Walters Clark (1892–1948), British army officer John W. Clark (Medal of Honor) (1830–1898), American soldier in the American Civil War  Other John Clark (chaplain) (1784–1853), American clergyman who served as chaplain of the senate John Allen Clark (1926–2001), British businessman John Howard Clark (1830–1878), editor of The South Australian Register, 1870–1877 John Kinzie Clark (1792–1865), trader, trapper and early settler in the Chicago area John Kirkland Clark (1877–1963), New York City assistant district attorney  Fictional characters John Clark (Tom Clancy character), character in Tom Clancy novels John Clark, Jr., detective in the American television series NYPD Blue  See also John Bates Clark Medal, an award given by the American Economic Association John Clark Field, a multi-use stadium in Plano, Texas, United States Capt.
2
John Clark may refer to:  Arts and entertainment John Clark or Signor Brocolini (1841–1906), Irish-born American operatic singer John Clark (actor) (born 1932), British actor and theatre director.
John Clark House, a historic house near Canterbury, Connecticut, United States John Clark House (Clarksdale, Mississippi), a historic house in Clarksdale, Mississippi, United States John Clarke (disambiguation) John Clerk (disambiguation) John Clerke (disambiguation) Jonathan Clark (disambiguation)
HOLLYWOOD BLVD.: June 16, 1999 was "Another Day In Paradise" when this composer got a star on the Walk of Fame
Phil Collins
"Another Day in Paradise" is a protest song recorded by English drummer and singer Phil Collins.
3
The song was another massive hit for Collins.
This song is notable for keeping Janet Jackson's "Rhythm Nation" from ever reaching number one.
9UK
PARDON MY POLISH: On "The Simpsons" in Warsaw Bart is a brat, one of these to Lisa
brother
Discography Albums Wendy and Lisa (1987), Columbia Records (UK #84) Fruit at the Bottom (1989), Columbia Records (UK #45) Eroica (1990), Virgin Records (UK #33) Girl Bros. (1998), World Domination – Re-released as Wendy & Lisa "Girl Brothers Inc." (1999) (self-released) White Flags of Winter Chimneys (2008), W. Melvoin/L. Coleman (self-released) Snapshots EP (2011) (self-released)  Soundtracks Toys (1992), Geffen Records Heroes: Original Score (2009), La-La Land Records Nurse Jackie: Season One Soundtrack (2010), Lionsgate Music Dirty Girl Original Motion Picture Soundtrack (2010), Lakeshore Music  Singles  Year Single Peak positions Album UK NED BEL(FLA)
3
Coleman suggested Melvoin, who had been brought on tour, as a replacement.
Awards
Possessed: The Rise and Fall of Prince.
STAY!: The "Live Like Eloise Package" at this NYC hotel includes a night in a suite & a copy of a Kay Thompson book
the Plaza
Eloise Thompson, who lived at the Plaza Hotel in New York City, became most notable as the author of the Eloise series of children's books.
3
Standing, from left: Ronald Reagan, Nick Adams, Lloyd Bridges, Mickey Rooney, Edgar Bergen, Jack Carson, Ralph Bellamy, Kay Thompson, Dean Jones.
The Billboard Book of Top 40 Hits, 3rd ed.
The rest of her recording career is compiled on the 3-CD box set "Think Pink!
CLAUDIAS: In 1993's "Son of the Pink Panther", she played the mother of Clouseau's son
Claudia Cardinale
Also in this film are Panther regulars Herbert Lom, Burt Kwouk and Graham Stark and a star of the original 1963 film, Claudia Cardinale.
3
When Hans' men attempt to plant a bomb under the Gambrelli house, it leads to Dreyfus becoming injured instead and sent to the hospital.
While Maria decides to stay beside the injured Dreyfus at the hospital to see him recover, they both reveal Gambrelli's origins to him as the only known offspring of the late Inspector Clouseau.
The final scene has Inspector Gambrelli attending a ceremony in Lugash attended by King Haroak and Princess Yasmin who award him with a special medal for his rescue of Yasmin which is attended by Maria, Dreyfus, Cato, Prof.
BASKETBALL: Number 14 on the 1945&ndash;46 NBL champion Rochester Royals, he went on to play "The Rifleman"
Chuck Connors
The Rifleman is an American Western television program starring Chuck Connors as rancher Lucas McCain and Johnny Crawford as his son, Mark McCain.
3
Royal Dano appeared as a former Confederate States of America soldier in "The Sheridan Story" who is given a job on the McCain ranch and encounters General Philip Sheridan, the man who cost him his arm in battle.
Notable people in other fields also made cameo appearances such as future baseball Hall of Famers Duke Snider and Don Drysdale, comedian Buddy Hackett and writer, director and producer Paul Mazursky.
It is notable that McCain almost never carried a pistol.
ARTISTS: His 1770 work "The Blue Boy" resides in the Huntington Art Gallery in San Marino, California
Thomas Gainsborough
The Blue Boy (c. 1770) is a full-length portrait in oil by Thomas Gainsborough, now in the Huntington Library, San Marino, California.
3
History Perhaps Gainsborough's most famous work, it is thought to be a portrait of Jonathan Buttall (1752–1805), the son of a wealthy hardware merchant, although this has never been proven.
The painting was in Jonathan Buttall's possession until he filed for bankruptcy in 1796.
In a move that caused a public outcry in Britain, it was then sold to the American railway pioneer Henry Edwards Huntington for $728,800 (£182,200), according to Duveen's bill,Thorpe, James Ernest, Henry Edwards Huntington, A Biography, Berkeley: University of California Press, 1994, p. 438.
AT THE DRUGSTORE: No need to be embarrassed by this condition--try Selsun Blue or Sebulex on aisle 5
dandruff
Selsun Blue is an over-the-counter brand of dandruff shampoo now owned by Sanofi.
2
The first four types contain the active ingredient selenium sulfide which has been shown to have anti-fungal properties.
Category:Skin care
WHO'S THE TV BOSS?: No-nonsense police Lt. Anita Van Buren
S. Epatha Merkerson
Lieutenant Anita Van Buren is a fictional character on NBC's long-running police procedural and legal drama television series Law & Order, portrayed by S. Epatha Merkerson.
3
She was investigated, and absolved, by the Internal Affairs Bureau.
She eventually learns to tolerate (and perhaps accept) Cassady as a member of her squad; however, this acceptance does not seem to last long and in the seventeenth season finale "The Family Hour", Van Buren berates the detective for her inability to keep her temper in check and suggests that Cassady has no future in the 27th Squad.
Cancer storyline In Season 20, Van Buren sees an OB/GYN and is diagnosed with Stage-II cervical cancer, caused by the sexually-transmitted human papillomavirus — which she contracted from Donald, who had been cheating on her.
FILMS OF THE '90S: He starred as Quigley in "Quigley Down Under"
Tom Selleck
Starring Tom Selleck, Alan Rickman and Laura San Giacomo, it was directed by Simon Wincer.
3
Quigley rides alone to a nearby town leaving Cora and the infant Aborigine in the desert with food and water.
After the filming concluded, Selleck kept all three rifles, and had two of them reconditioned by Shiloh Rifle Co.
The shoot is the largest of its kind in America, attended by around 600 shooters, with targets out to 800 yards.
WORLD TRAVEL: Hua HIn is a favorite seaside resort of this country's ruling Chakkri family; their summer palace is there
Thailand
Chakkri (; from Sanskrit cakrī चक्री, meaning "one who has a discus", referring to the Hindu god Vishnu who possesses the discus Sudarshana) was the noble title of the civil chancellor (สมุหนายก) of Ayutthaya, Thon Buri, and Rattanakosin, the city-states in present-day Thailand.
1
Rama I, born as Thongduang (ทองด้วง), a government officer under King Taksin of Thon Buri who later seized the throne and established Rattanakosin.
WE'LL ALWAYS HAVE PARRIS ISLAND: (Cheryl of the Clue Crew reports from Parris Island, SC.)  Marines are taught to see themselves as part of a team, like this basic unit of 30 to 50 people
a platoon
In one incident, a platoon of ROK Marines wiped out an NVA/VC battalion, alone.
3
The Indian Navy has an elite special operations unit called "MARCOS" (Marine Commandos).
Estonia The Meredessantpataljon, was a short lived infantry battalion of the Estonian Navy.
The most famous example of this form of land service was provided by the guns accompanying the forces relieving Ladysmith.
ON OLD MAPS: The area once known as United Provinces is now this Indian state that also has the initials U.P.
Uttar Pradesh
United Provinces may refer to:  United Provinces of Agra and Oudh (1902–1921), a former province of British India; now Uttar Pradesh  United Provinces of British India (1921–1937), a former province of British India; now Uttar Pradesh  United Provinces (1937-1950), a former province of British India & Dominion of India; now Uttar Pradesh  United Provinces of New Granada, (1810–1816), a Confederacy formed after the independence of Colombia  United Provinces of Canada or Province of Canada (1841–1867), a former British colony in North America  United Provinces of Central America (1823–1838), a former country in Central America  United Provinces of Central Italy (1859–1860), a short-lived client state of the Kingdom of Piedmont-Sardinia  United Provinces of China (1911–1912), was an early translation of the Republic of China in Xinhai Revolution  United Provinces of Heilongjiang and Nenjiang (1947), a short-lived Communist Chinese province; now Heilongjiang  United Provinces of South America or United Provinces of the River Plate (1816–1853), official name of Argentina.
1
United Provinces, another name for the Dutch Republic (1581–1795), now the Netherlands  See also  United Kingdom (disambiguation)  United States (disambiguation)  ru:Соединённые провинции
CONTEMPORARY AUTHORS: The paperback release of his "The Apocalypse Watch" climbed the best seller charts in 1996
Robert Ludlum
The Apocalypse Watch (1995) is a novel by Robert Ludlum.
2
Plot summary  The plot concerns Drew Latham, a special officer for consular operations, who must discover why his brother was killed after a covert mission.
A running joke concerns the inability of the French to pronounce "Latham" correctly.
ARCHITECTS: This American architect who turned 95 in 2001 is known for his "Glass House" of 1949
Philip Johnson
Built in 1949, it was designed by Philip Johnson as his own residence, and "universally viewed as having been derived from" the Farnsworth House design, according to Alice T. Friedman.
2
In part, the landscape was a reflection of a landscape painting, The Funeral of Phocion by Nicolas Poussin (circa 1648) placed in a seating area of Glass House.
The rectangularity of the Glass House itself is complemented with a circular brick fireplace.
A SPELLING CATEGORY: (Let's go back to Tori...)Dad got Emmy nominations for producing "Family" & this nighttime soap about the Carrington clan
Dynasty
birthplace unknown Kelly Carrington (living), American model Vernon Carrington (1936–2005), Jamaican religious leader, founder of the Twelve Tribes of Israel branch of the Rastafari movement Walter Carrington (living), American diplomat  pen names and pseudonyms Charles Carrington (1867–1921), 19th century publisher of erotic literature Tori Carrington, American writing team of romance novels  fictional characters Carrington family (1981–1989), the core family of the American prime time soap opera Dynasty Michael Carrington, a British student played by Maxwell Caulfield in the 1982 movie Grease 2 Daniel Carrington, character in the video game franchise Perfect Dark Arthur Carrington, character played by Robert Cornthwaite in the 1951 science-fiction movie The Thing From Another World.
3
For places or other uses, see Carrington (disambiguation).
Matthew Carrington (1983–2005), student at California State University, Chico, killed during a hazing incident, prompting Matt's Law Michael Carrington (voice actor)Presumed born in the United States (living), American comic writer and voice actor Paul Carrington (judge) (1733 – c. 1826), American appellate judge.
American artist/ sculptor, President "The Carrington Foundation For Public Art", teacher, pilot, B.S. degree U.C Berkeley, Forestry, Officer, United States Air Force.
THE 1950 EMMYS: It was the first program to win as Best Game Show; host Ralph Edwards picked up the award
Truth or Consequences
November 16, 2005) was an American radio and television host, radio producer, and television producer, best known for his radio-TV game shows Truth or Consequences and This Is Your Life.
3
Radio Speakers: Narrators, News Junkies, Sports Jockeys, Tattletales, Tipsters, Toastmasters and Coffee Klatch Couples Who Verbalized the Jargon of the Aural Ether from the 1920s to the 1980s--A Biographical Dictionary.
In 1981, with Stu Billett, he executive-produced The People's Court, the first program of its type.
Shortly before his death he released a selection of his
POP IN '98: Nick, Brian, Kevin, A. J. & Howie D. "hit the road" as this group
The Backstreet Boys
Brian Johnson (born 1947), member and lead vocalist of the hard rock band AC/DC Brian Johnston (1912–1994), British cricket commentator Brian Jones (1942–1969), founding member, guitarist and multi-instrumentalist in the English rock group The Rolling Stones Brian Joo (born 1981), American-born Korean singer, former member of the R&B duo Fly to the Sky Brian Jossie (born 1977), American professional wrestler performing under the ring name of Abraham Washington Brian Joubert (born 1984), French figure skater and 2007 World Champion Brian Kim (born 1975/76), American former hedge fund manager and criminal Brian Lara (born 1969), former West Indian cricketer Brian Laudrup (born 1969), former Danish international soccer player Brian Littrell (born 1975), member of the boy band, The Backstreet Boys Brian May (born 1947), famous guitarist from the band, Queen Brian McConaghy (born 1950), Canadian forensic scientist Brian McKnight (born June 5, 1969) American singer-songwriter, arranger, producer, and R&B musician.
3
Noel Higgins & Jeanne Goldner, Names, Names, Names, A Book for You (Middletown, Connecticut: Weekly Reader Books, 1986), page 8-b.
Variant spellings such as "Brien" are sometimes used as female given names, especially among members of the Irish diaspora.
London : Routledge, 2004.
ROSSINI OPERAS: Rudolph is the commander of Gessler's archers in this opera
William Tell
Notable people with the surname include:  Albrecht Gessler, 14th century Austrian bailiff connected with the William Tell legend Amaka Gessler, New Zealand swimmer Friedrich Leopold von Geßler (1688-1762), Prussian field marshal Doc Gessler (1880-1924), American baseball player Otto Gessler (1875-1955), German politician Scott Gessler (born 1965), American lawyer and Secretary of State of the U.S. State of Colorado  See also  113355 Gessler, asteroid  Gessler Clinic, P.A., a large outpatient clinic system in Winter Haven, Florida  Category:German-language surnames
1
Gessler or Geßler is a German surname.
THEATRE: His expressionistic 1922 play "The Hairy Ape" opens in the firemen's forecastle of an ocean liner
Eugene O'Neill
The Hairy Ape (1922) is an expressionist play by Eugene O'Neill about a brutish, unthinking laborer known as Yank as he searches for a sense of belonging in a world controlled by the rich.
3
Production history right|thumb|Promotional poster for 1944 film version of The Hairy Ape, starring William Bendix and Susan Hayward (1944)  The Hairy Ape was first produced by the Provincetown Players in 1922.
In February 2004, The Hairy Ape received positive reviews at the San Pedro Playhouse, Cellar Theatre in San Antonio, Texas.
BBC –
COLORS: In Chekhov's "The Seagull", it's the color Masha always wears
Black
Masha Gessen (born 1967), Russian and American journalist and author  Maria (Masha) Kolenkina, Russian socialist revolutionary of the late 19th century  Masha and Dasha Krivoshlyapova (1950-2003), Russian conjoined twins  Masha Lubelsky (born 1936), Israeli former politician  Masha Ma, Chinese fashion designer  Masha Rasputina (born 1964), Russian pop singer   Fictional characters   Masha and the bear (Маша и медведь) in Russian folklore  Masha and the Bear, Russian TV series  Masha, heroine of Pushkin's novel The Captain's Daughter  Masha, one of the title characters in The Three Sisters (play) by Anton Chekhov  Masha, Ilya's and Polina's daughter in The Seagull, another Chekhov play Masha, a character in Tokyo Mew Mew, a Japanese manga series  Masha Rostova, Elizabeth Keen's birth name in NBC's The Blacklist   References  Behindthename.com  Category:Russian feminine given names
3
In the Russian language, Masha (Маша) is a diminutive of Maria.
In Serbo-Croatian and Slovene "Maša" is a diminutive of "Marija" but can be a given name in its own right.
Mashunya ()  Mashuta ()  Mashenka ()  Mar'ya ()  Mashulya ()  Masharik ()  Mashka ()   People named Masha   Masha Bruskina (1924-1941), Soviet partisan of the Minsk Resistance.
THE NIGHTTIME SKY: As seen from the Earth, the brightest star excluding the sun is this "Dog Star"
Sirius
Retrieved 1 Dec 2012 Earth & Sky was aired one or more times daily on more than 1,000 commercial, NPR, and other public radio stations, 80 affiliates stations for the sight-impaired, and across 35 channels on both XM and Sirius satellite radio in the United States.
3
Earthsky: A clear voice for science Retrieved 1 Dec 2012 It began broadcasting in 1991.
Informal Learning Review, The, No. 75, November - December 2005 pp.
Earth in Space 4 (2):
I GOT A CALDECOTT!: Arnold Lobel took a page out of Aesop's book, publishing a book of these that won in 1981
Fables
He both wrote and illustrated those picture books, as well as Fables, for which he won the 1981 Caldecott Medal recognizing the year's best-illustrated U.S. picture book.
3
He attended Pratt Institute in Brooklyn, New York.
Frog and Toad series A series of books featuring Frog and ToadFrog and Toad Are Friends (1970)Frog and Toad Together (1972)Frog and Toad All Year (1976)Days with Frog and Toad (1979) The musical A Year with Frog and Toad (workshopped 2000, premiered 2002), by Adrianne Lobel and others, played on Broadway in 2003 and has toured nationally since.
Mister Muster series Featuring Arnold Lobel's first self-written and illustrated bookA Zoo for Mister Muster (1962)A Holiday for Mister Muster (1963)  Mouse seriesMouse Tales                                                                                                                                                                                              (1972)Mouse Soup (1977) (Garden State Children's Book Award winner)  As illustrator   Happy Times with Holiday Rhymes (1958) by Tamar Grand  My First Book of Prayers (1958) by Edythe Scharfstein, Sol Scharfstein, and Ezekiel Schloss  The Book of Chanukah Poems, Riddles, Stories, Songs, Things to Do (1959) by Edythe Scharfstein and Ezekial Schloss  The Complete Book of Hanukkah (1959) by Kinneret Chiel  Holidays are Nice: Around the Year with the Jewish Child (1960) by Robert Garvey and Ezekiel Schloss  Red Tag Comes Back (1961) by Fred Phleger  Something Old Something New (1961) by Susan Rhinehart  Little Runner of the Longhouse (1962) by Betty Baker  The Secret Three (1963) by Mildred Myrick  Miss Suzy (1964) by Miriam Young  Dudley Pippin (1965) by Phil Ressner  The Witch on the Corner (1966) by Felice Holman  The Star Thief (1968) by Andrea DiNoto  Ants Are Fun (1969) by Mildred Myrick  I'll Fix Anthony (1969) by Judith Viorst  As I Was Crossing Boston Common (1973) by Norma Farber  The Clay Pot Boy (1974) by Cynthia Jameson  Written by Millicent E. Selsam A series of Science I Can Read Books all written by Millicent E. Selsam and illustrated by Arnold Lobel:  Greg's Microscope (1963)  Terry and the Caterpillars (1963)  Let's Get Turtles (1965)  Benny's Animals and How He Put Them in Order (1966)  Written by Jack Prelutsky Books that Arnold Lobel illustrated for Jack Prelutsky:The Terrible Tiger (1970)Circus (1974)Nightmares: Poems to Trouble Your Sleep (1976)The Mean Old Mean Hyena (1978)The Headless Horseman Rides Tonight:
STATE QUARTERS: A racecar superimposed on an outline of the state & the motto "Crossroads of America"
Indiana
200px|right|Interstates in Indiana The Crossroads of America is a nickname given to the state of Indiana as it, and, more specifically, the city of Indianapolis is the hub for several major Interstate highways that criss-cross the state, connecting Hoosiers to the rest of the United States.
2
Vandalia, Ohio, has also been called, at one time, the Crossroads of America due to U.S. Highway 40 and the eastern division of the Dixie Highway crossing in the middle of the town.
I-75 and I-70 cross in Vandalia as well.
GOING TO TOWN: Large island on which you'd find Holsteinsborg, also called Sisimiut & Julianehab, also called Qaqortoq
Greenland
is a town in the Kujalleq municipality in southern Greenland.
2
The Dorset people arrived in the Qaqortoq area around 2,800 years ago.
1856.
VIVA MEXICO!: As a colony of that country, from 1521 to 1821 Mexico was known as New this
Spain
In 1521, the Spanish Empire conquered and colonized the territory from its base in Mexico-Tenochtitlan, which was administered as the Viceroyalty of New Spain.
3
At first, the Aztecs believed the epidemic was a punishment from an angry god, but they later accepted their fate and no longer resisted the Spanish rule.
Of these, 64 senators (two for each state and two for the Federal District) are elected by plurality vote in pairs; 32 senators are the first minority or first-runner up (one for each state and one for the Federal District), and 32 are elected by proportional representation from national closed party lists.
In addition to the indigenous languages, other minority languages are spoken by immigrant populations, such as the 80,000 German-speaking Mennonites in Mexico, and 5,000 the Chipilo dialect of the Venetian language spoken in Chipilo, Puebla.
LATIN AMERICA: The earliest known Indian civilization in the Americas, they lived in what is now Mexico over 3,000 years ago
the Olmecs
The Olmecs : America's First Civilization.
3
9–25.
In all states indigenous people have higher infant mortality, in some states almost double of the non-indigenous populations.
In 2013, Mexico's basketball team won the Americas Basketball Championship and qualified for the 2014 Basketball World Cup where it reached the playoffs.
HIGH SCHOOLS: New England's Deerfield Academy, Phillips Academy & Groton are noted schools of this type
Preparatory schools
The Headmaster: Frank L. Boyden (1966) ISBN 0-374-51496-8  Moorhead, Andrea D. and Moorhead, Robert K. Deerfield, 1797-1997: A Pictorial History of the Academy (1997) (ISBN 0-9632800-1-5)  References  External links  Deerfield Academy website  Category:Boarding schools in Massachusetts Category:Deerfield, Massachusetts Category:Educational institutions established in the 1790s Category:Private high schools in Massachusetts Category:1797 establishments in Massachusetts Category:Round Square schools Category:Preparatory schools in Massachusetts Category:Deerfield Academy alumni Category:Schools in Franklin County, Massachusetts Category:Co-educational boarding schools
3
After 66 years of service, Frank Boyden retired in 1968.
Mark's, Lawrenceville–Hill, and Deerfield–Choate.
Lanham, Md.: Madison Books (1994)  Cookson, Peter W. Preparing For Power: America's Elite Boarding Schools (1985) (ISBN 0-465-06268-7)
TV PRIVATE EYES: He won an Emmy playing Thomas Magnum
Selleck
Magnum is portrayed by Tom Selleck.
3
Perhaps his most valued possession was his late father's Rolex GMT Master aviator's wristwatch.
The job perks included use of the guest house on his Hawaii estate "Robin's Nest" and use of his red Ferrari 308 GTS in exchange for quality control of the estate security.
Personal details  Personal details: In "Memories are Forever" (Ep.2.05), Magnum’s drivers license was shown briefly on screen giving the viewer the following .
AWARDS: "The Best Intentions" was the 1992 winner of the Golden Palm, the top prize at this film festival
Cannes
The film won the Palme d'Or at the 1992 Cannes Film Festival.
3
On the other hand, the family of his best friend Ernst Åkerblom is wealthy.
Some years later, Anna's father is deceased, Anna suffers from tuberculosis and Henrik has finished his studies.
When he turns down a job offer for a prestigious position in Uppsala, the situation exacerbates.
EDGAR AWARD WINNERS: He won in 1955 for his novel "The Long Goodbye"
Raymond Chandler
The Long Goodbye (novel), a 1953 novel by Raymond Chandler  The Long Goodbye (play), a 1940 one-act play by Tennessee Williams   Films   The Long Goodbye (film), a 1973 film by Robert Altman, adapted from the Raymond Chandler novel (see above)  Long Goodbye (film) or The Head Hunter, a 1982 Hong Kong film by Shing Hon Lau   Music   The Long Goodbye (band), an American band featuring Michael Cera  The Long Goodbye (The Essex Green album), 2003  The Long Goodbye (Procol Harum album), 1995  Long Goodbye: A Tribute to Don Pullen, a 1998 album by David Murray  The Long Goodbye, an album by John Paul White, 2008  "The Long Goodbye" (song), originally recorded by co-writer Paul Brady, also covered by Brooks & Dunn and by co-writer Ronan Keating  "The Long Goodbye", a song by Gary Brooker  "The Long Goodbye", a composition by John Williams and Johnny Mercer, for the 1973 film  "The Long Goodbye", a song by Bruce Springsteen from Human Touch  The Long Goodbye: LCD Soundsystem Live at Madison Square Garden, 2014   Television episodes   "The Long Goodbye" (Beverly Hills, 90210)  "The Long Goodbye" (Casualty)  "The Long Goodbye" (Dallas)  "The Long Goodbye" (Dawson's Creek)
3
The Long Goodbye may refer to:   Books
"The Long Goodbye" (Duet)
"The Long Goodbye" (Flying Blind)  "The Long Goodbye" (Full House)  "The Long Goodbye" (Growing Pains)  "The Long Goodbye" (McLeod's Daughters)  "The Long Goodbye" (The Persuaders!)  "The Long Goodbye" (The Rifleman)  "The Long Goodbye" (Stargate Atlantis)  "The Long Goodbye" (The Torkelsons)  "The Long Goodbye" (The West Wing)
ISLANDS: It's not only Australia's southernmost state, it's the most mountainous as well
Tasmania
Australia (, , colloquially ), officially known as the Commonwealth of Australia, is an Oceanian country comprising the mainland of the Australian continent, the island of Tasmania, and numerous smaller islands.
3
Government  thumb|alt=A large white and cream coloured building with grass on its roof.
Water restrictions are frequently in place in many regions and cities of Australia in response to chronic shortages due to urban population increases and localised drought.
Smith, Terry (1996) "Kngwarreye Woman, Abstract Painter", p. 24 in Emily Kngwarreye –
CHARLES DARWIN: Charles & this American president were born on the same day, February 12, 1809; Charles lived much longer
Abraham Lincoln
In contrast to his comic roles, one of his loftier appearances came as President Abraham Lincoln in 1935.
3
Career In 1920, after a tour wherein he played "rural parts," he was engaged by Christie Studios on Gower Street in Los Angeles.
According to Grace Kingsley in the Jan. 28 edition of the Los Angeles Times, page II11, "It now comes to light that Chic Sale, appearing at the Orpheum this week, will as soon as his present tour is finished, about the middle of next month, return to town in the Capacity of a Christie star.
The Perfect Tribute was a short film dramatizing Lincoln's disappointment at the meagre reaction to his Gettysburg Address.
U.S. ARMY 5-STAR GENERALS: The fifth star was a reward for his service in World War I & he retired at that rank in 1924
Pershing
General John J. Pershing, American Expeditionary Forces (AEF) commander, refused to break up American units to be used as filler material.
3
Tanks were developed by Britain and France, and were first used in combat by the British during the Battle of Flers–Courcelette (part of the Battle of the Somme) on 15 September 1916, with only partial success.
In November 1918, the Allies had ample supplies of men and materiel to invade Germany.
Kitson discovered important new deposits of manganese, used in munitions production, in the Gold Coast.
FOLKS ON SPORTS: A sports radio host, on this HBO drama sponsoring a NASCAR entry: "Here's hoping nobody opens the trunk"
The Sopranos
Many HBO programs have been syndicated to other networks and broadcast television stations (usually after some editing), and a number of HBO-produced series and films have been released on DVD. Since HBO's more successful series (most notably shows such as Sex and the City, The Sopranos, The Wire, Entourage, Six Feet Under, Boardwalk Empire, Game of Thrones and True Blood) air on over-the-air broadcasters in other countries (such as in Canada, Australia and much of Europe – including the United Kingdom), HBO's programming has the potential of being exposed to a higher percentage of the population of those countries compared to the United States.
3
After MTV's successful rollout in 1981, the Standing Room Only series began to produce fewer concerts, but focused more on "world class" music events featuring artists such as Elton John, Tina Turner and Barbra Streisand, as well as fundraisers such as Farm Aid.
That same year, Mattel and Screenlife released a version of the DVD interactive game Scene It?
Only", "HBO Special" or "On Location") in block text, before additional beams sweep across the text and shine, with more flashing into a fade to black.
BOROUGH BABIES: Donald Trump grew up in a 23-room house in Jamaica Estates here
Queens
Early life  Donald John Trump was born on June 14, 1946, in the New York City borough of Queens."Donald Trump’s Old Queens Neighborhood Contrasts
3
The late 1990s saw a resurgence in Trump's financial situation.
Critics pointed out that the proposal would result in the exclusion of many of the most important allies in the country's war on terror, from interpreters helping the CIA to Jordan's King Abdullah, and that it would bolster ISIL by furthering its narrative that the U.S. is pitted against the Muslim faith.
In May 2005 the company emerged from bankruptcy as Trump Entertainment Resorts Holdings.
MY MAINE MAN!: Born in Bar Harbor on July 8, 1908, he succeeded Gerald Ford as VP
Rockefeller
He went on to state: thumb|upright|left|Ford and his golden retriever, Liberty, in the Oval Office, 1974  He also stated:  thumb|upright|Message to Congress nominating Nelson A. Rockefeller to be Vice President (August 20, 1974) A portion of the speech would later be memorialized with a plaque at the entrance to his presidential museum.
3
In addition to the pardon dispute and lingering anti-Republican sentiment, Ford had to counter a plethora of negative media imagery.
President Ford's 1976 election campaign had the advantage that he was an incumbent president during several anniversary events held during the period leading up to the United States Bicentennial.
Jespersen, T. Christopher. "
LATIN AMERICAN LITERATURE: "Aphrodite:  A Memoir Of The Senses" is a 1998 novel from this "House Of The Spirits" author
Isabel Allende
Overall, contemporary literature in the region is vibrant and varied, ranging from the best-selling Paulo Coelho and Isabel Allende to the more avant-garde and critically acclaimed work of writers such as Diamela Eltit, Giannina Braschi, Luisa Valenzuela, Marcos Aguinis, Ricardo Piglia, Roberto Ampuero, Jorge Marchant Lazcano, Alicia Yánez, Jaime Marchán, Jaime Bayly, Manfredo Kempff, Edmundo Paz Soldán, Gioconda Belli, Jorge Franco, Víctor Montoya or Mario Mendoza.
3
In a mock diary by post-modernist Giannina Braschi the Narrator of the Latin American Boom is shot by a Macy's make-up artist who accuses the Boom of capitalizing on her solitude.
Verso.
Supplement I / ed.
REALLY BIG COUNTRIES: Nearly twice as large as Canada, it covers 11% of the Earth's land surface
Russia
By total area (including its waters), Canada is the second-largest country in the world, after Russia.
3
The Cabinet of Liberal Prime Minister Wilfrid Laurier fostered continental European immigrants settling the prairies and Alberta and Saskatchewan became provinces in 1905.
Since the early 20th century, the growth of Canada's manufacturing, mining, and service sectors has transformed the nation from a largely rural economy to an urbanized, industrial one.
In 2012, Canada spent approximately C$31.3 billion on domestic research and development, of which around $7 billion was provided by the federal and provincial governments.
BRITTANY: Born in Brittany, he hit the Jacquespot when he voyaged to Canada & discovered the St. Lawrence River
Jacques Cartier
In 1535, indigenous inhabitants of the present-day Quebec City region used the word to direct French explorer Jacques Cartier to the village of Stadacona.
3
French explorer Samuel de Champlain arrived in 1603 and established the first permanent European settlements at Port Royal (in 1605) and Quebec City (in 1608).
Although more than 85 percent of French-speaking Canadians live in Quebec, there are substantial Francophone populations in New Brunswick, Alberta,  and Manitoba;  Ontario has the largest French-speaking population outside Quebec.
Several aboriginal languages have official status in the Northwest Territories.
DEATH IN POP: In 1997 Elton John reworked this Marilyn Monroe tribute as a farewell to Princess Diana
"Candle In The Wind"
It contained the US number 1 "Bennie and the Jets", along with other hits, "Goodbye Yellow Brick Road", "Candle in the Wind", "Saturday Night's Alright for Fighting" and "Funeral for a Friend/Love Lies Bleeding".
3
The two comics spent the episode pointing him in the direction of everywhere except the stage in order to prevent him singing.
After gay marriage became legal in England in March 2014, John and Furnish married in Windsor, Berkshire, on 21 December 2014, the ninth anniversary of their civil partnership.
production  Paul Buckmaster –
LYRICISTS: He & Elton John met when both answered an ad placed by Liberty Records in 1967
Bernie Taupin
He has worked with lyricist Bernie Taupin as his songwriting partner since 1967; they have collaborated on more than 30 albums to date.
3
The Guinness World Records 2009 states that the song is "the biggest-selling single since UK and US singles charts began in the 1950s, having accumulated worldwide sales of 33million copies".
To raise money for his AIDS charity, he annually hosts a glamorous White Tie & Tiara Ball
guitar  Labelle – vocals, background vocals  David Crosby – vocals, background vocals  Graham Nash – vocals, background vocals  London Symphony Orchestra  London Philharmonic Orchestra  Melbourne Symphony Orchestra  Royal Philharmonic Orchestra  David Sanborn –
THE EMERALD AISLE: John Boorman's man-returns-to-the-jungle film "The Emerald Forest" takes place mostly in this S.A. country
Brazil
The Emerald Forest is a 1985 British film set in the Brazilian Rainforest.
3
The chief informs Markham that he admires his tenacity, comparing him to a jaguar, and that after a night's head-start into the jungle he will be hunted at daybreak.
He comes to understand his son's transformation and the tribe's way of life, forging a begrudging respect for the chief who took him as a child.
Kaciri's cousin Silvana de Faria –
MATTERS MATHEMATICAL: The fraction 1/5 cubed equals 5 to the power of this
-3
The Buckley-class Destroyer Escorts Naval Institute Press ISBN 1-55750-280-3 p.34Mk32 Mod0TwinEnclosed base ringCruisers, aircraft carriersMk32 Mod4TwinEnclosed base ringCruisers, aircraft carriersMk37 Mod0SingleOpen pedestalArmed merchants, auxiliariesMk38 Mod0TwinEnclosed base ringDestroyers, Atlanta class light cruisers  Ammunition delivery Since this gun fires semi-fixed ammunition, each round is delivered to the gun in two pieces — a projectile and a powder case.
3
The Mk12 gun assembly weighs .
The Rammer Control is pushed to the up position by a cam on top of the Housing.
Variations to the basic design are called Modifications (or its abbreviation Mod).
CROSSWORD CLUES "A": Clock warning        (5)
Alarm
The Buckley-class Destroyer Escorts Naval Institute Press ISBN 1-55750-280-3 p.34Mk32 Mod0TwinEnclosed base ringCruisers, aircraft carriersMk32 Mod4TwinEnclosed base ringCruisers, aircraft carriersMk37 Mod0SingleOpen pedestalArmed merchants, auxiliariesMk38 Mod0TwinEnclosed base ringDestroyers, Atlanta class light cruisers  Ammunition delivery Since this gun fires semi-fixed ammunition, each round is delivered to the gun in two pieces — a projectile and a powder case.
3
This mount was the standard installation on battleships, cruisers, early destroyer leader classes (these mounts on the DL's were single-purpose/anti-surface ship only), and later destroyers.
Fuze setter  right|thumb|Single Mount Fuze-setting Indicator RegulatorHe operates the equipment which sets the fuze time on projectiles with mechanical time fuzes.
At the ogive and rear ends are threaded openings used to the install the shell's filler and hold the fuzes.
GEOGRAPHY: About 1/3 of Africa's Pygmy population lives in what was once Belgian Congo
Zaire
Post-colonial Africa thumb|upright|left|Mobutu Sese Seko, Zaire's longtime dictator, embezzled over $5 billion from his country.
3
ISBN 0-19-927186-0.
Transformations in Slavery: A History of Slavery in Africa p 25 by Paul E. Lovejoy More than 1 million Europeans were captured by Barbary pirates and sold as slaves in North Africa between the 16th and 19th centuries.
The Khoisan languages number about fifty and are spoken in Southern Africa by approximately 120,000 people.
SHAPELY COUNTRIES: This island off the coast of Africa is where you might find Alex, Marty and Melman
Madagascar
The continent includes Madagascar and various archipelagos.
3
The Skull of Australopithecus Afarensis, Oxford University Press US.
The gradual decline of slave-trading, prompted by a lack of demand for slaves in the New World, increasing anti-slavery legislation in Europe and America, and the British Royal Navy's increasing presence off the West African coast, obliged African states to adopt new economies.
Jenny Aker, Isaac Mbiti, "Mobile Phones and Economic Development in Africa" SSRN.  Geography  thumb|Satellite photo of Africa.
WORLD CITIES: This Egyptian city is the most populous in Africa & the Middle East
Cairo
andterritory, with flag Area(km²) PopulationUSCensusBureau:Countries and Areas Ranked by Population: 2009 Year Density(per km²) CapitalNorthern Africa2,381,74034,178,188200914Algiers (Spain)The Spanish Canary Islands, of which Las Palmas de Gran Canaria are Santa Cruz de Tenerife are co-capitals, are often considered part of Northern Africa due to their relative proximity to Morocco and Western Sahara; population and area figures are for 2001.7,4922,118,5192010226Las Palmas de Gran Canaria,Santa Cruz de Tenerife (Spain)The Spanish exclave of Ceuta is surrounded on land by Morocco in Northern Africa; population and area figures are for 2001.2071,50520013,575—Egypt is generally considered a transcontinental country in Northern Africa (UN region) and Western Asia; population and area figures are for African portion only, west of the Suez Canal.1,001,45082,868,000201283Cairo1,759,5406,310,43420094Tripoli (Portugal)The Portuguese Madeira Islands are often considered part of Northern Africa due to their relative proximity to Morocco; population and area figures are for 2001.797245,0002001307Funchal (Spain)The Spanish exclave of Melilla is surrounded on land by Morocco in Northern Africa; population and area figures are for 2001.1266,41120015,534—446,55034,859,364200978Rabat1,861,48430,894,000200817Khartoum163,61010,486,339200964Tunis Western SaharaThe territory of Western Sahara is claimed by the Sahrawi Arab Democratic Republic and Morocco.
3
Africa's total population surpassing   other continents is fairly recent; African population surpassed Europe in the 1990s, while the Americas was overtaken sometime around the year 2000; Africa's rapid population growth is expected to overtake the only two nations currently larger than its population, at roughly the same time - India and China's 1.4 billion people each will swap ranking around the year 2022.http://www.nytimes.com/2015/07/30/world/asia/india-will-be-most-populous-country-sooner-than-thought-un-says.html?_r=0 NYT India Will Be Most Populous Country Sooner Than Thought, U.N. Says right|upright|thumb|San Bushman man from Botswana Speakers of Bantu languages (part of the Niger–Congo family) are the majority in southern, central and southeast Africa.
The Berber-speaking Tuareg and other often-nomadic peoples are the principal inhabitants of the Saharan interior of North Africa.
Council of Europe, p. 25.
I ONLY HAVE "I"s FOR YOU: Hedera Helix is the English variety of this climbing plant
ivy
Hedera helix (common ivy, English ivy, European ivy, or just ivy) is a species of flowering plant in the family Araliaceae, native to most of Europe and western Asia.
2
Hedera chrysocarpa Walsh)southeast Europe and southwest Asia (Italy, Balkans, Turkey), plants without rhizomes, orange-yellow ripe fruit H. h. rhizomatifera McAllistersoutheast Spain, plants rhizomatiferous, purple-black ripe fruit  The closely related species Hedera canariensis and Hedera hibernica are also often treated as subspecies of H. helix, though they differ in chromosome number so do not hybridise readily.
Bown. D. (1995).
CHILDREN'S LIT: 2 of his many books are "The Foot Book" & "The 500 Hats of Bartholomew Cubbins"
Dr. Seuss
The Foot Book: Dr. Seuss's Wacky Book of Opposites is a children's book written by Dr. Seuss and first published in 1968.
2
ISBN 0-930751-11-6
Big Brother Mouse, a publishing project in Laos, drew on The Foot Book to develop Baby Frog, Baby Monkey, a book for very young readers that uses rhymes, repetition, and the pairing of opposite words in the same style.
